
The Color of Magic
Prologue
IN A DISTANT AND SECONDHAND SET OF DIMENSIONS, in an astral
plane that was never meant to fly, the curling star-mists waver and part…
See…
Great A’Tuin the turtle comes, swimming slowly through the interstellar gulf,
hydrogen frost on his ponderous limbs, his huge and ancient shell pocked with
meteor craters. Through sea-sized eyes that are crusted with rheum and asteroid
dust He stares fixedly at the Destination.
In a brain bigger than a city, with geological slowness, He thinks only of the
Weight.
Most of the weight is of course accounted for by Berilia, Tubul, Great T’Phon
and Jerakeen, the four giant elephants upon whose broad and star-tanned
shoulders the Disc of the World rests, garlanded by the long waterfall at its vast
circumference and domed by the baby-blue vault of Heaven.
Astropsychology has been, as yet, unable to establish what they think about.
The Great Turtle was a mere hypothesis until the day the small and secretive
kingdom of Krull, whose rim-most mountains project out over the Rimfall, built
a gantry and pulley arrangement at the tip of the most precipitous crag and
lowered several observers over the Edge in a quartz-windowed brass vessel to
peer through the mist veils.
The early astrozoologists, hauled back from their long dangle by enormous
teams of slaves, were able to bring back much information about the shape and
nature of A’Tuin and the elephants but this did not resolve fundamental
questions about the nature and purpose of the universe.
For example, what was A’Tuin’s actual sex? This vital question, said the
astrozoologists with mounting authority, would not be answered until a larger
and more powerful gantry was constructed for a deep-space vessel. In the
meantime they could only speculate about the revealed cosmos.
There was, for example, the theory that A’Tuin had come from nowhere and
would continue at a uniform crawl, or steady gait, into nowhere, for all time.
This theory was popular among academics.
An alternative, favored by those of a religious persuasion, was that A’Tuin was
crawling from the Birthplace to the Time of Mating, as were all the stars in the
sky which were, obviously, also carried by giant turtles. When they arrived they
would briefly and passionately mate, for the first and only time, and from that
fiery union new turtles would be born to carry a new pattern of worlds. This was
known as the Big Bang hypothesis.
Thus it was that a young cosmochelonian of the Steady Gait faction, testing a
new telescope with which he hoped to make measurements of the precise albedo
of Great A’Tuin’s right eye, was on this eventful evening the first outsider to see
the smoke rise hubward from the burning of the oldest city in the world.
Later that night he became so engrossed in his studies he completely forgot
about it. Nevertheless, he was the first.
There were others…
THE COLOR OF MAGIC
Fire roared through the bifurcated city of Ankh-Morpork. Where it licked the
Wizards’ Quarter it burned blue and green and was even laced with strange
sparks of the eighth color, octarine; where its outriders found their way into the
vats and oil stores all along Merchant Street it progressed in a series of blazing
fountains and explosions; in the streets of the perfume blenders it burned with a
sweetness; where it touched bundles of rare and dry herbs in the storerooms of
the drugmasters it made men go mad and talk to God.
By now the whole of downtown Morpork was alight, and the richer and worthier
citizens of Ankh on the far bank were bravely responding to the situation by
feverishly demolishing the bridges. But already the ships in the Morpork docks
—laden with grain, cotton and timber, and coated with tar—were blazing merrily
and, their moorings burnt to ashes, were breasting the river Ankh on the ebb tide,
igniting riverside palaces and bowers as they drifted like drowning fireflies
toward the sea. In any case, sparks were riding the breeze and touching down far
across the river in hidden gardens and remote rickyards.
The smoke from the merry burning rose miles high, in a wind-sculpted black
column that could be seen across the whole of the Discworld.
It was certainly impressive from the cool, dark hilltop a few leagues away, where
two figures were watching with considerable interest.
The taller of the pair was chewing on a chicken leg and leaning on a sword that
was only marginally shorter than the average man. If it wasn’t for the air of wary
intelligence about him it might have been supposed that he was a barbarian from
the Hubland wastes.
His partner was much shorter and wrapped from head to toe in a brown cloak.
Later, when he has occasion to move, it will be seen that he moves lightly,
catlike.
The two had barely exchanged a word in the last twenty minutes except for a
short and inconclusive argument as to whether a particularly powerful explosion
had been the oil bond store or the workshop of Kerible the Enchanter. Money
hinged on the fact.
Now the big man finished gnawing at the bone and tossed it into the grass,
smiling ruefully.
“There go all those little alleyways,” he said. “I liked them.”
“All the treasure houses,” said the small man. He added thoughtfully, “Do gems
burn? I wonder. ’Tis said they’re kin to coal.”
“All the gold, melting and running down the gutters,” said the big one, ignoring
him. “And all the wine, boiling in the barrels.”
“There were rats,” said his brown companion.
“Rats, I’ll grant you.”
“It was no place to be in high summer.”
“That, too. One can’t help feeling, though, a—well, a momentary—”
He trailed off, then brightened. “We owed old Fredor at the Crimson Leech eight
silver pieces,” he added. The little man nodded.
They were silent for a while as a whole new series of explosions carved a red
line across a hitherto dark section of the greatest city in the world. Then the big
man stirred.
“Weasel?”
“Yes?”
“I wonder who started it.”
The small swordsman known as the Weasel said nothing. He was watching the
road in the ruddy light. Few had come that way since the Deosil Gate had been
one of the first to collapse in a shower of white-hot embers.
But two were coming up it now. The Weasel’s eyes, always at their sharpest in
gloom and half-light, made out the shapes of two mounted men and some sort of
low beast behind them. Doubtless a rich merchant escaping with as much
treasure as he could lay frantic hands on. The Weasel said as much to his
companion, who sighed.
“The status of footpad ill suits us,” said the barbarian, “but, as you say, times are
hard and there are no soft beds tonight.”
He shifted his grip on his sword and, as the leading rider drew near, stepped out
onto the road with a hand held up and his face set in a grin nicely calculated to
reassure yet threaten.
“Your pardon, sir—” he began.
The rider reined in his horse and drew back his hood. The big man looked into a
face blotched with superficial burns and punctuated by tufts of singed beard.
Even the eyebrows had gone.
“Bugger off,” said the face. “You’re Bravd the Hublander,* aren’t you?”
Bravd became aware that he had fumbled the initiative.
“Just go away, will you?” said the rider. “I just haven’t got time for you, do you
understand?”
He looked around and added: “That goes for your shadow-loving fleabag
partner, too, wherever he’s hiding.”
The Weasel stepped up to the horse and peered at the disheveled figure.
“Why, it’s Rincewind the wizard, isn’t it?” he said in tones of delight, meanwhile
filing the wizard’s description of him in his memory for leisurely vengeance. “I
thought I recognized the voice.”
Bravd spat and sheathed his sword. It was seldom worth tangling with wizards,
they so rarely had any treasure worth speaking of.
“He talks pretty big for a gutter wizard,” he muttered.
“You don’t understand at all,” said the wizard wearily. “I’m so scared of you my
spine has turned to jelly, it’s just that I’m suffering from an overdose of terror
right now. I mean, when I’ve got over that then I’ll have time to be decently
frightened of you.”
The Weasel pointed toward the burning city.
“You’ve been through that?” he asked.
The wizard rubbed a red-raw hand across his eyes. “I was there when it started.
See him? Back there?” He pointed back down the road to where his traveling
companion was still approaching, having adopted a method of riding that
involved falling out of the saddle every few seconds.
“Well?” said Weasel.
“He started it,” said Rincewind simply.
Bravd and Weasel looked at the figure, now hopping across the road with one
foot in a stirrup.
“Fire-raiser, is he?” said Bravd at last.
“No,” said Rincewind. “Not precisely. Let’s just say that if complete and utter
chaos were lightning, then he’d be the sort to stand on a hilltop in a thunderstorm
wearing wet copper armor and shouting ‘All gods are bastards.’ Got any food?”
“There’s some chicken,” said Weasel. “In exchange for a story.”
“What’s his name?” said Bravd, who tended to lag behind in conversations.
“Twoflower.”
“Twoflower?” said Bravd. “What a funny name.”
“You,” said Rincewind, dismounting, “do not know the half of it. Chicken, you
say?”
“Deviled,” said Weasel. The wizard groaned.
“That reminds me,” added the Weasel, snapping his fingers, “there was a really
big explosion about, oh, half an hour ago—”
“That was the oil bond store going up,” said Rincewind, wincing at the memory
of the burning rain.
Weasel turned and grinned expectantly at his companion, who grunted and
handed over a coin from his pouch. Then there was a scream from the roadway,
cut off abruptly. Rincewind did not look up from his chicken.
“One of the things he can’t do, he can’t ride a horse,” he said. Then he stiffened
as if sandbagged by a sudden recollection, gave a small yelp of terror and dashed
into the gloom. When he returned, the being called Twoflower was hanging
limply over his shoulder. It was small and skinny, and dressed very oddly in a
pair of knee length britches and a shirt in such a violent and vivid conflict of
colors that Weasel’s fastidious eye was offended even in the half-light.
“No bones broken, by the feel of things,” said Rincewind. He was breathing
heavily. Bravd winked at the Weasel and went to investigate the shape that they
assumed was a pack animal.
“You’d be wise to forget it,” said the wizard, without looking up from his
examination of the unconscious Twoflower. “Believe me. A power protects it.”
“A spell?” said Weasel, squatting down.
“No-oo. But magic of a kind, I think. Not the usual sort. I mean, it can turn gold
into copper while at the same time it is still gold, it makes men rich by
destroying their possessions, it allows the weak to walk fearlessly among
thieves, it passes through the strongest doors to leach the most protected
treasuries. Even now it has me enslaved—so that I must follow this madman
willynilly and protect him from harm. It’s stronger than you, Bravd. It is, I think,
more cunning even than you, Weasel.”
“What is it called then, this mighty magic?”
Rincewind shrugged. “In our tongue it is called reflected-sound-as-ofunderground-
spirits. Is there any wine?”
“You must know that I am not without artifice where magic is concerned,” said
Weasel. “Only last year did I—assisted by my friend there—part the notoriously
powerful Archmage of Ymitury from his staff, his belt of moon jewels and his
life, in that approximate order. I do not fear this reflected-sound-of-undergroundspirits
of which you speak. However,” he added, “you engage my interest.
Perhaps you would care to tell me more?”
Bravd looked at the shape on the road. It was closer now, and clearer in the predawn
light. It looked for all the world like a—
“A box on legs?” he said.
“I’ll tell you about it,” said Rincewind. “If there’s any wine, that is.”
Down in the valley there was a roar and a hiss. Someone more thoughtful than
the rest had ordered to be shut the big river gates that were at the point where the
Ankh flowed out of the twin city. Denied its usual egress, the river had burst its
banks and was pouring down the fire-ravaged streets. Soon the continent of
flame became a series of islands, each one growing smaller as the dark tide rose.
And up from the city of fumes and smoke rose a broiling cloud of steam,
covering the stars. Weasel thought that it looked like some dark fungus or
mushroom.
The twin city of proud Ankh and pestilent Morpork, of which all the other cities
of time and space are, as it were, mere reflections, has stood many assaults in its
long and crowded history and has always risen to flourish again. So the fire and
its subsequent flood, which destroyed everything left that was not flammable and
added a particularly noisome flux to the survivors’ problems, did not mark its
end. Rather it was a fiery punctuation mark, a coal-like comma, or salamander
semicolon, in a continuing story.
Several days before these events a ship came up the Ankh on the dawn tide and
fetched up, among many others, in the maze of wharves and docks on the
Morpork shore. It carried a cargo of pink pearls, milk nuts, pumice, some official
letters for the Patrician of Ankh, and a man.
It was the man who engaged the attention of Blind Hugh, one of the beggars on
early duty at Pearl Dock. He nudged Cripple Wa in the ribs, and pointed
wordlessly.
Now the stranger was standing on the quayside, watching several straining
seamen carry a large, brass-bound chest down the gangplank. Another man,
obviously the captain, was standing beside him. There was about the seamen—
every nerve in Blind Hugh’s body, which tended to vibrate in the presence of
even a small amount of impure gold at fifty paces, screamed into his brain—the
air of one anticipating imminent enrichment.
Sure enough, when the chest had been deposited on the cobbles, the stranger
reached into a pouch and there was the flash of a coin. Several coins. Gold.
Blind Hugh, his body twanging like a hazel rod in the presence of water,
whistled to himself. Then he nudged Wa again, and sent him scurrying off down
a nearby alley into the heart of the city.
When the captain walked back onto his ship, leaving the newcomer looking
faintly bewildered on the quayside, Blind Hugh snatched up his begging cup and
made his way across the street with an ingratiating leer. At the sight of him the
stranger started to fumble urgently with his money pouch.
“Good day to thee, sire,” Blind Hugh began, and found himself looking up into a
face with four eyes in it. He turned to run.
“!” said the stranger, and grabbed his arm. Hugh was aware that the sailors lining
the rail of the ship were laughing at him. At the same time his specialized senses
detected an overpowering impression of money. He froze. The stranger let go
and quickly thumbed through a small black book he had taken from his belt.
Then he said “Hallo.”
“What?” said Hugh. The man looked blank.
“Hallo?” he repeated, rather louder than necessary and so carefully that Hugh
could hear the vowels tinkling into place.
“Hallo yourself,” Hugh riposted. The stranger smiled widely fumbled yet again
in the pouch. This time his hand came out holding a large gold coin. It was in
fact slightly larger than an 8,000-dollar Ankhian crown and the design on it was
unfamiliar, but it spoke inside Hugh’s mind in a language he understood
perfectly. My current owner, it said, is in need of succor and assistance; why not
give it to him, so you and me can go off somewhere and enjoy ourselves?
Subtle changes in the beggar’s posture made the stranger feel more at ease. He
consulted the small book again.
“I wish to be directed to a hotel, tavern, lodging house, inn, hospice,
caravanserai,” he said.
“What, all of them?” said Hugh, taken aback.
“?” said the stranger.
Hugh was aware that a small crowd of fishwives, shellfish diggers and freelance
gawpers were watching them with interest.
“Look,” he said, “I know a good tavern, is that enough?” He shuddered to think
of the gold coin escaping from his life. He’d keep that one, even if Ymor
confiscated all the rest. And the big chest that comprised most of the
newcomer’s luggage looked to be full of gold, Hugh decided.
The four-eyed man looked at his book.
“I would like to be directed to a hotel, place of repose, tavern, a—”
“Yes, all right. Come on then,” said Hugh hurriedly. He picked up one of the
bundles and walked away quickly. The stranger, after a moment’s hesitation,
strolled after him.
A train of thought shunted its way through Hugh’s mind. Getting the newcomer
to the Broken Drum so easily was a stroke of luck, no doubt of it, and Ymor
would probably reward him. But for all his new acquaintance’s mildness there
was something about him that made Hugh uneasy, and for the life of him he
couldn’t figure out what it was. Not the two extra eyes, odd though they were.
There was something else. He glanced back.
The little man was ambling along in the middle of the street, looking around him
with an expression of keen interest.
Something else Hugh saw nearly made him gibber.
The massive wooden chest, which he had last seen resting solidly on the
quayside, was following on its master’s heels with a gentle rocking gait. Slowly,
in case a sudden movement on his part might break his fragile control over his
own legs, Hugh bent slightly so that he could see under the chest.
There were lots and lots of little legs.
Very deliberately, Hugh turned around and walked very carefully toward the
Broken Drum.
“Odd,” said Ymor.
“He had this big wooden chest,” added Cripple Wa.
“He’d have to be a merchant or a spy,” said Ymor. He pulled a scrap of meat
from the cutlet in his hand and tossed it into the air. It hadn’t reached the zenith
of its arc before a black shape detached itself from the shadows in the corner of
the room and swooped down, taking the morsel in midair.
“A merchant or a spy,” repeated Ymor. “I’d prefer a spy. A spy pays for himself
twice, because there’s always the reward when we turn him in. What do you
think, Withel?”
Opposite Ymor the second greatest thief in Ankh-Morpork half closed his one
eye and shrugged.
“I’ve checked on the ship,” he said. “It’s a freelance trader. Does the occasional
run to the Brown Islands. People there are just savages. They don’t understand
about spies and I expect they eat merchants.”
“He looked a bit like a merchant,” volunteered Wa. “Except he wasn’t fat.”
There was a flutter of wings at the window. Ymor shifted his bulk out of the
chair and crossed the room, coming back with a large raven. After he’d
unfastened the message capsule from its leg it flew up to join its fellows lurking
among the rafters. Withel regarded it without love. Ymor’s ravens were
notoriously loyal to their master, to the extent that Withel’s one attempt to
promote himself to the rank of greatest thief in Ankh-Morpork had cost their
master’s right-hand man his left eye. But not his life, however. Ymor never
grudged a man his ambitions.
“B12,” said Ymor, tossing the little phial aside and unrolling the tiny scroll
within.
“Gorrin the Cat,” said Withel automatically. “On station up in the gong tower at
the Temple of Small Gods.”
“He says Hugh has taken our stranger to the Broken Drum. Well, that’s good
enough. Broadman is a—friend of ours, isn’t he?”
“Aye,” said Withel. “If he knows what’s good for trade.”·
“Among his customers has been your man Gorrin,” said Ymor pleasantly, “for
he writes here about a box on legs, if I read this scrawl correctly.” He looked at
Withel over the top of the paper.
Withel looked away. “He will be disciplined,” he said flatly. Wa looked at the
man leaning back in his chair, his black-clad frame resting as nonchalantly as a
Rimland puma on a jungle branch, and decided that Gorrin atop Small Gods
Temple would soon be joining those little deities in the multifold dimensions of
Beyond. And he owed Wa three copper pieces.
Ymor crumpled the note and tossed it into a corner. “I think we’ll wander along
to the Drum later on, Withel. Perhaps, too, we may try this beer that your men
find so tempting.”
Withel said nothing. Being Ymor’s right-hand man was like being gently flogged
to death with scented bootlaces.
The twin city of Ankh-Morpork, foremost of all the cities bounding the Circle
Sea, was as a matter of course the home of a large number of gangs, thieves’
guilds, syndicates and similar organizations. This was one of the reasons for its
wealth. Most of the humbler folk on the widdershin side of the river, in
Morpork’s mazy alleys, supplemented their meager incomes by filling some
small role for one or other of the competing gangs. So it was that by the time
Hugh and Twoflower entered the courtyard of the Broken Drum the leaders of a
number of them were aware that someone had arrived in the city who appeared
to have much treasure. Some reports from the more observant spies included
details about a book that told the stranger what to say, and a box that walked by
itself. These facts were immediately discounted. No magician capable of such
enchantments ever came within a mile of Morpork docks.
It still being that hour when most of the city was just rising or about to go to bed
there were few people in the Drum to watch Twoflower descend the stairs. When
the Luggage appeared behind him and started to lurch confidently down the
steps the customers at the rough wooden tables, as one man, looked suspiciously
at their drinks.
Broadman was browbeating the small troll who swept the bar when the trio
walked past him. “What in hell’s that?” he said.
“Just don’t talk about it,” hissed Hugh. Twoflower was already thumbing
through his book.
“What’s he doing?” said Broadman, arms akimbo.
“It tells him what to say. I know it sounds ridiculous,” muttered Hugh.
“How can a book tell a man what to say?”
“I wish for an accommodation, a room, lodgings, the lodging house, full board,
are your rooms clean, a room with a view, what is your rate for one night?” said
Twoflower in one breath.
Broadman looked at Hugh. The beggar shrugged.
“He’s got plenty money,” he said.
“Tell him it’s three copper pieces, then. And that Thing will have to go in the
stable.”
“?” said the stranger. Broadman held up three thick red fingers and the man’s
face was suddenly a sunny display of comprehension. He reached into his pouch
and laid three large gold pieces in Broadman’s palm.
Broadman stared at them. They represented about four times the worth of the
Broken Drum, staff included. He looked at Hugh. There was no help there. He
looked at the stranger. He swallowed.
“Yes,” he said, in an unnaturally high voice. “And then there’s meals, o’course.
Uh. You understand, yes? Food. You eat. No?” He made the appropriate
motions.
“Fut?” said the little man.
“Yes,” said Broadman, beginning to sweat. “Have a look in your little book, I
should.”
The man opened the book and ran a finger down one page. Broadman, who
could read after a fashion, peered over the top of the volume. What he saw made
no sense.
“Fooood,” said the stranger. “Yes. Cutlet, hash, chop, stew, ragout, fricassee,
mince, collops, soufflé, dumpling, blancmange, sorbet, gruel, sausage, not to
have a sausage, beans, without a bean, kickshaws, jelly, jam. Giblets.” He
beamed at Broadman.
“All that?” said the innkeeper weakly.
“It’s just the way he talks,” said Hugh. “Don’t ask me why. He just does.”
All eyes in the room were watching the stranger—except for a pair belonging to
Rincewind the wizard, who was sitting in the darkest corner nursing a mug of
very small beer.
He was watching the Luggage.
Watch Rincewind.
Look at him. Scrawny, like most wizards, and clad in a dark red robe on which a
few mystic sigils were embroidered in tarnished sequins. Some might have taken
him for a mere apprentice enchanter who had run away from his master out of
defiance, boredom, fear and a lingering taste for heterosexuality. Yet around his
neck was a chain bearing the bronze octagon that marked him as an alumnus of
Unseen University, the high school of magic whose time-and-space transcendent
campus is never precisely Here or There. Graduates were usually destined for
mageship at least, but Rincewind—after an unfortunate event—had left knowing
only one spell and made a living of sorts around the town by capitalizing on an
innate gift for languages. He avoided work as a rule, but had a quickness of wit
that put his acquaintances in mind of a bright rodent. And he knew sapient
pearwood when he saw it. He was seeing it now, and didn’t quite believe it.
An archmage, by dint of great effort and much expenditure of time, might
eventually obtain a small staff made from the timber of the sapient pear tree. It
grew only on the sites of ancient magic. There were probably no more than two
such staffs in all the cities of the Circle Sea. A large chest of it…Rincewind tried
to work it out, and decided that even if the box were crammed with star opals
and sticks of auricholatum the contents would not be worth one-tenth the price
of the container. A vein started to throb in his forehead.
He stood up and made his way to the trio.
“May I be of assistance?” he ventured.
“Shove off, Rincewind,” snarled Broadman.
“I only thought it might be useful to address this gentleman in his own tongue,”
said the wizard gently.
“He’s doing all right on his own,” said the innkeeper, but took a few steps
backward.
Rincewind smiled politely at the stranger and tried a few words of Chimeran. He
prided himself on his fluency in the tongue, but the stranger only looked
bemused.
“It won’t work,” said Hugh knowledgeably. “It’s the book, you see. It tells him
what to say. Magic.”
Rincewind switched to High Borogravian, to Vanglemesht, Sumtri and even
Black Oroogu, the language with no nouns and only one adjective, which is
obscene. Each was met with polite incomprehension. In desperation he tried
heathen Trob, and the little man’s face split into a delighted grin.
“At last!” he said. “My good sir! This is remarkable!” (Although in Trob the last
word in fact became “a thing which may happen but once in the usable lifetime
of a canoe hollowed diligently by ax and fire from the tallest diamondwood tree
that grows in the noted diamondwood forests on the lower slopes of Mount
Awayawa, home of the firegods or so it is said.”)
“What was all that?” said Broadman suspiciously.
“What did the innkeeper say?” said the little man.
Rincewind swallowed. “Broadman,” he said. “Two mugs of your best ale,
please.”
“You can understand him?”
“Oh, sure.”
“Tell him—tell him he’s very welcome. Tell him breakfast is—uh—one gold
piece.” For a moment Broadman’s face looked as though some vast internal
struggle was going on, and then he added with a burst of generosity, “I’ll throw
in yours, too.”
“Stranger,” said Rincewind levelly. “If you stay here you will be knifed or
poisoned by nightfall. But don’t stop smiling, or so will I.”
“Oh, come now,” said the stranger, looking around. “This looks like a delightful
place. A genuine Morporkean tavern. I’ve heard so much about them, you know.
All these quaint old beams. And so reasonable, too.”
Rincewind glanced around quickly, in case some leakage of enchantment from
the Magician’s Quarter across the river had momentarily transported them to
some other place. No—this was still the interior of the Drum, its walls stained
with smoke, its floor a compost of old rushes and nameless beetles, its sour beer
not so much purchased as merely hired for a while. He tried to fit the image
around the word “quaint,” or rather the nearest Trob equivalent, which was “that
pleasant oddity of design found in the little coral houses of the sponge-eating
pigmies on the Orohai peninsular.”
His mind reeled back from the effort. The visitor went on, “My name is
Twoflower,” and extended his hand. Instinctively, the other three looked down to
see if there was a coin in it.
“Pleased to meet you,” said Rincewind. “I’m Rincewind. Look, I wasn’t joking.
This is a tough place.”
“Good! Exactly what I wanted!”
“Eh?”
“What is this stuff in the mugs?”
“This? Beer. Thanks, Broadman. Yes. Beer. You know. Beer.”
“Ah. The so-typical drink. A small gold piece will be sufficient payment, do you
think? I do not want to cause offense.”
It was already half out of his purse.
“Yarrt,” croaked Rincewind. “I mean, no, it won’t cause offense.”
“Good. You say this is a tough place. Frequented, you mean, by heroes and men
of adventure?”
Rincewind considered this. “Yes?” he managed.
“Excellent. I would like to meet some.”
An explanation occurred to the wizard. “Ah,” he said. “You’ve come to hire
mercenaries (‘warriors who fight for the tribe with most milknut meal’)?”
“Oh no. I just want to meet them. So that when I get home I can say that I did
it.”
Rincewind thought that a meeting with most of the Drum’s clientele would mean
that Twoflower never went home again, unless he lived downriver and happened
to float past.
“Where is your home?” he inquired. Broadman had slipped away into some back
room, he noticed. Hugh was watching them suspiciously from a nearby table.
“Have you heard of the city of Bes Palargic?”
“Well, I didn’t spend much time in Trob. I was just passing through, you know
—”
“Oh, it’s not in Trob. I speak Trob because there are many beTrobi sailors in our
ports. Bes Palargic is the major seaport of the Agatean Empire.”
“Never heard of it, I’m afraid?”
Twoflower raised his eyebrows. “No? It is quite big. You sail turnwise from the
Brown Islands for about a week and there it is. Are you all right?”
He hurried around the table and patted the wizard on the back. Rincewind
choked on his beer.
The Counterweight Continent!
Three streets away an old man dropped a coin into a saucer of acid and swirled it
gently. Broadman waited impatiently, ill at ease in a room made noisome by vats
and bubbling beakers and lined with shelves containing shadowy shapes
suggestive of skulls and stuffed impossibilities.
“Well?” he demanded.
“One cannot hurry these things,” said the old alchemist peevishly. “Assaying
takes time. Ah.” He prodded the saucer, where the coin now lay in a swirl of
green color. He made some calculations on a scrap of parchment.
“Exceptionally interesting,” he said at last.
“Is it genuine?”
The old man pursed his lips. “It depends on how you define the term,” he said.
“If you mean: is this coin the same as, say, a fifty-dollar piece, then the answer is
no.”
“I knew it,” screamed the innkeeper, and started toward the door.
“I’m not sure that I’m making myself clear,” said the alchemist. Broadman
turned around angrily.
“What do you mean?”
“Well, you see, what with one thing and another our coinage has been somewhat
watered, over the years. The gold content of the average coin is barely four parts
in twelve, the balance being made up of silver, copper—”
“What of it?”
“I said this coin isn’t like ours. It is pure gold.”
After Broadman had left, at a run, the alchemist spent some time staring at the
ceiling. Then he drew out a very small piece of thin parchment, rummaged for a
pen amongst the debris on his workbench, and wrote a very short, small,
message. Then he went over to his cages of white doves, black cockerels and
other laboratory animals. From one cage he removed a glossy coated rat, rolled
the parchment into the phial attached to a hind leg, and let the animal go.
It sniffed around the floor for a moment, then disappeared down a hole in the far
wall.
At about this time a hitherto unsuccessful fortune teller living on the other side
of the block chanced to glance into her scrying bowl, gave a small scream and,
within the hour, had sold her jewelry, various magical accoutrements, most of
her clothes and almost all her other possessions that could not be conveniently
carried on the fastest horse she could buy. The fact that later on, when her house
collapsed in flames, she herself died in a freak landslide in the Morpork
Mountains, proves that Death, too, has a sense of humor.
Also at about the same moment as the homing rat disappeared into the maze of
runs under the city, scurrying along in faultless obedience to an ancient instinct,
the Patrician of Ankh-Morpork picked up the letters delivered that morning by
albatross. He looked pensively at the topmost one again, and summoned his
chief of spies.
And in the Broken Drum Rincewind was listening open-mouthed as Twoflower
talked.
“So I decided to see for myself,” the little man was saying. “Eight years’ saving
up, this has cost me. But worth every half-rhinu. I mean, here I am. In Ankh-
Morpork. Famed in song and story, I mean. In the streets that have known the
tread of Heric Whiteblade, Hrun the Barbarian, and Bravd the Hublander and the
Weasel…It’s all just like I imagined, you know.”
Rincewind’s face was a mask of fascinated horror.
“I just couldn’t stand it any more back in Bes Pelargic,” Twoflower went on
blithely, “sitting at a desk all day, just adding up columns of figures, just a
pension to look forward to at the end of it…where’s the romance in that?
Twoflower, I thought, it’s now or never. You don’t just have to listen to stories.
You can go there. Now’s the time to stop hanging around the docks listening to
sailors’ tales. So I compiled a phrase book and bought a passage on the next ship
to the Brown Islands.”
“No guards?” murmured Rincewind.
“No. Why? What have I got that’s worth stealing?”
Rincewind coughed. “You have, uh, gold,” he said.
“Barely two thousand rhinu. Hardly enough to keep a man alive for more than a
month or two. At home, that is. I imagine they might stretch a bit further here.”
“Would a rhinu be one of those big gold coins?” said Rincewind.
“Yes.” Twoflower looked worriedly at the wizard over the top of his strange
seeing lenses. “Will two thousand be sufficient, do you think?”
“Yarrrt,” croaked Rincewind. “I mean, yes—sufficient.”
“Good.”
“Um. Is everyone in the Agatean Empire as rich as you?”
“Me? Rich? Bless you, whatever put that idea into your head? I am but a poor
clerk! Did I pay the innkeeper too much, do you think?” Twoflower added.
“Uh. He might have settled for less,” Rincewind conceded.
“Ah. I shall know better next time. I can see I have a lot to learn. An idea occurs
to me. Rincewind, would you perhaps consent to be employed as a, I don’t
know, perhaps the word ‘guide’ would fit the circumstances? I think I could
afford to pay you a rhinu a day.”
Rincewind opened his mouth to reply but felt the words huddle together in his
throat, reluctant to emerge in a world that was rapidly going mad. Twoflower
blushed.
“I have offended you,” he said. “It was an impertinent request to make of a
professional man such as yourself. Doubtless you have many projects you wish
to return to—some works of high magic, no doubt…”
“No,” said Rincewind faintly. “Not just at present. A rhinu, you say? One a day.
Every day?”
“I think perhaps in the circumstances I should make it one and one half rhinu per
day. Plus any out-of-pocket expenses, of course.”
The wizard rallied magnificently. “That will be fine,” he said. “Great.”
Twoflower reached into his pouch and took out a large round gold object,
glanced at it for a moment, and slipped it back. Rincewind didn’t get a chance to
see it properly.
“I think,” said the tourist, “that I would like a little rest now. It was a long
crossing. And then perhaps you would care to call back at noon and we can take
a look at the city.”
“Sure.”
“Then please be good enough to ask the innkeeper to show me to my room.”
Rincewind did so, and watched the nervous Broadman, who had arrived at a
gallop from some back room, lead the way up the wooden steps behind the bar.
After a few seconds the Luggage got up and pattered across the floor after them.
Then the wizard looked down at the six big coins in his hand. Twoflower had
insisted on paying his first four days’ wages in advance.
Hugh nodded and smiled encouragingly. Rincewind snarled at him.
As a student wizard Rincewind had never achieved high marks in precognition,
but now unused circuits in his brain were throbbing and the future might as well
have been engraved in bright colors on his eyeballs. The space between his
shoulder blades began to itch. The sensible thing to do, he knew, was to buy a
horse. It would have to be a fast one, and expensive—offhand, Rincewind
couldn’t think of any horse dealer he knew who was rich enough to give change
out of almost a whole ounce of gold.
And then, of course, the other five coins would help him set up a useful practice
at some safe distance, say two hundred miles. That would be the sensible thing.
But what would happen to Twoflower, all alone in a city where even the
cockroaches had an unerring instinct for gold? A man would have to be a real
heel to leave him.
The Patrician of Ankh-Morpork smiled, but with his mouth only.
“The Hub Gate, you say?” he murmured.
The guard captain saluted smartly. “Aye, lord. We had to shoot the horse before
he would stop.”
“Which, by a fairly direct route, brings you here,” said the Patrician, looking
down at Rincewind. “And what have you got to say for yourself?”
It was rumored that an entire wing of the Patrician’s palace was filled with clerks
who spent their days collating and updating all the information collected by their
master’s exquisitely organized spy system. Rincewind didn’t doubt it. He
glanced toward the balcony that ran down one side of the audience room. A
sudden run, a nimble jump—a sudden hail of crossbow quarrels. He shuddered.
The Patrician cradled his chins in a beringed hand, and regarded the wizard with
eyes as small and hard as beads.
“Let me see,” he said. “Oathbreaking, the theft of a horse, uttering false coinage
—yes, I think it’s the Arena for you, Rincewind.”
This was too much.
“I didn’t steal the horse! I bought it fairly!”
“But with false coinage. Technical theft, you see.”
“But those rhinu are solid gold!”
“Rhinu?” The Patrician rolled one of them around in his thick fingers. “Is that
what they are called? How interesting. But, as you point out, they are not very
similar to dollars…”
“Well, of course they’re not—”
“Ah! you admit it, then?”
Rincewind opened his mouth to speak, thought better of it, and shut it again.
“Quite so. And on top of these there is, of course, the moral obloquy attendant
on the cowardly betrayal of a visitor to this shore. For shame, Rincewind!”
The Patrician waved a hand vaguely. The guards behind Rincewind backed
away, and their captain took a few paces to the right. Rincewind suddenly felt
very alone.
It is said that when a wizard is about to die Death himself turns up to claim him
(instead of delegating the task to a subordinate, such as Disease or Famine, as is
usually the case). Rincewind looked around nervously for a tall figure in black
(wizards, even failed wizards, have in addition to rods and cones in their
eyeballs the tiny octagons that enable them to see into the far octarine, the basic
color of which all other colors are merely pale shadows impinging on normal
four dimensional space. It is said to be a sort of fluorescent greenish yellow
purple).
Was that a flickering shadow in the corner?
“Of course,” said the Patrician, “I could be merciful.”
The shadow disappeared. Rincewind looked up, an expression of insane hope on
his face.
“Yes?” he said.
The Patrician waved a hand again. Rincewind saw the guards leave the chamber.
Alone with the overlord of the twin cities, he almost wished they would come
back.
“Come hither, Rincewind,” said the Patrician. He indicated a bowl of savories on
a low onyx table by the throne. “Would you care for a crystallized jellyfish?
No?”
“Um,” said Rincewind, “no.”
“Now I want you to listen very carefully to what I am about to say,” said the
Patrician amiably, “otherwise you will die. In an interesting fashion. Over a
period. Please stop fidgeting like that.
“Since you are a wizard of sorts, you are of course aware that we live upon a
world shaped, as it were, like a disc? And that there is said to exist, toward the
far rim, a continent which though small is equal in weight to all the mighty landmasses
in this hemi-circle? And that this, according to ancient legend, is because
it is largely made of gold?”
Rincewind nodded. Who hadn’t heard of the Counterweight Continent? Some
sailors even believed the childhood tales and sailed in search of it. Of course,
they returned either empty-handed or not at all. Probably eaten by giant turtles,
in the opinion of more serious mariners. Because, of course, the Counterweight
Continent was nothing more than a solar myth.
“It does, of course, exist,” said the Patrician. “Although it is not made of gold, it
is true that gold is a very common metal there. Most of the mass is made up by
vast deposits of octiron deep within the crust. Now it will be obvious to an
incisive mind like yours that the existence of the Counterweight Continent poses
a deadly threat to our people here—” he paused, looking at Rincewind’s open
mouth. He sighed. He said, “Do you by some chance fail to follow me?”
“Yarrg,” said Rincewind. He swallowed, and licked his lips. “I mean, no. I mean
—well, gold…”
“I see,” said the Patrician sweetly. “You feel, perhaps, that it would be a
marvelous thing to go to the Counterweight Continent and bring back a shipload
of gold?”
Rincewind had a feeling that some sort of trap was being set.
“Yes?” he ventured.
“And if every man on the shores of the Circle Sea had a mountain of gold of his
own? Would that be a good thing? What would happen? Think carefully.”
Rincewind’s brow furrowed. He thought. “We’d all be rich?”
The way the temperature fell at his remark told him that it was not the correct
one.
“I may as well tell you, Rincewind, that there is some contact between the Lords
of the Circle Sea and the Emperor of the Agatean Empire, as it is styled,” the
Patrician went on. “It is only very slight. There is little common ground between
us. We have nothing they want, and they have nothing we can afford. It is an old
Empire, Rincewind. Old and cunning and cruel and very, very rich. So we
exchange fraternal greetings by albatross mail. At infrequent intervals.
“One such letter arrived this morning. A subject of the Emperor appears to have
taken it into his head to visit our city. It appears he wishes to look at it. Only a
madman would possibly undergo all the privations of crossing the Turnwise
Ocean in order to merely look at anything. However.
“He landed this morning. He might have met a great hero, or the cunningest of
thieves, or some wise and great sage. He met you. He has employed you as a
guide. You will be a guide, Rincewind, to this looker, this Twoflower. You will
see that he returns home with a good report of our little homeland. What do you
say to that?”
“Er. Thank you, Lord,” said Rincewind miserably.
“There is another point, of course. It would be a tragedy should anything
untoward happen to our little visitor. It would be dreadful if he were to die, for
example. Dreadful for the whole of our land, because the Agatean Emperor
looks after his own and could certainly extinguish us at a nod. A mere nod. And
that would be dreadful for you, Rincewind, because in the weeks that remained
before the Empire’s huge mercenary fleet arrived certain of my servants would
occupy themselves about your person in the hope that the avenging captains, on
their arrival, might find their anger tempered by the sight of your still living
body. There are certain spells that can prevent the life departing from a body, be
it never so abused, and—I see by your face that understanding dawns?”
“Yarrg.”
“I beg your pardon?”
“Yes, lord. I’ll, er, see to it, I mean, I’ll endeavor to see, I mean, well, I’ll try to
look after him and see he comes to no harm.” And after that I’ll get a job
juggling snowballs through Hell, he added bitterly in the privacy of his own
skull.
“Capital! I gather already that you and Twoflower are on the best of terms. An
excellent beginning. When he returns safely to his homeland you will not find
me ungrateful. I shall probably even dismiss the charges against you. Thank you,
Rincewind. You may go.”
Rincewind decided not to ask for the return of his five remaining rhinu. He
backed away, cautiously.
“Oh, and there is one other thing,” the Patrician said, as the wizard groped for
the door handles.
“Yes, lord?” he replied, with a sinking heart.
“I’m sure you won’t dream of trying to escape from your obligations by fleeing
the city. I judge you to be a born city person. But you may be sure that the lords
of the other cities will be appraised of these conditions by nightfall.”
“I assure you the thought never even crossed my mind, Lord.”
“Indeed? Then if I were you I’d sue my face for slander.”
Rincewind reached the Broken Drum at a dead run, and was just in time to
collide with a man who came out backward, fast. The stranger’s haste was in
part accounted for by the spear in his chest. He bubbled noisily and dropped
dead at the wizard’s feet.
Rincewind peered around the doorframe and jerked back as a heavy throwing ax
whirred past like a partridge.
It was probably a lucky throw, a second cautious glance told him. The dark
interior of the Drum was a broil of fighting men, quite a number of them—a
third and longer glance confirmed—in bits. Rincewind swayed back as a wildly
thrown stool sailed past and smashed on the far side of the street. Then he dived
in.
He was wearing a dark robe, made darker by constant wear and irregular
washings. In the raging gloom no one appeared to notice a shadowy shape that
shuffled desperately from table to table. At one point a fighter, staggering back,
trod on what felt like fingers. A number of what felt like teeth bit his ankle. He
yelped shrilly and dropped his guard just sufficiently for a sword, swung by a
surprised opponent, to skewer him.
Rincewind reached the stairway, sucking his bruised hand and running with a
curious, bent-over gait. A crossbow quarrel thunked into the banister rail above
him, and he gave a whimper.
He made the stairs in one breathless rush, expecting at any moment another,
more accurate shot.
In the corridor above he stood upright, gasping, and saw the floor in front of him
scattered with bodies. A big black bearded man, with a bloody sword in one
hand, was trying a door handle.
“Hey!” screamed Rincewind. The man looked around and then, almost
absentmindedly, drew a short throwing knife from his bandolier and hurled it.
Rincewind ducked. There was a brief scream behind him as the crossbow man,
sighting down his weapon, dropped it and clutched at his throat.
The big man was already reaching for another knife. Rincewind looked around
wildly, and then with wild improvisation drew himself up into a wizardly pose.
His hand was flung back. “Asoniti! Kyorucha! Beazleblor!”
The man hesitated, his eyes flicking nervously from side to side as he waited for
the magic. The conclusion that there was not going to be any hit him at the same
time as Rincewind, whirring wildly down the passage, kicked him sharply in the
groin.
As he screamed and clutched at himself the wizard dragged open the door,
sprang inside, slammed it behind him and threw his body against it, panting.
It was quiet in here. There was Twoflower, sleeping peacefully on the low bed.
And there, at the foot of the bed, was the Luggage.
Rincewind took a few steps forward, cupidity moving him as easily as if he were
on little wheels. The chest was open. There were bags inside, and in one of them
he caught the gleam of gold. For a moment greed overcame caution, and he
reached out gingerly…but what was the use? He’d never live to enjoy it.
Reluctantly he drew his hand back, and was surprised to see a slight tremor in
the chest’s open lid. Hadn’t it shifted slightly, as though rocked by the wind?
Rincewind looked at his fingers, and then at the lid. It looked heavy, and was
bound with brass bands. It was quite still now.
What wind?
“Rincewind!”
Twoflower sprang off the bed. The wizard jumped back, wrenching his features
into a smile.
“My dear chap, right on time! We’ll just have lunch, and then I’m sure you’ve
got a wonderful program lined up for this afternoon!”
“Er—”
“That’s great!”
Rincewind took a deep breath. “Look,” he said desperately, “let’s eat somewhere
else. There’s been a bit of a fight down below.”
“A tavern brawl? Why didn’t you wake me up?”
“Well, you see, I—What?”
“I thought I made myself clear this morning, Rincewind. I want to see genuine
Morporkian life—the slave market, the Whore Pits, the Temple of Small Gods,
the Beggars’ Guild…and a genuine tavern brawl.” A faint note of suspicion
entered Twoflower’s voice. “You do have them, don’t you? You know, people
swinging on chandelier, swordfights over the table, the sort of thing Hrun the
Barbarian and the Weasel are always getting involved in. You know
—excitement.”
Rincewind sat down heavily on the bed.
“You want to see a fight?” he said.
“Yes. What’s wrong with that?”
“For a start, people get hurt.”
“Oh, I wasn’t suggesting we get involved. I just want to see one, that’s all. And
some of your famous heroes. You do have some, don’t you? It’s not all dockside
talk?” And now, to the wizard’s astonishment, Twoflower was almost pleading.
“Oh, yeah. We have them all right,” said Rincewind hurriedly. He pictured them
in his mind, and recoiled from the thought.
All the heroes of the Circle Sea passed through the gates of Ankh-Morpork
sooner or later. Most of them were from the barbaric tribes nearer the frozen
Hub, which had a sort of export trade in heroes. Almost all of them had crude
magic swords, whose unsuppressed harmonics on the astral plane played hell
with any delicate experiments in applied sorcery for miles around, but
Rincewind didn’t object to them on that score. He knew himself to be a magical
dropout, so it didn’t bother him that the mere appearance of a hero at the city
gates was enough to cause retorts to explode and demons to materialize all
through the Magical Quarter. No, what he didn’t like about heroes was that they
were usually suicidally gloomy when sober and homicidally insane when drunk.
There were too many of them, too. Some of the most notable questing grounds
near the city were a veritable hubbub in the season. There was talk of organizing
a rota.
He rubbed his nose. The only heroes he had much time for were Bravd and the
Weasel, who were out of town at the moment, and Hrun the Barbarian, who was
practically an academic by Hub standards in that he could think without moving
his lips. Hrun was said to be roving somewhere Turnwise..
“Look,” he said at last. “Have you ever met a barbarian?”
Twoflower shook his head.
“I was afraid of that,” said Rincewind. “Well, they’re—”
There was a clatter of running feet in the street outside and a fresh uproar from
downstairs. It was followed by a commotion on the stairs. The door was flung
open before Rincewind could collect himself sufficiently to make a dash for the
window.
But instead of the greed-crazed madman he expected, he found himself looking
into the round red face of a Sergeant of the Watch. He breathed again. Of course.
The Watch were always careful not to intervene too soon in any brawl where the
odds were not heavily stacked in their favor. The job carried a pension, and
attracted a cautious, thoughtful kind of man.
The Sergeant glowered at Rincewind, and then peered at Twoflower with
interest.
“Everything all right here, then?” he said.
“Oh, fine,” said Rincewind. “Got held up, did you?”
The sergeant ignored him. “This the foreigner, then?” he inquired.
“We were just leaving,” said Rincewind quickly, and switched to Trob.
“Twoflower, I think we ought to get lunch somewhere else. I know some
places.”
He marched out into the corridor with as much aplomb as he could muster.
Twoflower followed, and a few seconds later there was a strangling sound from
the sergeant as the Luggage closed its lid with a snap, stood up, stretched, and
marched after them.
Watchmen were dragging bodies out of the room downstairs. There were no
survivors. The Watch had ensured this by giving them ample time to escape via
the back door, a neat compromise between caution and justice that benefited all
parties.
“Who are all these men?” said Twoflower.
“Oh, you know. Just men,” said Rincewind. And before he could stop himself
some part of his brain that had nothing to do took control of his mouth and
added, “Heroes, in fact.”
“Really?”
When one foot is stuck in the Grey Miasma of H’rull it is much easier to step
right in and sink rather than prolong the struggle. Rincewind let himself go.
“Yes, that one over there is Erig Stronginthearm, over there is Black Zenell—”
“Is Hrun the Barbarian here?” said Twoflower, looking around eagerly.
Rincewind took a deep breath.
“That’s him behind us,” he said.
The enormity of this lie was so great that its ripples did in fact spread out one of
the lower astral planes as far as the Magical Quarter across the river, where it
picked up tremendous velocity from the huge standing wave of power that
always hovered there and bounced wildly across the Circle Sea. A harmonic got
as far as Hrun himself, currently fighting a couple of gnolls on a crumbling ledge
high in the Caderack Mountains, and caused him a moment’s unexplained
discomfort.
Twoflower, meanwhile, had thrown back the lid of the Luggage and was hastily
pulling out a heavy black cube.
“This is fantastic!” he said. “They’re never going to believe this at home!”
“What’s he going on about?” said the sergeant doubtfully.
“He’s pleased you rescued us,” said Rincewind. He looked sidelong at the black
box, half expecting it to explode or emit strange musical tones.
“Ah,” said the sergeant. He was staring at the box, too.
Twoflower smiled brightly at them.
“I’d like a record of the event,” he said. “Do you think you could ask them all to
stand over by the window, please? This won’t take a moment. And, er,
Rincewind?”
“Yes?”
Twoflower stood on tiptoe to whisper.
“I expect you know what this is, don’t you?”
Rincewind stared down at the box. It had a round glass eye protruding from the
center of one face, and a lever at the back.
“Not wholly,” he said.
“It’s a device for making pictures quickly,” said Twoflower. “Quite a new
invention. I’m rather proud of it but, look, I don’t think these gentlemen would
—well, I mean they might be—sort of apprehensive? Could you explain it to
them? I’ll reimburse them for their time, of course.”
“He’s got a box with a demon in it that draws pictures,” said Rincewind shortly.
“Do what the madman says and he will give you gold.”
The Watch smiled nervously.
“I’d like you in the picture, Rincewind. That’s fine.” Twoflower took out the
golden disc that Rincewind had noticed before, squinted at its unseen face for a
moment, muttered “Thirty seconds should about do it,” and said brightly, “Smile
please!”
“Smile,” rasped Rincewind. There was a whirr from the box.
“Right!”
High above the Disc the second albatross soared; so high in fact that its tiny mad
orange eyes could see the whole of the world and the great, glittering, girdling
Circle Sea. There was a yellow message capsule strapped to one leg. Far below
it, unseen in the clouds, the bird that had brought the earlier message to the
Patrician of Ankh-Morpork flapped gently back to its home.
Rincewind looked at the tiny square of glass in astonishment. There he was, all
right—a tiny figure, in perfect color, standing in front of a group of Watchmen
whose faces were each frozen in a terrified rictus. A buzz of wordless terror went
up from the men around him as they craned over his shoulder to look.
Grinning, Twoflower produced a handful of the smaller coins Rincewind now
recognized as quarter-rhinu. He winked at the wizard.
“I had similar problems when I stopped over in the Brown Islands,” he said.
“They thought the iconograph steals a bit of their souls. Laughable, isn’t it?”
“Yarg,” said Rincewind and then, because somehow that was hardly enough to
keep up his side of the conversation, added, “I don’t think it looks very like me,
though.”
“It’s easy to operate,” said Twoflower, ignoring him. “Look, all you have to do is
press this button. The iconograph does the rest. Now, I’ll just stand over here
next to Hrun, and you can take the picture.”
The coins quietened the men’s agitation in the way that gold can, and Rincewind
was amazed to find, half a minute later, that he was holding a little glass portrait
of Twoflower wielding a huge notched sword and smiling as though all his
dreams had come true.
They lunched at a small eating house near the Brass Bridge, with the Luggage
nestling under the table. The food and wine, both far superior to Rincewind’s
normal fare, did much to relax him. Things weren’t going to be too bad, he
decided. A bit of invention and some quick thinking, that was all that was
needed.
Twoflower seemed to be thinking too. Looking reflectively into his wine cup he
said, “Tavern fights are pretty common around here, I expect?”
“Oh, fairly.”
“No doubt fixtures and fittings get damaged?”
“Fixt—Oh, I see. You mean like benches and whatnot. Yes, I suppose so.”
“That must be upsetting for the innkeepers.”
“I’ve never really thought about it. I suppose it must be one of the risks of the
job.”
Twoflower regarded him thoughtfully.
“I might be able to help there,” he said. “Risks are my business. I say, this food
is a bit greasy, isn’t it?”
“You did say you wanted to try some typical Morporkean food,” said Rincewind.
“What was that about risks?”
“Oh, I know all about risks. They’re my business.”
“I thought that’s what you said. I didn’t believe it the first time either.”
“Oh, I don’t take risks. About the most exciting thing that happened to me was
knocking some ink over. I assess risks. Day after day. Do you know what the
odds are against a house catching fire in the Red Triangle district of Bes
Pelargic? Five hundred and thirty-eight to one. I calculated that,” he added with
a trace of pride.
“What—” Rincewind tried to suppress a burp—“what for? ’Scuse me.” He
helped himself to some more wine.
“For—” Twoflower paused. “I can’t say it in Trob,” he said. “I don’t think the
beTrobi have a word for it. In my language we call it—” he said a collection of
outlandish syllables.
“Inn-sewer-ants,” repeated Rincewind. “Tha’s a funny word. Wossit mean?”
“Well, suppose you have a ship loaded with, say, gold bars. It might run into
storms or, or be taken by pirates. You don’t want that to happen, so you take out
an inn-sewer-ants-polly-sea. I work out the odds against the cargo being lost,
based on weather reports and piracy records for the last twenty years, then I add
a bit, then you pay me some money based on those odds—”
“—and the bit—” Rincewind said, waggling a finger solemnly.
“—and then, if the cargo is lost, I reimburse you.”
“Reeburs?”
“Pay you the value of your cargo,” said Twoflower patiently.
“I get it. It’s like a bet, right?”
“A wager? In a way, I suppose.”
“And you make money at this inn-sewer-ants?”
“It offers a return on investment, certainly.”
Wrapped in the warm yellow glow of the wine, Rincewind tried to think of innsewer-
ants in Circle Sea terms.
“I don’t think I unnerstan’ this inn-sewer-ants,” he said firmly, idly watching the
world spin by. “Magic, now. Magic I unnerstan’.”
Twoflower grinned. “Magic is one thing, and reflected-sound-of-undergroundspirits
is another,” he said.
“Wha’?”
“What?”
“That funny wor’ you used,” said Rincewind impatiently.
“Reflected-sound-of-underground-spirits?”
“Never heard o’ it.”
Twoflower tried to explain.
Rincewind tried to understand.
In the long afternoon they toured the city Turnwise of the river. Twoflower led
the way, with the strange picture box slung on a strap around his neck.
Rincewind trailed behind, whimpering at intervals and checking to see that his
head was still there.
A few others followed, too. In a city where public executions, duels, fights,
magical feuds and strange events regularly punctuated the daily round the
inhabitants had brought the profession of interested bystander to a peak of
perfection. They were, to a man, highly skilled gawpers. In any case, Twoflower
was delightedly taking picture after picture of people engaged in what he
described as typical activities, and since a quarter-rhinu would subsequently
change hands “for their trouble” a tail of bemused and happy nouveauxriches
was soon following him in case this madman exploded in a shower of gold.
At the Temple of the Seven-Handed Sek a hasty convocation of priests and ritual
heart-transplant artisans agreed that the hundred-span high statue of Sek was
altogether too holy to be made into a magic picture, but a payment of two rhinu
left them astoundedly agreeing that perhaps He wasn’t as holy as all that.
A prolonged session at the Whore Pits produced a number of colorful and
instructive pictures, a number of which Rincewind concealed about his person
for detailed perusal in private. As the fumes cleared from his brain he began to
speculate seriously as to how the iconograph worked.
Even a failed wizard knew that some substances were sensitive to light. Perhaps
the glass plates were treated by some arcane process that froze the light that
passed through them? Something like that, anyway. Rincewind often suspected
that there was something, somewhere, that was better than magic. He was
usually disappointed.
However, he soon took every opportunity to operate the box. Twoflower was
only too pleased to allow this, since that enabled the little man to appear in his
own pictures. It was at this point that Rincewind noticed something strange.
Possession of the box conferred a kind of power on the wielder—which was that
anyone, confronted with the hypnotic glass eye, would submissively obey the
most peremptory orders about stance and expression.
It was while he was thus engaged in the Plaza of Broken Moons that disaster
struck.
Twoflower had posed alongside a bewildered charm seller, his crowd of
newfound admirers watching him with interest in case he did something
humorously lunatic.
Rincewind got down on one knee, the better to arrange the picture, and pressed
the enchanted lever.
The box said, “It’s no good. I’ve run out of pink.”
A hitherto unnoticed door opened in front of his eyes. A small, green and
hideously warty humanoid figure leaned out, pointed at a color-encrusted palette
in one clawed hand, and screamed at him.
“No pink! See?” screeched the homunculus. “No good you going on pressing the
lever when there’s no pink, is there? If you wanted pink you shouldn’t of took all
those pictures of young ladies, should you? It’s monochrome from now on,
friend. All right?”
“All right. Yeah, Sure,” said Rincewind. In one dim corner of the little box he
thought he could see an easel, and a tiny unmade bed. He hoped he couldn’t.
“So long as that’s understood,” said the imp, and shut the door. Rincewind
thought he could hear the muffled sound of grumbling and the scrape of a stool
being dragged across the floor.
“Twoflower—” he began, and looked up.
Twoflower had vanished. As Rincewind stared at the crowd, with sensations of
prickly horror traveling up his spine, there came a gentle prod in the small of his
back.
“Turn without haste,” said a voice like black silk. “Or kiss your kidneys
goodbye.”
The crowd watched with interest. It was turning out to be quite a good day.
Rincewind turned slowly, feeling the point of the sword scrape along his ribs. At
the other end of the blade he recognized Stren Withel—thief, cruel swordsman,
disgruntled contender for the title of worst man in the world.
“Hi,” he said weakly. A few yards away he noticed a couple of unsympathetic
men raising the lid of the Luggage and pointing excitedly at the bags of gold.
Withel smiled. It made an unnerving effect on his scar-crossed face.
“I know you,” he said. “A gutter wizard. What is that thing?”
Rincewind became aware that the lid of the Luggage was trembling slightly,
although there was no wind. And he was still holding the picture box.
“This? It makes pictures,” he said brightly. “Hey, just hold that smile, will you?”
He backed away quickly and pointed the box.
For a moment Withel hesitated. “What?” he said.
“That’s fine, hold it just like that…” said Rincewind.
The thief paused, then growled and swung his sword back.
There was a snap, and a duet of horrible screams. Rincewind did not glance
around for fear of the terrible things he might see, and by the time Withel looked
for him again he was on the other side of the Plaza, and still accelerating.
The albatross descended in wide, slow sweeps that ended in an undignified
flurry of feathers and a thump as it landed heavily on its platform in the
Patrician’s bird garden.
The custodian of the birds, dozing in the sun and hardly expecting a longdistance
message so soon after this morning’s arrival, jerked to his feet and
looked up.
A few moments later he was scuttling through the palace’s corridors holding the
message capsule and—owing to carelessness brought on by surprise—sucking at
the nasty beak wound on the back of his hand.
Rincewind pounded down an alley, paying no heed to the screams of rage
coming from the picture box, and cleared a high wall with his frayed robe
flapping around him like the feathers of a disheveled jackdaw. He landed in the
forecourt of a carpet shop, scattering the merchandise and customers, dived
through its rear exit trailing apologies, skidded down another alley and stopped,
teetering dangerously, just as he was about to plunge unthinkingly into the Ankh.
There are said to be some mystic rivers one drop of which can steal a man’s life
away. After its turbid passage through the twin cities the Ankh could have been
one of them.
In the distance the cries of rage took on a shrill note of terror. Rincewind looked
around desperately for a boat, or a handhold up the sheer walls on either side of
him.
He was trapped.
Unbidden, the Spell welled up in his mind. It was perhaps untrue to say that he
had learned it; it had learned him. The episode had led to his expulsion from
Unseen University, because, for a bet, he had dared to open the pages of the last
remaining copy of the Creator’s own grimoire, the Octavo (while the University
librarian was otherwise engaged). The spell had leapt out of the page and
instantly burrowed deeply into his mind, whence even the combined talents of
the Faculty of Medicine had been unable to coax it. Precisely which one it was
they were also unable to ascertain, except that it was one of the eight basic spells
that were intricately interwoven with the very fabric of time and space itself.
Since then it had been showing a worrying tendency, when Rincewind was
feeling rundown or especially threatened, to try to get itself said.
He clenched his teeth together but the first syllable forced itself around the
corner of his mouth. His left hand raised involuntarily and, as the magical force
whirled him around, began to give off octarine sparks…
The Luggage hurtled around the corner, its several hundred knees moving like
pistons.
Rincewind gaped. The spell died, unsaid.
The box didn’t appear to be hampered in any way by the ornamental rug draped
roguishly over it, nor by the thief hanging by one arm from the lid. It was, in a
very real sense, a dead weight. Farther along the lid were the remains of two
fingers, owner unknown.
The Luggage halted a few feet from the wizard and, after a moment, retracted its
legs. It had no eyes that Rincewind could see, but he was nevertheless sure that it
was staring at him. Expectantly.
“Shoo,” he said weakly. It didn’t budge, but the lid creaked open, releasing the
dead thief.
Rincewind remembered about the gold. Presumably the box had to have a
master. In the absence of Twoflower, had it adopted him?
The tide was turning and he could see debris drifting downstream in the yellow
afternoon light toward the River Gate, a mere hundred yards downstream. It was
the work of a moment to let the dead thief join them. Even if it was found later it
would hardly cause comment. And the sharks in the estuary were used to solid,
regular meals.
Rincewind watched the body drift away, and considered his next move. The
Luggage would probably float. All he had to do was wait until dusk, and then go
out with the tide. There were plenty of wild places downstream where he could
wade ashore, and then—well, if the Patrician really had sent out word about him
then a change of clothing and a shave should take care of that. In any case, there
were other lands and he had a facility for languages. Let him but get to Chimera
or Gonim or Ecalpon and half a dozen armies couldn’t bring him back. And then
—wealth, comfort, security…
There was, of course, the problem of Twoflower. Rincewind allowed himself a
moment’s sadness.
“It could be worse,” he said by way of farewell. “It could be me.”
It was when he tried to move that he found his robe was caught on some
obstruction.
By craning his neck he found that the edge of it was being gripped firmly by the
Luggage’s lid.
“Ah, Gorphal,” said the Patrician pleasantly. “Come in. Sit down. Can I press
you to a candied starfish?”
“I am yours to command, master,” said the old man calmly. “Save, perhaps, in
the matter of preserved echinoderms.”
The Patrician shrugged, and indicated the scroll on the table.
“Read that,” he said.
Gorphal picked up the parchment and raised one eyebrow slightly when he saw
the familiar ideograms of the Golden Empire. He read in silence for perhaps a
minute, and then turned the scroll over to examine minutely the seal on the
obverse.
“You are famed as a student of Empire affairs,” said the Patrician. “Can you
explain this?”
“Knowledge in the matter of the Empire lies less in noting particular events than
in studying a certain cast of mind,” said the old diplomat. “The message is
curious, yes, but not surprising.”
“This morning the Emperor instructed,” the Patrician allowed himself the luxury
of a scowl, “instructed me, Gorphal, to protect this Twoflower person. Now it
seems I must have him killed. You don’t find that surprising?”
“No. The Emperor is no more than a boy. He is—idealistic. Keen. A god to his
people. Whereas this afternoon’s letter is, unless I am very much mistaken, from
Nine Turning Mirrors, the Grand Vizier. He has grown old in the service of
several Emperors. He regards them as a necessary but tiresome ingredient in the
successful running of the Empire. He does not like things out of place. The
Empire was not built by allowing things to get out of place. That is his view.”
“I begin to see—” said the Patrician.
“Quite so.” Gorphal smiled into his beard. “This tourist is a thing that is out of
place. After acceding to his master’s wishes Nine Turning Mirrors would, I am
quite sure, make his own arrangements with a view to ensuring that one
wanderer would not be allowed to return home bringing, perhaps, the disease of
dissatisfaction. The Empire likes people to stay where it puts them. So much
more convenient, then, if this Twoflower disappears for good in the barbarian
lands. Meaning here, master.”
“And your advice?” said the Patrician.
Gorphal shrugged.
“Merely that you should do nothing. Matters will undoubtedly resolve
themselves. However,” he scratched an ear thoughtfully, “perhaps the Assassins’
Guild…?”
“Ah yes,” said the Patrician. “The Assassins’ Guild. Who is their president at the
moment?”
“Zlorf Flannelfoot, master.”
“Have a word with him, will you?”
“Quite so, master.”
The Patrician nodded. It was all rather a relief. He agreed with Nine Turning
Mirrors—life was difficult enough. People ought to stay where they were put.
Brilliant constellations shone down on the Discworld. One by one the traders
shuttered their shops. One by one the ganefs, thieves, finewirers, whores,
illusionists, backsliders and second-story men awoke and breakfasted. Wizards
went about their polydimensional affairs. Tonight saw the conjunction of two
powerful planets, and already the air over the Magical Quarter was hazy with
early spells.
“Look,” said Rincewind, “this isn’t getting us anywhere.” He inched sideways.
The Luggage followed faithfully, lid half open and menacing. Rincewind briefly
considered making a desperate leap to safety. The lid smacked in anticipation.
In any case, he told himself with sinking heart, the damn thing would only
follow him again. It had that dogged look about it. Even if he managed to get to
a horse, he had a nasty suspicion that it would follow him at its own pace.
Endlessly. Swimming rivers and oceans. Gaining slowly every night, while he
had to stop to sleep. And then one day, in some exotic city and years hence, he’d
hear the sound of hundreds of tiny feet accelerating down the road behind him…
“You’ve got the wrong man!” he moaned. “It’s not my fault! I didn’t kidnap
him!”
The box moved forward slightly. Now there was just a narrow strip of greasy
jetty between Rincewind’s heels and the river. A flash of precognition told him
that the box would be able to swim faster than he could. He tried not to imagine
what it would be like to drown in the Ankh.
“It won’t stop until you give in, you know,” said a small voice conversationally.
Rincewind looked down at the iconograph, still hanging around his neck. Its
trapdoor was open and the homunculus was leaning against the frame, smoking a
pipe and watching the proceedings with amusement.
“I’ll take you in with me, at least,” said Rincewind through gritted teeth.
The imp took the pipe out of his mouth. “What did you say?” he said.
“I said I’ll take you in with me, dammit!”
“Suit yourself.” The imp tapped the side of the box meaningfully. “We’ll see
who sinks first.”
The Luggage yawned, and moved forward a fraction of an inch.
“Oh, all right,” said Rincewind irritably. “But you’ll have to give me time to
think.”
The Luggage backed off slowly. Rincewind edged his way back onto reasonably
safe land and sat down with his back against a wall. Across the river the lights of
Ankh city glowed.
“You’re a wizard,” said the picture imp. “You’ll think of some way to find him.”
“Not much of a wizard, I’m afraid.”
“You can just jump down on everyone and turn them into worms,” the imp
added encouragingly, ignoring his last remark.
“No. Turning To Animals is an Eighth Level spell. I never even completed my
training. I only know one spell.”
“Well, that’ll do.”
“I doubt it,” said Rincewind hopelessly.
“What does it do, then?”
“Can’t tell you. Don’t really want to talk about it. But frankly,” he sighed, “no
spells are much good. It takes three months to commit even a simple one to
memory, and then once you’ve used it, poof! it’s gone. That’s what’s so stupid
about the whole magic thing, you know. You spend twenty years learning the
spell that makes nude virgins appear in your bedroom, and then you’re so
poisoned by quicksilver fumes and half blind from reading old grimoires that
you can’t remember what happens next.”
“I never thought of it like that,” said the imp.
“Hey, look—this is all wrong. When Twoflower said they’d got better kind of
magic in the Empire I thought—I thought…”
The imp looked at him expectantly. Rincewind cursed to himself.
“Well, if you must know, I thought he didn’t mean magic. Not as such.”
“What else is there, then?”
Rincewind began to feel really wretched. “I don’t know,” he said. “A better way
of doing things, I suppose. Something with a bit of sense in it. Harnessing—
harnessing the lightning, or something.”
The imp gave him a kind but pitying look.
“Lightning is the spears hurled by the thunder giants when they fight,” it said
gently. “Established meteorological fact. You can’t harness it.”
“I know,” said Rincewind miserably. “That’s the flaw in the argument, of
course.”
The imp nodded, and disappeared into the depths of the iconograph. A few
moments later Rincewind smelled bacon frying. He waited until his stomach
couldn’t stand the strain anymore, and rapped on the box. The imp reappeared.
“I’ve been thinking about what you said,” it said before Rincewind could open
his mouth. “And even if you could get a harness on it, how could you get it to
pull a cart?”
“What the hell are you talking about?”
“Lightning. It just goes up and down. You’d want it to go along, not up and
down. Anyway, it’d probably burn through the harness.”
“I don’t care about the lightning! How can I think on an empty stomach?”
“Eat something, then. That’s logic.”
“How? Every time I move that damn box flexes its hinges at me!”
The Luggage, on cue, gaped widely.
“See?”
“It’s not trying to bite you,” said the imp. “There’s food in there. You’re no use
to it starved.”
Rincewind peered into the dark recesses of the Luggage. There were indeed,
among the chaos of boxes and bags of gold, several bottles and packages in oiled
paper. He gave a cynical laugh, mooched around the abandoned jetty until he
found a piece of wood about the right length, wedged it as politely as possible in
the gap between the lid and the box, and pulled out one of the flat packages.
It held biscuits that turned out to be as hard as diamondwood.
“’Loody ’ell,” he muttered, nursing his teeth.
“Captain Eightpanther’s Travelers’ Digestives, them,” said the imp from the
doorway to his box. “Saved many a life at sea, they have.”
“Oh, sure. Do you use them as a raft, or just throw them to the sharks and sort of
watch them sink? What’s in the bottles? Poison?”
“Water.”
“But there’s water everywhere! Why’d he want to bring water?”
“Trust.”
“Trust?”
“Yes. That’s what he didn’t, the water here. See?”
Rincewind opened a bottle. The liquid inside might have been water. It had a
flat, empty flavor, with no trace of life. “Neither taste nor smell,” he grumbled.
The Luggage gave a little creak, attracting his attention. With a lazy air of
calculated menace it shut its lid slowly, grinding Rincewind’s impromptu wedge
like a dry loaf.
“All right, all right,” he said. “I’m thinking.”
Ymor’s headquarters were in the Leaning Tower at the junction of Rime Street
and Frost Alley. At midnight the solitary guard leaning in the shadows looked up
at the conjoining planets and wondered idly what change in his fortunes they
might herald.
There was the faintest of sounds, as of a gnat yawning.
The guard glanced down the deserted street, and now caught the glimmer of
moonlight on something lying in the mud a few yards away. He picked it up. The
lunar light gleamed on gold, and his intake of breath was almost loud enough to
echo down the alleyway.
There was a slight sound again, and another coin rolled into the gutter on the
other side of the street.
By the time he had picked it up there was another one, a little way off and still
spinning. Gold was, he remembered, said to be formed from the crystallized
light of stars. Until now he had never believed it to be true, that something as
heavy as gold could fall naturally from the sky.
As he drew level with the opposite alley mouth some more fell. It was still in its
bag, there was an awful lot of it, and Rincewind brought it down heavily onto his
head.
When the guard came to he found himself looking up into the wild-eyed face of
a wizard, who was menacing his throat with a sword. In the darkness, too,
something was gripping his leg.
It was the disconcerting sort of grip that suggested that the gripper could grip a
whole lot harder, if he wanted to.
“Where is he, the rich foreigner?” hissed the wizard. “Quickly!”
“What’s holding my leg?” said the man, with a note of terror in his voice. He
tried to wriggle free. The pressure increased.
“You wouldn’t want to know,” said Rincewind. “Pay attention, please. Where’s
the foreigner?”
“Not here! They’ve got him at Broadman’s place! Everyone’s looking for him!
You’re Rincewind, aren’t you? The box—the box that bites people—ononono…
pleasssse…”
Rincewind had gone. The guard felt the unseen leg gripper release his—or, as he
was beginning to fear, its—hold. Then, as he tried to pull himself to his feet,
something big and heavy and square cannoned into him out of the dark and
plunged off after the wizard. Something with hundreds of tiny feet.
With only his homemade phrase book to help him, Twoflower was trying to
explain the mysteries of inn-sewer-ants to Broadman. The fat innkeeper was
listening intently, his little black eyes glittering.
From the other end of the table Ymor watched with mild amusement,
occasionally feeding one of his ravens with scraps from his plate. Beside him
Withel paced up and down.
“You fret too much,” said Ymor, without taking his eyes from the two men
opposite him. “I can feel it, Stren. Who would dare attack us here? And the
gutter wizard will come. He’s too much of a coward not to. And he’ll try to
bargain. And we shall have him. And the gold. And the chest.”
Withel’s one eye glared, and he smacked a fist into the palm of a black-gloved
hand.
“Who would have thought there was so much sapient pearwood in the whole of
the Disc?” he said. “How could we have known?”
“You fret too much, Stren. I’m sure you can do better this time,” said Ymor
pleasantly.
The lieutenant snorted in disgust, and strode off around the room to bully his
men. Ymor carried on watching the tourist.
It was strange, but the little man didn’t seem to realize the seriousness of his
position. Ymor had on several occasions seen him look around the room with an
expression of deep satisfaction. He had also been talking for ages to Broadman,
and Ymor had seen a piece of paper change hands. And Broadman had given the
foreigner some coins. It was strange.
When Broadman got up and waddled past Ymor’s chair the thiefmaster’s arm
shot out like a steel spring and grabbed the fat man by his apron.
“What was that all about, friend?” asked Ymor quietly.
“N-nothing, Ymor. Just private business, like.”
“There are no secrets between friends, Broadman.”
“Yar. Well, I’m not sure about it myself, really. It’s a sort of bet, see?” said the
innkeeper nervously. “Inn-sewer-ants, it’s called. It’s like a bet that the Broken
Drum won’t get burned down.”
Ymor held the man’s gaze until Broadman twitched in fear and embarrassment.
Then the thiefmaster laughed.
“This worm-eaten old tinder pile?” he said. “The man must be mad!”
“Yes, but mad with money. He says now he’s got the—can’t remember the word,
begins with a P, it’s what you might call the stake money—the people he works
for in the Agatean Empire will pay up. If the Broken Drum burns down. Not that
I hope it does. Burn down. The Broken Drum, I mean. I mean, it’s like a home to
me, is the Drum…”
“Not entirely stupid, are you?” said Ymor, and pushed the innkeeper away.
The door slammed back on its hinges and thudded into the wall.
“Hey, that’s my door!” screamed Broadman. Then he realized who was standing
at the top of the steps, and ducked behind the table a mere shaving of time before
a short black dart sped across the room and thunked into the woodwork.
Ymor moved his hand carefully, and poured out another flagon of beer.
“Won’t you join me, Zlorf?” he said levelly. “And put that sword away, Stren.
Zlorf Flannelfoot is our friend.”
The president of the Assassins’ Guild spun his short blowgun dexterously and
slotted it into its holster in one smooth movement.
“Stren!” said Ymor.
The black-clad thief hissed, and sheathed his sword. But he kept his hand on the
hilt, and his eyes on the assassin.
That wasn’t easy. Promotion in the Assassins’ Guild was by competitive
examination, the Practical being the most important—indeed, the only—part.
Thus Zlorf’s broad, honest face was a welt of scar tissue, the result of many a
close encounter. It probably hadn’t been all that good looking in any case—it
was said that Zlorf had chosen a profession in which dark hoods, cloaks and
nocturnal prowlings figured largely because there was a day-fearing trollish
streak in his parentage. People who said this in earshot of Zlorf tended to carry
their ears home in their hats.
He strolled down the stairs, followed by a number of assassins. When he was
directly in front of Ymor he said: “I’ve come for the tourist.”
“Is it any of your business, Zlorf?”
“Yes. Grinjo, Urmond—take him.”
Two of the assassins stepped forward. Then Stren was in front of them, his
sword appearing to materialize an inch from their throats without having to pass
through the intervening air.
“Possibly I could only kill one of you,” he murmured, “but I suggest you ask
yourselves—which one?”
“Look up, Zlorf,” said Ymor.
A row of yellow, baleful eyes looked down from the darkness among the rafters.
“One step more and you’ll leave here with fewer eyeballs than you came with,”
said the thiefmaster. “So sit down and have a drink, Zlorf, and let’s talk about
this sensibly. I thought we had an agreement. You don’t rob—I don’t kill. Not for
payment, that is,” he added after a pause.
Zlorf took the proferred beer.
“So?” he said. “I’ll kill him. Then you rob him. Is he that funny looking one over
there?”
“Yes.”
Zlorf stared at Twoflower, who grinned at him. He shrugged. He seldom wasted
time wondering why people wanted other people dead. It was just a living.
“Who is your client, may I ask?” said Ymor.
Zlorf held up a hand. “Please!” he protested. “Professional etiquette.”
“Of course. By the way—”
“Yes?”
“I believe I have a couple of guards outside—”
“Had.”
“And some others in the doorway across the street—”
“Formerly.”
“And two bowmen on the roof.”
A flicker of doubt passed across Zlorf’s face, like the last shaft of sunlight over a
badly plowed field.
The door flew open, badly damaging the assassin who was standing beside it.
“Stop doing that!” shrieked Broadman, from under his table.
Zlorf and Ymor stared up at the figure on the threshold. It was short, fat and
richly dressed. Very richly dressed. There were a number of tall, big shapes
looming behind it. Very big, threatening shapes.
“Who’s that?” said Zlorf.
“I know him,” said Ymor. “His name’s Rerpf. He runs the Groaning Platter
tavern down by Brass Bridge. Stren—remove him.”
Rerpf held up a beringed hand. Stren Withel hesitated halfway to the door as
several very large trolls ducked under the doorway and stood on either side of
the fat man, blinking in the light. Muscles the size of melons bulged in forearms
like floursacks. Each troll held a double-headed ax. Between thumb and
forefinger.
Broadman erupted from cover, his face suffused with rage.
“Out!” he screamed. “Get those trolls out of here!”
No one moved. The room was suddenly quiet. Broadman looked around quickly.
It began to dawn on him just what he had said, and to whom. A whimper escaped
from his lips, glad to be free.
He reached the doorway to his cellars just as one of the trolls, with a lazy flick of
one ham-sized hand, sent his ax whirling across the room. The slam of the door
and its subsequent splitting as the ax hit it merged into one sound.
“Bloody hell!” exclaimed Zlorf Flannelfoot.
“What do you want?” said Ymor.
“I am here on behalf of the Guild of Merchants and Traders,” said Rerpf evenly.
“To protect our interests, you might say. Meaning the little man.”
Ymor wrinkled his brows.
“I’m sorry,” he said. “I thought I heard you say the Guild of Merchants?”
“And traders,” agreed Rerpf. Behind him now, in addition to more trolls, were
several humans that Ymor vaguely recognized. He had seen them, maybe,
behind counters and bars. Shadowy figures, usually—easily ignored, easily
forgotten. At the back of his mind a bad feeling began to grow. He thought about
how it might be to be, say, a fox confronted with an angry sheep. A sheep,
moreover, that could afford to employ wolves.
“How long has this—Guild—been in existence, may I ask?” he said.
“Since this afternoon,” said Rerpf. “I’m vice-guildmaster in charge of tourism,
you know.”
“What is this tourism of which you speak?”
“Uh—we are not quite sure…” said Rerpf. An old bearded man poked his head
over the guildmaster’s shoulder and cackled, “Speaking on behalf of the
winesellers of Morpork, Tourism means Business. See?”
“Well?” said Ymor coldly.
“Well,” said Rerpf, “we’re protecting our interests, like I said.”
“Thieves OUT, Thieves OUT!” cackled his elderly companion.” Several others
took up the chant. Zlorf grinned. “And assassins,” chanted the old man. Zlorf
growled.
“Stands to reason,” said Rerpf. “People robbing and murdering all over place,
what sort of impression are visitors going to take away? You come all the way to
see our fine city with its many points of historical and civic interest, also many
quaint customs, and you wake up dead in some back alley or as it might be
floating down the Ankh, how are you going to tell all your friends what a great
time you’re having? Let’s face it, you’ve got to move with the times.”
Zlorf and Ymor met each other’s gaze.
“We have, have we?” said Ymor.
“Then let us move, brother,” agreed Zlorf. In one movement he brought his
blowgun to his mouth and sent a dart hissing toward the nearest troll. It spun
around, hurling its ax, which whirred over the assassin’s head and buried itself in
a luckless thief behind him.
Rerpf ducked, allowing a troll behind him to raise its huge iron crossbow and
fire a spear length quarrel into the nearest assassin. That was the start…
It has been remarked before that those who are sensitive to radiations in the far
octarine—the eighth color, the pigment of the Imagination—can see things that
others cannot.
Thus it was that Rincewind, hurrying through the crowded, flare-lit evening
bazaars of Morpork with the Luggage trundling behind him, jostled a tall dark
figure, turned to deliver a few suitable curses, and beheld Death.
It had to be Death. No one else went around with empty eye sockets and, of
course, the scythe over one shoulder was another clue. As Rincewind stared in
horror a courting couple, laughing at some private joke, walked straight through
the apparition without appearing to notice it.
Death, insofar as it was possible in a face with no movable features, looked
surprised.
RINCEWIND? Death said, in tones as deep and heavy as the slamming of
leaden doors, far underground.
“Um,” said Rincewind, trying to back away from that eyeless stare.
BUT WHY ARE YOU HERE? (Boom, boom went crypt lids, in the worm
haunted fastnesses under old mountains…)
“Um, why not?” said Rincewind. “Anyway, I’m sure you’ve got lots to do, so if
you’ll just—”
I WAS SURPRISED THAT YOU JOSTLED ME, RINCEWIND, FOR I HAVE
AN APPOINTMENT WITH THEE THIS VERY NIGHT.
“Oh no, not—”
OF COURSE, WHAT’S SO BLOODY VEXING ABOUT THE WHOLE
BUSINESS IS THAT I WAS EXPECTING TO MEET THEE IN
PSEPHOPOLOLIS.
“But that’s five hundred miles away!”
YOU DON’T HAVE TO TELL ME. THE WHOLE SYSTEM’S GOT
SCREWED UP AGAIN, I CAN SEE THAT. LOOK, THERE’S NO CHANCE
OF YOU—?
Rincewind backed away, hands spread protectively in front of him. The dried
fish salesman on a nearby stall watched this madman with interest.
“Not a chance!”
I COULD LEND YOU A VERY FAST HORSE.
“No!”
IT WON’T HURT A BIT.
“No!” Rincewind turned and ran. Death watched him go, and shrugged bitterly.
SOD YOU, THEN, Death said. He turned, and noticed the fish salesman. With a
snarl Death reached out a bony finger and stopped the man’s heart, but he didn’t
take much pride in it.
Then Death remembered what was due to happen later that night. It would not be
true to say that Death smiled, because in any case His features were perforce
frozen in a calcareous grin. But He hummed a little tune, cheery as a plague pit,
and—pausing only to extract the life from a passing mayfly, and one ninth of the
lives from a cat cowering under the fish stall (all cats can see into the octarine)—
Death turned on His heel and set off toward the Broken Drum.
Short Street, Morpork, is in fact one of the longest in the city. Filigree Street
crosses its turnwise end in the manner of the crosspiece of a T, and the Broken
Drum is so placed that it looks down the full length of the street.
At the furthermost end of Short Street a dark oblong rose on hundreds of tiny
legs, and started to run. At first it moved at no more than a lumbering trot, but by
the time it was halfway up the street it was moving arrow-fast…
A darker shadow inched its way along one of the walls of the Drum, a few yards
from the two trolls who were guarding the door. Rincewind was sweating. If
they heard the faint clinking of the specially prepared bags at his belt…
One of the trolls tapped his colleague on the shoulder, producing a noise like two
pebbles being knocked together. He pointed down the starlit street…
Rincewind darted from his hiding place, turned, and hurled his burden through
the Drum’s nearest window.
Withel saw it arrive. The bag arced across the room, turning slowly in the air,
and burst on the edge of a table. A moment later gold coins were rolling across
the floor, spinning, glittering.
The room was suddenly silent, save for the tiny noises of gold and the whimpers
of the wounded. With a curse Withel dispatched the assassin he had been
fighting. “It’s a trick!” he screamed. “No one move!”
Three score men and a dozen trolls froze in mid-grope.
Then, for the third time, the door burst open. Two trolls hurried through it,
slammed it behind them, dropped the heavy bar across it and fled down the
stairs.
Outside there was a sudden crescendo of running feet. And, for the last time, the
door opened. In fact it exploded, the great wooden bar being hurled far across
the room and the frame itself giving way.
Door and frame landed on a table, which flew into splinters. It was then that the
frozen fighters noticed that there was something else in the pile of wood. It was a
box, shaking itself madly to free itself of the smashed timber around it.
Rincewind appeared in the ruined doorway, hurling another of his gold grenades.
It smashed into a wall, showering coins.
Down in the cellar Broadman looked up, muttered to himself, and carried on
with his work. His entire spindlewinter’s supply of candles had already been
strewn on the floor, mixed with his store of kindling wood. Now he was
attacking a barrel of lamp oil.
“Inn-sewer-ants,” he muttered. Oil gushed out and swirled around his feet.
Withel stormed across the floor, his face a mask of rage. Rincewind took careful
aim and caught the thief full in the chest with a bag of gold.
But now Ymor was shouting, and pointing an accusing finger. A raven swooped
down from its perch in the rafters and dived at the wizard, talons open and
gleaming.
It didn’t make it. At about the halfway point the Luggage leapt from its bed of
splinters, gaped briefly in midair, and snapped shut.
It landed lightly. Rincewind saw its lid open again, slightly. Just far enough for a
tongue, large as a palm leaf, red as mahogany, to lick up a few errant feathers.
At the same moment the giant candlewheel fell from the ceiling, plunging the
room into gloom. Rincewind, coiling himself like a spring, gave a standing jump
and grasped a beam, swinging himself up into the relative safety of the roof with
a strength that amazed him.
“Exciting, isn’t it!” said a voice by his ear.
Down below, thieves, assassins, trolls and merchants all realized at about the
same moment that they were in a room made treacherous of foothold by gold
coins and containing something, among the suddenly menacing shapes in the
semidarkness, that was absolutely horrible. As one they made for the door, but
had two dozen different recollections of its exact position.
High above the chaos Rincewind stared at Twoflower.
“Did you cut the lights down?” he hissed.
“Yes.”
“How come you’re up here?”
“I thought I’d better not get in everyone’s way.”
Rincewind considered this. There didn’t seem to be much he could say.
Twoflower added: “A real brawl! Better than anything I’d imagined! Do you
think I ought to thank them? Or did you arrange it?”
Rincewind looked at him blankly. “I think we ought to be getting down now,” he
said hollowly. “Everyone’s gone.”
He dragged Twoflower across the littered floor and up the steps. They burst out
into the tail end of the night. There were still a few stars but the moon was down,
and there was a faint gray glow to rimward. Most important, the street was
empty.
Rincewind sniffed.
“Can you smell oil?” he said.
Then Withel stepped out of the shadows and tripped him up.
At the top of the cellar steps Broadman knelt down and fumbled in his tinderbox.
It turned out to be damp.
“I’ll kill that bloody cat,” he muttered, and groped for the spare box that was
normally on the ledge by the door. It was missing. Broadman said a bad word.
A lighted taper appeared in midair, right beside him.
HERE, TAKE THIS.
“Thanks,” said Broadman.
DON’T MENTION IT.
Broadman went to throw the taper down the steps. His hand paused in midair. He
looked at the taper, his brow furrowing. Then he turned around and held the
taper up to illuminate the scene. It didn’t shed much light, but it did give the
darkness a shape…
“Oh, no—” he breathed.
BUT YES, said Death.
Rincewind rolled.
For a moment he thought Withel was going to spit him where he lay. But it was
worse than that. He was waiting for him to get up.
“I see you have a sword, wizard,” he said quietly. “I suggest you rise, and we
shall see how well you use it.”
Rincewind stood up as slowly as he dared, and drew from his belt the short
sword he had taken from the guard a few hours and a hundred years ago. It was a
short blunt affair compared to Withel’s hair-thin rapier.
“But I don’t know how to use a sword,” he wailed.
“Good.”
“You know that wizards can’t be killed by edged weapons?” said Rincewind
desperately.
Withel smiled coldly. “So I have heard,” he said. “I look forward to putting it to
the test.” He lunged.
Rincewind caught the thrust by sheer luck, jerked his hand away in shock,
deflected the second stroke by coincidence, and took the third one through his
robe at heart height.
There was a clink.
Withel’s snarl of triumph died in his throat. He drew the sword out and prodded
again at the wizard, who was rigid with terror and guilt. There was another clink,
and gold coins began to drop out of the hem of the wizard’s robe.
“So you bleed gold, do you?” hissed Withel. “But have you got gold concealed
in that raggedy beard, you little—”
As his sword went back for his final sweep the sullen glow that had been
growing in the doorway of the Broken Drum flickered, dimmed, and erupted into
a roaring fireball that sent the walls billowing outward and carried the roof a
hundred feet into the air before bursting through it, in a gout of red-hot tiles.
Withel stared at the boiling flames, unnerved. And Rincewind leapt. He ducked
under the thief’s sword arm and brought his own blade around in an arc so
incompetently misjudged that it hit the man flat first and jolted out of the
wizard’s hand. Sparks and droplets of flaming oil rained down as Withel reached
out with both gauntleted hands and grabbed Rincewind’s neck, forcing him
down.
“You did this!” he screamed. “You and your box of trickery!”
His thumb found Rincewind’s windpipe. This is it, the wizard thought. Wherever
I’m going, it can’t be worse than here…
“Excuse me,” said Twoflower.
Rincewind felt the grip lessen. And now Withel was slowly getting up, a look of
absolute hatred on his face.
A glowing ember landed on the wizard. He brushed it off hurriedly, and
scrambled to his feet.
Twoflower was behind Withel, holding the man’s own needle-sharp sword with
the point resting in the small of the thief’s back. Rincewind’s eyes narrowed. He
reached into his robe, then withdrew his hand bunched into a fist.
“Don’t move,” he said.
“Am I doing this right?” asked Twoflower anxiously.
“He says he’ll skewer your liver if you move,” Rincewind translated freely.
“I doubt it,” said Withel.
“Bet?”
“No.”
As Withel tensed himself to turn on the tourist Rincewind lashed out and caught
the thief on the jaw. Withel stared at him in amazement for a moment, and then
quietly toppled into the mud.
The wizard uncurled his stinging fist and the roll of gold coins slipped between
his throbbing fingers. He looked down at the recumbent thief.
“Good grief,” he gasped.
He looked up and yelled as another ember landed on his neck. Flames were
racing along the rooftops on either side of the street. All around him people were
hurling possessions from windows and dragging horses from smoking stables.
Another explosion in the white-hot volcano that was the Drum sent a whole
marble mantelpiece scything overhead.
“The Widdershin Gate’s the nearest!” Rincewind shouted above the crackle of
collapsing rafters. “Come on!”
He grabbed Twoflower’s reluctant arm and dragged him down the street.
“My Luggage—”
“Blast your luggage! Stay here much longer and you’ll go where you don’t need
luggage! Come on!” screamed Rincewind.
They jogged on through the crowd of frightened people leaving the area, while
the wizard took great mouthfuls of cool dawn air. Something was puzzling him.
“I’m sure all the candles went out,” he said. “So how did the Drum catch fire?”
“I don’t know,” moaned Twoflower. “It’s terrible, Rincewind. We were getting
along so well, too.”
Rincewind stopped in astonishment, so that another refugee cannoned into him
and spun away with an oath.
“Getting on?”
“Yes, a great bunch of fellows, I thought—language was a bit of a problem, but
they were so keen for me to join their party, they just wouldn’t take no for an
answer—really friendly people, I thought…”
Rincewind started to correct him, then realized he didn’t know how to begin.
“It’ll be a blow for old Broadman,” Twoflower continued. “Still, he was wise.
I’ve still got the rhinu he paid as his first premium.”
Rincewind didn’t know the meaning of the word premium, but his mind was
working fast.
“You inn-sewered the Drum?” he said. “You bet Broadman it wouldn’t catch
fire?”
“Oh yes. Standard valuation. Two hundred rhinu. Why do you ask?”
Rincewind turned and stared at the flames racing toward them, and wondered
how much of Ankh-Morpork could be bought for two hundred rhinu. Quite a
large piece, he decided. Only not now, not the way those flames were moving…
He glanced down at the tourist.
“You—” he began, and searched his memory for the worst word in the Trob
tongue; the happy little beTrobi didn’t really know how to swear properly.
“You,” he repeated. Another hurrying figure bumped into him, narrowly missing
him with the blade over its shoulder. Rincewind’s tortured temper exploded.
“You little (such a one who, while wearing a copper nose ring, stands in a
footbath atop Mount Raruaruaha during a heavy thunderstorm and shouts that
Alohura, goddess of lightning, has the facial features of a diseased uloruaha
root)!”
JUST DOING MY JOB, said the figure, stalking away.
Every word fell as heavily as slabs of marble; moreover, Rincewind was certain
that he was the only one who heard them.
He grabbed Twoflower again.
“Let’s get out of here!” he suggested.
One interesting side effect of the fire in Ankh-Morpork concerns the inn-sewerants
policy, which left the city through the ravaged roof of the Broken Drum,
was wafted high into the Discworld’s atmosphere on the ensuing thermal, and
came to earth several days and a few thousand miles away on an uloruaha bush
in the beTrobi islands. The simple, laughing islanders subsequently worshipped
it as a god, much to the amusement of their more sophisticated neighbors.
Strangely enough the rainfall and harvests in the next few years were almost
supernaturally abundant, and this led to a research team being dispatched to the
islands by the Minor Religions faculty of Unseen University. Their verdict was
that it only went to show.
The fire, driven by the wind, spread out from the Drum faster than a man could
walk. The timbers of the Widdershin Gate were already on fire when Rincewind,
his face blistered and reddened from the flames, reached them. By now he and
Twoflower were on horseback—mounts hadn’t been that hard to obtain. A wily
merchant had asked fifty times their worth, and had been left gaping when one
thousand times their worth had been pressed into his hands.
They rode through just before the first of the big gate timbers descended in an
explosion of sparks. Morpork was already a cauldron of flame.
As they galloped up the red-lit road Rincewind glanced sideways at his traveling
companion, currently trying hard to learn to ride a horse.
Bloody hell, he thought. He’s alive! Me too. Who’d have thought it? Perhaps
there is something in this reflected-sound-of-underground-spirits? It was a
cumbersome phrase. Rincewind tried to get his tongue around the thick syllables
that were the word in Twoflower’s own language.
“Ecolirix?” he tried. “Ecro-gnothics? Echo-gnomics?”
That would do. That sounded about right.
Several hundred yards downriver from the last smoldering suburb of the city a
strangely rectangular and apparently heavily waterlogged object touched the
mud on the widdershin bank. Immediately it sprouted numerous legs and
scrabbled for a purchase.
Hauling itself to the top of the bank the Luggage—streaked with soot, stained
with water and very, very angry—shook itself and took its bearings. Then it
moved away at a brisk trot, the small and incredibly ugly imp that was perching
on its lid watching the scenery with interest.
Bravd looked at the Weasel and raised his eyebrows.
“And that’s it,” said Rincewind. “The Luggage caught up with us, don’t ask me
how. Is there any more wine?”
The Weasel picked up the empty wineskin.
“I think you have had just about enough wine this night,” he said.
Bravd’s forehead wrinkled.
“Gold is gold,” he said finally. “How can a man with plenty of gold consider
himself poor? You’re either poor or rich. It stands to reason.”
Rincewind hiccupped. He was finding Reason rather difficult to hold on to.
“Well,” he said, “what I think is, the point is, well, you know octiron?”
The two adventurers nodded. The strange iridescent metal was almost as highly
valued in the lands around the Circle Sea as sapient pearwood, and was about as
rare. A man who owned a needle made of octiron would never lose his way,
since it always pointed to the Hub of the Discworld, being acutely sensitive to
the Disc’s magical field; it would also miraculously darn his socks.
“Well, my point is, you see, that gold also has its sort of magical field. Sort of
financial wizardry. Echo-gnomics.” Rincewind giggled.
The Weasel stood up and stretched. The sun was well up now, and the city below
them was wreathed in mists and full of foul vapors. Also gold, he decided. Even
a citizen of Morpork would, at the very point of death, desert his treasure to save
his skin. Time to move.
The little man called Twoflower appeared to be asleep. The Weasel looked down
at him and shook his head.
“The city awaits, such as it is,” he said. “Thank you for a pleasant tale, Wizard.
What will you do now?” He eyed the Luggage, which immediately backed away
and snapped its lid at him.
“Well, there are no ships leaving the city now,” giggled Rincewind. “I suppose
we’ll take the coast road to Chirm. I’ve got to look after him, you see. But look,
I didn’t make it—”
“Sure, sure,” said the Weasel soothingly. He turned away and swung himself into
the saddle of the horse that Bravd was holding. A few moments later the two
heroes were just specks under a cloud of dust, heading down toward the charcoal
city.
Rincewind stared muzzily at the recumbent tourist. At two recumbent tourists. In
his somewhat defenseless state a stray thought, wandering through the
dimensions in search of a mind to harbor it, slid into his brain.
“Here’s another fine mess you’ve got me into,” he moaned, and slumped
backward.
“Mad,” said the Weasel. Bravd, galloping along a few feet away, nodded.
“All wizards get like that,” he said. “It’s the quicksilver fumes. Rots their brains.
Mushrooms, too.”
“However—” said the brown clad one. He reached into his tunic and took out a
golden disc on a short chain. Bravd raised his eyebrows.
“The wizard said that the little man had some sort of golden disc that told him
the time,” said the Weasel.
“Arousing your cupidity, little friend? You always were an expert thief, Weasel.”
“Aye,” agreed the Weasel modestly. He touched the knob at the disc’s rim, and it
flipped open.
The very small demon imprisoned within looked up from its tiny abacus and
scowled. “It lacks but ten minutes to eight of the clock,” it snarled. The lid
slammed shut, almost trapping the Weasel’s fingers.
With an oath the Weasel hurled the time-teller far out into the heather, where it
possibly hit a stone. Something, in any event, caused the case to split; there was
a vivid octarine flash and a whiff of brimstone as the time being vanished into
whatever demonic dimension it called home.
“What did you do that for?” said Bravd, who hadn’t been close enough to hear
the words.
“Do what?” said the Weasel. “I didn’t do anything. Nothing happened at all.
Come on—we’re wasting opportunities!”
Bravd nodded. Together they turned their steeds and galloped toward ancient
Ankh, and honest enchantments.
The Sending of Eight
PROLOGUE
THE DISCWORLD OFFERS SIGHTS far more impressive than those found in
universes built by Creators with less imagination but more mechanical aptitude.
Although the Disc’s sun is but an orbiting moonlet, its prominences hardly
bigger than croquet hoops, this slight drawback must be set against the
tremendous sight of Great A’Tuin the Turtle, upon Whose ancient and meteor
riddled shell the Disc ultimately rests. Sometimes, in His slow journey across the
shores of Infinity, He moves His country-sized head to snap at a passing comet.
But perhaps the most impressive sight of all—if only because most brains, when
faced with the sheer galactic enormity of A’Tuin, refuse to believe it—is the
endless Rimfall, where the seas of the Disc boil ceaselessly over the Edge into
space. Or perhaps it is the Rimbow, the eight-colored, world-girdling rainbow
that hovers in the mist-laden air over the Fall. The eighth color is octarine,
caused by the scatter effect of strong sunlight on an intense magical field.
Or perhaps, again, the most magnificent sight is the Hub. There, a spire of green
ice ten miles high rises through the clouds and supports at its peak the realm of
Dunmanifestin, the abode of the Disc gods. The Disc gods themselves, despite
the splendor of the world below them, are seldom satisfied. It is embarrassing to
know that one is a god of a world that only exists because every improbability
curve must have its far end; especially when one can peer into other dimensions
at worlds whose Creators had more mechanical aptitude than imagination. No
wonder, then, that the Disc gods spend more time in bickering than in
omnicognizance.
On this particular day Blind Io, by dint of constant vigilance the chief of the
gods, sat with his chin on his hand and looked at the gaming board on the red
marble table in front of him. Blind Io had got his name because, where his eye
sockets should have been, there were nothing but two areas of blank skin. His
eyes, of which he had an impressively large number, led a semi-independent life
of their own. Several were currently hovering above the table.
The gaming board was a carefully carved map of the Discworld, overprinted
with squares. A number of beautifully modeled playing pieces were now
occupying some of the squares. A human onlooker would, for example, have
recognized in two of them the likenesses of Bravd and the Weasel. Others
represented yet more heroes and champions, of which the Disc had a more than
adequate supply.
Still in the game were Io, Offler the Crocodile God, Zephyrus the god of slight
breezes, Fate, and the Lady. There was an air of concentration around the board
now that the lesser players had been removed from the Game. Chance had been
an early casualty, running her hero into a full house of armed gnolls (the result of
a lucky throw by Offler) and shortly afterward Night has cashed his chips,
pleading an appointment with Destiny. Several minor deities had drifted up and
were kibitzing over the shoulders of the players.
Side bets were made that the Lady would be the next to leave the board. Her last
champion of any standing was now a pinch of potash in the ruins of stillsmoking
Ankh-Morpork, and there were hardly any pieces that she could
promote to first rank.
Blind Io took up the dice box, which was a skull whose various orifices had been
stoppered with rubies, and with several of his eyes on the Lady he rolled three
fives.
She smiled. This was the nature of the Lady’s eyes: they were bright green,
lacking iris or pupil, and they glowed from within.
The room was silent as she scrabbled in her box of pieces and, from the very
bottom, produced a couple that she set down on the board with two decisive
clicks. The rest of the players, as one god, craned forward to peer at them.
“A wenegade wiffard and fome fort of clerk,” said Offler the Crocodile God,
hindered as usual by his tusks. “Well, weally!” With one claw he pushed a pile of
bone-white tokens into the center of the table.
The Lady nodded slightly. She picked up the dice cup and held it as steady as a
rock, yet all the gods could hear the three cubes rattling about inside. And then
she sent them bouncing across the table.
A six. A three. A five.
Something was happening to the five, however. Battered by the chance collision
of several billion molecules, the die flipped onto a point, spun gently and came
down a seven.
Blind Io picked up the cube and counted the sides.
“Come on,” he said wearily. “Play fair.”
THE SENDING OF EIGHT
The road from Ankh-Morpork to Chirm is high, white and winding, a thirtyleague
stretch of potholes and half-buried rocks that spirals around mountains
and dips into cool green valleys of citrus trees, crosses liana-webbed gorges on
creaking rope bridges and is generally more picturesque than useful.
Picturesque. That was a new word to Rincewind the wizard (B. Mgc., Unseen
University [failed]). It was one of a number he had picked up since leaving the
charred ruins of Ankh-Morpork. Quaint was another one. Picturesque meant—he
decided after careful observation of the scenery that inspired Twoflower to use
the word—that the landscape was horribly precipitous. Quaint, when used to
describe the occasional village through which they passed, meant fever-ridden
and tumbledown.
Twoflower was a tourist, the first ever seen on the Discworld. Tourist,
Rincewind had decided, meant “idiot.”
As they rode leisurely through the thyme-scented, bee-humming air, Rincewind
pondered on the experiences of the last few days. While the little foreigner was
obviously insane, he was also generous and considerably less lethal than half the
people the wizard had mixed with in the city. Rincewind rather liked him.
Disliking him would be like kicking a puppy.
Currently Twoflower was showing a great interest in the theory and practice of
magic.
“It all seems, well, rather useless to me,” he said. “I always thought that, you
know, a wizard just said the magic words and that was that. Not all this tedious
memorizing.”
Rincewind agreed moodily. He tried to explain that magic had indeed once been
wild and lawless, but had been tamed back in the mists of time by the Olden
Ones, who had bound it to obey among other things the Law of Conservation of
Reality; this demanded that the effort needed to achieve a goal should be the
same regardless of the means used. In practical terms this meant that, say,
creating the illusion of a glass of wine was relatively easy, since it involved
merely the subtle shifting of light patterns. On the other hand, lifting a genuine
wineglass a few feet in the air by sheer mental energy required several hours of
systematic preparation if the wizard wished to prevent the simple principle of
leverage flicking his brain out through his ears.
He went on to add that some of the ancient magic could still be found in its raw
state, recognizable—to the initiated—by the eightfold shape it made in the
crystalline structure of space-time. There was the metal octiron, for example, and
the gas octogen. Both radiated dangerous amounts of raw enchantment.
“It’s all very depressing,” he finished.
“Depressing?”
Rincewind turned in his saddle and glanced at Twoflower’s Luggage, which was
currently ambling along on its little legs, occasionally snapping its lid at
butterflies. He sighed.
“Rincewind thinks he ought to be able to harness the lightning,” said the picture
imp, who was observing the passing scene from the tiny doorway of the box
slung around Twoflower’s neck. He had spent the morning painting picturesque
views and quaint scenes for his master, and had been allowed to knock off for a
smoke.
“When I said harness I didn’t mean harness,” snapped Rincewind. “I meant,
well, I just meant that—I dunno, I just can’t think of the right words. I just think
the world ought to be more sort of organized.”
“That’s just fantasy,” said Twoflower.
“I know. That’s the trouble.” Rincewind sighed again. It was all very well going
on about pure logic and how the universe was ruled by logic and the harmony of
numbers, but the plain fact of the matter was that the Disc was manifestly
traversing space on the back of a giant turtle and the gods had a habit of going
around to atheists’ houses and smashing their windows.
There was a faint sound, hardly louder than the noise of the bees in the rosemary
by the road. It had a curiously bony quality, as of rolling skulls or a whirling dice
box. Rincewind peered around. There was no one nearby.
For some reason that worried him.
Then came a slight breeze, that grew and went in the space of a few heartbeats. It
left the world unchanged save in a few interesting particulars.
There was now, for example, a five-meter tall mountain troll standing in the
road. It was exceptionally angry. This was partly because trolls generally are, in
any case, but it was exacerbated by the fact that the sudden and instantaneous
teleportation from its lair in the Rammerorck Mountains three thousand miles
away and a thousand yards closer to the Rim had raised its internal temperature
to a dangerous level, in accordance with the laws of conservation of energy. So it
bared its fangs and charged.
“What a strange creature,” Twoflower remarked. “Is it dangerous?”
“Only to people!” shouted Rincewind. He drew his sword and, with a smooth
overarm throw, completely failed to hit the troll. The blade plunged on into the
heather at the side of the track.
There was the faintest of sounds, like the rattle of old teeth.
The sword struck a boulder concealed in the heather—concealed, a watcher
might have considered, so artfully that a moment before it had not appeared to
be there at all. It sprang up like a leaping salmon and in mid-ricochet plunged
deeply into the back of the troll’s gray neck.
The creature grunted, and with one swipe of a claw gouged a wound in the flank
of Twoflower’s horse, which screamed and bolted into the trees at the roadside.
The troll spun around and made a grab for Rincewind.
Then its sluggish nervous system brought it the message that it was dead. It
looked surprised for a moment, and then toppled over and shattered into gravel
(trolls being silica-ceous life-forms, their bodies reverted instantly to stone at the
moment of death).
“Aaargh,” thought Rincewind as his horse reared in terror. He hung on
desperately as it staggered two-legged across the road and then, screaming,
turned and galloped into the woods.
The sound of hoofbeats died away, leaving the air to the hum of bees and the
occasional rustle of butterfly wings. There was another sound, too, a strange
noise for the bright time of noonday.
It sounded like dice.
“Rincewind?”
The long aisles of trees threw Twoflower’s voice from side to side and
eventually tossed it back to him, unheeded. He sat down on a rock and tried to
think.
Firstly, he was lost. That was vexing, but it did not worry him unduly. The forest
looked quite interesting and probably held elves or gnomes, perhaps both. In fact
on a couple of occasions he had thought he had seen strange green faces peering
down at him from the branches. Twoflower had always wanted to meet an elf. In
fact what he really wanted to meet was a dragon, but an elf would do. Or a real
goblin.
His Luggage was missing, and that was annoying. It was also starting to rain. He
squirmed uncomfortably on the damp stone, and tried to look on the bright side.
For example, during its mad dash his plunging horse had burst through some
bushes and disturbed a she-bear with her cubs, but had gone on before the bear
could react. Then it had suddenly been galloping over the sleeping bodies of a
large wolf pack and, again, its mad speed had been such that the furious yelping
had been left far behind. Nevertheless, the day was wearing on and perhaps it
would be a good idea—Twoflower thought—not to hang about in the open.
Perhaps there was a…he racked his brains trying to remember what sort of
accommodation forests traditionally offered…perhaps there was a gingerbread
house or something?
The stone really was uncomfortable. Twoflower looked down and, for the first
time, noticed the strange carving.
It looked like a spider. Or was it a squid? Moss and lichens rather blurred the
precise details. But they didn’t blur the runes carved below it. Twoflower could
read them clearly, and they said: Traveler, the hospitable temple of Bel-
Shamharoth lies one thousand paces hubward. Now this was strange, Twoflower
realized, because although he could read the message the actual letters were
completely unknown to him. Somehow the message was arriving in his brain
without the tedious necessity of passing through his eyes.
He stood up and untied his now-biddable horse from a sapling. He wasn’t sure
which way the Hub lay, but there seemed to be an old track of sorts leading away
between the trees. This Bel-Shamharoth seemed prepared to go out of his way to
help stranded travelers. In any case, it was that or the wolves. Twoflower nodded
decisively.
It is interesting to note that, several hours later, a couple of wolves who were
following Twoflower’s scent arrived in the glade. Their green eyes fell on the
strange eight-legged carving—which may indeed have been a spider, or an
octopus, or may yet again have been something altogether more strange—and
they immediately decided that they weren’t so hungry, at that.
About three miles away a failed wizard was hanging by his hands from a high
branch in a beech tree.
This was the end result of five minutes of crowded activity. First, an enraged
she-bear had barged through the undergrowth and taken the throat out of his
horse with one swipe of her paw. Then, as Rincewind had fled the carnage, he
had run into a glade in which a number of irate wolves were milling about. His
instructors at Unseen University, who had despaired of Rincewind’s inability to
master levitation, would have then been amazed at the speed with which he
reached and climbed the nearest tree, without apparently touching it.
Now there was just the matter of the snake.
It was large and green, and wound itself along the branch with reptilian patience.
Rincewind wondered if it was poisonous, then chided himself for asking such a
silly question. Of course it would be poisonous.
“What are you grinning for?” he asked the figure on the next branch.
I CAN’T HELP IT, said Death. NOW WOULD YOU BE SO KIND AS TO LET
GO? I CAN’T HANG AROUND ALL DAY.
“I can,” said Rincewind defiantly.
The wolves clustered around the base of the tree looked up with interest at their
next meal talking to himself.
IT WON’T HURT, said Death. If words had weight, a single sentence from
Death would have anchored a ship.
Rincewind’s arms screamed their agony at him. He scowled at the vulturelike,
slightly transparent figure.
“Won’t hurt?” he said. “Being torn apart by wolves won’t hurt?”
He noticed another branch crossing his dangerously narrowing one a few feet
away. If he could just reach it…
He swung himself forward, one hand outstretched.
The branch, already bending, did not break. It simply made a wet little sound
and twisted.
Rincewind found that he was now hanging onto the end of a tongue of bark and
fiber, lengthening as it peeled away from the tree. He looked down, and with a
sort of fatal satisfaction realized that he would land right on the biggest wolf.
Now he was moving slowly as the bark peeled back in a longer and longer strip.
The snake watched him thoughtfully.
But the growing length of bark held. Rincewind began to congratulate himself
until, looking up, he saw what he had hitherto not noticed. There was the largest
hornets’ nest he had ever seen, hanging right in his path.
He shut his eyes tightly.
Why the troll? he asked himself. Everything else is just my usual luck, but why
the troll? What the hell is going on?
Click. It may have been a twig snapping, except that the sound appeared to be
inside Rincewind’s head. Click, click. And a breeze that failed to set a single leaf
atremble.
The hornets’ nest was ripped from the branch as the strip passed by. It shot past
the wizard’s head and he watched it grow smaller as it plummeted toward the
circle of upturned muzzles.
The circle suddenly closed.
The circle suddenly expanded.
The concerted yelp of pain as the pack fought to escape the furious cloud echoed
among the trees. Rincewind grinned inanely.
Rincewind’s elbow nudged something. It was the tree trunk. The strip had
carried him right to the end of the branch. But there were no other branches. The
smooth bark beside him offered no handholds.
It offered hands, though. Two were even now thrusting through the mossy bark
beside him; slim hands, green as young leaves. Then a shapely arm followed,
and then the hamadryad leaned right out and grasped the astonished wizard
firmly and, with that vegetable strength that can send roots questing into rock,
drew him into the tree. The solid bark parted like a mist, closed like a clam.
Death watched impassively.
He glanced at the cloud of mayflies that were dancing their joyful zigzags near
His skull. He snapped His fingers. The insects fell out of the air. But, somehow,
it wasn’t quite the same.
Blind Io pushed his stack of chips across the table, glowered through such of his
eyes that were currently in the room, and strode out. A few demigods tittered. At
least Offler had taken the loss of a perfectly good troll with precise, if somewhat
reptilian, grace.
The Lady’s last opponent shifted his seat until he faced her across the board.
“Lord,” she said, politely.
“Lady,” he acknowledged. Their eyes met.
He was a taciturn god. It was said that he had arrived in the Discworld after
some terrible and mysterious incident in another Eventuality. It is of course the
privilege of gods to control their apparent outward form, even to other gods; the
Fate of the Discworld was currently a kindly man in late middle age, graying
hair brushed neatly around features that a maiden would confidently proffer a
glass of small beer to, should they appear at her back door. It was a face a kindly
youth would gladly help over a stile. Except for his eyes, of course.
No deity can disguise the manner and nature of his eyes. The nature of the two
eyes of the Fate of the Discworld was this: that while at a mere glance they were
simply dark, a closer look would reveal—too late!—that they were but holes
opening onto a blackness so remote, so deep that the watcher would feel himself
inexorably drawn into the twin pools of infinite night and their terrible, wheeling
stars…
The Lady coughed politely, and laid twenty-one white chips on the table. Then
from her robe she took another chip, silvery and translucent and twice the size of
the others. The soul of a true Hero always finds a better rate of exchange, and is
valued highly by the gods.
Fate raised an eyebrow.
“And no cheating, Lady,” he said.
“But who could cheat Fate?” she asked. He shrugged.
“No one. Yet everyone tries.”
“And yet, again, I believe I felt you giving me a little assistance against the
others?”
“But of course. So that the endgame could be the sweeter, Lady. And now…”
He reached into his gaming box and brought forth a piece, setting it down on the
board with a satisfied air. The watching deities gave a collective sigh. Even the
Lady was momentarily taken aback.
It was certainly ugly. The carving was uncertain, as if the craftsman’s hands were
shaking in horror of the thing taking shape under his reluctant fingers. It seemed
to be all suckers and tentacles. And mandibles, the Lady observed. And one
great eye.
“I thought such as He died out at the beginnings of Time,” she said.
“Mayhap our necrotic friend was loath even to go near this one,” laughed Fate.
He was enjoying himself.
“It should never have been spawned.”
“Nevertheless,” said Fate gnomically. He scooped the dice into their unusual
box, and then glanced up at her.
“Unless,” he added, “you wish to resign…?”
She shook her head.
“Play,” she said.
“You can match my stake?”
“Play.”
Rincewind knew what was inside trees: wood, sap, possibly squirrels. Not a
palace.
Still—the cushions underneath him were definitely softer than wood, the wine in
the wooden cup beside him was much tastier than sap, and there could be
absolutely no comparison between a squirrel and the girl sitting before him,
clasping her knees and watching him thoughtfully, unless mention was made of
certain hints of furriness.
The room was high, wide and lit with a soft yellow light which came from no
particular source that Rincewind could identify. Through gnarled and knotted
archways he could see other rooms, and what looked like a very large winding
staircase. And it had looked a perfectly normal tree from the outside, too.
The girl was green—flesh green. Rincewind could be absolutely certain about
that, because all she was wearing was a medallion around her neck. Her long
hair had a faintly mossy look about it. Her eyes had no pupils and were a
luminous green. Rincewind wished he had paid more attention to anthropology
lectures at University.
She had said nothing. Apart from indicating the couch and offering him the wine
she had done no more than sit watching him, occasionally rubbing a deep scratch
on her arm.
Rincewind hurriedly recalled that a dryad was so linked to her tree that she
suffered wounds in sympathy—
“Sorry about that,” he said quickly. “It was just an accident. I mean, there were
these wolves, and—”
“You had to climb my tree, and I rescued you,” said the dryad smoothly. “How
lucky for you. And for your friend, perhaps?”
“Friend?”
“The little man with the magic box,” said the dryad.
“Oh, sure, him,” said Rincewind vaguely. “Yeah. I hope he’s okay.”
“He needs your help.”
“He usually does. Did he make it to a tree, too?”
“He made it to the Temple of Bel-Shamharoth.”
Rincewind choked on his wine. His ears tried to crawl into his head in terror of
the syllables they had just heard. The Soul Eater! Before he could stop them the
memories came galloping back. Once, while a student of practical magic at
Unseen University, and for a bet, he’d slipped into the little room off the main
library—the room with walls covered in protective lead pentagrams, the room no
one was allowed to occupy for more than four minutes and thirty-two seconds,
which was a figure arrived at after two hundred years of cautious
experimentation…
He had gingerly opened the Book, which was chained to the octiron pedestal in
the middle of the rune-strewn floor not lest someone steal it, but lest it escape;
for it was the Octavo, so full of magic that it had its own vague sentience. One
spell had indeed leapt from the crackling pages and lodged itself in the dark
recesses of his brain. And, apart from knowing that it was one of the Eight Great
Spells, no one would know which one until he said it. Even Rincewind did not.
But he could feel it sometimes, sidling out of sight behind his Ego, biding its
time…
On the front of the Octavo had been a representation of Bel-Shamharoth. He was
not Evil, for even Evil has a certain vitality—Bel-Shamharoth was the flip side
of the coin of which Good and Evil are but one side.
“The Soul Eater. His number lyeth between seven and nine; it is twice four,”
Rincewind quoted, his mind frozen with fear. “Oh no. Where’s the Temple?”
“Hubward, toward the center of the forest,” said the dryad. “It is very old.”
“But who would be so stupid as to worship Bel—him? I mean, devils yes, but
he’s the Soul Eater—”
“There were—certain advantages. And the race that used to live in these parts
had strange notions.”
“What happened to them, then?”
“I did say they used to live in these parts.” The dryad stood up and stretched out
her hand. “Come. I am Druellae. Come with me and watch your friend’s fate. It
should be interesting.”
“I’m not sure that—” began Rincewind.
The dryad turned her green eyes on him.
“Do you believe you have a choice?” she asked.
A staircase broad as a major highway wound up through the tree, with vast
rooms leading off at every landing. The sourceless yellow light was everywhere.
There was also a sound like—Rincewind concentrated, trying to identify it—like
far off thunder, or a distant waterfall.
“It’s the tree,” said the dryad shortly.
“What’s it doing?” said Rincewind.
“Living.”
“I wondered about that. I mean, are we really in a tree? Have I been reduced in
size? From outside it looked narrow enough for me to put my arms around.”
“It is.”
“Um, but here I am inside it?”
“You are.”
“Um,” said Rincewind.
Druellae laughed.
“I can see into your mind, false wizard! Am I not a dryad? Do you not know that
what you belittle by the name tree is but the mere four-dimensional analogue of
a whole multidimensional universe which—no, I can see you do not. I should
have realized that you weren’t a real wizard when I saw you didn’t have a staff.”
“Lost it in a fire,” lied Rincewind automatically.
“No hat with magic sigils embroidered on it.”
“It blew off.”
“No familiar.”
“It died. Look, thanks for rescuing me, but if you don’t mind I think I ought to
be going. If you could show me the way out—”
Something in her expression made him turn around. There were three he-dryads
behind him. They were as naked as the woman, and unarmed. That last fact was
irrelevant, however. They didn’t look as though they would need weapons to
fight Rincewind. They looked as though they could shoulder their way through
solid rock and beat up a regiment of trolls into the bargain. The three handsome
giants looked down at him with wooden menace. Their skins were the color of
walnut husks, and under it muscles bulged like sacks of melons.
He turned around again and grinned weakly at Druellae. Life was beginning to
take on a familiar shape again.
“I’m not rescued, am I?” he said. “I’m captured, right?”
“Of course.”
“And you’re not letting me go?” It was a statement.
Druellae shook her head. “You hurt the Tree. But you are lucky. Your friend is
going to meet Bel-Shamharoth. You will only die.”
From behind two hands gripped his shoulders in much the same way that an old
tree root coils relentlessly around a pebble.
“With a certain amount of ceremony, of course,” the dryad went on. “After the
Sender of Eight has finished with your friend.”
All Rincewind could manage to say was, “You know, I never imagined there
were he-dryads. Not even in an oak tree.”
One of the giants grinned at him.
Druellae snorted. “Stupid! Where do you think acorns come from?”
There was a vast empty space like a hall, its roof lost in the golden haze. The
endless stair ran right up through it.
Several hundred dryads were clustered at the other end of the hall. They parted
respectfully when Druellae approached, and stared through Rincewind as he was
propelled firmly along behind.
Most of them were females, although there were a few of the giant males among
them. They stood like god-shaped statues among the small, intelligent females.
Insects, thought Rincewind. The Tree is like a hive.
But why were there dryads at all? As far as he could recall, the tree people had
died out centuries before. They had been out-evolved by humans, like most of
the other Twilight Peoples. Only elves and trolls had survived the coming of
Man to the Discworld; the elves because they were altogether too clever by half,
and the trollen folk because they were at least as good as humans at being nasty,
spiteful and greedy. Dryads were supposed to have died out, along with gnomes
and pixies.
The background roar was louder here. Sometimes a pulsing golden glow would
race up the translucent walls until it was lost in the haze overhead. Some power
in the air made it vibrate.
“O incompetent wizard,” said Druellae, “see some magic. Not your weasel-faced
tame magic, but root-and-branch magic, the old magic. Wild magic. Watch.”
Fifty or so of the females formed a tight cluster, joined hands and walked
backward until they formed the circumference of a large circle. The rest of the
dryads began a low chant. Then, at a nod from Druellae, the circle began to spin
widdershins.
As the pace began to quicken and the complicated threads of the chant began to
rise Rincewind found himself watching, fascinated. He had heard about the Old
Magic at University, although it was forbidden to wizards. He knew that when
the circle was spinning fast enough against the standing magical field of the
Discworld itself in its slow turning, the resulting astral friction would build up a
vast potential difference which would earth itself by a vast discharge of the
Elemental Magical Force.
The circle was a blur now, and the walls of the Tree rang with the echoes of the
chant—
Rincewind felt the familiar sticky prickling in the scalp that indicated the build
up of a heavy charge of raw enchantment in the vicinity, and so he was not
utterly amazed when, a few seconds later, a shaft of vivid octarine light speared
down from the invisible ceiling and focused, crackling, in the center of the
circle.
There it formed an image of a storm-swept, tree-girt hill with a temple on its
crest. Its shape did unpleasant things to the eye. Rincewind knew that if it was a
temple to Bel-Shamharoth it would have eight sides. (Eight was also the Number
of Bel-Shamharoth, which was why a sensible wizard would never mention the
number if he could avoid it. Or you’ll be eight alive, apprentices were jocularly
warned. Bel-Shamharoth was especially attracted to dabblers in magic who, by
being as it were beachcombers on the shores of the unnatural, were already halfenmeshed
in his nets. Rincewind’s room number in his hall of residence had
been 7a. He hadn’t been surprised.)
Rain streamed off the black walls of the temple. The only sign of life was the
horse tethered outside, and it wasn’t Twoflower’s horse. For one thing, it was too
big. It was a white charger with hooves the size of meat dishes and leather
harness aglitter with ostentatious gold ornamentation. It was currently enjoying a
nosebag.
There was something familiar about it. Rincewind tried to remember where he
had seen it before.
It looked as though it was capable of a fair turn of speed, anyway. A speed
which, once it had lumbered up to it, it could maintain for a long time. All
Rincewind had to do was shake off his guards, fight his way out of the Tree, find
the temple and steal the horse out from under whatever it was that Bel-
Shamharoth used for a nose.
“The Sender of Eight has two for dinner, it seems,” said Druellae, looking hard
at Rincewind. “Who does that steed belong to, false wizard?”
“I’ve no idea.”
“No? Well, it does not matter. We shall see soon enough.”
She waved a hand. The focus of the image moved inward, darted through a great
octagonal archway and sped along the corridor within.
There was a figure there, sidling along stealthily with its back against one wall.
Rincewind saw the gleam of gold and bronze.
There was no mistaking that shape. He’d seen it many times. The wide chest, the
neck like a tree trunk, the surprisingly small head under its wild thatch of black
hair looking like a tomato on a coffin…he could put a name to the creeping
figure, and that name was Hrun the Barbarian.
Hrun was one of the Circle Sea’s more durable heroes: a fighter of dragons, a
despoiler of temples, a hired sword, the kingpost of every street brawl. He could
even—and unlike many heroes of Rincewind’s acquaintance—speak words of
more than two syllables, if given time and maybe a hint or two.
There was a sound on the edge of Rincewind’s hearing. It sounded like several
skulls bouncing down the steps of some distant dungeon. He looked sideways at
his guards to see if they had heard it.
They had all their limited attention focused on Hrun, who was admittedly built
on the same lines as themselves. Their hands were resting lightly on the wizard’s
shoulders.
Rincewind ducked, jerked backward like a tumbler, and came up running.
Behind him he heard Druellae shout, and he redoubled his speed.
Something caught the hood of his robe, which tore off. A he-dryad waiting at the
stairs spread his arms wide and grinned woodenly at the figure hurtling toward
him. Without breaking his stride Rincewind ducked again, so low that his chin
was on a level with his knees, while a fist like a log sizzled through the air by his
ear.
Ahead of him a whole spinney of the tree men awaited. He spun around, dodged
another blow from the puzzled guard, and sped back toward the circle, passing
on the way the dryads who were pursuing him and leaving them as disorganized
as a set of skittles.
But there were still more in front, pushing their way through the crowds of
females and smacking their fists into the horny palms of their hands with
anticipatory concentration.
“Stand still, false wizard,” said Druellae, stepping forward. Behind her the
enchanted dancers spun on; the focus of the circle was now drifting along a
violet-lit corridor.
Rincewind cracked.
“Will you knock that off!” he snarled. “Let’s just get this straight, right? I am a
real wizard!” He stamped a foot pettulantly.
“Indeed?” said the dryad. “Then let us see you pass a spell.”
“Uh—” began Rincewind. The fact was that, since the ancient and mysterious
spell had squatted in his mind, he had been unable to remember even the
simplest cantrap for, say, killing cockroaches or scratching the small of his back
without using his hands. The mages at Unseen University had tried to explain
this by suggesting that the involuntary memorizing of the spell had, as it were,
tied up all his spellretention cells. In his darker moments Rincewind had come
up with his own explanation as to why even minor spells refused to stay in his
head for more than a few seconds.
They were scared, he decided.
“Um—” he repeated.
“A small one would do,” said Druellae, watching him curl his lips in a frenzy of
anger and embarrassment. She signaled, and a couple of he-dryads closed in.
The Spell chose that moment to vault into the temporarily abandoned saddle of
Rincewind’s consciousness. He felt it sitting there, leering defiantly at him.
“I do know a spell,” he said wearily.
“Yes? Pray tell,” said Druellae.
Rincewind wasn’t sure that he dared, although the Spell was trying to take
control of his tongue. He fought it.
“You thed you could read by bind,” he said indistinctly. “Read it.”
She stepped forward, looking mockingly into his eyes.
Her smile froze. Her hands raised protectively, she crouched back. From her
throat came a sound of pure terror.
Rincewind looked around. The rest of the dryads were also backing away. What
had he done? Something terrible, apparently.
But in his experience it was only a matter of time before the normal balance of
the universe restored itself and started doing the usual terrible things to him. He
backed away, ducked between the still spinning dryads who were creating the
magic circle, and watched to see what Druellae would do next.
“Grab him,” she screamed. “Take him a long way from the Tree and kill him!”
Rincewind turned and bolted.
Across the focus of the circle.
There was a brilliant flash.
There was a sudden darkness.
There was a vaguely Rincewind-shaped violet shadow, dwindling to a point and
winking out.
There was nothing at all.
Hrun the Barbarian crept soundlessly along the corridors, which were lit with a
light so violet that it was almost black. His earlier confusion was gone. This was
obviously a magical temple, and that explained everything.
It explained why, earlier in the afternoon, he had espied a chest by the side of the
track while riding through this benighted forest. Its top was invitingly open,
displaying much gold. But when he had leapt off his horse to approach it the
chest had sprouted legs and had gone trotting off into the forest, stopping again a
few hundred yards away.
Now, after several hours of teasing pursuit, he had lost it in these hell-lit tunnels.
On the whole, the unpleasant carvings and occasional disjointed skeletons he
passed held no fears for Hrun. This was partly because he was not exceptionally
bright while being at the same time exceptionally unimaginative, but it was also
because odd carvings and perilous tunnels were all in a day’s work. He spent a
great deal of time in similar situations, seeking gold or demons or distressed
virgins and relieving them respectively of their owners, their lives and at least
one cause of their distress.
Observe Hrun, as he leaps cat-footed across a suspicious tunnel mouth. Even in
this violet light his skin gleams coppery. There is much gold about his person, in
the form of anklets and wristlets, but otherwise he is naked except for a
leopardskin loincloth. He took that in the steaming forests of Howondaland, after
killing its owner with his teeth.
In his right hand he carries the magical black sword Kring, which was forged
from a thunderbolt and has a soul but suffers no scabbard. Hrun had stolen it
only three days before from the impregnable palace of the Archmandrite of
B’Ituni, and he was already regretting it. It was beginning to get on his nerves.
“I tell you it went down that last passage on the right,” hissed Kring in a voice
like the scrape of a blade over stone.
“Be silent!”
“All I said was—”
“Shut up!”
And Twoflower…
He was lost, he knew that. Either the building was much bigger than it looked, or
he was now on some wide underground level without having gone down any
steps, or—as he was beginning to suspect—the inner dimensions of the place
disobeyed a fairly basic rule of architecture by being bigger than the outside.
And why all these strange lights? They were eight-sided crystals set at regular
intervals in the walls and ceiling, and they shed a rather unpleasant glow that
didn’t so much illuminate as outline the darkness.
And whoever had done those carvings on the wall, Twoflower thought
charitably, had probably been drinking too much. For years.
On the other hand, it was certainly a fascinating building. Its builders had been
obsessed with the number eight. The floor was a continuous mosaic of eightsided
tiles, the corridor walls were angled to give the corridors eight sides if the
walls and ceilings were counted and, in those places where part of the masonry
had fallen in, Twoflower noticed that even the stones themselves had eight sides.
“I don’t like it,” said the picture imp, from his box around Twoflower’s neck.
“Why not?” inquired Twoflower.
“It’s weird.”
“But you’re a demon. Demons can’t call things weird. I mean, what’s weird to a
demon?”
“Oh, you know,” said the demon cautiously, glancing around nervously and
shifting from claw to claw. “Things. Stuff.”
Twoflower looked at him sternly. “What things?”
The demon coughed nervously (demons do not breathe; however, every
intelligent being, whether it breathes or not, coughs nervously at some time in its
life. And this was one of them as far as the demon was concerned).
“Oh, things,” it said wretchedly. “Evil things. Things we don’t talk about is the
point I’m broadly trying to get across, master.”
Twoflower shook his head wearily. “I wish Rincewind was here,” he said. “He’d
know what to do.”
“Him?” sneered the demon. “Can’t see a wizard coming here. They can’t have
anything to do with the number eight.” The demon slapped a hand across his
mouth guiltily.
Twoflower looked up at the ceiling.
“What was that?” he asked. “Didn’t you hear something?”
“Me? Hear? No! Not a thing!” the demon insisted. It jerked back into its box and
slammed the door. Twoflower tapped on it. The door opened a crack.
“It sounded like a stone moving,” he explained. The door banged shut.
Twoflower shrugged.
“The place is probably falling to bits,” he said to himself. He stood up.
“I say!” he shouted. “Is anyone there?”
AIR, Air, air, replied the dark tunnels.
“Hullo?” he tried.
LO, Lo, lo.
“I know there’s someone here, I just heard you playing dice!”
ICE, Ice, ice.
“Look, I had just—”
Twoflower stopped. The reason for this was the bright point of light that had
popped into existence a few feet from his eyes. It grew rapidly, and after a few
seconds was the tiny bright shape of a man. At this stage it began to make a
noise, or, rather, Twoflower started to hear the noise it had been making all
along. It sounded like a sliver of a scream, caught in one long instant of time.
The iridescent man was doll-sized now, a tortured shape tumbling in slow
motion while hanging in midair. Twoflower wondered why he had thought of the
phrase “a sliver of a scream”…and began to wish he hadn’t.
It was beginning to look like Rincewind. The wizard’s mouth was open, and his
face was brilliantly lit by the light of—what? Strange suns, Twoflower found
himself thinking. Suns men don’t usually see. He shivered.
Now the turning wizard was half man-size. At that point the growth was faster,
there was a sudden crowded moment, a rush of air, and an explosion of sound.
Rincewind tumbled out of the air, screaming. He hit the floor hard, choked, then
rolled over with his head cradled in his arms and his body curled up tightly.
When the dust had settled Twoflower reached out gingerly and tapped the wizard
on the shoulder. The human ball rolled up tighter.
“It’s me,” explained Twoflower helpfully. The wizard unrolled a fraction.
“What?” he said.
“Me.”
In one movement Rincewind unrolled and bounced up in front of the little man,
his hands gripping his shoulders desperately. His eyes were wild and wide.
“Don’t say it!” he hissed. “Don’t say it and we might get out!”
“Get out? How did you get in? Don’t you know—”
“Don’t say it!”
Twoflower backed away from this madman.
“Don’t say it!”
“Don’t say what?”
“The number!”
“Number?” said Twoflower. “Hey, Rincewind—”
“Yes, number! Between seven and nine. Four plus four!”
“What, ei—”
Rincewind’s hands clapped over the man’s mouth. “Say it and we’re doomed.
Just don’t think about it, right? Trust me!”
“I don’t understand!” wailed Twoflower. Rincewind relaxed slightly, which was
to say that he still made a violin string look like a bowl of jelly.
“Come on,” he said. “Let’s try and get out. And I’ll try and tell you.”
After the first Age of Magic the disposal of grimoires began to become a severe
problem on the Discworld. A spell is still a spell even when imprisoned
temporarily in parchment and ink. It has potency. This is not a problem while the
book’s owner still lives, but on his death the spell book becomes a source of
uncontrolled power that cannot easily be defused.
In short, spell books leak magic. Various solutions have been tried. Countries
near the Rim simply loaded down the books of dead mages with leaden
pentalphas and threw them over the Edge. Near the Hub less satisfactory
alternatives were available. Inserting the offending books in canisters of
negatively polarized octiron and sinking them in the fathomless depths of the sea
was one (burial in deep caves on land was earlier ruled out after some districts
complained of walking trees and five headed cats) but before long the magic
seeped out and eventually fishermen complained of shoals of invisible fish or
psychic clams.
A temporary solution was the construction, in various centers of magical lore, of
large rooms made of denatured octiron, which is impervious to most forms of
magic. Here the more critical grimoires could be stored until their potency had
attenuated.
That was how there came to be at Unseen University the Octavo, greatest of all
grimoires, formerly owned by the Creator of the Universe. It was this book that
Rincewind had once opened for a bet. He had only a second to stare at a page
before setting off various alarm spells, but that was time enough for one spell to
leap from it and settle in his memory like a toad in a stone.
“Then what?” said Twoflower.
“Oh, they dragged me out. Thrashed me, of course.”
“And no one knows what the spell does?”
Rincewind shook his head.
“It’d vanished from the page,” he said. “No one will know until I say it. Or until
I die, of course. Then it will sort of say itself. For all I know it stops the universe,
or ends Time, or anything.”
Twoflower patted him on the shoulder.
“No sense in brooding,” he said cheerfully. “Let’s have another look for a way
out.”
Rincewind shook his head. All the terror had been spent now. He had broken
through the terror barrier, perhaps, and was in the dead calm state of mind that
lies on the other side. Anyway, he had ceased to gibber.
“We’re doomed,” he stated. “We’ve been walking around all night. I tell you,
this place is a spiderweb. It doesn’t matter which way we go, we’ll end up in the
center.”
“It was kind of you to come looking for me, anyway,” said Twoflower. “How did
you manage it exactly? It was very impressive.”
“Oh, well,” began the wizard awkwardly. “I just thought “I can’t leave old
Twoflower there’ and—”
“So what we’ve got to do now is find this Bel-Shamharoth person and explain
things to him and perhaps he’ll let us out,” said Twoflower.
Rincewind ran a finger around his ear.
“It must be the funny echoes in here,” he said. “I thought I heard you use words
like find and explain.”
“That’s right.”
Rincewind glared at him in the hellish purple glow.
“Find Bel-Shamharoth?” he said.
“Yes. We don’t have to get involved.”
“Find the Soul Render and not get involved? Just give him a nod, I suppose, and
ask the way to the exit? Explain things to the Sender of Eignnnngh,” Rincewind
bit off the end of the word just in time and finished, “You’re insane! Hey! Come
back!”
He darted down the passage after Twoflower, and after a few moments came to a
halt with a groan.
The violet light was intense here, giving everything new and unpleasant colors.
This wasn’t a passage, it was a wide room with walls to a number that
Rincewind didn’t dare to contemplate, and ei—and 7a passages radiating from it.
Rincewind saw, a little way off, a low altar with the same number of sides as
four times two. It didn’t occupy the center of the room, however. The center was
occupied by a huge stone slab with twice as many sides as a square. It looked
massive. In the strange light it appeared to be slightly tilted, with one edge
standing proud of the slabs around it.
Twoflower was standing on it.
“Hey. Rincewind! Look what’s here!”
The Luggage came ambling down one of the other passages that radiated from
the room.
“That’s great,” said Rincewind. “Fine. It can lead us out of here. Now.”
Twoflower was already rummaging in the chest.
“Yes,” he said. “After I’ve taken a few pictures. Just let me fit the attachment—”
“I said now—”
Rincewind stopped. Hrun the Barbarian was standing in the passage mouth
directly opposite him, a great black sword held in one ham-sized fist.
“You?” said Hrun uncertainly.
“Ahaha. Yes,” said Rincewind. “Hrun, isn’t it? Long time no see. What brings
you here?”
Hrun pointed to the Luggage.
“That,” he said. This much conversation seemed to exhaust Hrun. Then he
added, in a tone that combined statement, claim, threat and ultimatum: “Mine.”
“It belongs to Twoflower here,” said Rincewind. “Here’s a tip. Don’t touch it.”
It dawned on him that this was precisely the wrong thing to say, but Hrun had
already pushed Twoflower away and was reaching for the Luggage…
…which sprouted legs, backed away, and raised its lid threateningly. In the
uncertain light Rincewind thought he could see rows of enormous teeth, white as
bleached beech-wood.
“Hrun,” he said quickly, “there’s something I ought to tell you.”
Hrun turned a puzzled face to him.
“What?” he said.
“It’s about numbers. Look, you know if you add seven and one, or three and
five, or take two from ten, you get a number. While you’re here don’t say it, and
we might all stand a chance of getting out of here alive. Or merely just dead.”
“Who is he?” asked Twoflower. He was holding a cage in his hands, dredged
from the bottommost depths of the Luggage. It appeared to be full of sulking
pink lizards.
“I am Hrun,” said Hrun proudly. Then he looked at Rincewind.
“What?” he said.
“Just don’t say it, okay?” said Rincewind.
He looked at the sword in Hrun’s hand. It was black, the sort of black that is less
a color than a graveyard of colors, and there was a highly ornate runic
inscription up the blade. More noticeable still was the faint octarine glow that
surrounded it. The sword must have noticed him, too, because it suddenly spoke
in a voice like a claw being scraped across glass.
“Strange,” it said. “Why can’t he say eight?”
EIGHT, Hate, ate said the echoes. There was the faintest of grinding noises, deep
under the earth.
And the echoes, although they became softer, refused to die away. They bounced
from wall to wall, crossing and recrossing, and the violet light flickered in time
with the sound.
“You did it!” screamed Rincewind. “I said you shouldn’t say eight!”
He stopped, appalled at himself. But the word was out now, and joined its
colleagues in the general susurration.
Rincewind turned to run, but the air suddenly seemed to be thicker than treacle.
A charge of magic bigger than he had ever seen was building up; when he
moved, in painful slow motion, his limbs left trails of golden sparks that traced
their shape in the air.
Behind him there was a rumble as the great octagonal slab rose into the air, hung
for a moment on one edge, and crashed down on the floor.
Something thin and black snaked out of the pit and wrapped itself around his
ankle. He screamed as he landed heavily on the vibrating flagstones. The
tentacle started to pull him across the floor.
Then Twoflower was in front of him, reaching out for his hands. He grasped the
little man’s arms desperately and they lay looking into each other’s faces.
Rincewind slid on, even so.
“What’s holding you?” he gasped.
“N-nothing!” said Twoflower. “What’s happening?”
“I’m being dragged into this pit, what do you think?”
“Oh, Rincewind, I’m sorry—”
“You’re sorry—”
There was a noise like a singing saw and the pressure on Rincewind’s legs
abruptly ceased. He turned his head and saw Hrun crouched by the pit, his sword
a blur as it hacked at the tentacles racing out toward him.
Twoflower helped the wizard to his feet and they crouched by the altar stone,
watching the manic figure as it battled the questing arms.
“It won’t work,” said Rincewind. “The Sender can materialize tentacles. What
are you doing?”
Twoflower was feverishly attaching the cage of subdued lizards to the picture
box, which he had mounted on a tripod.
“I’ve just got to get a picture of this,” he muttered. “It’s stupendous! Can you
hear me, imp?”
The picture imp opened his tiny hatch, glanced momentarily at the scene around
the pit, and vanished into the box. Rincewind jumped as something touched his
leg, and brought his heel down on a questing tentacle.
“Come on,” he said. “Time to go zoom.” He grabbed Twoflower’s arm, but the
tourist resisted.
“Run away and leave Hrun with that thing?” he said.
Rincewind looked blank. “Why not?” he said. “It’s his job.”
“But it’ll kill him!”
“It could be worse,” said Rincewind.
“What?”
“It could be us,” Rincewind pointed out logically. “Come on!”
Twoflower pointed. “Hey!” he said. “It’s got my Luggage!”
Before Rincewind could restrain him Twoflower ran around the edge of the pit to
the box, which was being dragged across the floor while its lid snapped
ineffectually at the tentacle that held it. The little man began to kick at the
tentacle in fury.
Another one snapped out of the melee around Hrun and caught him around the
waist. Hrun himself was already an indistinct shape amid the tightening coils.
Even as Rincewind stared in horror the Hero’s sword was wrenched from his
grasp and hurled against a wall.
“Your spell!” shouted Twoflower.
Rincewind did not move. He was looking at the Thing rising out of the pit. It
was an enormous eye, and it was staring directly at him. He whimpered as a
tentacle fastened itself around his waist.
The words of the spell rose unbidden in his throat. He opened his mouth as in a
dream, shapping it around the first barbaric syllable.
Another tentacle shot out like a whip and coiled around his throat, choking him.
Staggering and gasping, Rincewind was dragged across the floor.
One flailing arm caught Twoflower’s picture box as it skittered past on its tripod.
He snatched it up instinctively, as his ancestors might have snatched up a stone
when faced with a marauding tiger. If only he could get enough room to swing it
against the Eye…
…the Eye filled the whole universe in front of him. Rincewind felt his will
draining away like water from a sieve.
In front of him the torpid lizards stirred in their cage on the picture box.
Irrationally, as a man about to be beheaded notices every scratch and stain on the
executioner’s block, Rincewind saw that they had overlarge tails that were
bluish-white and, he realized, throbbing alarmingly.
As he was drawn toward the Eye the terror-struck Rincewind raised the box
protectively, and at the same time heard the picture imp say, “They’re about ripe
now, can’t hold them any longer. Everyone smile, please.”
There was a—
—flash of light so white and so bright—
—it didn’t seem like light at all.
Bel-Shamharoth screamed, a sound that started in the far ultrasonic and finished
somewhere in Rincewind’s bowels. The tentacles went momentarily as stiff as
rods, hurling their various cargoes around the room, before bunching up
protectively in front of the abused Eye. The whole mass dropped into the pit and
a moment later the big slab was snatched up by several dozen tentacles and
slammed into place, leaving a number of thrashing limbs trapped around the
edge.
Hrun landed rolling, bounced off a wall and came up on his feet. He found his
sword and started to chop methodically at the doomed arms. Rincewind lay on
the floor, concentrating on not going mad. A hollow wooden noise made him
turn his head.
The Luggage had landed on its curved lid. Now it was rocking angrily and
kicking its little legs in the air.
Warily, Rincewind looked around for Twoflower. The little man was in a
crumpled heap against the wall, but at least he was groaning.
The wizard pulled himself across the floor, painfully, and whispered, “What the
hell was that?”
“Why were they so bright?” muttered Twoflower. “Gods, my head…”
“Too bright?” said Rincewind. He looked across the floor to the cage on the
picture box. The lizards inside, now noticeably thinner, were watching him with
interest.
“The salamanders,” moaned Twoflower. “The picture’ll be overexposed, I know
it…”
“They’re salamanders?” asked Rincewind incredulously.
“Of course. Standard attachment.”
Rincewind staggered across to the box and picked it up. He’d seen salamanders
before, of course, but they had been small specimens. They had also been
floating in a jar of pickle in the curiobiological museum down in the cellars of
Unseen University, since live salamanders were extinct around the Circle Sea.
He tried to remember the little he knew about them. They were magical
creatures. They also had no mouths, since they subsisted entirely on the
nourishing quality of the octarine wavelength in the Discworld’s sunlight, which
they absorbed through their skins. Of course, they also absorbed the rest of the
sunlight as well, storing it in a special sac until it was excreted in the normal
way. A desert inhabited by Discworld salamanders was a veritable lighthouse at
night.
Rincewind put them down and nodded grimly. With all the octarine light in this
magical place the creatures had been gorging themselves, and then nature had
taken its course.
The picture box sidled away on its tripod. Rincewind aimed a kick at it, and
missed. He was beginning to dislike sapient pearwood.
Something small stung his cheek. He brushed it away irritably.
He looked around at a sudden grinding noise, and a voice like a carving knife
cutting through silk said, “This is very undignified.”
“Shuddup,” said Hrun. He was using Kring to lever the top off the altar. He
looked up at Rincewind and grinned. Rincewind hoped that rictus-strung
grimace was a grin.
“Mighty magic,” commented the barbarian, pushing down heavily on the
complaining blade with a hand the size of a ham. “Now we share the treasure,
eh?”
Rincewind grunted as something small and hard struck his ear. There was a gust
of wind, hardly felt.
“How do you know there’s treasure in there?” he said.
Hrun heaved, and managed to hook his fingers under the stone. “You find
chokeapples under a chokeapple tree,” he said. “You find treasure under altars.
Logic.”
He gritted his teeth. The stone swung up and landed heavily on the floor.
This time something struck Rincewind’s hand, heavily. He clawed at the air and
looked at the thing he had caught. It was a piece of stone with five-plus-three
sides. He looked up at the ceiling. Should it be sagging like that? Hrun hummed
a little tune as he began to pull crumbling leather from the desecrated altar.
The air crackled, fluoresced, hummed. Intangible winds gripped the wizard’s
robe, flapping it out in eddies of blue and green sparks. Around Rincewind’s
head mad, half-formed spirits howled and gibbered as they were sucked past.
He tried raising a hand. It was immediately surrounded by a glowing octarine
corona as the rising magical wind roared past. The gale raced through the room
without stirring one iota of dust, yet it was blowing Rincewind’s eyelids inside
out. It screamed along the tunnels, its banshee-wail bouncing madly from stone
to stone.
Twoflower staggered up, bent double in the teeth of the astral gale.
“What the hell is this?” he shouted.
Rincewind half-turned. Immediately the howling wind caught him, nearly
pitching him over. Poltergeist eddies, spinning in the rushing air, snatched at his
feet.
Hrun’s arm shot out and caught him. A moment later he and Twoflower had been
dragged into the lee of the ravaged altar, and lay panting on the floor. Beside
them the talking sword Kring sparkled, its magical field boosted a hundredfold
by the storm.
“Hold on!” screamed Rincewind.
“The wind!” shouted Twoflower. “Where’s it coming from? Where’s it blowing
to?” He looked into Rincewind’s mask of sheer terror, which made him redouble
his own grip on the stones.
“We’re doomed,” murmured Rincewind, while overhead the roof cracked and
shifted. “Where do shadows come from? That’s where the wind is blowing!”
What was in fact happening, as the wizard knew, was that as the abused spirit of
Bel-Shamharoth sank through the deeper chthonic planes his brooding spirit was
being sucked out of the very stones into the region which, according to the
Discworld’s most reliable priests, was both under the ground and Somewhere
Else. In consequence his temple was being abandoned to the ravages of Time,
who for thousands of shamefaced years had been reluctant to go near the place.
Now the suddenly released, accumulated weight of all those pent-up seconds
was bearing down heavily on the unbraced stones.
Hrun glanced up at the widening cracks and sighed. Then he put two fingers into
his mouth and whistled.
Strangely the real sound rang out loudly over the pseudo-sound of the widening
astral whirlpool that was forming in the middle of the great octagonal slab. It
was followed by a hollow echo which sounded, he fancied, strangely like the
bouncing of strange bones. Then came a noise with no hint of strangeness. It was
hollow hoofbeats.
Hrun’s warhorse cantered through a creaking archway and reared up by its
master, its mane streaming in the gale. The barbarian pulled himself to his feet
and slung his treasure bags into a sack that hung from the saddle, then hauled
himself onto the beast’s back. He reached down and grabbed Twoflower by the
scruff of his neck, dragging him across the saddle tree. As the horse turned
around Rincewind took a desperate leap and landed behind Hrun, who raised no
objection.
The horse pounded surefooted along the tunnels, leaping sudden slides of rubble
and adroitly sidestepping huge stones as they thundered down from the straining
roof. Rincewind, clinging on grimly, looked behind them.
No wonder the horse was moving so swiftly. Close behind, speeding through the
flickering violet light, were a large ominous-looking chest and a picture box that
skittered along dangerously on its three legs. So great was the ability of sapient
pearwood to follow its master anywhere, the gravegoods of dead emperors had
traditionally been made of it…
They reached the outer air a moment before the octagonal arch finally broke and
smashed into the flags.
The sun was rising. Behind them a column of dust rose as the temple collapsed
in on itself, but they did not look back. That was a shame, because Twoflower
might have been able to obtain pictures unusual even by Discworld standards.
There was a movement in the smoking ruins. They seemed to be growing a
green carpet. Then an oak tree spiraled up, branching out like an exploding green
rocket, and was in the middle of a venerable copse even before the tips of its
aged branches had stopped quivering. A beech burst out like a fungus, matured,
rotted, and fell in a cloud of tinder dust amid its struggling offspring. Already the
temple was a half-buried heap of mossy stones.
But Time, having initially gone for the throat, was now setting out to complete
the job. The boiling interface between decaying magic and ascendant entropy
roared down the hill and overtook the galloping horse, whose riders, being
themselves creatures of Time, completely failed to notice it. But it lashed into
the enchanted forest with the whip of centuries.
“Impressive, isn’t it?” observed a voice by Rincewind’s knee as the horse
cantered through the haze of decaying timber and falling leaves.
The voice had an eerie metallic ring to it. Rincewind looked down at Kring the
sword. It had a couple of rubies set in the pommel. He got the impression they
were watching him.
From the moorland rimward of the wood they watched the battle between the
trees and Time, which could only have one ending. It was a sort of cabaret to the
main business of the halt, which was the consumption of quite a lot of a bear
which had incautiously come within bowshot of Hrun.
Rincewind watched Hrun over the top of his slab of greasy meat. Hrun going
about the business of being a hero, he realized, was quite different to the winebibbing,
carousing Hrun who occasionally came to Ankh-Morpork. He was catcautious,
lithe as a panther, and thoroughly at home.
And I’ve survived Bel-Shamharoth, Rincewind reminded himself. Fantastic.
Twoflower was helping the hero sort through the treasure stolen from the temple.
It was mostly silver set with unpleasant purple stones. Representations of
spiders, octopi and the tree-dwelling octarsier of the Hubland wastes figured
largely in the heap.
Rincewind tried to shut his ears to the grating voice beside him. It was no use.
“—and then I belonged to the Pasha of Re’durat and played a prominent part in
the battle of the Great Nef, which is where I received the slight nick you may
have noticed some two-thirds of the way up my blade,” Kring was saying from
its temporary home in a tussock. “Some infidel was wearing an octiron collar,
most unsporting, and of course I was a lot sharper in those days and my master
used to use me to cut silk handkerchiefs in midair and—am I boring you?”
“Huh? Oh, no, no, not at all. It’s all very interesting,” said Rincewind, with his
eyes still on Hrun. How trustworthy would he be? Here they were, out in the
wilds, there were trolls about…
“I could see you were a cultured person,” Kring went on. “So seldom do I get to
meet really interesting people, for any length of time, anyway. What I’d really
like is a nice mantelpiece to hang over, somewhere nice and quiet. I spent a
couple of hundred years on the bottom of a lake once.”
“That must have been fun,” said Rincewind absently.
“Not really,” said Kring.
“No, I suppose not.”
“What I’d really like is to be a plowshare. I don’t know what that is, but it
sounds like an existence with some point to it.”
Twoflower hurried over to the wizard.
“I had a great idea,” he burbled.
“Yah,” said Rincewind, wearily. “Why don’t we get Hrun to accompany us to
Quirm?”
Twoflower looked amazed. “How did you know?” he said.
“I just thought you’d think it,” said Rincewind.
Hrun ceased stuffing silverware into his saddlebags and grinned encouragingly
at them. Then his eyes strayed back to the Luggage.
“If we had him with us, who’d attack us?” said Twoflower.
Rincewind scratched his chin. “Hrun?” he suggested.
“But we saved his life in the Temple!”
“Well, if by attack you mean kill,” said Rincewind, “I don’t think he’d do that.
He’s not that sort. He’d just rob us and tie us up and leave us for the wolves, I
expect.”
“Oh, come on.”
“Look, this is real life,” snapped Rincewind. “I mean, here you are, carrying
around a box full of gold, don’t you think anyone in their right minds would
jump at the chance of pinching it?” I would, he added mentally—if I hadn’t seen
what the Luggage does to prying fingers.
Then the answer hit him. He looked from Hrun to the picture box. The picture
imp was doing its laundry in a tiny tub, while the salamanders dozed in their
cage.
“I’ve got an idea,” he said. “I mean, what is it heroes really want?”
“Gold?” said Twoflower.
“No. I mean really want.”
Twoflower frowned. “I don’t quite understand,” he said. Rincewind picked up
the picture box.
“Hrun,” he said. “Come over here, will you?”
The days passed peacefully. True, a small band of bridge trolls tried to ambush
them on one occasion, and a party of brigands nearly caught them unawares one
night (but unwisely tried to investigate the Luggage before slaughtering the
sleepers). Hrun demanded, and got, double pay for both occasions.
“If any harm comes to us,” said Rincewind, “then there will be no one to operate
the magic box. No more pictures of Hrun, you understand?”
Hrun nodded, his eyes fixed on the latest picture. It showed Hrun striking a
heroic pose, with one foot on a heap of slain trolls.
“Me and you and little friend Twoflowers, we all get on hokay,” he said. “Also
tomorrow, may we get a better profile, hokay?”
He carefully wrapped the picture in trollskin and stowed it in his saddlebag,
along with the others.
“It seems to be working,” said Twoflower admiringly, as Hrun rode ahead to
scout the road.
“Sure,” said Rincewind. “What heroes like best is themselves.”
“You’re getting quite good at using the picture box, you know that?”
“Yar.”
“So you might like to have this.” Twoflower held out a picture.
“What is it?” asked Rincewind.
“Oh, just the picture you took in the temple.”
Rincewind looked in horror. There, bordered by a few glimpses of tentacle, was
a huge, whorled, callused, potion-stained and unfocused thumb.
“That’s the story of my life,” he said wearily.
“You win,” said Fate, pushing the heap of souls across the gaming table. The
assembled gods relaxed. “There will be other games,” he added.
The Lady smiled into two eyes that were like holes in the universe.
And then there was nothing but the ruin of the forests and a cloud of dust on the
horizon, which drifted away on the breeze. And, sitting on a pitted and mossgrown
milestone, a black and raggedy figure. His was the air of one who is
unjustly put upon, who is dreaded and feared, yet who is the only friend of the
poor and the best doctor for the mortally wounded.
Death, although of course completely eyeless, watched Rincewind disappearing
with what would, had His face possessed any mobility at all, have been a frown.
Death, although exceptionally busy at all times, decided that He now had a
hobby. There was something about the wizard that irked Him beyond measure.
He didn’t keep appointments, for one thing.
I’LL GET YOU YET, CULLY, said Death, in the voice like the slamming of
leaden coffin lids, SEE IF I DON’T.
THE LURE OF THE WYRM
It was called the Wyrmberg and it rose almost one half of a mile above the green
valley; a mountain huge, gray and upside down.
At its base it was a mere score of yards across. Then it rose through clinging
cloud, curving gracefully outward like an upturned trumpet until it was truncated
by a plateau fully a quarter of a mile across. There was a tiny forest up there, its
greenery cascading over the lip. There were buildings. There was even a small
river, tumbling over the edge in a waterfall so wind-whipped that it reached the
ground as rain.
There were also a number of cave mouths, a few yards below the plateau. They
had a crudely carved, regular look about them, so that on this crisp autumn
morning the Wyrmberg hung over the clouds like a giant’s dovecote.
This would mean that the “doves” had a wingspan slightly in excess of forty
yards.
“I knew it,” said Rincewind. “We’re in a strong magical field.”
Twoflower and Hrun looked around the little hollow where they had made their
noonday halt. Then they looked at each other.
The horses were quietly cropping the rich grass by the stream. Yellow butterflies
skittered among the bushes. There was a smell of thyme and a buzzing of bees.
The wild pigs on the spit sizzled gently.
Hrun shrugged and went back to oiling his biceps. They gleamed.
“Looks all right to me,” he said.
“Try tossing a coin,” said Rincewind.
“What?”
“Go on. Toss a coin.”
“Hokay,” said Hrun. “If it gives you any pleasure.” He reached into his pouch
and withdrew a handful of loose change plundered from a dozen realms. With
some care he selected a Zchloty leaden quarter-iotum and balanced it on a purple
thumbnail.
“You call,” he said. “Heads or—” he inspected the obverse with an air of intense
concentration, “some sort of a fish with legs.”
“When it’s in the air,” said Rincewind. Hrun grinned and flicked his thumb.
The iotum rose, spinning.
“Edge,” said Rincewind, without looking at it.
Magic never dies. It merely fades away.
Nowhere was this more evident on the wide blue expanse of the Discworld than
in those areas that had been the scene of the great battles of the Mage Wars,
which had happened very shortly after Creation. In those days magic in its raw
state had been widely available, and had been eagerly utilized by the First Men
in their war against the gods.
The precise origins of the Mage Wars have been lost in the fogs of Time, but
Disc philosophers agree that the First Men, shortly after their creation,
understandably lost their temper. And great and pyrotechnic were the battles that
followed—the sun wheeled across the sky, the seas boiled, weird storms ravaged
the land, small white pigeons mysteriously appeared in people’s clothing, and
the very stability of the Disc (carried as it was through space on the backs of four
giant turtle-riding elephants) was threatened. This resulted in stern action by the
Old High Ones, to whom even the gods themselves are answerable. The gods
were banished to high places, men were re-created a good deal smaller, and
much of the old wild magic was sucked out of the earth.
That did not solve the problem of those places on the Disc which, during the
wars, had suffered a direct hit by a spell. The magic faded away—slowly, over
the millennia, releasing as it decayed myriads of sub-astral particles that severely
distorted the reality around it…
Rincewind, Twoflower and Hrun stared at the coin.
“Edge it is,” said Hrun. “Well, you’re a wizard. So what?”
“I don’t do—that sort of spell.”
“You mean you can’t.”
Rincewind ignored this, because it was true. “Try it again,” he suggested.
Hrun pulled out a fistful of coins.
The first two landed in the usual manner. So did the fourth. The third landed on
its edge and balanced there. The fifth turned into a small yellow caterpillar and
crawled away. The sixth, upon reaching its zenith, vanished with a sharp
“spang!” A moment later there was a small thunder clap.
“Hey, that one was silver!” exclaimed Hrun, rising to his feet and staring
upward. “Bring it back!”
“I don’t know where it’s gone,” said Rincewind wearily. “It’s probably still
accelerating. The ones I tried this morning didn’t come down, anyway.”
Hrun was still staring into the sky.
“What?” said Twoflower.
Rincewind sighed. He had been dreading this.
“We’ve strayed into a zone with a high magical index,” he said. “Don’t ask me
how. Once upon a time a really powerful magic field must have been generated
here, and we’re feeling the aftereffects.”
“Precisely,” said a passing bush.
Hrun’s head jerked down.
“You mean this is one of those places?” he asked. “Let’s get out of here!”
“Right,” agreed Rincewind. “If we retrace our steps we might make it. We can
stop every mile or so and toss a coin.”
He stood up urgently and started stuffing things into his saddlebags.
“What?” said Twoflower.
Rincewind stopped. “Look,” he snapped. “Just don’t argue. Come on.”
“It looks all right,” said Twoflower. “Just a bit underpopulated, that’s all…”
“Yes,” said Rincewind. “Odd, isn’t it? Come on!”
There was a noise high above them, like a strip of leather being slapped on a wet
rock. Something glassy and indistinct passed over Rincewind’s head, throwing
up a cloud of ashes from the fire, and the pig carcass took off from the spit and
rocketed into the sky.
It banked to avoid a clump of trees, righted itself, roared around in a tight circle,
and headed hubward leaving a trail of hot pork-fat droplets.
“What are they doing now?” asked the old man.
The young woman glanced at the scrying glass.
“Heading rimward at speed,” she reported. “By the way—they’ve still got that
box on legs.”
The old man chuckled, an oddly disturbing sound in the dark and dusty crypt.
“Sapient pearwood,” he said. “Remarkable. Yes, I think we will have that. Please
see to it, my dear—before they go beyond your power, perhaps?”
“Silence! Or—”
“Or what, Liessa?” said the old man (in this dim light there was something odd
about the way he was slumped in the stone chair). “You killed me once already,
remember?”
She snorted and stood up, tossing back her hair scornfully. It was red, flecked
with gold. Erect, Liessa Wyrmbidder was entirely a magnificent sight. She was
also almost naked, except for a couple of mere scraps of the lightest chain mail
and riding boots of iridescent dragonhide. In one boot was thrust a riding crop,
unusual in that it was as long as a spear and tipped with tiny steel barbs.
“My power will be quite sufficient,” she said coldly.
The indistinct figure appeared to nod, or at least to wobble. “As you keep
assuring me,” he said. Liessa snorted, and strode out of the hall.
Her father did not bother to watch her go. One reason for this was, of course,
that since he had been dead for three months his eyes were in any case not in the
best of condition. The other was that as a wizard—even a dead wizard of the
fifteenth grade, his optic nerves had long since become attuned to seeing into
levels and dimensions far removed from common reality, and were therefore
somewhat inefficient at observing the merely mundane. (During his life they had
appeared to others to be eight-faceted and eerily insectile). Besides, since he was
now suspended in the narrow space between the living world and the dark
shadow-world of Death he could survey the whole of Causality itself. That was
why, apart from a mild hope that this time his wretched daughter would get
herself killed, he did not devote his considerable powers to learning more about
the three travelers galloping desperately out of his realm.
Several hundred yards away, Liessa was in a strange humor as she strode down
the worn steps that led into the hollow heart of the Wyrmberg, followed by half a
dozen Riders. Would this be the opportunity? Perhaps here was the key to break
the deadlock, the key to the throne of the Wyrmberg. It was rightfully hers, of
course; but tradition said that only a man could rule the Wyrmberg. That irked
Liessa, and when she was angry the Power flowed stronger and the dragons were
especially big and ugly.
If she had a man, things would be different. Someone who, for preference, was a
big strapping lad but short on brains. Someone who would do what he was
told…
The biggest of the three now fleeing the dragonlands might do. And if it turned
out that he wouldn’t, then dragons were always hungry and needed to be fed
regularly. She could see to it that they got ugly.
Uglier than usual, anyway.
The stairway passed through a stone arch and ended in a narrow ledge near the
roof of the great cavern where the Wyrms roosted.
Sunbeams from the myriad entrances around the walls crisscrossed the dusty
gloom like amber rods in which a million golden insects had been preserved.
Below, they revealed nothing but a thin haze. Above…
The walking rings started so close to Liessa’s head that she could reach up and
touch one. They stretched away in their thousands across the upturned acres of
the cavern roof. It had taken a score of masons a score of years to hammer the
pitons for all those, hanging from their work as they progressed. Yet they were as
nothing compared to the eighty-eight major rings that clustered near the apex of
the dome. A further fifty had been lost in the old days, as they were swung into
place by teams of sweating slaves (and there had been slaves aplenty, in the first
days of the Power) and the great rings had gone crashing into the depths,
dragging their unfortunate manipulators with them.
But eighty-eight had been installed, huge as rainbows, rusty as blood. From
them…
The dragons sense Liessa’s presence. Air swishes around the cavern as eightyeight
pairs of wings unfold like a complicated puzzle. Great heads with green,
multifaceted eyes peer down at her.
The beasts are still faintly transparent. While the men around her take their
hookboots from the rack, Liessa bends her mind to the task of full visualization;
above her in the musty air the dragons become fully visible, bronze scales dully
reflecting the sunbeam shafts. Her mind throbs, but now that the Power is
flowing fully she can, with barely a waver of concentration, think of other
things.
Now she too buckles on the hookboots and turns a graceful cartwheel to bring
their hooks, with a faint clang, against a couple of the walking rings in the
ceiling.
Only now it is the floor. The world has changed. Now she is standing on the
edge of a deep bowl or crater, floored with the little rings across which the
dragonriders are already strolling with a pendulum gait. In the center of the bowl
their huge mounts wait among the herd. Far above are the distant rocks of the
cavern floor, discolored by centuries of dragon droppings.
Moving with the easy gliding movement that is second nature Liessa sets off
toward her own dragon, Laolith, who turns his great horsey head toward her. His
jowls are greasy with pork fat.
It was very enjoyable, he says in her mind.
“I thought I said there were to be no unaccompanied flights?” she snaps.
I was hungry, Liessa.
“Curb your hunger. Soon there will be horses to eat.”
The reins stick in our teeth. Are there any warriors? We like warriors.
Liessa swings down the mounting ladder and lands with her legs locked around
Laolith’s leathery neck.
“The warrior is mine. There are a couple of others you can have. One appears to
be a wizard of sorts,” she adds by way of encouragement.
Oh, you know how it is with wizards. Half an hour afterward you could do with
another one, the dragon grumbles.
He spreads his wings and drops.
“They’re gaining!” screamed Rincewind. He bent even lower over his horse’s
neck and groaned. Twoflower was trying to keep up while at the same time
craning round to look at the flying beasts.
“You don’t understand!” screamed the tourist, above the terrible noise of the
wingbeats. “All my life I’ve wanted to see dragons!”
“From the inside?” shouted Rincewind. “Shut up and ride!” He whipped at his
horse with the reins and stared at the wood ahead, trying to drag it closer by
sheer willpower. Under those trees they’d be safe. Under those trees no dragons
could fly…
He heard the clap of wings before shadows folded around him. Instinctively he
rolled in the saddle and felt the white-hot stab of pain as something sharp scored
a line across his shoulders.
Behind him Hrun screamed, but it sounded more like a bellow of rage than a cry
of pain. The barbarian had vaulted down into the heather and had drawn the
black sword, Kring. He flourished it as one of the dragons curved in for another
low pass.
“No bloody lizard does that to me!” he roared.
Rincewind leaned over and grabbed Twoflower’s reins.
“Come on!” he hissed.
“But, the dragons—” said Twoflower, entranced.
“Blast the—” began the wizard, and froze. Another dragon had peeled off from
the circling dots overhead and was gliding toward them. Rincewind let go of
Twoflower’s horse, swore bitterly, and spurred his own mount toward the trees,
alone. He didn’t look back at the sudden commotion behind him and, when a
shadow passed over him, merely gibbered weakly and tried to burrow into the
horse’s mane.
Then, instead of the searing, piercing pain he had expected, there was a series of
stinging blows as the terrified animal passed under the eaves of the wood. The
wizard tried to hang on but another low branch, stouter than the others, knocked
him out of the saddle. The last thing he heard before the flashing blue lights of
unconsciousness closed in was a high reptilian scream of frustration, and the
thrashing of talons in the treetops.
When he awoke a dragon was watching him; at least, it was staring in his general
direction. Rincewind groaned and tried to dig his way into the moss with his
shoulderblades, then gasped as the pain hit him.
Through the mists of agony and fear he looked back at the dragon.
The creature was hanging from a branch of a large dead oak tree, several
hundred feet away. Its bronze-gold wings were tightly wrapped around its body
but the long equine head turned this way and that at the end of a remarkably
prehensile neck. It was scanning the forest.
It was also semitransparent. Although the sun glinted off its scales, Rincewind
could clearly make out the outlines of the branches behind it.
On one of them a man was sitting, dwarfed by the hanging reptile. He appeared
to be naked except for a pair of high boots, a tiny leather hold-all in the region of
his groin, and a high-crested helmet. He was swinging a short sword back and
forth idly, and stared out across the treetops with the air of one carrying out a
tedious and unglamorous assignment.
A beetle began to crawl laboriously up Rincewind’s leg.
The wizard wondered how much damage a half-solid dragon could do. Would it
only half-kill him? He decided not to stay and find out.
Moving on heels, fingertips and shoulder muscles, Rincewind wriggled sideways
until foliage masked the oak and its occupants. Then he scrambled to his feet and
hared off between the trees.
He had no destination in mind, no provisions, and no horse. But while he still
had legs he could run. Ferns and brambles whipped at him, but he didn’t feel
them at all.
When he had put about a mile between him and the dragon he stopped and
collapsed against a tree, which then spoke to him.
“Psst,” it said.
Dreading what he might see, Rincewind let his gaze slide upward. It tried to
fasten on innocuous bits of bark and leaf, but the scourge of curiosity forced it to
leave them behind. Finally it fixed on a black sword thrust straight through the
branch above Rincewind’s head.
“Don’t just stand there,” said the sword (in a voice like the sound of a finger
dragged around the rim of a large empty wine glass). “Pull me out.”
“What?” said Rincewind, his chest still heaving.
“Pull me out,” repeated Kring. “It’s either that or I’ll be spending the next
million years in a coal measure. Did I ever tell you about the time I was thrown
into a lake up in the—”
“What happened to the others?” said Rincewind, still clutching the tree
desperately.
“Oh, the dragons got them. And the horses. And that box thing. Me too, except
that Hrun dropped me. What a stroke of luck for you.”
“Well—” began Rincewind. Kring ignored him.
“I expect you’ll be in a hurry to rescue them,” it added.
“Yes, well—”
“So if you’ll just pull me out we can be off.”
Rincewind squinted up at the sword. A rescue attempt had hitherto been so far at
the back of his mind that, if some advanced speculations on the nature and shape
of the many-dimensioned multiplexity of the universe were correct, it was right
at the front; but a magic sword was a valuable item…
And it would be a long trek back home, wherever that was…
He scrambled up the tree and inched along the branch. Kring was buried very
firmly in the wood. He gripped the pommel and heaved until lights flashed in
front of his eyes.
“Try again,” said the sword encouragingly.
Rincewind groaned and gritted his teeth.
“Could be worse,” said Kring. “This could have been an anvil.”
“Yaargh,” hissed the wizard, fearing for the future of his groin.
“I have had a multidimensional existence,” said the sword.
“Ungh?”
“I have had many names, you know.”
“Amazing,” said Rincewind. He swayed backward as the blade slid free. It felt
strangely light.
Back on the ground again he decided to break the news.
“I really don’t think rescue is a good idea,” he said. “I think we’d better head
back to a city, you know. To raise a search party.”
“The dragons headed hubward,” said Kring. “However, I suggest we start with
the one in the trees over there.”
“Sorry, but—”
“You can’t leave them to their fate!”
Rincewind looked surprised. “I can’t?” he said.
“No. You can’t. Look, I’ll be frank. I’ve worked with better material than you,
but it’s either that or—have you ever spent a million years in a coal measure?”
“Look, I—”
“So if you don’t stop arguing I’ll chop your head off.”
Rincewind saw his own arm snap up until the shimmering blade was humming a
mere inch from his throat. He tried to force his fingers to let go. They wouldn’t.
“I don’t know how to be a hero!” he shouted.
“I propose to teach you.”
Bronze Psepha rumbled deep in his throat.
K!sdra the dragonrider leaned forward and squinted across the clearing.
“I see him,” he said. He swung himself down easily from branch to branch and
landed lightly on the tussocky grass, drawing his sword.
He took a long look at the approaching man, who was obviously not keen on
leaving the shelter of the trees. He was armed, but the dragonrider observed with
some interest the strange way in which the man held the sword in front of him at
arm’s length, as though embarrassed to be seen in its company.
K!sdra hefted his own sword and grinned expansively as the wizard shuffled
toward him. Then he leapt.
Later, he remembered only two things about the fight. He recalled the uncanny
way in which the wizard’s sword curved up and caught his own blade with a
shock that jerked it out of his grip. The other thing—and it was this, he averred,
that led to his downfall—was that the wizard was covering his eyes with one
hand.
K!sdra jumped back to avoid another thrust and fell full length on the turf. With
a snarl Psepha unfolded his great wings and launched himself from his tree.
A moment later the wizard was standing over him, shouting, “Tell it that if it
singes me I’ll let the sword go! I will! I’ll let it go! So tell it!” The tip of the
black sword was hovering over K!sdra’s throat. What was odd was that the
wizard was obviously struggling with it, and it appeared to be singing to itself.
“Psepha!” K!sdra shouted.
The dragon roared in defiance, but pulled out of the dive that would have
removed Rincewind’s head, and flapped ponderously back to the tree.
“Talk!” screamed Rincewind.
K!sdra squinted at him up the length of the sword.
“What would you like me to say?” he asked.
“What?”
“I said what would you like me to say?
“Where are my friends? The barbarian and the little man is what I mean!”
“I expect they have been taken back to the Wyrmberg.”
Rincewind tugged desperately against the surge of the sword, trying to shut his
mind to Kring’s bloodthirsty humming.
“What’s a Wyrmberg?” he said.
“The Wyrmberg. There is only one. It is Dragonhome.”
“And I suppose you were waiting to take me there, eh?”
K!sdra yelped involuntarily as the tip of the sword pricked a bead of blood from
his Adam’s apple.
“Don’t want people to know you’ve got dragons here, eh?” snarled Rincewind.
The dragonrider forgot himself enough to nod, and came within a quarter-inch of
cutting his own throat.
Rincewind looked around desperately, and realized that this was something he
was really going to have to go through with.
“Right then,” he said as diffidently as he could manage. “You’d better take me to
this Wyrmberg of yours, hadn’t you?”
“I was supposed to take you in dead,” muttered K!sdra sullenly.
Rincewind looked down at him and grinned slowly. It was a wide, manic and
utterly humorless rictus. It was the sort of grin that is normally accompanied by
small riverside birds wandering in and out, picking scraps out of the teeth.
“Alive will do,” said Rincewind. “If we’re talking about anyone being dead,
remember whose sword is in which hand.”
“If you kill me nothing will prevent Psepha killing you!” shouted the prone
dragonrider.
“So what I’ll do is, I’ll chop bits off,” agreed the wizard. He tried the effect of
the grin again.
“Oh, all right,” said K!sdra sulkily. “Do you think I’ve got no imagination?”
He wriggled out from under the sword and waved at the dragon, which took
wing again and glided in toward them. Rincewind swallowed.
“You mean we’ve got to go on that?” he said. K!sdra looked at him scornfully,
the point of Kring still aimed at his neck.
“How else would anyone get to the Wyrmberg?”
“I don’t know,” said Rincewind. “How else?”
“I mean, there is no other way. It’s flying or nothing.”
Rincewind looked again at the dragon before him. He could quite clearly see
through it to the crushed grass on which it lay but, when he gingerly touched a
scale that was a mere golden sheen on thin air, it felt solid enough. Either
dragons should exist completely or fail to exist at all, he felt. A dragon only halfexisting
was worse than the extremes.
“I didn’t know dragons could be seen through,” he said.
K!sdra shrugged. “Didn’t you?” he said.
He swung himself astride the dragon awkwardly, because Rincewind was
hanging on to his belt. Once uncomfortably aboard the wizard moved his whiteknuckle
grip to a convenient piece of harness and prodded K!sdra lightly with
the sword.
“Have you ever flown before?” said the dragonrider, without looking around.
“Not as such, no.”
“Would you like something to suck?”
Rincewind gazed at the back of the man’s head, then dropped to the bag of red
and yellow sweets that was being proffered.
“Is it necessary?” he asked.
“It is traditional,” said K!sdra. “Please yourself.”
The dragon stood up, lumbered heavily across the meadow, and fluttered into the
air.
Rincewind occasionally had nightmares about teetering on some intangible but
enormously high place, and seeing a blue-distanced, cloud-punctuated landscape
reeling away below him (this usually woke him up with his ankles sweating; he
would have been even more worried had he known that the nightmare was not,
as he thought, just the usual Discworld vertigo. It was a backward memory of an
event in his future so terrifying that it had generated harmonics of fear all the
way along his lifeline).
This was not that event, but it was good practice for it.
Psepha clawed its way into the air with a series of vertebrae-shattering bounds.
At the top of its last leap the wide wings unfolded with a snap and spread out
with a thump which shook the trees.
Then the ground was gone, dropping away in a series of gentle jerks. Psepha was
suddenly rising gracefully, the afternoon sunlight gleaming off wings that were
still no more than a golden film. Rincewind made the mistake of glancing
downward, and found himself looking through the dragon to the treetops below.
Far below. His stomach shrank at the sight.
Closing his eyes wasn’t much better, because it gave his imagination full rein.
He compromised by gazing fixedly into the middle distance, where moorland
and forest drifted by and could be contemplated almost casually.
Wind snatched at him. K!sdra half turned and shouted into his ear.
“Behold the Wyrmberg!”
Rincewind turned his head slowly, taking care to keep Kring resting lightly on
the dragon’s back. His streaming eyes saw the impossibly inverted mountain
rearing out of the deep forested valley like a trumpet in a tub of moss. Even at
this distance he could make out the faint octarine glow in the air that must be
indicating a stable magic aura of at least—he gasped—several milliPrime? At
least!
“Oh no,” he said.
Even looking at the ground was better than that. He averted his eyes quickly, and
realized that he could now no longer see the ground through the dragon. As they
glided around in a wide circle toward the Wyrmberg it was definitely taking on a
more solid form, as if the creature’s body was filling with a gold mist. By the
time the Wyrmberg was in front of them, swinging wildly across the sky, the
dragon was as real as a rock.
Rincewind thought he could see a faint streak in the air, as if something from the
mountain had reached out and touched the beast. He got the strange feeling that
the dragon was being made more genuine.
Ahead of it the Wyrmberg turned from a distant toy to several billion tons of
rock poised between heaven and earth. He could see small fields, woods and a
lake up there, and from the lake a river spilled out and over the edge…
He made the mistake of following the thread of foaming water with his eyes, and
jerked himself back just in time.
The flared plateau of the upturned mountain drifted toward them. The dragon
didn’t even slow.
As the mountain loomed over Rincewind like the biggest fly-swatter in the
universe he saw a cave mouth. Psepha skimmed toward it, shoulder muscles
pumping.
The wizard screamed as the dark spread and enfolded him. There was a brief
vision of rock flashing past, blurred by speed. Then the dragon was in the open
again.
It was inside a cave, but bigger than any cave had a right to be. The dragon,
gliding across its vast emptiness, was a mere gilded fly in a banqueting hall.
There were other dragons—gold, silver, black, white—flapping across the sunshafted
air on errands of their own or perched on outcrops of rock. High in the
domed roof of the cavern scores of others hung from huge rings, their wings
wrapped batlike around their bodies. There were men up there, too. Rincewind
swallowed hard when he saw them, because they were walking on that broad
expanse of ceiling like flies.
Then he made out the thousands of tiny rings that studded the ceiling. A number
of inverted men were watching Psepha’s flight with interest. Rincewind
swallowed again. For the life of him he couldn’t think of what to do next.
“Well?” he asked, in a whisper. “Any suggestions?”
“Obviously you attack,” said Kring scornfully.
“Why didn’t I think of that?” said Rincewind. “Could it be because they all have
crossbows?”
“You’re a defeatist.”
“Defeatist! That’s because I’m going to be defeated!”
“You’re your own worst enemy, Rincewind,” said the sword.
Rincewind looked up at grinning men.
“Bet?” he said wearily.
Before Kring could reply Psepha reared in midair and alighted on one of the
large rings, which rocked alarmingly.
“Would you like to die now, or surrender first?” asked K!sdra calmly.
Men were converging on the ring from all directions, walking with a swaying
motion as their hooked boots engaged the ceiling rings.
There were more boots on a rack that hung in a small platform built on the side
of the perch-ring. Before Rincewind could stop him the dragonrider had leapt
from the creature’s back to land on the platform, where he stood grinning at the
wizard’s discomforture.
There was a small expressive sound made by a number of crossbows being
cocked. Rincewind looked up at a number of impassive, upside down faces. The
dragonfolk’s taste in clothing didn’t run to anything much more imaginative than
a leather harness, studded with bronze ornaments. Knives and sword sheaths
were worn inverted. Those who were not wearing helmets let their hair flow
freely, so that it moved like seaweed in the ventilation breeze near the roof.
There were several women among them. The inversion did strange things to
their anatomy. Rincewind stared.
“Surrender,” said K!sdra again.
Rincewind opened his mouth to do so. Kring hummed a warning, and agonizing
waves of pain shot up his arm. “Never,” he squeaked. The pain stopped.
“Of course he won’t!” boomed an expansive voice behind him. “He’s a hero,
isn’t he?”
Rincewind turned and looked into a pair of hairy nostrils. They belonged to a
heavily built young man, hanging nonchalantly from the ceiling by his boots.
“What is your name, hero?” said the man. “So that we know who you were.”
Agony shot up Rincewind’s arm. “I—I’m Rincewind of Ankh,” he managed to
gasp.
“And I am Lio!rt Dragonlord,” said the hanging man, pronouncing the word with
the harsh click in the back of the throat that Rincewind could only think of as a
kind of integral punctuation. “You have come to challenge me in mortal
combat.”
“Well, no, I didn’t—”
“You are mistaken. K!sdra, help our hero into a pair of hookboots. I am sure he
is anxious to get started.”
“No, look, I just came here to find my friends. I’m sure there’s no—” Rincewind
began, as the dragonrider guided him firmly onto the platform, pushed him onto
a seat, and proceeded to strap hookboots to his feet.
“Hurry up, K!sdra. We mustn’t keep our hero from his destiny,” said Lio!rt.
“Look, I expect my friends are happy enough here, so if you could just, you
know, set me down somewhere—”
“You will see your friends soon enough,” said the dragonlord airily. “If you are
religious, I mean. None who enter the Wyrmberg ever leave again. Except
metaphorically, of course. Show him how to reach the rings, K!sdra.”
“Look what you’ve got me into!” Rincewind hissed.
Kring vibrated in his hand. “Remember that I am a magic sword,” it hummed.
“How can I forget?”
“Climb the ladder and grab a ring,” said the dragonrider, “then bring your feet up
until the hooks catch.” He helped the protesting wizard climb until he was
hanging upside down, robe tucked into his britches, Kring dangling from one
hand. At this angle the dragonfolk looked reasonably bearable but the dragons
themselves, hanging from their perches, loomed over the scene like immense
gargoyles. Their eyes glowed with interest.
“Attention, please,” said Lio!rt. A dragonrider handed him a long shape,
wrapped in red silk.
“We fight to the death,” he said. “Yours.”
“And I suppose I earn my freedom if I win?” said Rincewind, without much
hope.
Lio!rt indicated the assembled dragonriders with a tilt of his head.
“Don’t be naive,” he said.
Rincewind took a deep breath. “I suppose I should warn you,” he said, his voice
hardly quavering at all, “that this is a magic sword.”
Lio!rt let the red silk wrapping drop away into the gloom and flourished a jetblack
blade. Runes glowed on its surface.
“What a coincidence,” he said, and lunged.
Rincewind went rigid with fright, but his arm swung out as Kring shot forward.
The swords met in an explosion of octarine light.
Lio!rt swung himself backward, his eyes narrowing. Kring leapt past his guard
and, although the dragonlord’s sword jerked up to deflect most of the force, the
result was a thin red line across its master’s torso.
With a growl he launched himself at the wizard, boots clattering as he slid from
ring to ring. The swords met again in another violent discharge of magic and, at
the same time, Lio!rt brought his other hand down against Rincewind’s head,
jarring him so hard that one foot jerked out of its ring and flailed desperately.
Rincewind knew himself to be almost certainly the worst wizard on the
Discworld since he knew but one spell; yet for all that he was still a wizard, and
thus by the inexorable laws of magic this meant that upon his demise it would be
Death himself who appeared to claim him (instead of sending one of his
numerous servants, as is usually the case).
Thus it was that, as a grinning Lio!rt swung back and brought his sword around
in a lazy arc, time ran into treacle.
To Rincewind’s eyes the world was suddenly lit by a flickering octarine light,
tinged with violet as photons impacted on the sudden magical aura. Inside it the
dragonlord was a ghastly-hued statue, his sword moving at a snail’s pace in the
glow.
Beside Lio!rt was another figure, visible only to those who can see into the extra
four dimensions of magic. It was tall and dark and thin and, against a sudden
night of frosty stars, it swung two-handed a scythe of proverbial sharpness…
Rincewind ducked. The blade hissed coldly through the air beside his head and
entered the rock of the cavern roof without slowing. Death screamed a curse in
his cold crypt voice. The scene vanished. What passed for reality on the
Discworld reasserted itself with a rush of sound. Lio!rt gasped at the sudden turn
of speed with which the wizard had dodged his killing stroke and, with that
desperation only available to the really terrified, Rincewind uncoiled like a snake
and launched himself across the space between them. He locked both hands
around the dragonlord’s sword arm, and wrenched.
It was at that moment that Rincewind’s one remaining ring, already
overburdened, slid out of the rock with a nasty little metal sound.
He plunged down, swung wildly, and ended up dangling over a bone-splintering
death with his hands gripping the dragonlord’s arm so tightly that the man
screamed.
Lio!rt looked up at his feet. Small flakes of rock were dropping out of the roof
around the ring pitons.
“Let go, damn you!” he screamed. “Or we’ll both die!”
Rincewind said nothing. He was concentrating on maintaining his grip and
keeping his mind closed to the pressing images of his fate on the rocks below.
“Shoot him!” bellowed Lio!rt.
Out of the corner of his eye Rincewind saw several crossbows leveled at him.
Lio!rt chose that moment to flail down with his free hand, and a fistful of rings
stabbed into the wizard’s fingers.
He let go.
Twoflower grabbed the bars and pulled himself up.
“See anything?” said Hrun, from the region of his feet.
“Just clouds.”
Hrun lifted him down again, and sat on the edge of one of the wooden beds that
were the only furnishings in the cell. “Bloody hell,” he said.
“Don’t despair,” said Twoflower.
“I’m not despairing.”
“I expect it’s all some sort of misunderstanding. I expect they’ll release us soon.
They seem very civilized.”
Hrun stared at him from under bushy eyebrows. He started to say something,
then appeared to think better of it. He sighed instead.
“And when we get back we can say we’ve seen dragons!” Twoflower continued.
“What about that, eh?”
“Dragons don’t exist,” said Hrun flatly. “Codice of Chimeria killed the last one
two hundred years ago. I don’t know what we’re seeing, but they aren’t
dragons.”
“But they carried us up in the air! In that hall there must have been hundreds—”
“I expect it was just magic,” said Hrun, dismissively.
“Well, they looked like dragons,” said Twoflower, an air of defiance about him.
“I always wanted to see dragons, ever since I was a little lad. Dragons flying
around in the sky, breathing flames…”
“They just used to crawl around in swamps and stuff, and all they breathed was
stink,” said Hrun, lying down in the bunk. “They weren’t very big, either. They
used to collect firewood.”
“I heard they used to collect treasure,” said Twoflower.
“And firewood. Hey,” Hrun added, brightening up, “did you notice all those
rooms they brought us through? Pretty impressive, I thought. Lot of good stuff
about, plus some of those tapestries have got to be worth a fortune.” He
scratched his chin thoughtfully, making a noise like a porcupine shouldering its
way through gorse.
“What happens next?” asked Twoflower.
Hrun screwed a finger in his ear and inspected it absently.
“Oh,” he said, “I expect in a minute the door will be flung back and I’ll be
dragged off to some sort of temple arena where I’ll fight maybe a couple of giant
spiders and an eight-foot slave from the jungles of Klatch and then I’ll rescue
some kind of a princess from the altar and then kill off a few guards or whatever
and then this girl will show me the secret passage out of the place and we’ll
liberate a couple of horses and escape with the treasure.” Hrun leaned his head
back on his hands and looked at the ceiling, whistling tunelessly.
“All that?” said Twoflower.
“Usually.”
Twoflower sat down on his bunk and tried to think. This proved difficult,
because his mind was awash with dragons.
Dragons!
Ever since he was two years old he had been captivated by the pictures of the
fiery beasts in The Octarine Fairy Book. His sister had told him they didn’t
really exist, and he recalled the bitter disappointment. If the world didn’t contain
those beautiful creatures, he’d decided, it wasn’t half the world it ought to be.
And then later he had been bound apprentice to Ninereeds the Masteraccount,
who in his gray-mindedness was everything that dragons were not, and there was
no time for dreaming.
But there was something wrong with these dragons. They were too small and
sleek, compared to the ones in his mind’s eye. Dragons ought to be big and green
and clawed and exotic and firebreathing—big and green with long sharp…
Something moved at the edge of his vision, in the furthest, darkest corner of the
dungeon. When he turned his head it vanished, although he thought he heard the
faintest of noises that might have been made by claws scrabbling on stone.
“Hrun?” he said.
There was a snore from the other bunk.
Twoflower padded over to the corner, poking gingerly at the stones in case there
was a secret panel. At that moment the door was flung back, thumping against
the wall. Half a dozen guards hurtled through it, spread out and flung themselves
down on one knee. Their weapons were aimed exclusively at Hrun. When he
thought about this later, Twoflower felt quite offended.
Hrun snored.
A woman strode into the room. Not many women can stride convincingly, but
she managed it. She glanced briefly at Twoflower, as one might look at a piece
of furniture, then glared down at the man on the bed.
She was wearing the same sort of leather harness that the dragonriders had been
wearing, but in her case it was much briefer. That, and the magnificent mane of
chestnut-red hair that fell to her waist, was her only concession to what even on
the Discworld passed for decency. She was also wearing a thoughtful expression.
Hrun made a glubbing noise, turned over, and slept on.
With a careful movement, as though handling some instrument of rare delicacy,
the woman drew a slim black dagger from her belt and stabbed downward.
Before it was halfway through its arc Hrun’s right hand moved so fast that it
appeared to travel between two points in space without at any time occupying
the intervening air. It closed around the woman’s wrist with a dull smack. His
other hand groped feverishly for a sword that wasn’t there…
Hrun awoke.
“Gngh?” he said, looking up at the woman with a puzzled frown. Then he caught
sight of the bowmen.
“Let go,” said the woman, in a voice that was calm and quiet and edged with
diamonds. Hrun released his grip slowly.
She stepped back, massaging her wrist and looking at Hrun in much the same
way that a cat watches a mousehole.
“So,” she said at last. “You pass the first test. What is your name, barbarian?”
“Who are you calling a barbarian?” snarled Hrun.
“That is what I want to know.”
Hrun counted the bowmen slowly and made a brief calculation. His shoulders
relaxed.
“I am Hrun of Chimeria. And you?”
“Liessa Dragonlady.”
“You are the lord of this place?”
“That remains to be seen. You have the look about you of a hired sword, Hrun of
Chimeria. I could use you—if you pass the tests, of course. There are three of
them. You have passed the first.”
“What are the other—” Hrun paused, his lips moved soundlessly and then he
hazarded, “two?”
“Perilous.”
“And the fee?”
“Valuable.”
“Excuse me,” said Twoflower.
“And if I fail these tests?” said Hrun, ignoring him. The air between Hrun and
Liessa crackled with small explosions of charisma as their gazes sought for a
hold.
“If you had failed the first test you would now be dead. This may be considered
a typical penalty.”
“Um, look,” began Twoflower. Liessa spared him a brief glance, and appeared
actually to notice him for the first time.
“Take that away,” she said calmly, and turned back to Hrun. Two of the guards
shouldered their bows, grasped Twoflower by the elbows and lifted him off the
ground. Then they trotted smartly through the doorway.
“Hey,” said Twoflower, as they hurried down the corridor outside, “where” (as
they stopped in front of another door) “is my” (as they dragged the door open)
“Luggage?” He landed in a heap of what might once have been straw. The door
banged shut, its echoes punctuated by the sound of bolts being slammed home.
In the other cell Hrun had barely blinked.
“Okay,” he said, “what is the second test?”
“You must kill my two brothers.” Hrun considered this.
“Both at the same time, or one after the other?” he said.
“Consecutively or concurrently,” she assured him.
“What?”
“Just kill them,” she said sharply.
“Good fighters, are they?”
“Renowned.”
“So in return for all this…?”
“You will wed me and become Lord of the Wyrmberg.”
There was a long pause. Hrun’s eyebrows twisted themselves in unaccustomed
calculation.
“I get you and this mountain?” he said at last.
“Yes.” She looked him squarely in the eye, and her lips twitched. “The fee is
worthwhile, I assure you.”
Hrun dropped his gaze to the rings on her hand. The stones were large, being the
incredibly rare blue milk diamonds from the clay basins of Mithos. When he
managed to turn his eyes from them he saw Liessa glaring down at him in fury.
“So calculating?” she rasped. “Hrun the Barbarian, who would boldly walk into
the jaws of Death Himself?”
Hrun shrugged. “Sure,” he said, “the only reason for walking into the jaws of
Death is so’s you can steal His gold teeth.” He brought one arm around
expansively, and the wooden bunk was at the end of it. It cannoned into the
bowmen and Hrun followed it joyously, felling one man with a blow and
snatching the weapon from another. A moment later it was all over.
Liessa had not moved.
“Well?” she said.
“Well what?” said Hrun, from the carnage.
“Do you intend to kill me?”
“What? Oh no. No, this is just, you know, kind of a habit. Just keeping in
practice. So where are these brothers?” He grinned.
Twoflower sat on his straw and stared into the darkness. He wondered how long
he had been there. Hours, at least. Days, probably. He speculated that perhaps it
had been years, and he had simply forgotten.
No, that sort of thinking wouldn’t do. He tried to think of something else—grass,
trees, fresh air, dragons. Dragons…
There was the faintest of scrabblings in the darkness. Twoflower felt the sweat
prickle on his forehead.
Something was in the cell with him. Something that made small noises, but even
in the pitch blackness gave the impression of hugeness. He felt the air move.
When he lifted his arm there was the greasy feel and faint shower of sparks that
betokened a localized magical field. Twoflower found himself fervently wishing
for light.
A gout of flame rolled past his head and struck the far wall. As the rocks flashed
into furnace heat he looked up at the dragon that now occupied more than half
the cell.
I obey, lord said a voice in his head.
By the glow of the crackling, spitting stone Twoflower looked into his own
reflection in two enormous green eyes. Beyond them the dragon was as
multihued, horned, spiked and lithe as the one in his memory—a real dragon. Its
folded wings were nevertheless still wide enough to scrape the wall on both
sides of the room. It lay with him between its talons.
“Obey?” he said, his voice vibrating with terror and delight.
Of course, lord.
The glow faded away. Twoflower pointed a trembling finger at where he
remembered the door to be and said, “Open it!”
The dragon raised its huge head. Again the ball of flame rolled out but this time,
as the dragon’s neck muscles contracted, its color faded from orange to yellow,
from yellow to white, and finally to the faintest of blues. By that time the flame
was also very thin, and where it touched the wall the molten rock spat and ran.
When it reached the door the metal exploded into a shower of hot droplets.
Black shadows arced and jigggered over the walls. The metal bubbled for an
eye-aching moment, and then the door fell in two pieces in the passage beyond.
The flame winked out with a suddenness that was almost as startling as its
arrival.
Twoflower stepped gingerly over the cooling door and looked up and down the
corridor. It was empty.
The dragon followed. The heavy door frame caused it some minor difficulty,
which it overcame with a swing of its shoulders that tore the timber out and
tossed it to one side. The creature looked expectantly at Twoflower, its skin
rippling and twitching as it sought to open its wings in the confines of the
passage.
“How did you get in there?” said Twoflower.
You summoned me, master.
“I don’t remember doing that.”
In your mind. You called me up, in your mind, thought the dragon, patiently.
“You mean I just thought of you and there you were?”
Yes.
“It was magic?”
Yes.
“But I’ve thought about dragons all my life!”
In this place the frontier between thought and reality is probably a little
confused. All I know is that once I was not, and then you thought me, and then I
was. Therefore, of course, I am yours to command.
“Good grief!”
Half a dozen guards chose that moment to turn the bend in the corridor. They
stopped, open-mouthed. Then one remembered himself sufficiently to raise his
crossbow and fire.
The dragon’s chest heaved. The quarrel exploded into flaming fragments in
midair. The guards scurried out of sight. A fraction of a second later a wash of
flame played over the stones where they had been standing.
Twoflower looked up in admiration.
“Can you fly, too?” he said.
Of course.
Twoflower glanced up and down the corridor, and decided against following the
guards. Since he knew himself to be totally lost already, any direction was
probably an improvement. He edged past the dragon and hurried away, the huge
beast turning with difficulty to follow him.
They padded down a series of passages that crisscrossed like a maze. At one
point Twoflower thought he heard shouts, a long way behind them, but they soon
faded away. Sometimes the dark arch of a crumbling doorway loomed past them
in the gloom. Light filtered through dimly from various shafts and, here and
there, bounced off big mirrors that had been mortared into angles of the passage.
Sometimes there was a brighter glow from a distant light-well.
What was odd, thought Twoflower as he strolled down a wide flight of stairs and
kicked up billowing clouds of silver dust motes, was that the tunnels here were
much wider. And better constructed, too. There were statues in niches set in the
walls, and here and there faded but interesting tapestries had been hung. They
mainly showed dragons—dragons by the hundred, in flight or hanging from their
perch rings, dragons with men on their backs hunting down deer and, sometimes,
other men. Twoflower touched one tapestry gingerly. The fabric crumbled
instantly in the hot dry air, leaving only a dangling mesh where some threads had
been plaited with fine gold wire.
“I wonder why they left all this?” he said.
I don’t know said a polite voice in his head.
He turned and looked up into the scaly horse face above him.
“What is your name, dragon?” said Twoflower.
I don’t know.
“I think I shall call you Ninereeds.”
That is my name, then.
They waded through the all-encroaching dust in a series of huge, dark-pillared
halls which had been carved out of the solid rock. With some cunning too; from
floor to ceiling the walls were a mass of statues, gargoyles, bas-reliefs and fluted
columns that cast weirdly-moving shadows when the dragon gave an obliging
illumination at Twoflower’s request. They crossed the lengthy galleries and vast
carven amphitheaters, all awash with deep soft dust and completely uninhabited.
No one had come to these dead caverns in centuries.
Then he saw the path, leading away into yet another dark tunnel mouth.
Someone had been using it regularly, and recently. It was a deep narrow trail in
the gray blanket.
Twoflower followed it. It led through still more lofty halls and winding corridors
quite big enough for a dragon (and dragons had come this way once, it seemed;
there was a room full of rotting harness, dragon-sized, and another room
containing plate and chain mail big enough for elephants). They ended in a pair
of green bronze doors, each so high that they disappeared into the gloom. In
front of Twoflower, at chest height, was a small handle shaped like a brass
dragon.
When he touched it the doors swung open instantly and with a disconcerting
noiselessness.
Instantly sparks crackled in Twoflower’s hair and there was a sudden gust of hot
dry wind that didn’t disturb the dust in the way that ordinary wind should but,
instead, whipped it up momentarily into unpleasantly half-living shapes before it
settled again. In Twoflower’s ears came the strange shrill twittering of the
Things locked in the distant dungeon Dimensions, out beyond the fragile lattice
of time and space. Shadows appeared where there was nothing to cause them.
The air buzzed like a hive.
In short, there was a vast discharge of magic going on around him.
The chamber beyond the door was lit by a pale green glow. Stacked around the
walls, each on its own marble shelf, were tier upon tier of coffins. In the center
of the room was a stone chair on a raised dais, and it contained a slumped figure
which did not move but said, in a brittle old voice, “Come in, young man.”
Twoflower stepped forward. The figure in the seat was human, as far as he could
make out in the murky light, but there was something about the awkward way it
was sprawled in the chair that made him glad he couldn’t see it any clearer.
“I’m dead, you know,” came a voice from what Twoflower fervently hoped was
a head, in conversational tones. “I expect you can tell.”
“Um,” said Twoflower. “Yes.” He began to back away.
“Obvious, isn’t it?” agreed the voice. “You’d be Twoflower, wouldn’t you? Or is
that later?”
“Later?” said Twoflower. “Later than what?” He stopped.
“Well,” said the voice. “You see, one of the advantages of being dead is that one
is released as it were from the bonds of time and therefore I can see everything
that has happened or will happen, all at the same time except that of course I
now know that Time does not, for all practical purposes, exist.”
“That doesn’t sound like a disadvantage,” said Twoflower.
“You don’t think so? Imagine every moment being at one and the same time a
distant memory and a nasty surprise and you’ll see what I mean. Anyway, I now
recall what it was I am about to tell you. Or have I already done so? That’s a
fine-looking dragon, by the way. Or don’t I say that yet?”
“It is rather good. It just turned up,” said Twoflower.
“It turned up?” said the voice. “You summoned it!”
“Yes, well, all I did—”
“You have the Power!”
“All I did was think of it.”
“That’s what the Power is! Have I already told you that I am Greicha the First?
Or is that next? I’m sorry, but I haven’t had too much experience of
transcendence. Anyway, yes—the Power. It summons dragons, you know.”
“I think you already told me that,” said Twoflower.
“Did I? I certainly intended to,” said the dead man.
“But how does it? I’ve been thinking about dragons all my life, but this is the
first time one has turned up.”
“Oh well, you see, the truth of the matter is that dragons have never existed as
you (and, until I was poisoned some three months ago, I) understand existence.
I’m talking about the true dragon, draconis nobilis, you understand; the swamp
dragon, draconis vulgaris, is a base creature and not worth our consideration.
The true dragon, on the other hand, is a creature of such refinement of spirit that
they can only take on form in this world if they are conceived by the most skilled
imagination. And even then the said imagination must be in some place heavily
impregnated with magic, which helps to weaken the walls between the world of
the seen and unseen. Then the dragons pop through, as it were, and impress their
form on this world’s possibility matrix. I was very good at it when I was alive. I
could imagine up to, oh, five hundred dragons at a time. Now Liessa, the most
skilled of my children, can barely imagine fifty rather nondescript creatures. So
much for a progressive education. She doesn’t really believe in them. That’s why
her dragons are rather boring—while yours,” said the voice of Greicha, “is
almost as good as some of mine used to be. A sight for sore eyes, not that I have
any to speak of now.”
Twoflower said hurriedly, “You keep saying you’re dead…”
“Well?”
“Well, the dead, er, they, you know, don’t talk much. As a rule.”
“I used to be an exceptionally powerful wizard. My daughter poisoned me, of
course. It is the generally accepted method of succession in our family, but,” the
corpse sighed, or at least a sigh came from the air a few feet above it, “it soon
became obvious that none of my three children is sufficiently powerful to wrest
the lordship of the Wyrmberg from the other two. A most unsatisfactory
arrangement. A kingdom like ours has to have one ruler. So I resolved to remain
alive in an unofficial capacity, which of course annoys them all immensely. I
won’t give my children the satisfaction of burying me until there is only one of
them left to perform the ceremony.” There was a nasty wheezing noise.
Twoflower decided that it was meant to be a chuckle.
“So it was one of them that kidnapped us?” said Twoflower.
“Liessa,” said the dead wizard’s voice. “My daughter. Her power is strongest,
you know. My sons’ dragons are incapable of flying more than a few miles
before they fade.”
“Fade? I did notice that we could see through the one that brought us here,” said
Twoflower. “I thought that was a bit odd.”
“Of course,” said Greicha. “The Power only works near the Wyrmberg. It’s the
inverse square law, you know. At least, I think it is. As the dragons fly further
away they begin to dwindle. Otherwise my little Liessa would be ruling the
whole world by now, if I know anything about it. But I can see I mustn’t keep
you. I expect you’ll be wanting to rescue your friend.”
Twoflower gaped. “Hrun?” he said.
“Not him. The skinny wizard. My son Lio!rt is trying to hack him to pieces. I
admired the way you rescued him. Will, I mean.”
Twoflower drew himself up to his full height, an easy task. “Where is he?” he
said, heading toward the door with what he hoped was an heroic stride.
“Just follow the pathway in the dust,” said the voice. “Liessa comes to see me
sometimes. She still comes to see her old dad, my little girl. She was the only
one with the strength of character to murder me. A chip off the old block. Good
luck, by the way. I seem to recall I said that. Will say it now, I mean.”
The rambling voice got lost in a maze of tenses as Twoflower ran along the dead
tunnels, with the dragon loping along easily behind him. But soon he was
leaning against a pillar, completely out of breath. It seemed ages since he’d had
anything to eat.
Why don’t you fly? said Ninereeds, inside his head. The dragon spread its wings
and gave an experimental flap, which lifted it momentarily off the ground.
Twoflower stared for a moment, then ran forward and clambered quickly onto
the beast’s neck. Soon they were airborne, the dragon skimming along easily a
few feet from the floor and leaving a billowing cloud of dust in its wake.
Twoflower hung on as best he could as Ninereeds swooped through a succession
of caverns and soared around a spiral staircase that could easily have
accommodated a retreating army. At the top they emerged into the more
inhabited regions, the mirrors at every corridor corner brightly polished and
reflecting a pale light.
I smell other dragons.
The wings became a blur and Twoflower was jerked back as the dragon veered
and sped off down a side corridor like a gnat-crazed swallow. Another sharp turn
sent them soaring out of a tunnel mouth in the side of a vast cavern. There were
rocks far below, and up above were broad shafts of light from great holes near
the roof. A lot of activity on the ceiling, too…as Ninereeds hovered, thumping
the air with his wings, Twoflower peered up at the shapes of roosting beasts and
tiny men-shaped dots that were somehow walking upside down.
This is a roosting hall said the dragon in a satisfied tone.
As Twoflower watched, one of the shapes far above detached itself from the roof
and began to grow larger…
Rincewind watched as Lio!rt’s pale face dropped away from him. This is funny,
gibbered a small part of his mind, why am I rising?
Then he began to tumble in the air and reality took over. He was dropping to the
distant, guano-speckled rocks.
His brain reeled with the thought. The words of the Spell picked just that
moment to surface from the depths of his mind, as they always did in time of
crisis. Why not say us, they seemed to urge. What have you got to lose?
Rincewind waved a hand in the gathering slipstream.
“Ashonai,” he called. The word formed in front of him in a cold blue flame that
streamed in the wind.
He waved the other hand, drunk with terror and magic.
“Ebiris,” he intoned. The sound froze into a flickering orange word that hung
beside its companion.
“Urshoring. Kvanti. Pythan. N’gurad. Feringomalee.” As the words blazed their
rainbow colors around him he flung his hands back and prepared to say the
eighth and final word that would appear in corruscating octarine and seal the
spell. The imminent rocks were forgotten.
“—” he began.
The breath was knocked out of him, the spell scattered and snuffed out. A pair of
arms locked around his waist and the whole world jerked sideways as the dragon
rose out of its long dive, claws grazing just for a moment the topmost rock on
the Wyrmberg’s noisome floor. Twoflower laughed triumphantly.
“Got him!”
And the dragon, curving gracefully at the top of his flight, gave a lazy flip of his
wings and soared through a cavemouth into the morning air.
At noon, in a wide green meadow on the lush tableland that was the top of the
impossibly balanced Wyrmberg, the dragons and their riders formed a wide
circle. There was room beyond them for a rabble of servants and slaves and
others who scratched a living here on the roof of the world, and they were all
watching the figures clustered in the center of the grassy arena.
The group contained a number of senior dragonlords, and among them were
Lio!rt and his brother Liartes. The former was still rubbing his legs, with small
grimaces of pain. Slightly to one side stood Liessa and Hrun, with some of the
woman’s own followers. Between the two factions stood the Wyrmberg’s
hereditary Loremaster.
“As you know,” he said uncertainly, “the not-fully-late Lord of the Wyrmberg,
Greicha the First, has stipulated that there will be no succession until one of his
children feels himself—or as it might be, herself—powerful enough to challenge
and defeat his or her siblings in mortal combat.”
“Yes, yes, we know all that. Get on with it,” said a thin peevish voice from the
air beside him.
The Loremaster swallowed. He had never come to terms with his former
master’s failure to expire properly. Is the old buzzard dead or isn’t he? he
wondered.
“It is not certain,” he quavered, “whether it is allowable to issue a challenge by
proxy—”
“It is, it is,” snapped Greicha’s disembodied voice. “It shows intelligence. Don’t
take all day about it.”
“I challenge you,” said Hrun, glaring at the brothers, “both at once.”
Lio!rt and Liartes exchanged looks.
“You’ll fight us both together?” said Liartes, a tall, wiry man with long black
hair.
“Yah.”
“That’s pretty uneven odds, isn’t it?”
“Yah. I outnumber you one to two.”
Lio!rt scowled. “You arrogant barbarian—”
“That just about does it!” growled Hrun. “I’ll—”
The Loremaster put out a blue-veined hand to restrain him.
“It is forbidden to fight on the Killing Ground,” he said, and paused while he
considered the sense of this. “You know what I mean, anyway,” he hazarded,
giving up, and added “As the challenged parties my lords Lio!rt and Liartes have
choice of weapons.”
“Dragons,” they said together. Liessa snorted.
“Dragons can be used offensively, therefore they are weapons,” said Lio!rt
firmly. “If you disagree we can fight over it.”
“Yah,” said his brother, nodding at Hrun.
The Loremaster felt a ghostly finger prod him in the chest.
“Don’t stand there with your mouth open,” said Greicha’s graveyard voice. “Just
hurry up, will you?”
Hrun stepped back, shaking his head.
“Oh no,” he said. “Once was enough. I’d rather be dead than fight on one of
those things.”
“Die, then,” said the Loremaster, as kindly as he could manage.
Lio!rt and Liartes were already striding back across the turf to where the
servants stood waiting with their mounts. Hrun turned to Liessa. She shrugged.
“Don’t I even get a sword?” he pleaded. “A knife, even?”
“No,” she said. “I didn’t expect this.” She suddenly looked smaller, all defiance
gone. “I’m sorry.”
“You’re sorry?”
“Yes. I’m sorry.”
“Yes, I thought you said you’re sorry.”
“Don’t glare at me like that! I can imagine you the finest dragon to ride—”
“No!”
The Loremaster wiped his nose on a handkerchief, held the little silken square
aloft for a moment, then let it fall.
A boom of wings made Hrun spin around. Lio!rt’s dragon was already airborne
and circling around toward them. As it swooped low over the turf a billow of
flame shot from its mouth, scoring a black streak across the grass that rushed
toward Hrun.
At the last minute he pushed Liessa aside, and felt the wild pain of the flame on
his arm as he dived for safety. He rolled as he hit the ground, and flipped onto
his feet again while he looked around frantically for the other dragon. It came in
from one side, and Hrun was forced to take a badly judged standing jump to
escape the flame. The dragon’s tail whipped around as it passed and caught him
a stinging blow across the forehead. He pushed himself upright, shaking his head
to make the wheeling stars go away. His blistered back screamed pain at him.
Lio!rt came in for a second run, but slower this time to allow for the big man’s
unexpected agility. As the ground drifted up he saw the barbarian standing stock
still, chest heaving, arms hanging loosely by his sides. An easy target.
As his dragon swooped away Lio!rt turned his head, expecting to see a
dreadfully big cinder.
There was nothing there. Puzzled, Lio!rt turned back.
Hrun, heaving himself over the dragon’s shoulder scales with one hand and
beating out his flaming hair with the other, presented himself to his view. Lio!rt’s
hand flew to his dagger, but pain had sharpened Hrun’s normally excellent
reflexes to needle point. A backhand blow hammered into the dragonlord’s wrist,
sending the dagger arcing away toward the ground, and another caught the man
full on the chin.
The dragon, carrying the weight of two men, was only a few yards above the
grass. This turned out to be fortunate, because at the moment Lio!rt lost
consciousness the dragon winked out of existence.
Liessa hurried across the grass and helped Hrun stagger to his feet. He blinked at
her.
“What happened? What happened?” he said thickly.
“That was really fantastic!” she said. “The way you turned that somersault in
midair and everything!”
“Yah, but what happened?”
“It’s rather difficult to explain—”
Hrun peered up at the sky. Liartes, by far the most cautious of the two brothers,
was circling high above them.
“Well, you’ve got about ten seconds to try,” he said.
“The dragons—”
“Yah?”
“They’re imaginary.”
“Like all these imaginary burns on my arm, you mean?”
“Yes. No!” she shook her head violently. “I’ll have to tell you later!”
“Fine, if you can find a really good medium,” snapped Hrun. He glared up at
Liartes, who was beginning to descend in wide sweeps.
“Just listen, will you? Unless my brother is conscious his dragon can’t exist, it’s
got no pathway through to this—”
“Run!” shouted Hrun. He threw her away from him and flung himself flat on the
ground as Liartes’s dragon thundered by, leaving another smoking scar across
the turf.
While the creature sought height for another sweep Hrun scrambled to his feet
and set off at a dead run for the woods at the edge of the arena. They were
sparse, little more than a wide and overgrown hedge, but at least no dragon
would be able to fly through them.
It didn’t try. Liartes brought his mount in to land on the turf a few yards away
and dismounted casually. The dragon folded its wings and poked its head in
among the greenery, while its master leaned against a tree and whistled
tunelessly.
“I can burn you out,” said Liartes, after a while.
The bushes remained motionless.
“Perhaps you’re in that holly bush over there?”
The holly bush became a waxy ball of flame.
“I’m sure I can see movement in those ferns.”
The ferns became mere skeletons of white ash.
“You’re only prolonging it, barbarian. Why not give in now? I’ve burned lots of
people; it doesn’t hurt a bit,” said Liartes, looking sideways at the bushes.
The dragon continued through the spinney, incinerating every likely looking
bush and clump of ferns. Liartes drew his sword and waited.
Hrun dropped from a tree and landed running. Behind him the dragon roared and
crashed through the bushes as it tried to turn around, but Hrun was running,
running, with his gaze fixed on Liartes and a dead branch in his hands.
It is a little known but true fact that a two legged creature can usually beat a four
legged creature over a short distance, simply because of the time it takes the
quadruped to get its legs sorted out. Hrun heard the scrabble of claws behind him
and then an ominous thump. The dragon had half-opened its wings and was
trying to fly.
As Hrun bore down on the dragonlord Liartes’s sword came up wickedly, to be
caught on the branch. Then Hrun cannoned into him and the two men sprawled
on the ground.
The dragon roared.
Liartes screamed as Hrun brought a knee upward with anatomical precision, but
managed a wild blow that rebroke the barbarian’s nose for him.
Hrun kicked away and scrambled to his feet, to find himself looking up into the
wild horse-face of the dragon, its nostrils distended.
He lashed out with a foot and caught Liartes, who was trying to stand up, on the
side of his head. The man slumped.
The dragon vanished. The ball of fire that was billowing toward Hrun faded
until, when it reached him, it was no more than a puff of warm air. Then there
was no sound but the crackle of burning bushes.
Hrun slung the unconscious dragonlord over his shoulder and set off at a trot
back to the arena. Halfway there he found Lio!rt sprawled on the ground, one leg
bent awkwardly. He stooped and, with a grunt, hoisted the man onto his vacant
shoulder.
Liessa and the Loremaster were waiting on a raised dais at one end of the
meadow. The dragonwoman had quite recovered her composure now, and looked
levelly at Hrun as he threw the two men down on the steps before her. The
people around her were standing in deferential poses, like a court.
“Kill them,” she said.
“I kill in my own time,” he said. “In any case, killing unconscious people isn’t
right.”
“I can’t think of a more opportune time,” said the Loremaster. Liessa snorted.
“Then I shall banish them,” she said. “Once they are beyond the reach of the
Wyrmberg’s magic then they’ll have no Power. They’ll be simply brigands. Will
that satisfy you?”
“Yes.”
“I am surprised that you are so merciful, ba—Hrun.”
Hrun shrugged. “A man in my position, he can’t afford to be anything else, he’s
got to consider his image.” He looked around. “Where’s the next test, then?”
“I warn you that it is perilous. If you wish, you may leave now. If you pass the
test, however, you will become Lord of the Wyrmberg and, of course, my lawful
husband.”
Hrun met her gaze. He thought about his life, to date. It suddenly seemed to him
to have been full of long damp nights sleeping under the stars, desperate fights
with trolls, city guards, countless bandits and evil priests and, on at least three
occasions, actual demigods—and for what? Well, for quite a lot of treasure, he
had to admit—but where had it all gone? Rescuing beleaguered maidens had a
certain passing reward, but most of the time he’d finished up by setting them up
in some city somewhere with a handsome dowry, because after a while even the
most agreeable ex-maiden became possessive and had scant sympathy for his
efforts to rescue her sister sufferers. In short, life had really left him with little
more than a reputation and a network of scars. Being a lord might be fun. Hrun
grinned. With a base like this, all these dragons and a good bunch of fighting
men, a man could really be a contender.
Besides, the wench was not uncomely.
“The third test?” she said.
“Am I to be weaponless again?” said Hrun.
Liessa reached up and removed her helmet, letting the coils of red hair tumble
out. Then she unfastened the brooch of her robe. Underneath, she was naked.
As Hrun’s gaze swept over her his mind began to operate two notional counting
machines. One assessed the gold in her bangles, the tiger-rubies that ornamented
her toe-rings, the diamond spangle that adorned her navel, and two highly
individual whirligigs of silver filigree. The other was plugged straight into his
libido. Both produced tallies that pleased him mightily.
As she raised a hand and proffered a glass of wine she smiled, and said, “I think
not.”
“He didn’t attempt to rescue you,” Rincewind pointed out as a last resort.
He clung desperately to Twoflower’s waist as the dragon circled slowly, tilting
the world at a dangerous angle. The new knowledge that the scaly back he was
astride only existed as a sort of three-dimensional daydream did not, he had soon
realized, do anything at all for his ankle-wrenching sensations of vertigo. His
mind kept straying toward the possible results of Twoflower losing his
concentration.
“Not even Hrun could have prevailed against those crossbows,” said Twoflower
stoutly.
As the dragon rose higher above the patch of woodland, where the three of them
had slept a damp and uneasy sleep, the sun rose over the edge of the Disc.
Instantly the gloomy blues and grays of pre-dawn were transformed into a bright
bronze river that flowed across the world, flaring into gold where it struck ice or
water or a light-dam. (Owing to the density of the magical field surrounding the
Disc, light itself moved at subsonic speeds; this interesting property was well
utilized by the Sorca people of the Great Nef, for example, who over the
centuries had constructed intricate and delicate dams, and valleys walled with
polished silica, to catch the slow sunlight and sort of store it. The scintillating
reservoirs of the Nef, overflowing after several weeks of uninterrupted sunlight,
were a truly magnificent sight from the air and it is therefore unfortunate that
Twoflower and Rincewind did not happen to glance in that direction.)
In front of them the billion-ton impossibility that was the magic-wrought
Wyrmberg hung against the sky and that was not too bad, until Rincewind turned
his head and saw the mountain’s shadow slowly unroll itself across the
cloudscape of the world…
“What can you see?” said Twoflower to the dragon.
I see fighting on the top of the mountain came the gentle reply.
“See?” said Twoflower. “Hrun’s probably fighting for his life at this very
moment.”
Rincewind was silent. After a moment Twoflower looked around. The wizard
was staring intently at nothing at all, his lips moving soundlessly.
“Rincewind?”
The wizard made a small croaking noise.
“I’m sorry,” said Twoflower. “What did you say?”
“…all the way…the great fall…” muttered Rincewind. His eyes focused, looked
puzzled for a moment, then widened in terror. He made the mistake of looking
down.
“Aargh,” he opined, and began to slide. Twoflower grabbed him.
“What’s the matter?”
Rincewind tried shutting his eyes, but there were no eyelids to his imagination
and it was staring widely.
“Don’t you get scared of heights?” he managed to say.
Twoflower looked down at the tiny landscape, mottled with cloud shadows. The
thought of fear hadn’t actually occurred to him.
“No,” he said. “Why should I? You’re just as dead if you fall from forty feet as
you are from four thousand fathoms, that’s what I say.”
Rincewind tried to consider this dispassionately, but couldn’t see the logic of it.
It wasn’t the actual falling, it was the hitting he…
Twoflower grabbed him quickly.
“Steady on,” he said cheerfully. “We’re nearly there.”
“I wish I was back in the city,” moaned Rincewind. “I wish I was back on the
ground!”
“I wonder if dragons can fly all the way to the stars?” mused Twoflower. “Now
that would be something…”
“You’re mad,” said Rincewind flatly. There was no reply from the tourist, and
when the wizard craned around he was horrified to see Twoflower looking up at
the paling stars with an odd smile on his face.
“Don’t you even think about it,” added Rincewind, menacingly.
The man you seek is talking to the dragonwoman said the dragon.
“Hmm?” said Twoflower, still looking at the paling stars.
“What?” said Rincewind urgently.
“Oh yes. Hrun.” said Twoflower. “I hope we’re in time. Dive now! Go low!”
Rincewind opened his eyes as the wind increased to a whistling gale. Perhaps
they were blown open—the wind certainly made them impossible to shut.
The flat summit of the Wyrmberg rose up at them, lurched alarmingly, then
somersaulted into a green blur that flashed by on either side. Tiny woods and
fields blurred into a rushing patchwork. A brief silvery flash in the landscape
may have been the little river that overflowed into the air at the plateau’s rim.
Rincewind tried to force the memory out of his mind, but it was rather enjoying
itself there, terrorizing the other occupants and kicking over the furniture.
“I think not,” said Liessa.
Hrun took the wine cup, slowly. He grinned like a pumpkin.
Around the arena the dragons started to bay. Their riders looked up. And
something like a green blur flashed across the arena, and Hrun had gone.
The winecup hung momentarily in the air, then crashed down on the steps. Only
then did a single drop spill.
This was because, in the instant of enfolding Hrun gently in his claws, Ninereeds
the dragon had momentarily synchronized their bodily rhythms. Since the
dimension of the imagination is much more complex than those of time and
space, which are very junior dimensions indeed, the effect of this was to
instantly transform a stationary and priapic Hrun into a Hrun moving sideways at
eighty miles an hour with no ill effects whatsoever, except for a few wasted
mouthfuls of wine. Another effect was to cause Liessa to scream with rage and
summon her dragon. As the gold beast materialized in front of her she leapt
astride it, still naked, and snatched a crossbow from one of the guards. Then she
was airborne, while the other dragonriders swarmed toward their own beasts.
The Loremaster, watching from the pillar he had prudently slid behind in the
mad scramble, happened at that moment to catch the cross-dimensional echoes
of a theory being at the same instant hatched in the mind of an early psychiatrist
in an adjacent universe, possibly because the dimension-leak was flowing both
ways, and for a moment the psychiatrist saw the girl on the dragon. The
Loremaster smiled.
“Want to bet that she won’t catch him?” said Greicha, in a voice of worms and
sepulchers, right by his ear.
The Loremaster shut his eyes and swallowed hard.
“I thought that my Lord would now be residing fully in the Dread Land,” he
managed.
“I am a wizard,” said Greicha. “Death Himself must claim a wizard. And, aha,
He doesn’t appear to be in the neighborhood…”
SHALL WE GO? asked Death.
He was on a white horse, a horse of flesh and blood but red of eye and fiery of
nostril, and He stretched out a bony hand and took Greicha’s soul out of the air
and rolled it up until it was a point of painful light, and then He swallowed it.
Then He clapped spurs to his steed and it sprang into the air, sparks corruscating
from its hooves.
“Lord Greicha!” whispered the old Loremaster, as the universe flickered around
him.
“That was a mean trick,” came the wizard’s voice, a mere speck of sound
disappearing into the infinite black dimensions.
“My Lord…what is Death like?” called the old man tremulously.
“When I have investigated it fully, I will let you know,” came the faintest of
modulations on the breeze.
“Yes,” murmured the Loremaster. A thought struck him. “During daylight,
please,” he added.
“You clowns,” screamed Hrun, from his perch on Ninereeds’s foreclaws.
“What did he say?” roared Rincewind, as the dragon ripped its way through the
air in the race for the heights.
“Didn’t hear!” bellowed Twoflower, his voice torn away by the gale. As the
dragon banked slightly he looked down at the little toy spinning top that was the
mighty Wyrmberg and saw the swarm of creatures rising in pursuit. Ninereed’s
wings pounded and flicked the air away contemptuously. Thinner air, too.
Twoflower’s ear popped for the third time.
Ahead of the swarm, he noticed, was a golden dragon. Someone on it, too.
“Hey, are you all right?” said Rincewind urgently. He had to drink in several
lungfuls of the strangely distilled air in order to get the words out.
“I could have been a lord, and you clowns had to go and—” Hrun gasped, as the
chill thin air drew the life even out of his mighty chest.
“Wass happnin to the air?” muttered Rincewind. Blue lights appeared in front of
his eyes.
“Unk,” said Twoflower, and passed out.
The dragon vanished.
For a few seconds the three men continued upward, Twoflower and the wizard
presenting an odd picture as they sat one in front of the other with their legs
astride something that wasn’t there. Then what passed for gravity on the Disc
recovered from the surprise, and claimed them.
At that moment Liessa’s dragon flashed by, and Hrun landed heavily across its
neck. Liessa leaned over and kissed him.
This detail was lost to Rincewind as he dropped away, with his arms still clasped
around Twoflower’s waist. The Disc was a little round map pinned against the
sky. It didn’t appear to be moving, but Rincewind knew that it was. The whole
world was coming toward him like a giant custard pie.
“Wake up!” he shouted, above the roar of the wind. “Dragons! Think of
dragons!”
There was a flurry of wings as they plummeted through the host of pursuing
creatures, which fell away and up. Dragons screamed and wheeled across the
sky.
No answer came from Twoflower. Rincewind’s robe whipped around him, but he
did not wake.
Dragons, thought Rincewind in a panic. He tried to concentrate his mind, tried to
envisage a really lifelike dragon. If he can do it, he thought, then so can I. But
nothing happened.
The Disc was bigger now, a cloud-swirled circle rising gently underneath them.
Rincewind tried again, screwing up his eyes and straining every nerve in his
body. A dragon. His imagination, a somewhat battered and overused organ,
reached out for a dragon…any dragon.
IT WON’T WORK, laughed a voice like the dull toning of a funeral bell, YOU
DON’T BELIEVE IN THEM.
Rincewind looked at the terrible mounted apparition grinning at him, and his
mind bolted in terror.
There was a brilliant flash.
There was utter darkness.
There was a soft floor under Rincewind’s feet, a pink light around him, and the
sudden shocked cries of many people.
He looked around wildly. He was standing in some kind of tunnel, which was
mostly filled with seats in which out-landishly dressed people had been strapped.
They were all shouting at him.
“Wake up!” he hissed. “Help me!”
Dragging the still-unconscious tourist with him he backed away from the mob
until his free hand found an oddly shaped door handle. He twisted it and ducked
through, then slammed it hard.
He stared around the new room in which he found himself and met the terrified
gaze of a young woman who dropped the tray she was holding and screamed.
It sounded like the sort of scream that brings muscular help. Rincewind, awash
with fear-distilled adrenaline, turned and barged past her. There were more seats
here, and the people in them ducked as he dragged Twoflower urgently along the
central gangway. Beyond the rows of seats were little windows. Beyond the
windows, against a background of fleecy clouds, was a dragon’s wing. It was
silver.
I’ve been eaten by a dragon, he thought. That’s ridiculous, he replied, you can’t
see out of dragons. Then his shoulder hit the door at the far end of the tunnel,
and he followed it through into a cone-shaped room that was even stranger than
the tunnel.
It was full of tiny glittering lights. Among the lights, in contoured chairs, were
four men who were now staring at him open-mouthed. As he stared back he saw
their gazes dart sideways.
Rincewind turned slowly. Beside him was a fifth man—youngish, bearded, as
swarthy as the nomad folk of the Great Nef.
“Where am I?” said the wizard. “In the belly of a dragon?”
The young man crouched back and shoved a small black box in the wizard’s
face. The men in the chairs ducked down.
“What is it?” said Rincewind. “A picture box?” He reached out and took it, a
movement which appeared to surprise the swarthy man, who shouted and tried to
snatch it back. There was another shout, this time from one of the men in the
chairs. Only now he wasn’t sitting. He was standing up, pointing something
small and metallic at the young man.
It had an amazing effect. The man crouched back with his hands in the air.
“Please give me the bomb, sir,” said the man with the metallic thing. “Carefully,
please.”
“This thing?” said Rincewind. “You have it! I don’t want it!” The man took it
very carefully and put it on the floor. The seated men relaxed, and one of them
started speaking urgently to the wall. The wizard watched him in amazement.
“Don’t move!” snapped the man with the metal—an amulet, Rincewind decided,
it must be an amulet. The swarthy man backed into the corner.
“That was a very brave thing you did,” said Amuletholder to Rincewind. “You
know that?”
“What?”
“What’s the matter with your friend.”
“Friend?”
Rincewind looked down at Twoflower, who was still slumbering peacefully.
That was no surprise. What was really surprising was that Twoflower was
wearing new clothes. Strange clothes. His britches now ended just above his
knees. Above that he wore some sort of vest of brightly-striped material. On his
head was a ridiculous little straw hat. With a feather in it.
An awkward feeling around the leg regions made Rincewind look down. His
clothes had changed, too. Instead of the comfortable old robe, so marvelously
well-adapted for speed into action in all possible contingencies, his legs were
encased in cloth tubes. He was wearing a jacket of the same gray material…
Until now he’d never heard the language the man with the amulet was using. It
was uncouth and vaguely Hublandish—so why could he understand every word?
Let’s see, they’d suddenly appeared in this dragon after, they’d materialized in
this drag, they’d sudd, they’d, they’d—they had struck up a conversation in the
airport so naturally they had chosen to sit together on the plane, and he’d
promised to show Jack Zweiblumen around when they got back to the States.
Yes, that was it. And then Jack had been taken ill and he’d panicked and come
through here and surprised this hijacker. Of course. What on earth was
“Hublandish?”
Dr. Rjinswand rubbed his forehead. What he could do with was a drink.
Ripples of paradox spread out across the sea of causality.
Possibly the most important point that would have to be borne in mind by
anyone outside the sum totality of the multiverse was that although the wizard
and the tourist had indeed only recently appeared in an aircraft in midair, they
had also at one and the same time been riding on that airplane in the normal
course of things. That is to say: while it was true that they had just appeared in
this particular set of dimensions, it was also true that they had been living in
them all along. It is at this point that normal language gives up, and goes and has
a drink.
The point is that several quintillion atoms had just materialized (however, they
had not. See below) in a universe where they should not strictly had been. The
usual upshot of this sort of thing is a vast explosion but, since universes are
fairly resilient things, this particular universe had saved itself by instantaneously
unraveling its space-time continuum back to a point where the surplus atoms
could safely be accommodated and then rapidly rewinding back to that circle of
firelight which for want of a better term its inhabitants were wont to call The
Present. This had of course changed history—there had been a few less wars, a
few extra dinosaurs and so on—but on the whole the episode passed remarkably
quietly.
Outside of this particular universe, however, the repercussions of the sudden
double-take bounced to and fro across the face of The Sum of Things, bending
whole dimensions and sinking galaxies without a trace.
All this was however totally lost on Dr. Rjinswand, 33, a bachelor, born in
Sweden, raised in New Jersey, and a specialist in the breakaway oxidation
phenomena of certain nuclear reactors. Anyway, he probably would not have
believed any of it.
Zweiblumen still seemed to be unconscious. The stewardess, who had helped
Rjinswand to his seat to the applause of the rest of the passengers, was bending
over him anxiously.
“We’ve radioed ahead,” she told Rjinswand. “There’ll be an ambulance waiting
when we land. Uh, it says on the passenger list that you’re a doctor—”
“I don’t know what’s wrong with him,” said Rjinswand hurriedly. “It might be a
different matter if he was a Magnox reactor of course. Is it shock of some kind?”
“I’ve never—”
Her sentence terminated in a tremendous crash from the rear of the plane.
Several passengers screamed. A sudden gale of air swept every loose magazine
and newspaper into a screaming whirlwind that twisted madly down the aisle.
Something else was coming up the aisle. Something big and oblong and wooden
and brass-bound. It had hundreds of legs. If it was what it seemed—a walking
chest of the kind that appeared in pirate stories brim full of ill-gotten gold and
jewels—then what would have been its lid suddenly gaped open.
There were no jewels. But there were lots of big square teeth, white as sycamore,
and a pulsating tongue, red as mahogany.
An ancient suitcase was coming to eat him.
Rjinswand clutched at the unconscious Zweiblumen for what little comfort there
was there, and gibbered. He wished fervently that he was somewhere else…
There was a sudden darkness.
There was a brilliant flash.
The sudden departure of several quintillion atoms from a universe that they had
no right to be in anyway caused a wild imbalance in the harmony of the Sum
Totality which it tried frantically to retrieve, wiping out a number of subrealities
in the process. Huge surges of raw magic boiled uncontrolled around the very
foundations of the multiverse itself, welling up through every crevice into
hitherto peaceful dimensions and causing novas, supernovas, stellar collisions,
wild flights of geese and drowning of imaginary continents. Worlds as far away
as the other end of time experienced brilliant sunsets of corruscating octarine as
highly charged magical particles roared through the atmosphere. In the cometary
halo around the fabled Ice System of Zeret a noble comet died as a prince flamed
across the sky.
All this was however lost on Rincewind as, clutching the inert Twoflower around
the waist, he plunged toward the Disc’s sea several hundred feet below. Not even
the convulsions of all the dimensions could break the iron Law of the
Conservation of Energy, and Rjinswand’s brief journey in the plane had sufficed
to carry him several hundred miles horizontally and seven thousand feet
vertically.
The word “plane” flamed and died in Rincewind’s mind.
Was that a ship down there?
The cold waters of the Circle Sea roared up at him and sucked him down into
their green, suffocating embrace. A moment later there was another splash as the
luggage, still bearing a label carrying the powerful traveling rune TWA, also hit
the sea.
Later on, they used it as a raft.
CLOSE TO THE EDGE
It had been a long time in the making. Now it was almost completed, and the
slaves hacked away at the last clay remnants of the mantle.
Where other slaves were industriously rubbing its metal flanks with silver sand it
was already beginning to gleam in the sun with the silken, organic sheen of
young bronze. It was still warm, even after a week of cooling in the casting pit.
The Arch-astronomer of Krull motioned lightly with his hand and his bearers set
the throne down in the shadow of the hull.
Like a fish, he thought. A great flying fish. And of what seas?
“It is indeed magnificent,” he whispered. “A work of true art.”
“Craft,” said the thickset man by his side. The Arch-astronomer turned slowly
and looked up at the man’s impassive face. It isn’t particularly hard for a face to
look impassive when there are two golden spheres where the eyes should be.
They glowed disconcertingly.
“Craft, indeed,” said the astronomer, and smiled. “I would imagine that there is
no greater craftsman on the entire Disc than you, Goldeneyes. Would I be right?”
The craftsman paused, his naked body—naked, at least, were it not for a toolbelt,
a wrist abacus and a deep tan—tensing as he considered the implications of this
last remark. The golden eyes appeared to be looking into some other world.
“The answer is both yes and no,” he said at last. Some of the lesser astronomers
behind the throne gasped at this lack of etiquette, but the Arch-astronomer
appeared not to have noticed it.
“Continue,” he said.
“There are some essential skills that I lack. Yet I am Goldeneyes Silverhand
Dactylos,” said the craftsman. “I made the Metal Warriors that guard the Tomb
of Pitchiu, I designed the Light Dams of the Great Nef, I built the Palace of the
Seven Deserts. And yet—” he reached up and tapped one of his eyes, which rang
faintly, “when I built the golem army for Pitchiu he loaded me down with gold
and then, so that I would create no other work to rival my work for him, he had
my eyes put out.”
“Wise but cruel,” said the Arch-astronomer sympathetically.
“Yah. So I learned to hear the temper of metals and to see with my fingers. I
learned how to distinguish ores by taste and smell. I made these eyes, but I
cannot make them see.
“Next I was summoned to build the Palace of the Seven Deserts, as a result of
which the Emir showered me with silver and then, not entirely to my surprise,
had my right hand cut off.”
“A grave hindrance in your line of business,” nodded the Arch-astronomer.
“I used some of the silver to make myself this new hand, putting to use my
unrivaled knowledge of levers and fulcrums. It suffices. After I created the first
great Light Dam, which had a capacity of 50,000 daylight hours, the tribal
councils of the Nef loaded me down with fine silks and then hamstrung me so
that I could not escape. As a result I was put to some inconvenience to use the
silk and some bamboo to build a flying machine from which I could launch
myself from the topmost turret of my prison.”
“Bringing you, by various diversions, to Krull,” said the Arch-astronomer. “And
one cannot help feeling that some alternative occupation—lettuce farming, say—
would offer somewhat less of a risk of being put to death by installments. Why
do you persist in it?”
Goldeneyes Dactylos shrugged.
“I’m good at it,” he said.
The Arch-astronomer looked up again at the bronze fish, shining now like a
gong in the noontime sun.
“Such beauty,” he murmured. “And unique. Come, Dactylos. Recall to me what
it was that I promised should be your reward?”
“You asked me to design a fish that would swim through the seas of space that
lie between the worlds,” intoned the master craftsman. “In return for which—in
return—”
“Yes? My memory is not what it used to be,” purred the Arch-astronomer,
stroking the warm bronze.
“In return,” continued Dactylos, without much apparent hope, “you would set
me free, and refrain from chopping off any appendages. I require no treasure.”
“Ah, yes. I recall now.” The old man raised a blue-veined hand, and added, “I
lied.”
There was the merest whisper of sound, and the goldeneyed man rocked on his
feet. Then he looked down at the arrowhead protruding from his chest, and
nodded wearily. A speck of blood bloomed on his lips.
There was no sound in the entire square (save for the buzzing of a few expectant
flies) as his silver hand came up, very slowly, and fingered the arrowhead.
Dactylos grunted.
“Sloppy workmanship,” he said, and toppled backward.
The Arch-astronomer prodded the body with his toe, and sighed.
“There will be a short period of mourning, as befits a master craftsman,” he said.
He watched a bluebottle alight on one golden eye and fly away puzzled…“That
would seem to be long enough,” said the Arch-astronomer, and beckoned a
couple of slaves to carry the corpse away.
“Are the chelonauts ready?” he asked.
The master launchcontroller bustled forward.
“Indeed, your prominence,” he said.
“The correct prayers are being intoned?”
“Quite so, your prominence.”
“How long to the doorway?”
“The launch window,” corrected the master launchcontroller carefully. “Three
days, your prominence. Great A’Tuin’s tail will be in an unmatched position.”
“Then all that remains,” concluded the Arch-astronomer, “is to find the
appropriate sacrifices.”
The master launchcontroller bowed.
“The ocean shall provide,” he said.
The old man smiled. “It always does,” he said.
“If only you could navigate—”
“If only you could steer—”
A wave washed over the deck. Rincewind and Twoflower looked at each other.
“Keep bailing!” they screamed in unison, and reached for the buckets.
After a while Twoflower’s peevish voice filtered up from the waterlogged cabin.
“I don’t see how it’s my fault,” he said. He handed up another bucket, which the
wizard tipped over the side.
“You were supposed to be on watch,” snapped Rincewind.
“I saved us from the slavers, remember,” said Twoflower.
“I’d rather be a slave than a corpse,” replied the wizard. He straightened up and
looked out to sea. He appeared puzzled.
He was a somewhat different Rincewind from the one that escaped the fire of
Ankh-Morpork some six months before. More scarred, for one thing, and much
more traveled. He had visited the Hublands, discovered the curious folkways of
many colorful peoples—invariably obtaining more scars in the process—and had
even, for a never-to-be-forgotten few days, sailed on the legendary Dehydrated
Ocean at the heart of the incredibly dry desert known as the Great Nef. On a
colder and wetter sea he had seen floating mountains of ice. He had ridden on an
imaginary dragon. He had very nearly said the most powerful spell on the Disc.
He had—
—there was definitely less horizon than there ought to be.
“Hmm?” said Rincewind.
“I said nothing’s worse than slavery,” said Twoflower. His mouth opened as the
wizard flung his bucket far out to sea and sat down heavily on the waterlogged
deck, his face a gray mask.
“Look, I’m sorry I steered us into the reef, but this boat doesn’t seem to want to
sink and we’re bound to strike land sooner or later,” said Twoflower
comfortingly. “This current must go somewhere.”
“Look at the horizon,” said Rincewind, in a monotone.
Twoflower squinted.
“It looks all right,” he said after a while. “Admittedly, there seems to be less than
there usually is, but—”
“That’s because of the Rimfall,” said Rincewind. “We’re being carried over the
edge of the world.”
There was a long silence, broken only by the lapping of the waves as the
foundering ship spun slowly in the current. It was already quite strong.
“That’s probably why we hit that reef,” Rincewind added. “We got pulled off
course during the night.”
“Would you like something to eat?” asked Twoflower. He began to rummage
through the bundle that he had tied to the rail, out of the damp.
“Don’t you understand?” snarled Rincewind. “We are going over the Edge,
godsdammit!”
“Can’t we do anything about it?”
“No!”
“Then I can’t see the sense in panicking,” said Twoflower calmly.
“I knew we shouldn’t have come this far Edgewise,” complained Rincewind to
the sky, “I wish—”
“I wish I had my picture box,” said Twoflower, “but it’s back on that slaver ship
with the rest of the Luggage and—”
“You won’t need luggage where we’re going,” said Rincewind. He sagged, and
stared moodily at a distant whale that had carelessly strayed into the rimward
current and was now struggling against it.
There was a line of white on the foreshortened horizon, and the wizard fancied
he could hear a distant roaring.
“What happens after a ship goes over the Rimfall?” said Twoflower.
“Who knows?”
“Well, in that case perhaps we’ll just sail on through space and land on another
world.” A faraway look came into the little man’s eyes. “I’d like that,” he said.
Rincewind snorted.
The sun rose in the sky, looking noticeably bigger this close to the Edge. They
stood with their backs against the mast, busy with their own thoughts. Every so
often one or other would pick up a bucket and do a bit of desultory bailing, for
no very intelligent reason.
The sea around them seemed to be getting crowded. Rincewind noticed several
tree trunks keeping station with them, and just below the surface the water was
alive with fish of all sorts. Of course—the current must be teeming with food
washed from the continents near the Hub. He wondered what kind of life it
would be, having to keep swimming all the time to stay exactly in the same
place. Pretty similar to his own, he decided. He spotted a small green frog which
was paddling desperately in the grip of the inexorable current. To Twoflower’s
amazement he found a paddle and carefully extended it toward the little
amphibian, which scrambled onto it gratefully. A moment later a pair of jaws
broke the water and snapped impotently at the spot where it had been swimming.
The frog looked up at Rincewind from the cradle of his hands, and then bit him
thoughtfully on the thumb. Twoflower giggled. Rincewind tucked the frog away
in a pocket, and pretended he hadn’t heard.
“All very humanitarian, but why?” said Twoflower. “It’ll all be the same in an
hour.”
“Because,” said Rincewind vaguely, and did a bit of bailing. Spray was being
thrown up now and the current was so strong that waves were forming and
breaking all around them. It all seemed unnaturally warm. There was a hot
golden haze on the sea.
The roaring was louder now. A squid bigger than anything Rincewind had seen
before broke the surface a few hundred yards away and thrashed madly with its
tentacles before sinking away. Something else that was large and fortunately
unidentifiable howled in the mist. A whole squadron of flying fish tumbled up in
a cloud of rainbow-edged droplets and managed to gain a few yards before
dropping back and being swept away in an eddy.
They were running out of world. Rincewind dropped his bucket and snatched at
the mast as the roaring, final end of everything raced toward them.
“I must see this—” said Twoflower, half falling and half diving toward the prow.
Something hard and unyielding smacked into the hull, which spun ninety
degrees and came side-on to the invisible obstacle. Then it stopped suddenly and
a wash of cold sea foam cascaded over the deck, so that for a few seconds
Rincewind was under several feet of boiling green water. He began to scream
and then the underwater world became the deep clanging purple color of fading
consciousness, because it was at about this point that Rincewind started to
drown.
He awoke with his mouth full of burning liquid and, when he swallowed, the
searing pain in his throat jerked him into full consciousness.
The boards of a boat pressed into his back and Twoflower was looking down at
him with an expression of deep concern. Rincewind groaned, and sat up.
This turned out to be a mistake. The edge of the world was a few feet away.
Beyond it, at a level just below that of the lip of the endless Rimfall, was
something altogether magical.
Some seventy miles away, and well beyond the tug of the Rim current, a dhow
with the red sails typical of a freelance slaver drifted aimlessly through the
velvety twilight. The crew—such as remained—were clustered on the foredeck,
surrounding the men working feverishly on the raft.
The captain, a thickset man who wore the elbow-turbans typical of a Great Nef
tribesman, was much traveled and had seen many strange peoples and curious
things, many of which he had subsequently enslaved or stolen. He had begun his
career as a sailor on the Dehydrated Ocean in the heart of the Disc’s driest
desert. (Water on the Disc has an uncommon fourth state, caused by intense heat
combined with the strange dessicating effects of octarine light; it dehydrates,
leaving a silvery residue like free-flowing sand through which a well-designed
hull can glide with ease. The Dehydrated Ocean is a strange place, but not so
strange as its fish.) The captain had never before been really frightened. Now he
was terrified.
“I can’t hear anything,” he muttered to the first mate.
The mate peered into the gloom.
“Perhaps it fell overboard?” he suggested hopefully. As if in answer there came a
furious pounding from the oar deck below their feet, and the sound of splintering
wood. The crewmen drew together fearfully, brandishing axes and torches.
They probably wouldn’t dare to use them, even if the Monster came rushing
toward them. Before its terrible nature had been truly understood several men
had attacked it with axes, whereupon it had turned aside from its single-minded
searching of the ship and had either chased them overboard or had—eaten them?
The captain was not quite certain. The Thing looked like an ordinary wooden sea
chest. A bit larger than usual, maybe, but not suspiciously so. But while it
sometimes seemed to contain things like old socks and miscellaneous luggage, at
other times—and he shuddered—it seemed to be, seemed to be, seemed to
have…He tried not to think about it. It was just that the men who had been
drowned overboard had probably been more fortunate than those it had caught.
He tried not to think about it. There had been teeth, teeth like white wooden
gravestones, and a tongue red as mahogany…
He tried not to think about it. It didn’t work.
But he thought bitterly about one thing. This was going to be the last time he
rescued ungrateful drowning men in mysterious circumstances. Slavery was
better than sharks, wasn’t it? And then they had escaped and when his sailors
had investigated their big chest—how had they appeared in the middle of an
untroubled ocean sitting on a big chest, anyway?—and it had bitt…He tried not
to think about it again, but he found himself wondering what would happen
when the damned thing realized that its owner wasn’t on board any longer…
“Raft’s ready, lord,” said the first mate.
“Into the water with it,” shouted the captain, and “Get aboard!” and “Fire the
ship!”
After all, another ship wouldn’t be too hard to come by, he philosophized, but a
man might have to wait a long time in that Paradise the mullahs advertised
before he was granted another life. Let the magical box eat lobsters.
Some pirates achieved immortality by great deeds of cruelty or derring-do. Some
achieved immortality by amassing great wealth. But the captain had long ago
decided that he would, on the whole, prefer to achieve immortality by not dying.
“What the hell is that?” demanded Rincewind.
“It’s beautiful,” said Twoflower beatifically.
“I’ll decide about that when I know what it is,” said the wizard.
“It is the Rimbow,” said a voice immediately behind his left ear, “and you are
fortunate indeed to be looking at it. From above, at any rate.”
The voice was accompanied by a gust of cold, fishy breath. Rincewind sat quite
still.
“Twoflower?” he said.
“Yes?”
“If I turn around, what will I see?”
“His name is Tethis. He says he’s a sea troll. This is his boat. He rescued us,”
explained Twoflower. “Will you look around now?”
“Not just at the moment, thank you. So why aren’t we going over the Edge,
then?” asked Rincewind with glassy calmness.
“Because your boat hit the Circumfence,” said the voice behind him (in tones
that made Rincewind imagine submarine chasms and lurking Things in coral
reefs).
“The Circumfence?” he repeated.
“Yes. It runs along the edge of the world,” said the unseen troll. Above the roar
of the waterfall Rincewind thought he could make out the splash of oars. He
hoped they were oars.
“Ah. You mean the circumference,” said Rincewind. “The circumference makes
the edge of things.”
“So does the Circumfence,” said the troll.
“He means this,” said Twoflower, pointing down. Rincewind’s eyes followed the
finger, dreading what they might see…
Hubward of the boat was a rope suspended a few feet above the surface of the
white water. The boat was attached to it, moored yet mobile, by a complicated
arrangement of pulleys and little wooden wheels. They ran along the rope as the
unseen rower propelled the craft along the very lip of the Rimfall. That
explained one mystery—but what supported the rope?
Rincewind peered along its length and saw a stout wooden post sticking up out
of the water a few yards ahead. As he watched the boat neared it and then passed
it, the little wheels clacking neatly around it in a groove obviously cut for the
purpose.
Rincewind also noticed that smaller ropes hung down from the main rope at
intervals of a yard or so.
He turned back to Twoflower.
“I can see what it is,” he said, “but what is it?”
Twoflower shrugged. Behind Rincewind the sea troll said, “Up ahead is my
house. We will talk more when we are there. Now I must row.”
Rincewind found that looking ahead meant that he would have to turn and find
out what a sea troll actually looked like, and he wasn’t sure he wanted to do that
yet. He looked at the Rimbow instead.
It hung in the mists a few lengths beyond the edge of the world, appearing only
at morning and evening when the light of the Disc’s little orbiting sun shone past
the massive bulk of Great A’Tuin the World Turtle and struck the Disc’s magical
field at exactly the right angle.
A double rainbow corruscated into being. Close into the lip of the Rimfall were
the seven lesser colors, sparkling and dancing in the spray of the dying seas.
But they were pale in comparison to the wider band that floated beyond them,
not deigning to share the same spectrum.
It was the King Color, of which all the lesser colors are merely partial and
wishy-washy reflections. It was octarine, the color of magic. It was alive and
glowing and vibrant and it was the undisputed pigment of the imagination,
because wherever it appeared it was a sign that mere matter was a servant of the
powers of the magical mind. It was enchantment itself.
But Rincewind always thought it looked a sort of greenish purple.
After a while a small speck on the rim of the world resolved itself into a eyot or
crag, so perilously perched that the waters of the fall swirled around it at the start
of their long drop. A driftwood shanty had been built on it, and Rincewind saw
that the top rope of the Circumfence climbed over the rocky island on a number
of iron stakes and actually passed through the shack by a small round window.
He learned later that this was so that the troll could be alerted to the arrival of
any salvage on his stretch of the Circumfence by means of a series of small
bronze bells, balanced delicately on the rope.
A crude floating stockade had been built out of rough timber on the hubward
side of the island. It contained one or two hulks and quite a large amount of
floating wood in the form of planks, baulks and even whole natural tree trunks,
some still sporting green leaves. This close to the Edge the Disc’s magical field
was so intense that a hazy corona flickered across everything as raw illusion
spontaneously discharged itself.
With a last few squeaky jerks the boat slid up against a small driftwood jetty. As
it grounded itself and formed a circuit Rincewind felt all the familiar sensations
of a huge occult aura—oily, bluish tasting, and smelling of tin. All around them
pure, unfocused magic was sleeting soundlessly into the world.
The wizard and Twoflower scrambled onto the planking and for the first time
Rincewind saw the troll.
It wasn’t half so dreadful as he had imagined.
Umm, said his imagination after a while.
It wasn’t that the troll was horrifying. Instead of the rotting, betentacled
monstrosity he had been expecting Rincewind found himself looking at a rather
squat but not particularly ugly old man who would quite easily have passed for
normal on any city street, always provided that other people on the street were
used to seeing old men who were apparently composed of water and very little
else. It was as if the ocean had decided to create life without going through all
that tedious business of evolution, and had simply formed a part of itself into a
biped and sent it walking squishily up the beach. The troll was a pleasant
translucent blue color. As Rincewind stared a small shoal of silver fish flashed
across its chest.
“It’s rude to stare,” said the troll. Its mouth opened with a little crest of foam,
and shut again in exactly the same way that water closes over a stone.
“Is it? Why?” asked Rincewind. How does he hold himself together, his mind
screamed at him. Why doesn’t he spill?
“If you will follow me to my house I will find you food and a change of
clothing,” said the troll solemnly. He set off over the rocks without turning to see
if they would follow him. After all, where else could they go? It was getting
dark, and a chilly damp breeze was blowing over the edge of the world. Already
the transient Rimbow had faded and the mists above the waterfall were
beginning to thin.
“Come on,” said Rincewind, grabbing Twoflower’s elbow. But the tourist didn’t
appear to want to move.
“Come on,” the wizard repeated.
“When it gets really dark, do you think we’ll be able to look down and see Great
A’tuin the World Turtle?” asked Twoflower, staring at the rolling clouds.
“I hope not,” said Rincewind, “I really do. Now let’s go, shall we?”
Twoflower followed him reluctantly into the shack. The troll had lit a couple of
lamps and was sitting comfortably in a rocking chair. He got to his feet as they
entered and poured two cups of a green liquid from a tall pitcher. In the dim light
he appeared to phosphoresce, in the manner of warm seas on velvety summer
nights. Just to add a baroque gloss to Rincewind’s dull terror he seemed to be
several inches taller, too.
Most of the furniture in the room appeared to be boxes.
“Uh. Really great place you’ve got here,” said Rincewind. “Ethnic.”
He reached for a cup and looked at the green pool shimmering inside it. It’d
better be drinkable, he thought. Because I’m going to drink it. He swallowed.
It was the same stuff Twoflower had given him in the rowing boat but, at the
time, his mind had ignored it because there were more pressing matters. Now it
had the leisure to savor the taste.
Rincewind’s mouth twisted. He whimpered a little. One of his legs came up
convulsively and caught him painfully in the chest.
Twoflower swirled his own drink thoughtfully while he considered the flavor.
“Ghlen Livid,” he said. “The fermented vul nut drink they freeze-distill in my
home country. A certain smoky quality…Piquant. From the western plantations
in, ah, Rehigreed Province, yes? Next year’s harvest, I fancy, from the color.
May I ask how you came by it?”
(Plants on the Disc, while including the categories known commonly as annuals,
which were sown this year to come up later this year, biennials, sown this year to
grow next year, and perennials, sown this year to grow until further notice, also
included a few rare re-annuals which, because of an unusual four-dimensional
twist in their genes, could be planted this year to come up last year. The vul nut
vine was particularly exceptional in that it could flourish as many as eight years
prior to its seed actually being sown. Vul nut wine was reputed to give certain
drinkers an insight into the future which was, from the nut’s point of view, the
past. Strange but true.)
“All things drift into the Circumfence in time,” said the troll, gnomically, gently
rocking in his chair. “My job is to recover the flotsam. Timber, of course, and
ships. Barrels of wine. Bales of cloth. You.”
Light dawned inside Rincewind’s head.
“It’s a net, isn’t it? You’ve got a net right on the edge of the sea!”
“The Circumfence,” nodded the troll. Ripples ran across his chest.
Rincewind looked out into the phosphorescent darkness that surrounded the
island, and grinned inanely.
“Of course,” he said. “Amazing! You could sink piles and attach it to reefs and—
good grief! The net would have to be very strong.”
“It is,” said Tethis.
“It could be extended for a couple of miles, if you found enough rocks and
things,” said the wizard.
“Ten thousands of miles. I just patrol this league.”
“That’s a third of the way around the Disc!”
Tethis sloshed a little as he nodded again. While the two men helped themselves
to some more of the green wine, he told them about the Circumfence, the great
effort that had been made to build it, and the ancient and wise Kingdom of Krull
which had constructed it several centuries before, and the seven navies that
patrolled it constantly to keep it in repair and bring its salvage back to Krull, and
the manner in which Krull had become a land of leisure ruled by the most
learned seekers after knowledge, and the way in which they sought constantly to
understand in every possible particular the wondrous complexity of the
Circumfence were turned into slaves, and usually had their tongues cut out. After
some interjections at this point he spoke, in a friendly way, on the futility of
force, the impossibility of escaping from the island except by boat to one of the
other three hundred and eighty isles that lay between the island and Krull itself,
or by leaping over the Edge, and the high merit of muteness in comparison to,
for example, death.
There was a pause. The muted night-roar of the Rimfall only served to give the
silence a heavier texture.
Then the rocking chair started to creak again. Tethis seemed to have grown
alarmingly during the monologue.
“There is nothing personal in all this,” he added. “I too am a slave. If you try to
overpower me I shall have to kill you, of course, but I won’t take any particular
pleasure in it.”
Rincewind looked at the shimmering fists that rested lightly in the troll’s lap. He
suspected they could strike with all the force of a tsunami.
“I don’t think you understand,” explained Twoflower. “I am a citizen of the
Golden Empire. I’m sure Krull would not wish to incur the displeasure of the
Emperor.”
“How will the Emperor know?” asked the troll. “Do you think you’re the first
person from the Empire who has ended up on the Circumfence?”
“I won’t be a slave!” shouted Rincewind. “I’d—I’d jump over the Edge first!”
He was amazed at the sound in his own voice.
“Would you, though?” asked the troll. The rocking chair flicked back against the
wall and one blue arm caught the wizard around the waist. A moment later the
troll was striding out of the shack with Rincewind gripped carelessly in one fist.
He did not stop until he came to the rimward edge of the island. Rincewind
squealed.
“Stop that or I really will throw you over the edge,” snapped the troll. “I’m
holding you, aren’t I? Look.”
Rincewind looked.
In front of him was a soft black night whose mist-muted stars glowed peacefully.
But his eyes turned downward, drawn by some irresistible fascination.
It was midnight on the Disc and so, therefore, the sun was far, far below,
swinging slowly under Great A’Tuin’s vast and frosty plastron. Rincewind tried
a last attempt to fix his gaze on the tips of his boots, which were protruding over
the rim of the rock, but the sheer drop wrenched it away.
On either side of him two glittering curtains of water hurtled toward infinity as
the sea swept around the island on its way to the long fall. A hundred yards
below the wizard the largest sea salmon he had ever seen flicked itself out of the
foam in a wild, jerky and ultimately hopeless leap. Then it fell back, over and
over, in the golden underworld light.
Huge shadows grew out of that light like pillars supporting the roof of the
universe. Hundreds of miles below him the wizard made out the shape of
something, the edge of something—
Like those curious little pictures where the silhouette of an ornate glass suddenly
becomes the outline of two faces, the scene beneath him flipped into a whole,
new, terrifying perspective. Because down there was the head of an elephant as
big as a reasonablysized continent. One mighty tusk cut like a mountain against
the golden light, trailing a widening shadow toward the stars. The head was
slightly tilted, and a huge ruby eye might almost have been a red supergiant that
had managed to shine at noonday.
Below the elephant—
Rincewind swallowed and tried not to think—
Below the elephant there was nothing but the distant, painful Disc of the sun.
And, sweeping slowly past it, was something that for all its city-sized scales, its
crater-pocks, its Junar cragginess, was indubitably a flipper.
“Shall I let go?” suggested the troll.
“Gnah,” said Rincewind, straining backward.
“I have lived here on the Edge for five years and I have not had the courage,”
boomed Tethis. “Nor have you, if I’m any judge.” He stepped back, allowing
Rincewind to fling himself onto the ground.
Twoflower strolled up to the Rim and peered over.
“Fantastic,” he said. “If only I had my picture box…What else is down there? I
mean, if you jumped off, what would you see?”
Tethis sat down on an outcrop. High over the Disc the moon came out from
behind a cloud, giving him the appearance of ice.
“My home is down there, perhaps,” he said slowly. “Beyond your silly elephants
and that ridiculous turtle. A real world. Sometimes I come out here and look, but
somehow I can never bring myself to take that extra step…A real world, with
real people. I have wives and little ones, somewhere down there…” He stopped,
and blew his nose. “You soon learn what you’re made of, here on the Edge.”
“Stop saying that. Please,” moaned Rincewind. He turned over and saw
Twoflower standing unconcernedly at the very lip of the rock. “Gnah,” he said,
and tried to burrow into the stone.
“There’s another world down there?” said Twoflower, peering over. “Where,
exactly?”
The troll waved an arm vaguely. “Somewhere,” he said. “That’s all I know. It
was quite a small world. Mostly blue.”
“So why are you here?” said Twoflower.
“Isn’t it obvious?” snapped the troll. “I fell off the edge!”
He told them of the world of Bathys, somewhere among the stars, where the
seafolk had built a number of thriving civilizations in the three large oceans that
sprawled across its Disc. He had been a meatman, one of the caste which earned
a perilous living in large, sail-powered land yachts that ventured far out to land
and hunted the shoals of deer and buffalo that abounded in the storm-haunted
continents. His particular yacht had been blown into uncharted lands by a freak
gale. The rest of the crew had taken the yacht’s little rowing trolley and had
struck out for a distant lake, but Tethis, as master, had elected to remain with his
vessel. The storm had carried it right over the rocky rim of the world, smashing
it to matchwood in the process.
“At first I fell,” said Tethis, “but falling isn’t so bad, you know. It’s only the
landing that hurts, and there was nothing below me. As I fell I saw the world
spin off into space until it was lost against the stars.”
“What happened next?” said Twoflower breathlessly, glancing toward the misty
universe.
“I froze solid,” said Tethis simply. “Fortunately it is something my race can
survive. But I thawed out occasionally when I passed near other worlds. There
was one, I think it was the one with what I thought was this strange ring of
mountains around it that turned out to be the biggest dragon you could ever
imagine, covered in snow and glaciers and holding its tail in its mouth—well, I
came within a few leagues of that, I shot over the landscape like a comet, in fact,
and then I was off again. Then there was a time I woke up and there was your
world coming at me like a custard piethrown by the Creator and, well, I landed
in the sea not far from the Circumfence widdershins of Krull. All sorts of
creatures get washed up against the Fence, and at the time they were looking for
slaves to man the way stations, and I ended up here.” He stopped and stared
intently at Rincewind. “Every night I come out here and look down,” he
finished, “and I never jump. Courage is hard to come by, here on the Edge.”
Rincewind began to crawl determinedly toward the shack. He gave a little
scream as the troll picked him up, not unkindly, and set him on his feet.
“Amazing,” said Twoflower, and leaned farther out over the Edge. “There are
lots of other worlds out there?”
“Quite a number, I imagine,” said the troll.
“I suppose one could contrive some sort of, I don’t know, some sort of a thing
that could preserve one against the cold,” said the little man thoughtfully. “Some
sort of a ship that one could sail over the Edge and sail to far-off worlds, too. I
wonder…”
“Don’t even think about it!” moaned Rincewind. “Stop talking like that, do you
hear?”
“They all talk like that in Krull,” said Tethis.
“Those with tongues, of course,” he added.
“Are you awake?”
Twoflower snored on. Rincewind jabbed him viciously in the ribs.
“I said, are you awake?” he snarled.
“Scrdfngh…”
“We’ve got to get out of here before this salvage fleet comes!”
The dishwater light of dawn oozed through the shack’s one window, slopping
across the piles of salvaged boxes and bundles that were strewn around the
interior. Twoflower grunted again and tried to burrow into the pile of furs and
blankets that Tethis had given them.
“Look, there’s all kinds of weapons and stuff in here,” said Rincewind. “He’s
gone out somewhere. When he comes back we could overpower him and—and
—well, then we can think of something. How about it?”
“That doesn’t sound like a very good idea,” said Twoflower. “Anyhow, it’s a bit
ungracious isn’t it?”
“Tough buns,” snapped Rincewind. “This is a rough universe.”
He rummaged through the piles around the walls and selected a heavy, wavybladed
scimitar that had probably been some pirate’s pride and joy. It looked the
sort of weapon that relied as much on its weight as its edge to cause damage. He
raised it awkwardly.
“Would he leave that sort of thing around if it could hurt him?” Twoflower
wondered aloud.
Rincewind ignored him and took up a position beside the door. When it opened
some ten minutes later he moved unhesitatingly, swinging it across the opening
at what he judged was the troll’s head height. It swished harmlessly through
nothing at all and struck the doorpost, jerking him off his feet and onto the floor.
There was a sigh above him. He looked up into Tethis’s face, which was shaking
sadly from side to side.
“It wouldn’t have harmed me,” said the troll, “but nevertheless I am hurt. Deeply
hurt.” He reached over the wizard and jerked the sword out of the wood. With no
apparent effort he bent its blade into a circle and sent it bowling away over the
rocks until it hit a stone and sprang, still spinning, in a silver arc that ended in
the mists forming over the Rimfall.
“Very deeply hurt,” he concluded. He reached down beside the door and tossed a
sack toward Twoflower.
“It’s the carcass of a deer that is just about how you humans like it, and a few
lobsters, and a sea salmon. The Circumfence provides,” he said casually.
He looked hard at the tourist, and then down again at Rincewind.
“What are you staring at?” he said.
“It’s just that—” said Twoflower.
“—compared to last night—” said Rincewind.
“You’re so small,” finished Twoflower.
“I see, said the troll carefully. “Personal remarks now.” He drew himself up to
his full height, which was currently about four feet. “Just because I’m made of
water doesn’t mean I’m made of wood, you know.”
“I’m sorry,” said Twoflower, climbing hastily out of the furs.
“You’re made of dirt,” said the troll, “but I didn’t pass comments about things
you can’t help, did I? Oh, no. We can’t help the way the Creator made us, that’s
my view. But if you must know, your moon here is rather more powerful than the
ones around my own world.”
“The moon?” said Twoflower. “I don’t under—”
“If I’ve got to spell it out,” said the troll, testily, “I’m suffering from chronic
tides.”
A bell jangled in the darkness of the shack. Tethis strode across the creaking
floor to the complicated devices of levers, strings and bells that was mounted on
the Circumfence’s topmost strand where it passed through the hut.
The bell rang again, and then started to clang away in an odd jerky rhythm for
several minutes. The troll stood with his ear pressed close to it.
When it stopped he turned slowly and looked at them with a worried frown.
“You’re more important than I thought,” he said. “You’re not to wait for the
salvage fleet. You’re to be collected by a flyer. That’s what they say in Krull.”
He shrugged. “And I hadn’t even sent a message that you’re here, yet.
Someone’s been drinking vul nut wine again.”
He picked up a large mallet that hung on a pillar beside the bell and used it to tap
out a brief carillon.
“That’ll be passed from lengthman to lengthman all the way back to Krull,” he
said. “Marvelous really, isn’t it?”
It came speeding across the sea, floating a man-length above it, but still leaving a
foaming wake as whatever power that held it up smacked brutally into the water.
Rincewind knew what power held it up. He was, he would be the first to admit, a
coward, an incompetent, and not even very good at being a failure; but he was
still a wizard of sorts, he knew one of the Eight Great Spells, he would be
claimed by Death himself when he died, and he recognized really finely honed
magic when he saw it.
The lens skimming toward the island was perhaps twenty feet across, and totally
transparent. Sitting around its circumference were a large number of black-robed
men, each one strapped securely to the Disc by a leather harness and each one
staring down at the waves with an expression so tormented, so agonizing, that
the transparent disc seemed to be ringed with gargoyles.
Rincewind sighed with relief. This was such an unusual sound that it made
Twoflower take his eyes off the approaching disc and turn them on him.
“We’re important, no lie,” explained Rincewind. “They wouldn’t be wasting all
that magic on a couple of potential slaves.” He grinned.
“What is it?” said Twoflower.
“Well, the disc itself would have been created by Fresnel’s Wonderful
Concentrator,” said Rincewind, authoritatively. “That calls for many rare and
unstable ingredients, such as demon’s breath and so forth, and it takes at least
eight fourth-grade wizards a week to envision. Then there’s those wizards on it,
who must all be gifted hydrophobes—”
“You mean they hate water?” said Twoflower.
“No, that wouldn’t work,” said Rincewind. “Hate is an attracting force, just like
love. They really loathe it, the very idea of it revolts them. A really good
hydrophobe has to be trained on dehydrated water from birth. I mean, that costs
a fortune in magic alone. But they make great weather magicians. Rain clouds
just give up and go away.”
“It sounds terrible,” said the water troll behind them.
“And they all die young,” said Rincewind, ignoring him. “They just can’t live
with themselves.”
“Sometimes I think a man could wander across the Disc all his life and not see
everything there is to see,” said Twoflower. “And now it seems there are lots of
other worlds as well. When I think I might die without seeing a hundredth of all
there is to see it makes me feel,” he paused, then added, “well, humble, I
suppose. And very angry, of course.”
The flyer halted a few yards hubward of the island, throwing up a sheet of spray.
It hung there, spinning slowly. A hooded figure standing by the stubby pillar at
the exact center of the lens beckoned to them.
“You’d better wade out,” said the troll. “It doesn’t do to keep them waiting. It
has been nice to make your acquaintance.” He shook them both, wetly, by the
hand. As he waded out a little way with them the two nearest loathers on the lens
shied away with expressions of extreme disgust.
The hooded figure reached down with one hand and released a rope ladder. In its
other hand it held a silver rod, which had about it the unmistakable air of
something designed for killing people. Rincewind’s first impression was
reinforced when the figure raised the stick and waved it carelessly toward the
shore. A section of rock vanished, leaving a small gray haze of nothingness.
“That’s so you don’t think I’m afraid to use it,” said the figure.
“Don’t think you’re afraid?” said Rincewind. The hooded figure snorted.
“We know all about you, Rincewind the magician. You are a man of great
cunning and artifice. You laugh in the face of Death. Your affected air of craven
cowardice does not fool me.”
It fooled Rincewind. “I—” he began, and paled as the nothingness-stick was
turned toward him. “I see you know all about me,” he finished weakly, and sat
down heavily on the slippery surface. He and Twoflower, under instructions
from the hooded commander, strapped themselves down to rings set in the
transparent disc.
“If you make the merest suggestion of weaving a spell,” said the darkness under
the hood, “you die. Third quadrant reconcile, ninth quadrant redouble, forward
all!”
A wall of water shot into the air behind Rincewind and the disc jerked suddenly.
The dreadful presence of the sea troll had probably concentrated the
hydrophobes’ minds wonderfully, because it then rose at a very steep angle and
didn’t begin level flight until it was a dozen fathoms above the waves.
Rincewind glanced down through the transparent surface and wished he hadn’t.
“Well, off again then,” said Twoflower cheerfully. He turned and waved at the
troll, now no more than a speck on the edge of the world.
Rincewind glared at him. “Doesn’t anything every worry you?” he asked.
“We’re still alive, aren’t we?” asked Twoflower. “And you yourself said they
wouldn’t be going to all this trouble if we were just going to be slaves. I expect
Tethis was exaggerating. I expect it’s all a misunderstanding. I expect we’ll be
sent home. After we’ve seen Krull, of course. And I must say it all sounds
fascinating.”
“Oh yes,” said Rincewind, in a hollow voice. “Fascinating.” He was thinking:
I’ve seen excitement, and I’ve seen boredom. And boredom was best.
Had either of them happened to look down at that moment they would have
noticed a strange v-shaped wave surging through the water far below them, its
apex pointing directly at Tethis’s island. But they weren’t looking. The twentyfour
hydrophobic magicians were looking, but to them it was just another piece
of dreadfulness, not really any different from the liquid horror around it. They
were probably right.
Sometime before all this the blazing pirate ship had hissed under the waves and
started the long slow slide toward the distant ooze. It was more distant than
average, because directly under the stricken keel was the Gorunna Trench—a
chasm in the Disc’s surface that was so black, so deep and so reputedly evil that
even the krakens went there fearfully, and in pairs. In less reputedly evil chasms
the fish went about with natural lights on their heads and on the whole managed
quite well. In Gorunna they left them unlit and, insofar as it is possible for
something without legs to creep, they crept; they tended to bump into things, too.
Horrible things.
The water around the ship turned from green to purple, from purple to black,
from black to a darkness so complete that blackness itself seemed merely gray
by comparison. Most of its timbers had already been crushed into splinters under
the intense pressure.
It spiraled past groves of nightmare polyps and drifting forests of seaweed which
glowed with faint, diseased colors. Things brushed it briefly with soft, cold
tentacles as they darted away into the freezing silence.
Something rose up from the murk and ate it in one mouthful.
Some time later the islanders on a little rimward atoll were amazed to find,
washed into their little local lagoon, the wave-rocked corpse of a hideous sea
monster, all beaks, eyes and tentacles. They were further astonished at its size,
since it was rather larger than their village. But their surprise was tiny compared
to the huge, stricken expression on the face of the dead monster, which appeared
to have been trampled to death.
Somewhat farther rimward of the atoll a couple of little boats, trolling a net for
the ferocious free-swimming oysters which abounded in those seas, caught
something that dragged both vessels for several miles before one captain had the
presence of mind to sever the lines.
But even his bewilderment was as nothing compared to that of the islanders on
the last atoll in the archipelago. During the following night they were awakened
by a terrific crashing and splintering noise coming from their minute jungle;
when some of the bolder spirits went to investigate in the morning they found
that the trees had been smashed in a broad swath that started on the hubmost
shore of the atoll and made a line of total destruction pointing precisely
Edgewise, littered with broken lianas, crushed bushes and a few bewildered and
angry oysters.
They were high enough now to see the wide curve of the Rim sweeping away
from them, lapped by the fluffy clouds that mercifully hid the waterfall for most
of the time. From up here the sea, a deep blue dappled with cloud-shadows,
looked almost inviting. Rincewind shuddered.
“Excuse me,” he said. The hooded figure turned from its contemplation of the
distant haze and raised its wand threateningly.
“I don’t want to use this,” it said.
“You don’t?” said Rincewind.
“What is it, anyway?” said Twoflower.
“Ajandurah’s Wand of Utter Negativity,” said Rincewind. “And I wish you’d
stop waving it about. It might go off,” he added, nodding at the wand’s glittering
point. “I mean, it’s all very flattering, all this magic being used just for our
benefit, but there’s no need to go quite that far. And—”
“Shut up. The figure reached up and pulled back its hood, revealing itself to be a
most unusually tinted young woman. Her skin was black. Not the dark brown of
Urabewe, or the polished blue-black of monsoon-haunted Klatch, but the deep
black of midnight at the bottom of a cave. Her hair and eyebrows were the color
of moonlight. There was the same pale sheen around her lips. She looked about
fifteen, and very frightened.
Rincewind couldn’t help noticing that the hand holding the wand was shaking;
this was because a piece of sudden death, wobbling uncertainly a mere five feet
from your nose, is very hard to miss. It dawned on him—very slowly, because it
was a completely new sensation—that someone in the world was frightened of
him. The complete reverse was so often the case that he had come to think of it
as a kind of natural law.
“What is your name?” he said, as reassuringly as he could manage. She might be
frightened, but she did have the wand. If I had a wand like that, he thought, I
wouldn’t be frightened of anything. So what in Creation can she imagine I could
do?
“My name is immaterial,” she said.
“That’s a pretty name,” said Rincewind. “Where are you taking us, and why? I
can’t see any harm in your telling us.”
“You are being brought to Krull,” said the girl. “And don’t mock me, Hublander.
Else I’ll use the wand. I must bring you in alive, but no one said anything about
bringing you in whole. My name is Marchesa, and I am a wizard of the fifth
level. Do you understand?”
“Well, since you know all about me then you know that I never even made it to
Neophyte,” said Rincewind. “I’m not even a wizard, really.” He caught
Twoflower’s astonished expression, and added hastily, “Just a wizard of sorts.”
“You can’t do magic because one of the Eight Great Spells is indelibly lodged in
your mind,” said Marchesa, shifting her balance gracefully as the great lens
described a wide arc over the sea. “That’s why you were thrown out of Unseen
University. We know.”
“But you said just now that he was a magician of great cunning and artifice,”
protested Twoflower.
“Yes, because anyone who survives all that he has survived—most of which was
brought on himself by his tendency to think of himself as a wizard—well, he
must be some kind of a magician,” said Marchesa. “I warn you, Rincewind. If
you give me the merest suspicion that you are intoning the Great Spell I really
will kill you.” She scowled at him nervously.
“Seems to me your best course would be to just, you know, drop us off
somewhere,” said Rincewind. “I mean, thanks for rescuing us and everything, so
if you’d just let us get on with leading our lives I’m sure we’d all—”
“I hope you’re not proposing to enslave us,” said Twoflower.
Marchesa looked genuinely shocked. “Certainly not! Whatever could have given
you that idea? Your lives in Krull will be rich, full and comfortable—”
“Oh, good,” said Rincewind.
“—just not very long.”
Krull turned out to be a large island, quite mountainous and heavily wooded,
with pleasant white buildings visible here and there among the trees. The land
sloped gradually up toward the Rim, so that the highest point in Krull in fact
slightly overhung the Edge. Here the Krullians had built their major city, also
called Krull, and since so much of their building material had been salvaged
from the Circumfence the houses of Krull had a decidedly nautical persuasion.
To put it bluntly, entire ships had been mortised artfully together and converted
into buildings. Triremes, dhows and caravels protruded at strange angles from
the general wooden chaos. Painted figureheads and Hublandish dragonprows
reminded the citizens of Krull that their good fortune stemmed from the sea;
barquentines and carracks lent a distinctive shape to the larger buildings. And so
the city rose tier on tier between the blue-green ocean of the Disc and the soft
cloud sea of the Edge, the eight colors of the Rimbow reflected in every window
and in the many telescope lenses of the city’s multitude of astronomers.
“It’s absolutely awful,” said Rincewind gloomily.
The lens was approaching now along the very lip of the Rimfall. The island not
only got higher as it neared the Edge. It got narrower, too, so that the lens was
able to remain over water until it was very near the city. The parapet along the
edgewise cliff was dotted with gantries projecting into nothingness. The lens
glided smoothly toward one of them and docked with it as smoothly as a boat
might glide up to a quay. Four guards, with the same moonlight hair and
nightblack faces as Marchesa, were waiting. They did not appear to be armed,
but as Twoflower and Rincewind stumbled onto the parapet they were each
grabbed by the arms and held quite firmly enough for any thought of escape to
be instantly dismissed.
Then Marchesa and the watching hydrophobic wizards were quickly left behind
and the guards and their prisoners set off briskly along a lane that wound
between the ship houses. Soon it led downward, into what turned out to be a
palace of some sort, half-hewn out of the rock of the cliff itself. Rincewind was
vaguely aware of brightly lit tunnels, and courtyards open to the distant sky. A
few elderly men, their robes covered in mysterious occult symbols, stood aside
and watched with interest as the sextet passed. Several times Rincewind noticed
hydrophobes—their ingrained expressions of self-revulsion at their own bodyfluids
was distinctive—and here and there trudging men who could only be
slaves. He didn’t have much time to reflect on all this before a door was opened
ahead of them and they were pushed, gently but firmly, into a room. Then the
door slammed behind them.
Rincewind and Twoflower regained their balance and stared around the room in
which they now found themselves.
“Gosh,” said Twoflower ineffectually, after a pause during which he had tried
unsuccessfully to find a better word.
“This is a prison cell?” wondered Rincewind aloud.
“All that gold and silk and stuff,” Twoflower added. “I’ve never seen anything
like it!”
In the center of the richly decorated room, on a carpet that was so deep and furry
that Rincewind trod on it gingerly lest it be some kind of shaggy, floor-loving
beast, was a long gleaming table laden with food. Most were fish dishes,
including the biggest and most ornately prepared lobster Rincewind had ever
seen, but there were also plenty of bowls and platters piled with strange creations
that he had never seen before. He reached out cautiously and picked up some
sort of purple fruit crusted with green crystals.
“Candied sea urchin,” said a cracked, cheerful voice behind him. “A great
delicacy.”
He dropped it quickly and turned around. An old man had stepped out from
behind the heavy curtains. He was tall, thin and looked almost benign compared
to some of the faces Rincewind had seen recently.
“The purée of sea cucumbers is very good, too,” said the face, conversationally.
“Those little green bits are baby starfish.”
“Thank you for telling me,” said Rincewind weakly.
“Actually, they’re rather good,” said Twoflower, his mouth full. “I thought you
liked seafood?”
“Yes, I thought I did,” said Rincewind. “What’s this wine—crushed octopus
eyeballs?”
“Sea grape,” said the old man.
“Great,” said Rincewind, and swallowed a glassful. “Not bad. A bit salty,
maybe.”
“Sea grape is a kind of small jellyfish,” explained the stranger. “And now I really
think I should introduce myself. Why has your friend gone that strange color?”
“Culture shock, I imagine,” said Twoflower. “What did you say your name
was?”
“I didn’t. It’s Garhartra. I’m the Guestmaster, you see. It is my pleasant task to
make sure that your stay here is as delightful as possible.” He bowed. “If there is
anything you want you have only to say.”
Twoflower sat down on an ornate mother-of-pearl chair with a glass of oily wine
in one hand and a crystallized squid in the other. He frowned.
“I think I’ve missed something along the way,” he said. “First we were told we
were going to be slaves—”
“A base canard!” interrupted Garhartra.
“What’s a canard?” said Twoflower.
“I think it’s a kind of duck,” said Rincewind from the far end of the long table.
“Are these biscuits made of something really nauseating, do you suppose?”
“—and then we were rescued at great magical expense—”
“They’re made of pressed seaweed,” snapped the Guestmaster.
“—but then we’re threatened, also at a vast expenditure of magic—”
“Yes, I thought it would be something like seaweed,” agreed Rincewind. “They
certainly taste like seaweed would taste if anyone was masochistic enough to eat
seaweed.”
“—and then we’re manhandled by guards and thrown in here—”
“Pushed gently,” corrected Garhartra.
“—which turned out to be this amazingly rich room and there’s all this food and
a man saying he’s devoting his life to making us happy,” Twoflower concluded.
“What I’m getting at is this sort of lack of consistency.”
“Yar,” said Rincewind. “What he means is, are you about to start being generally
unpleasant again? Is this just a break for lunch?”
Garhartra held up his hands reassuringly.
“Please, please,” he protested. “It was just necessary to get you here as soon as
possible. We certainly do not want to enslave you. Please be reassured on that
score.”
“Well, fine,” said Rincewind.
“Yes, you will in fact be sacrificed,” Garhartra continued placidly.
“Sacrificed? You’re going to kill us?” shouted the wizard.
“Kill? Yes, of course. Certainly! It would hardly be a sacrifice if we didn’t,
would it? But don’t worry—it’ll be comparatively painless.”
“Comparatively? Compared to what?” said Rincewind. He picked up a tall green
bottle that was full of sea grape jellyfish wine and hurled it hard at the
Guestmaster, who flung up a hand as if to protect himself.
There was a crackle of octarine flame from his fingers and the air suddenly took
on the thick, greasy feel that indicated a powerful magical discharge. The flung
bottle slowed and then stopped in midair, rotating gently.
At the same time an invisible force picked Rincewind up and hurled him down
the length of the room, pinning him awkwardly halfway up the far wall with no
breath left in his body. He hung there with his mouth open in rage and
astonishment.
Garhartra lowered his hand and brushed it slowly on his robe.
“I didn’t enjoy doing that, you know,” he said.
“I could tell,” muttered Rincewind.
“But what do you want to sacrifice us for?” asked Twoflower. “You hardly know
us!”
“That’s rather the point, isn’t it? It’s not very good manners to sacrifice a friend.
Besides, you were, um, specified. I don’t know a lot about the god in question,
but He was quite clear on that point. Look, I must be running along now. So
much to organize, you know how it is,” the Guestmaster opened the door, and
then peered back around it. “Please make yourselves comfortable, and don’t
worry.”
“But you haven’t actually told us anything!” wailed Twoflower.
“It’s not really worth it, is it? What with you being sacrificed in the morning,”
said Garhartra, “it’s hardly worth the bother of knowing, really. Sleep well.
Comparatively well, anyway.”
He shut the door. A brief octarine flicker of balefire around it suggested that it
had now been sealed beyond the skills of any earthly locksmith.
Gling, clang, tang went the bells along the Circumfence in the moonlit, Rimfallroaring
night.
Terton, lengthman of the 45th Length, hadn’t heard such a clashing since the
night a giant kraken had been swept into the Fence five years ago. He leaned out
of his hut, which for the lack of any convenient eyot on this Length had been
built on wooden piles driven into the seabed, and stared into the darkness. Once
or twice he thought he could see movement, far off. Strictly speaking, he should
row out to see what was causing the din. But here in the clammy darkness it
didn’t seem like an astoundingly good idea, so he slammed the door, wrapped
some sacking around the madly jangling bells, and tried to get back to sleep.
That didn’t work, because even the top strand of the Fence was thrumming now,
as if something big and heavy was bouncing on it. After staring at the ceiling for
a few minutes, and trying hard not to think of great long tentacles and pondsized
eyes, Terton blew out the lantern and opened the door a crack.
Something was coming along the Fence, in giant loping bounds that covered
meters at a time. It loomed up at him and for a moment Terton saw something
rectangular, multilegged, shaggy with seaweed and—although it had absolutely
no features from which he could have deduced this—it was also very angry
indeed.
The hut was smashed to fragments as the monster charged through it, although
Terton survived by clinging to the Circumfence; some weeks later he was picked
up by a returning salvage fleet, subsequently escaped from Krull on a hijacked
lens (having developed hydrophobia to an astonishing degree) and after a
number of adventures eventually found his way to the Great Nef, an area of the
Disc so dry that it actually has negative rainfall, which he nevertheless
considered uncomfortably damp.
“Have you tried the door?”
“Yes,” said Twoflower. “And it isn’t any less locked than it was last time you
asked. There’s the window, though.”
“A great way of escape,” muttered Rincewind, from his perch halfway up the
wall. “You said it looks out over the Edge. Just step out, eh, and plunge through
space and maybe freeze solid or hit some other world at incredible speeds or
plunge wildly into the burning heart of a sun?”
“Worth a try,” said Twoflower. “Want a seaweed biscuit?”
“No!”
“When are you coming down?”
Rincewind snarled. This was partly in embarrassment. Garhartra’s spell had been
the little-used and hard-to-master Atavarr’s Personal Gravitational Upset, the
practical result of which was that until it wore off Rincewind’s body was
convinced that “down” lay at ninety degrees to that direction normally accepted
as of a downward persuasion by the majority of the Disc’s inhabitants. He was in
fact standing on the wall.
Meanwhile the flung bottle hung supportless in the air a few yards away. In its
case time had—well, not actually been stopped, but had been slowed by several
orders of magnitude, and its trajectory had so far occupied several hours and a
couple of inches as far as Twoflower and Rincewind were concerned. The glass
gleamed in the moonlight. Rincewind sighed and tried to make himself
comfortable on the wall.
“Why don’t you ever worry?” he demanded petulantly. “Here we are, going to be
sacrificed to some god or other in the morning, and you just sit there eating
barnacle canapés.”
“I expect something will turn up,” said Twoflower.
“I mean, it’s not as if we know why we’re going to be killed,” the wizard went
on.
You’d like to, would you?
“Did you say that?” asked Rincewind.
“Say what?”
You’re hearing things said the voice in Rincewind’s head.
He sat bolt sideways. “Who are you?” he demanded.
Twoflower gave him a worried look.
“I’m Twoflower,” he said. “Surely you remember?”
Rincewind put his head in his hands.
“It’s happened at last,” he moaned. “I’m going out of my mind.”
Good idea said the voice. It’s getting pretty crowded in here
The spell pinning Rincewind to the wall vanished with a faint “pop.” He fell
forward and landed in a heap on the floor.
Careful—you nearly squashed me
Rincewind struggled to his elbows and reached into the pocket of his robe. When
he withdrew his hand the green frog was sitting on it, its eyes oddly luminous in
the half-light.
“You?” said Rincewind.
Put me down on the floor and stand back The frog blinked.
The wizard did so, and dragged a bewildered Twoflower out of the way.
The room darkened. There was a windy, roaring sound. Streamers of green,
purple and octarine cloud appeared out of nowhere and began to spiral rapidly
toward the recumbent amphibian, shedding small bolts of lightning as they
whirled. Soon the frog was lost in a golden haze which began to elongate
upward, filling the room with a warm yellow light. Within it was a darker,
indistinct shape, which wavered and changed even as they watched. And all the
time there was the high, brain-curdling whine of a huge magical field…
As suddenly as it had appeared, the magical tornado vanished. And there,
occupying the space where the frog had been, was a frog.
“Fantastic,” said Rincewind.
The frog gazed at him reproachfully.
“Really amazing,” said Rincewind sourly. “A frog magically transformed into a
frog. Wondrous.”
“Turn around,” said a voice behind them. It was a soft, feminine voice, almost an
inviting voice, the sort of voice you could have a few drinks with, but it was
coming from a spot where there oughtn’t to be a voice at all. They managed to
turn without really moving, like a couple of statues revolving on plinths.
There was a woman standing in the pre-dawn light. She looked—she was—she
had a—in point of actual fact she…
Later Rincewind and Twoflower couldn’t quite agree on any single fact about
her, except that she had appeared to be beautiful (precisely what physical
features made her beautiful they could not, definitively, state) and that she had
green eyes. Not the pale green of ordinary eyes, either—these were the green of
fresh emeralds and as iridescent as a dragonfly. And one of the few genuinely
magical facts that Rincewind knew was that no god or goddess, contrary and
volatile as they might be in all other respects, could change the color or nature of
their eyes…
“L—” he began. She raised a hand.
“You know that if you say my name I must depart,” she hissed. “Surely you
recall that I am the one goddess who comes only when not invoked?”
“Uh. Yes, I suppose I do,” croaked the wizard, trying not to look at the eyes.
“You’re the one they call the Lady?”
“Yes.”
“Are you a goddess then?” said Twoflower excitedly. “I’ve always wanted to
meet one.”
Rincewind tensed, waiting for the explosion of rage. Instead, the Lady merely
smiled.
“Your friend the wizard should introduce us,” she said.
Rincewind coughed. “Uh, yar,” he said. “This is Twoflower, Lady, he’s a tourist
—”
“—I have attended him on a number of occasions—”
“—and, Twoflower, this is the Lady. Just the Lady, right? Nothing else. Don’t try
and give her any other name, okay?” he went on desperately, his eyes darting
meaningful glances that were totally lost on the little man.
Rincewind shivered. He was not, of course, an atheist; on the Disc the gods dealt
severely with atheists. On the few occasions when he had some spare change he
had always made a point of dropping a few coppers into a temple coffer,
somewhere, on the principle that a man needed all the friends he could get. But
usually he didn’t bother the gods, and he hoped the gods wouldn’t bother him.
Life was quite complicated enough.
There were two gods, however, who were really terrifying. The rest of the gods
were usually only sort of large-scale humans, fond of wine and war and whoring.
But Fate and the Lady were chilling.
In the Gods’ Quarter, in Ankh-Morpork, Fate had a small, heavy, leaden temple,
where hollow-eyed and gaunt worshippers met on dark nights for their
predestined and fairly pointless rites. There were no temples at all to the Lady,
although she was arguably the most powerful goddess in the entire history of
Creation. A few of the more daring members of the Gamblers’ Guild had once
experimented with a form of worship, in the deepest cellars of Guild
headquarters, and had all died of penury, murder or just Death within the week.
She was the Goddess Who Must Not Be Named; those who sought her never
found her, yet she was known to come to the aid of those in greatest need. And,
then again, sometimes she didn’t. She was like that. She didn’t like the clicking
of rosaries, but was attracted to the sound of dice. No man knew what She
looked like, although there were many times when a man who was gambling his
life on the turn of the cards would pick up the hand he had been dealt and stare
Her full in the face. Of course, sometimes he didn’t. Among all the gods she was
at one and the same time the most courted and the most cursed.
“We don’t have gods where I come from,” said Two flower.
“You do, you know,” said the Lady. “Everyone has gods. You just don’t think
they’re gods.”
Rincewind shook himself mentally.
“Look,” he said. “I don’t want to sound impatient, but in a few minutes some
people are going to come through that door and take us away and kill us.”
“Yes,” said the Lady.
“I suppose you wouldn’t tell us why?” said Twoflower.
“Yes,” said the Lady. “The Krullians intend to launch a bronze vessel over the
edge of the Disc. Their prime purpose is to learn the sex of A’Tuin the World
Turtle.”
“Seems rather pointless,” said Rincewind.
“No. Consider. One day Great A’Tuin may encounter another member of the
species chelys galactica, somewhere in the vast night in which we move. Will
they fight? Will they mate? A little imagination will show you that the sex of
Great A’Tuin could be very important to us. At least, so the Krullians say.”
Rincewind tried not to think of World Turtles mating. It wasn’t completely easy.
“So,” continued the goddess, “they intend to launch this ship of space, with two
voyagers aboard. It will be the culmination of decades of research. It will also be
very dangerous for the travelers. And so, in an attempt to reduce the risks, the
Arch-astronomer of Krull has bargained with Fate to sacrifice two men at the
moment of launch. Fate, in His turn, has agreed to smile on the space ship. A
neat barter, is it not?”
“And we’re the sacrifices,” said Rincewind.
“Yes.”
“I thought Fate didn’t go in for that sort of bargaining. I thought Fate was
implaccable,” said Rincewind.
“Normally, yes. But you two have been thorns in his side for some time. He
specified that the sacrifices should be you. He allowed you to escape from the
pirates. He allowed you to drift into the Circumfence. Fate can be one mean god
at times.”
There was a pause. The frog sighed and wandered off under the table.
“But you can help us?” prompted Twoflower.
“You amuse me,” said the Lady. “I have a sentimental streak. You’d know that, if
you were gamblers. So for a little while I rode in a frog’s mind and you kindly
rescued me, for, as we all know, no one likes to see pathetic and helpless
creatures swept to their death.”
“Thank you,” said Rincewind.
“The whole mind of Fate is bent against you,” said the Lady. “But all I can do is
give you one chance. Just one, small chance. The rest is up to you.”
She vanished.
“Gosh,” said Twoflower, after a while. “That’s the first time I’ve ever seen a
goddess.”
The door swung open. Garhartra entered, holding a wand in front of him. Behind
him were two guards, armed more conventionally with swords.
“Ah,” he said conversationally. “You are ready, I see.”
Ready said a voice inside Rincewind’s head.
The bottle that the wizard had flung some eight hours earlier had been hanging
in the air, imprisoned by magic in its own personal time-field. But during all
those hours the original mana of the spell had been slowly leaking away until the
total magical energy was no longer sufficient to hold it against the universe’s
own powerful normality field, and when that happened Reality snapped back in
a matter of microseconds. The visible sign of this was that the bottle suddenly
completed the last part of its parabola and burst against the side of the
Guestmaster’s head, showering the guards with glass and jellyfish wine.
Rincewind grabbed Twoflower’s arm, kicked the nearest guard in the groin, and
dragged the startled tourist into the corridor. Before the stunned Garhartra had
sunk to the floor his two guests were already pounding across distant flagstones.
Rincewind skidded around a corner and found himself on a balcony that ran
around the four sides of a courtyard. Below them, most of the floor of the yard
was taken up by an ornamental pond in which a few terrapins sunbathed among
the lily leaves.
And ahead of Rincewind were a couple of very surprised wizards wearing the
distinctive dark blue and black robes of trained hydrophobes. One of them,
quicker on the uptake than his companion, raised a hand and began the first
words of a spell.
There was a short sharp noise by Rincewind’s side. Twoflower had spat. The
hydrophobe screamed and dropped his hand as though it had been stung.
The other didn’t have time to move before Rincewind was on him, fists swinging
wildly. One stiff punch with the weight of terror behind it sent the man tumbling
over the balcony rail and into the pond, which did a very strange thing; the water
smacked aside as though a large invisible balloon had been dropped into it, and
the hydrophobe hung screaming in his own revulsion field.
Twoflower watched him in amazement until Rincewind snatched at his shoulder
and indicated a likely looking passage. They hurried down it, leaving the
remaining hydrophobe writhing on the floor and snatching at his damp hand.
For a while there was some shouting behind them, but they scuttled along a cross
corridor and another courtyard and soon left the sounds of pursuit behind.
Finally Rincewind picked a safe looking door, peered around it, found the room
beyond to be unoccupied, dragged Twoflower inside, and slammed it behind
him. Then he leaned against it, wheezing horribly.
“We’re totally lost in a palace on an island we haven’t a hope of leaving,” he
panted. “And what’s more we—hey!” he finished, as the sight of the contents of
the room filtered up his deranged optic nerves.
Twoflower was already staring at the walls.
Because what was so odd about the room was, it contained the whole universe.
Death sat in His garden, running a whetstone along the edge of His scythe. It
was already so sharp that any passing breeze that blew across it was sliced
smoothly into two puzzled zephyrs, although breezes were rare indeed in Death’s
silent garden. It lay on a sheltered plateau overlooking the Discworld’s complex
dimensions, and behind it loomed the cold, still, immensely high and brooding
mountains of Eternity.
Swish! went the stone. Death hummed a dirge, and tapped one bony foot on the
frosty flagstones.
Someone approached through the dim orchard where the nightapples grew, and
there came the sickly sweet smell of crushed lilies. Death looked up angrily, and
found Himself staring into eyes that were black as the inside of a cat and full of
distant stars that had no counterpart among the familiar constellations of the
Realtime universe.
Death and Fate looked at each other. Death grinned—He had no alternative, of
course, being made of implaccable bone. The whetstone sang rhythmically along
the blade as He continued His task.
“I have a task for you,” said Fate. His words drifted across Death’s scythe and
split tidily into two ribbons of consonants and vowels.
I HAVE TASKS ENOUGH THIS DAY, said Death in a voice as heavy as
neutronium. THE WHITE PLAGUE ABIDES EVEN NOW IN PSEUDOPOLIS
AND I AM BOUND THERE TO RESCUE MANY OF ITS CITIZENS FROM
HIS GRASP. SUCH A ONE HAS NOT BEEN SEEN THESE HUNDRED
YEARS. I AM EXPECTED TO STALK THE STREETS, AS IS MY DUTY.
“I refer to the matter of the little wanderer and the rogue wizard,” said Fate
softly, seating himself beside Death’s black-robed form and staring down at the
distant, multifaceted jewel which was the Disc universe as seen from this extradimensional
vantage point.
The scythe ceased its song.
“They die in a few hours,” said Fate. “It is fated.”
Death stirred, and the stone began to move again.
“I thought you would be pleased,” said Fate.
Death shrugged, a particularly expressive gesture for someone whose visible
shape was that of a skeleton.
I DID INDEED CHASE THEM MIGHTILY, ONCE, he said, BUT AT LAST
THE THOUGHT CAME TO ME THAT SOONER OR LATER ALL MEN
MUST DIE. EVERYTHING DIES IN THE END. I CAN BE ROBBED BUT
NEVER DENIED, I TOLD MYSELF. WHY WORRY?
“I too cannot be cheated,” snapped Fate.
SO I HAVE HEARD, said Death, still grinning.
“Enough!” shouted Fate, jumping to his feet. “They will die!” He vanished in a
sheet of blue fire.
Death nodded to Himself and continued at His work. After some minutes the
edge of the blade seemed to be finished to His satisfaction. He stood up and
leveled the scythe at the fat and noisome candle that burned on the edge of the
bench and then, with two deft sweeps, cut the flame into three bright slivers.
Death grinned.
A short while later he was saddling his white stallion, which lived in a stable at
the back of Death’s cottage. The beast snuffled at him in a friendly fashion;
though it was crimson-eyed and had flanks like oiled silk, it was nevertheless a
real flesh-and-blood horse and, indeed, was in all probability better treated than
most beasts of burden on the Disc. Death was not an unkind master. He weighed
very little and, although He often rode back with His saddlebags bulging, they
weighed nothing whatsoever.
“All those worlds!” said Twoflower. “It’s fantastic!”
Rincewind grunted, and continued to prowl warily around the star-filled room.
Twoflower turned to a complicated astrolabe, in the center of which was the
entire Great A’Tuin-Elephant-Disc system wrought in brass and picked out with
tiny jewels. Around it stars and planets wheeled on fine silver wires.
“Fantastic!” he said again. On the walls around him constellations made of tiny
phosphorescent seed pearls had been picked out on vast tapestries made of jetblack
velvet, giving the room’s occupants the impression of floating in the
interstellar gulf. Various easels held huge sketches of Great A’Tuin as viewed
from various parts of the Circumfence, with every mighty scale and cratered
pock-mark meticulously marked in. Twoflower stared about him with a faraway
look in his eyes.
Rincewind was deeply troubled. What troubled him most of all were the two
suits that hung from supports in the center of the room. He circled them uneasily.
They appeared to be made of fine white leather, hung about with straps and brass
nozzles and other highly unfamiliar and suspicious contrivances. The leggings
ended in high, thick-soled boots, and the arms were shoved into big supple
gauntlets. Strangest of all were the big copper helmets that were obviously
supposed to fit on heavy collars around the neck of the suits. The helmets were
almost certainly useless for protection—a light sword would have no difficulty
in splitting them, even if it didn’t hit the ridiculous little glass windows in the
front. Each helmet had a crest of white feathers on top, which went absolutely no
way at all toward improving their overall appearance.
Rincewind was beginning to have the glimmerings of a suspicion about those
suits.
In front of them was a table covered with celestial charts and scraps of
parchment covered with figures. Whoever would be wearing those suits,
Rincewind decided, was expecting to boldly go where no man—other than the
occasional luckless sailor, who didn’t really count—had boldly gone before, and
he was now beginning to get not just a suspicion but a horrible premonition.
He turned around and found Twoflower looking at him with a speculative
expression.
“No—” began Rincewind, urgently. Twoflower ignored him.
“The goddess said two men were going to be sent over the Edge,” he said, his
eyes gleaming, “and you remember Tethis the troll saying you’d need some kind
of protection? The Krullians have got over that. These are suits of space armor.”
“They don’t look very roomy to me,” said Rincewind hurriedly, and grabbed the
tourist by the arm, “so if you’d just come on, no sense in staying here—”
“Why must you always panic?” asked Twoflower petulantly.
“Because the whole of my future life just flashed in front of my eyes, and it
didn’t take very long, and if you don’t move now I’m going to leave without you
because any second now you’re going to suggest that we put on—”
The door opened.
Two husky young men stepped into the room. All they were wearing was a pair
of woolen pants apiece. One of them was still toweling himself briskly. They
both nodded at the two escapees with no apparent surprise.
The taller of the two men sat down on one of the benches in front of the seats.
He beckoned to Rincewind, and said:
“?Tyø yur åtl hø sooten gåtrunen?”
And this was awkward, because although Rincewind considered himself an
expert in most of the tongues of the western segments of the Disc it was the first
time that he had ever been addressed in Krullian, and he did not understand one
word of it. Neither did Twoflower, but that did not stop him stepping forward
and taking a breath.
The speed of light through a magical aura such as the one that surrounded the
Disc was quite slow, being not much faster than the speed of sound in less highly
tuned universes. But it was still the fastest thing around with the exception, in
moments like this, of Rincewind’s mind.
In an instant he became aware that the tourist was about to try his own peculiar
brand of linguistics, which meant that he would speak loudly and slowly in his
own language.
Rincewind’s elbow shot back, knocking the breath from Twoflower’s body.
When the little man looked up in pain and astonishment Rincewind caught his
eye and pulled an imaginary tongue out of his mouth and cut it with an
imaginary pair of scissors.
The second chelonaut—for such was the profession of the men whose fate it
would shortly be to voyage to Great A’Tuin—looked up from the chart table and
watched this in puzzlement. His big heroic brow wrinkled with the effort of
speech.
“?Hør yu latruin nør ü?” he said.
Rincewind smiled and nodded and pushed Twoflower in his general direction.
With an inward sigh of relief he saw the tourist pay sudden attention to a big
brass telescope that lay on the table.
“! Sooten ü!” commanded the seated chelonaut. Rincewind nodded and smiled
and took one of the big copper helmets from the rack and brought it down on the
man’s head as hard as he possibly could. The chelonaut fell forward with a soft
grunt.
The other man took one startled step before Twoflower hit him amateurishly but
effectively with the telescope. He crumpled on top of his colleague.
Rincewind and Twoflower looked at each other over the carnage.
“All right!” snapped Rincewind, aware that he had lost some kind of contest but
not entirely certain what it was. “Don’t bother to say it. Someone out there is
expecting these two guys to come out in the suits in a minute. I suppose they
thought we were slaves. Help me hide these behind the drapes and then, and then
—”
“—we’d better suit up,” said Twoflower, picking up the second helmet.
“Yes,” said Rincewind. “You know, as soon as I saw the suits I just knew I’d end
up wearing one. Don’t ask me how I knew—I suppose it was because it was just
about the worst possible thing that was likely to happen.”
“Well, you said yourself we have no way of escaping,” said Twoflower, his voice
muffled as he pulled the top half of a suit over his head. “Anything’s better than
being sacrificed.”
“As soon as we get a chance we run for it,” said Rincewind. “Don’t get any
ideas.”
He thrust an arm savagely into his suit and banged his head on the helmet. He
reflected briefly that someone up there was watching over him.
“Thanks a lot,” he said bitterly.
At the very edge of the city and country of Krull was a large semicircular
amphitheater, with seating for several tens of thousands of people. The arena was
only semicircular for the very elegant reason that it overlooked the cloud sea that
boiled up from the Rimfall, far below, and now every seat was occupied. And the
crowd was growing restive. It had come to see a double sacrifice and also the
launching of the great bronze space ship. Neither event had yet materialized.
The Arch-astronomer beckoned the Master Launchcontroller to him.
“Well?” he said, filling a mere four letters with a full lexicon of anger and
menace. The Master Launchcontroller went pale.
“No news, lord,” said the Launchcontroller, and added with a brittle brightness,
“except that your prominence will be pleased to hear that Garhartra has
recovered.”
“That is a fact he may come to regret,” said the Arch astronomer.
“Yes, lord.”
“How much longer do we have?”
The Launchcontroller glanced at the rapidly climbing sun.
“Thirty minutes, your prominence. After that Krull will have revolved away
from Great A’Tuin’s tail and the Potent Voyager will be doomed to spin away
into the interterrapene gulf. I have already set the automatic controls, so—”
“All right, all right,” the Arch-astronomer said, waving him away. “The launch
must go ahead. Maintain the watch on the harbor, of course. When the wretched
pair are caught I will personally take a great deal of pleasure in executing them
myself.”
“Yes, lord. Er—”
The Arch-astronomer frowned. “What else have you got to say, man?”
The Launchcontroller swallowed. All this was very unfair on him, he was a
practical magician rather than a diplomat, and that was why some wiser brains
had seen to it that he would be the one to pass on the news.
“A monster has come out of the sea and it’s attacking the ships in the harbor,” he
said. “A runner just arrived from there.”
“A big monster?” said the Arch-astronomer.
“Not particularly, although it is said to be exceptionally fierce, lord.”
The ruler of Krull and the Circumfence considered this for a moment, then
shrugged.
“The sea is full of monsters,” he said. “It is one of its prime attributes. Have it
dealt with. And—Master Launchcontroller?”
“Lord?”
“If I am further vexed, you will recall that two people are due to be sacrificed. I
may feel generous and increase the number.”
“Yes, lord.” The Master Launchcontroller scuttled away, relieved to be out of the
autocrat’s sight.
The Potent Voyager, no longer the blank bronze shell that had been smashed
from the mold a few days earlier, rested in its cradle on top of a wooden tower in
the center of the arena. In front of it a railway ran down toward the Edge, where
for the space of a few yards it turned suddenly upward.
The late Dactylos Goldeneyes, who had designed the launching pad as well as
the Potent Voyager itself, had claimed that this last touch was merely to ensure
that the ship would not snag on any rocks as it began its long plunge. Maybe it
was merely coincidental that it would also, because of that little twitch in the
track, leap like a salmon and shine theatrically in the sunlight before
disappearing into the cloud sea.
There was a fanfare of trumpets at the edge of the arena. The chelonauts’ honor
guard appeared, to much cheering from the crowd. Then the white-suited
explorers themselves stepped out into the light.
It immediately dawned on the Arch-astronomer that something was wrong.
Heroes always walked in a certain way, for example. They certainly didn’t
waddle, and one of the chelonauts was definitely waddling.
The roar of the assembled people of Krull was deafening. As the chelonauts and
their guards crossed the great arena, passing between the many altars that had
been set up for the various wizards and priests of Krull’s many sects to ensure
the success of the launch, the Arch-astronomer frowned. By the time the party
was halfway across the floor his mind had reached a conclusion. By the time the
chelonauts were standing at the foot of the ladder that led to the ship—and was
there more than a hint of reluctance about them?—the Arch-astronomer was on
his feet, his words lost in the noise of the crowd. One of his arms shot out and
back, fingers spread dramatically in the traditional spell-casting position, and
any passing lip-reader who was also familiar with the standard texts on magic
would have recognized the opening words of Vestcake’s Floating Curse, and
would then have prudently run away.
Its final words remained unsaid, however. The Arch-astronomer turned in
astonishment as a commotion broke out around the big arched entrance to the
arena. Guards were running out into the daylight, throwing down their weapons
as they scuttled among the altars or vaulted the parapet into the stands.
Something emerged behind them, and the crowd around the entrance ceased its
raucous cheering and began a silent, determined scramble to get out of the way.
The something was a low dome of seaweed, moving slowly but with a sinister
sense of purpose. One guard overcame his horror sufficiently to stand in its path
and hurl his spear, which landed squarely among the weeds. The crowd cheered
—then went deathly silent as the dome surged forward and engulfed the man
completely.
The Arch-astronomer dismissed the half-formed shape of Vestcake’s famous
Curse with a sharp wave of his hand, and quickly spoke the words of one of the
most powerful spells in his repertoire: the Infernal Combustion Enigma.
Octarine fire spiraled around and between his fingers as he shaped the complex
rune of the spell in midair and sent it, screaming and trailing blue smoke, toward
the shape.
There was a satisfying explosion and a gout of flame shot up into the clear
morning sky, shedding flakes of burning seaweed on the way. A cloud of smoke
and steam concealed the monster for several minutes, and when it cleared the
dome had completely disappeared.
There was a large charred circle on the flagstones, however, in which a few
clumps of kelp and bladderwrack still smoldered.
And in the center of the circle was a perfectly ordinary, if somewhat large,
wooden chest. It was not even scorched. Someone on the far side of the arena
started to laugh, but the sound was broken off abruptly as the chest rose up on
dozens of what could only be legs and turned to face the Arch-Astronomer. A
perfectly ordinary if somewhat large wooden chest does not, of course, have a
face with which to face, but this one was quite definitely facing. In precisely the
same way as he understood that, the Arch-astronomer was also horribly aware
that this perfectly normal box was in some indescribable way narrowing its eyes.
It began to move resolutely toward him. He shuddered.
“Magicians!” he screamed. “Where are my magicians?”
Around the arena pale-faced men peeped out from behind altars and under
benches. One of the bolder ones, seeing the expression on the Arch-astronomer’s
face, raised an arm tremulously and essayed a hasty thunderbolt. It hissed toward
the chest and struck it squarely in a shower of white sparks.
That was the signal for every magician, enchanter and thaumaturgist in Krull to
leap up eagerly and, under the terrified eyes of their master, unleash the first
spell that came to each desperate mind. Charms curved and whistled through the
air.
Soon the chest was lost to view again in an expanding cloud of magical particles,
which billowed out and wreathed it in twisting, disquieting shapes. Spell after
spell screamed into the melee. Flame and lightning bolts of all eight colors
stabbed out brightly from the seething thing that now occupied the space where
the box had been.
Not since the Mage Wars had so much magic been concentrated on one small
area. The air itself wavered and glittered. Spell ricocheted off spell, creating
short-lived wild spells whose brief half-life was both weird and uncontrolled.
The stones under the heaving mass began to buckle and split. One of them in fact
turned into something best left undescribed and slunk off into some dismal
dimension. Other strange side effects began to manifest themselves. A shower of
small lead cubes bounced out of the storm and rolled across the heaving floor,
and eldritch shapes gibbered and beckoned obscenely; four-sided triangles and
double-ended circles existed momentarily before merging again into the
booming, screaming tower of runaway raw magic that boiled up from the molten
flagstones and spread out over Krull. It no longer mattered that most of the
magicians had ceased their spell casting and fled—the thing was now feeding on
the stream of octarine particles that were always at their thickest near the Edge
of the Disc. Throughout the island of Krull every magical activity failed as all
the available mana in the area was sucked into the cloud, which was already a
quarter of a mile high and streaming out into mind-curdling shapes; hydrophobes
on their sea-skimming lenses crashed screaming into the waves, magic potions
turned to mere impure water in their phials, magic swords melted and dripped
from their scabbards.
But none of this in any way prevented the thing at the base of the cloud, now
gleaming mirror-bright in the intensity of the power storm around it, from
moving at a steady walking pace toward the Arch-astronomer.
Rincewind and Twoflower watched in awe from the shelter of Potent Voyager’s
launch tower. The honor party had long since vanished, leaving their weapons
scattered behind them.
“Well,” sighed Twoflower at last, “there goes the Luggage.” He sighed.
“Don’t you believe it,” said Rincewind. “Sapient pearwood is totally impervious
to all known forms of magic. It’s been constructed to follow you anywhere. I
mean, when you die, if you go to Heaven, you’ll at least have a clean pair of
socks in the afterlife. But I don’t want to die yet, so let’s just get going, shall
we?”
“Where?” said Twoflower.
Rincewind picked up a crossbow and a handful of quarrels. “Anywhere that isn’t
here,” he said.
“What about the Luggage?”
“Don’t worry. When the storm has used up all the free magic in the vicinity it’ll
just die out.”
In fact that was already beginning to happen. The billowing cloud was still
flowing up from the area but now it had a tenuous, harmless look about it. Even
as Twoflower stared, it began to flicker uncertainly.
Soon it was a pale ghost. The Luggage was now visible as a squat shape among
the almost invisible flames. Around it the rapidly cooling stones began to crack
and buckle.
Twoflower called softly to his Luggage. It stopped its stolid progression across
the tortured flags and appeared to be listening intently; then, moving its dozens
of feet in an intricate pattern, it turned on its length and headed toward the Potent
Voyager. Rincewind watched it sourly. The Luggage had an elemental nature,
absolutely no brain, a homicidal attitude toward anything that threatened its
master, and he wasn’t quite sure that its inside occupied the same space-time
framework as its outside.
“Not a mark on it,” said Twoflower cheerfully, as the box settled down in front
of him. He pushed open the lid.
“This is a fine time to change your underwear,” snarled Rincewind. “In a minute
all those guards and priests are going to come back, and they’re going to be
upset, man!”
“Water,” murmured Twoflower. “The whole box is full of water!”
Rincewind peered over his shoulder. There was no sign of clothes, moneybags,
or any other of the tourist’s belongings. The whole box was full of water.
A wave sprang up from nowhere and lapped over the edge. It hit the flagstones
but, instead of spreading out, began to take the shape of a foot. Another foot and
the bottom half of a pair of legs followed as more water streamed down as if
filling an invisible mold. A moment later Tethis the sea troll was standing in
front of them, blinking.
“I see,” he said at last. “You two. I suppose I shouldn’t be surprised.”
He looked around, ignoring their astonished expressions.
“I was just sitting outside my hut, watching the sun set, when this thing came
roaring up out of the water and swallowed me,” he said. “I thought it was rather
strange. Where is this place?”
“Krull,” said Rincewind. He stared hard at the now closed Luggage, which was
managing to project a smug expression. Swallowing people was something it did
quite frequently, but always when the lid was next opened there was nothing
inside but Twoflower’s laundry. Savagely he wrenched the lid up. There was
nothing inside but Twoflower’s laundry. It was perfectly dry.
“Well, well,” said Tethis. He looked up.
“Hey!” he said. “Isn’t this the ship they’re going to send over the Edge? Isn’t it?
It must be!”
An arrow zipped through his chest, leaving a faint ripple. He didn’t appear to
notice. Rincewind did. Soldiers were beginning to appear at the edge of the
arena, and a number of them were peering around the entrances.
Another arrow bounced off the tower behind Twoflower. At this range the bolts
did not have a lot of force, but it would only be a matter of time…
“Quick!” said Twoflower. “Into the ship! They won’t dare fire at that!”
“I knew you were going to suggest that,” groaned Rincewind. “I just knew it!”
He aimed a kick at the Luggage. It backed off a few inches, and opened its lid
threateningly.
A spear arced out of the sky and trembled to a halt in the woodwork by the
wizard’s ear. He screamed briefly and scrambled up the ladder after the others.
Arrows whistled around them as they came out onto the narrow catwalk that led
along the spine of the Potent Voyager. Twoflower led the way, jogging along
with what Rincewind considered to be too much suppressed excitement.
Atop the center of the ship was a large round bronze hatch with hasps around it.
The troll and the tourist knelt down and started to work on them.
In the heart of the Potent Voyager fine sand had been trickling into a carefully
designed cup for several hours. Now the cup was filled by exactly the right
amount to dip down and upset a carefully balanced weight. The weight swung
away, pulling a pin from an intricate little mechanism. A chain began to move.
There was a clonk…
“What was that?” said Rincewind urgently. He looked down.
The hail of arrows had stopped. The crowd of priests and soldiers were standing
motionless, staring intently at the ship. A small worried man elbowed his way
through them and started to shout something.
“What was what?” said Twoflower, busy with a wing-nut.
“I thought I heard something,” said Rincewind. “Look,” he said, “we’ll threaten
to damage the thing if they don’t let us go, right? That’s all we’re going to do,
right?”
“Yah,” said Twoflower vaguely. He sat back on his heels. “That’s it,” he said. “It
ought to lift off now.”
Several muscular men were swarming up the ladder to the ship. Rincewind
recognized the two chelonauts among them. They were carrying swords.
“I—” he began.
The ship lurched. Then, with infinite slowness, it began to move along the rails.
In that moment of black horror Rincewind saw that Twoflower and the troll had
managed to pull the hatch up. A metal ladder inside led into the cabin below. The
troll disappeared.
“We’ve got to get off,” whispered Rincewind. Twoflower looked at him, a
strange mad smile on his face.
“Stars,” said the tourist. “Worlds. The whole damn sky full of worlds. Places no
one will ever see. Except me.” He stepped through the hatchway.
“You’re totally mad,” said Rincewind hoarsely, trying to keep his balance as the
ship began to speed up. He turned as one of the chelonauts tried to leap the gap
between the Voyager and the tower, landed on the curving flank of the ship,
scrabbled for an instant for purchase, failed to find any, and dropped away with a
shriek.
The Voyager was traveling quite fast now. Rincewind could see past
Twoflower’s head to the sunlit cloud sea and the impossible Rimbow, floating
tantalizingly beyond it, beckoning fools to venture too far…
He also saw a gang of men climbing desperately over the lower slopes of the
launching ramp and manhandling a large bulk of timber onto the track, in a
frantic attempt to derail the ship before it vanished over the Edge. The wheels
slammed into it, but the only effect was to make the ship rock, Twoflower to lose
his grip on the ladder and fall into the cabin, and the hatch to slam down with the
horrible sound of a dozen fiddly little catches snapping into place. Rincewind
dived forward and scrabbled at them, whimpering.
The cloud sea was much nearer now. The Edge itself, a rocky perimeter to the
arena, was startlingly close.
Rincewind stood up. There was only one thing to do now, and he did it. He
panicked blindly, just as the ship’s bogeys hit the little upgrade and flung it,
sparkling like a salmon, into the sky and over the Edge.
A few seconds later there was a thunder of little feet and the Luggage cleared the
rim of the world, legs still pumping determinedly, and plunged down into the
universe.
THE END
Rincewind woke up and shivered. He was freezing cold.
So this is it, he thought. When you die you go to a cold, damp, misty freezing
place. Hades, where the mournful spirits of the Dead troop forever across the
sorrowful marshes, corpse-lights flickering fitfully in the encircling—hang on a
minute…
Surely Hades wasn’t this uncomfortable? And he was very uncomfortable
indeed. His back ached where a branch was pressing into it, his legs and arms
hurt where the twigs had lacerated them and, judging by the way his head was
feeling, something hard had recently hit it. If this was Hades it sure was hell—
hang on a minute…
Tree. He concentrated on the word that floated up from his mind, although the
buzzing in his ears and the flashing lights in front of his eyes made this an
unexpected achievement. Tree. Wooden thing. That was it. Branches and twigs
and things. And Rincewind, lying in it. Tree. Dripping wet. Cold white cloud all
around. Underneath, too. Now that was odd.
He was alive and lying covered in bruises in a small thorn tree that was growing
in a crevice in a rock that projected out of the foaming white wall that was the
Rimfall. The realization hit him in much the same way as an icy hammer. He
shuddered. The tree gave a warning creak.
Something blue and blurred shot past him, dipped briefly into the thundering
waters, and whirred back and settled on a branch near Rincewind’s head. It was a
small bird with a tuft of blue and green feathers. It swallowed the little silver fish
that it had snatched from the Fall and eyed him curiously.
Rincewind became aware that there were lots of similar birds around.
They hovered, darted and swooped easily across the face of the water, and every
so often one would raise an extra plume of spray as it stole another doomed
morsel from the waterfall. Several of them were perching in the tree. They were
as iridescent as jewels. Rincewind was entranced.
He was in fact the first man ever to see the rimfishers, the tiny creatures who had
long ago evolved a lifestyle quite unique even for the Disc. Long before the
Krullians had built the Circumfence the rimfishers had devised their own
efficient method of policing the edge of the world for a living.
They didn’t seem bothered about Rincewind. He had a brief but chilling vision
of himself living the rest of his life out in this tree, subsisting on raw birds and
such fish as he could snatch as they plummeted past.
The tree moved distinctly. Rincewind gave a whimper as he found himself
sliding backward, but managed to grab a branch. Only, sooner or later, he would
fall asleep…
There was a subtle change of scene, a slight purplish tint to the sky. A tall, blackcloaked
figure was standing on the air next to the tree. It had a scythe in one
hand. Its face was hidden in the shadows of the hood.
I HAVE COME FOR THEE, said the invisible mouth, in tones as heavy as a
whale’s heartbeat.
The trunk of the tree gave another protesting creak, and a pebble bounced off
Rincewind’s helmet as one root tore loose from the rock.
Death Himself always came in person to harvest the souls of wizards.
“What am I going to die of?” said Rincewind.
The tall figure hesitated.
PARDON? it said.
“Well, I haven’t broken anything, and I haven’t drowned, so what am I about to
die of? You can’t just be killed by Death; there has to be a reason,” said
Rincewind. To his utter amazement he didn’t feel terrified anymore. For about
the first time in his life he wasn’t frightened. Pity the experience didn’t look like
lasting for long.
Death appeared to reach a conclusion.
YOU COULD DIE OF TERROR, the hood intoned. The voice still had its
graveyard ring, but there was a slight tremor of uncertainty.
“Won’t work,” said Rincewind smugly.
THERE DOESN’T HAVE TO BE A REASON, said Death. I CAN JUST KILL
YOU.
“Hey, you can’t do that! It’d be murder!”
The cowled figure sighed and pulled back its hood. Instead of the grinning
death’s head that Rincewind had been expecting he found himself looking up
into the pale and slightly transparent face of a rather worried demon, of sorts.
“I’m making rather a mess of this, aren’t I?” it said wearily.
“You’re not Death! Who are you?” cried Rincewind.
“Scrofula.”
“Scrofula?”
“Death couldn’t come,” said the demon wretchedly. “There’s a big plague on in
Pseudopolis. He had to go and stalk the streets. So he sent me.”
“No one dies of scrofula! I’ve got rights. I’m a wizard!”
“All right, all right. This was going to be my big chance,” said Scrofula, “but
look at it this way—if I hit you with this scythe you’ll be just as dead as you
would be if Death had done it. Who’d know?”
“I’d know!” snapped Rincewind.
“You wouldn’t. You’d be dead,” said Scrofula logically.
“Piss off,” said Rincewind.
“That’s all very well,” said the demon, hefting the scythe, “but why not try to see
things from my point of view? This means a lot to me, and you’ve got to admit
that your life isn’t all that wonderful. Reincarnation can only be an improvement
—uh.”
His hand flew to his mouth but Rincewind was already pointing a trembling
finger at him.
“Reincarnation!” he said excitedly. “So it is true what the mystics say!”
“I’m admitting nothing,” said Scrofula testily. “It was a slip of the tongue. Now
—are you going to die willingly or not?”
“No,” said Rincewind.
“Please yourself,” replied the demon. He raised the scythe. It whistled down in
quite a professional way, but Rincewind wasn’t there. He was in fact several
meters below, and the distance was increasing all the time, because the branch
had chosen that moment to snap and send him on his interrupted journey toward
the interstellar gulf.
“Come back!” screamed the demon.
Rincewind didn’t answer. He was lying belly down in the rushing air, staring
down into the clouds that even now were thinning.
They vanished.
Below, the whole universe twinkled at Rincewind. There was Great A’Tuin, huge
and ponderous and pocked with craters. There was the little Disc moon. There
was a distant gleam that could only be the Potent Voyager. And there were all
the stars, looking remarkably like powdered diamonds spilled on black velvet,
the stars that lured and ultimately called the boldest toward them…
The whole of Creation was waiting for Rincewind to drop in.
He did so.
There didn’t seem to be any alternative.


- 1 -




- 2 -
They say the world is flat and supported on the back of four elephants who themselves stand on the back of a giant turtle.
They say that the elephants, being such huge beasts, have bones of rock and iron1, and nerves of gold for better conductivity over long distances.
They say that  came screaming and trumpeting through the atmosphere of the young world all those years ago and landed hard enough to split continents and raise mountains.
No one actually saw it land, which raised the interesting philosophical question: when millions of tons of angry elephant come spinning through the sky, and there is no one to hear it, does it — philosophically speaking — make a noise?
And if there was no one to see it hit, did it actually hit?
In other words, wasn't it just a story for children, to explain away some interesting natural occurrences?
As for the dwarfs, whose legend it is, and who mine a lot deeper than other people, they say that there is a grain of truth in it.
On a clear day, from the right vantage point on the Ramtops, a watcher could see a very long way across the plains. If it was high summer, they could count the columns of dust as the ox trains plodded on, at a top speed of two miles an hour, each pair pulling a train of two wagons carrying four tons apiece. Things took a long time to get anywhere, but when they did, there was certainly a lot of them. To the cities of the Circle Sea they carried raw material, and sometimes people who were off to seek their fortune and a fistful of diamonds.
To the mountains they brought manufactured goods, rare things from across the oceans, and people who had found wisdom and a few scars.
There was usually a day's travelling between each convoy. They turned the landscape into an unrolled time machine. On a clear day you could see last Tuesday.
Heliographs twinkled in the distant air as the columns flashed messages back and forth, about bandit presence,- cargoes and the best place to get double egg, treble chips and a steak that overhung the plate all round.
Lots of people travelled on the carts. It was cheap, it beat walking, and you got there eventually.
Some people travelled for free.
1 Not rock and iron in their dead form, as they are now, but living rock and iron.


- 3 -
The driver of one wagon was having problems with his team. They were skittish. He'd expect this in the mountains, where all sorts of wild creatures might regard the oxen as a travelling meal, but here there was nothing more dangerous than cabbages.
Behind him, down in a narrow space between the loads of cut lumber, something slept.
It was just another day in Ankh-Morpork...
Sergeant Colon balanced on a shaky ladder at one end of the Brass Bridge, one of the city's busiest thoroughfares. He clung by one hand to the tall pole with the box on top of it, and with the other he held up a home-made picture book to the slot in the front of the box.
'And this is another sort of cart,' he said. 'Got it?'
''s,' said a very small voice from within the box.
'O-kay,' said Colon, apparently satisfied. He dropped the book and pointed down the length of the bridge.
'Now, you see those two markers what has been painted across the cobbles?, And they mean... ?'
'If-a-cart-g's-tween-dem-in-less'na-minute—'sgoin-too-fas',' the little voice parroted.
'Well done. And then you...?'
'Painta-pic-cher.'
'Taking care to show... ?'
'Driver's-face-or-cart-licence.'
'And if it's night-time you...?'
'Use- der-sal'mander-to-make-it-bright...'
'Well done, Rodney. And one of us will come along every day and collect your pictures. Got everything you want?'
'What's that, sergeant?'
Colon looked down at the very large, brown, upturned face, and smiled.


- 4 -
'Afternoon, All,' he said, climbing ponderously down the ladder. 'What you're looking at, Mister Jolson, is the modern Watch for the new millenienienum... num.'
''s a bit big, Fred,' said All Jolson, looking at it critically. 'I've seen lots of smaller ones.'
'Watch as in City Watch, All.'
'Ah, right.'
'Anyone goes too fast around here and Lord Vetinari'll be looking at his picture next morning. The iconographs do not lie, All.'
'Right, Fred. 'cos they're too stupid.'
'His lordship's got fed up with carts speeding over the bridge, see, and asked us to do something about it. I'm Head of Traffic now, you know.'
'Is that good, Fred?'
'I should just think so!' said Sergeant Colon expansively. 'It's up to me to keep the, er, arteries of the city from clogging up, leadin' to a complete breakdown of commerce and ruination for us all. Most vital job there is, you could say.'
'And it's just you doing it, is it?'
'Well, mainly. Mainly. Corporal Nobbs and the other lads help, of course.'
All Jolson scratched his nose. 'It was on a similar subject that I wanted to talk to you, Fred,' he said.
'No problem, All.'
'Something very odd's turned up outside my restaurant, Fred.'
Sergeant Colon followed the huge man around the corner. Fred usually liked All's company because, next to All, he was very skinny indeed. All Jolson was a man who'd show up on an atlas and change the orbit of small planets. Paving stones cracked under his feet. He combined in one body — and there was plenty of room left over — Ankh-Morpork's best chef and its keenest eater, a circumstance made in mashed potato heaven. Sergeant Colon couldn't remember what the man's real first name had been; he'd picked up the nickname by general acclaim, since no one seeing him in the street for the first time could believe that it was all Jolson.
There was a big cart on Broad Way. Other traffic was backed up trying to manoeuvre around it.


- 5 -
'Had my meat delivered at lunchtime, Fred, and when my carter came out...' All Jolson pointed to the large triangular construction locked around one wheel of the cart. It was made of oak and steel, with yellow paint sloshed over it.
Fred tapped it carefully. 'I can see where your problem is, right here,' he said. 'So how long was your carter in there?'
'Well. I gave him lunch...'
'And very good lunches you do, All, I've always said. What was the special today?'
'Smitten steak with cream sauce and slumpie, and black death meringue to follow,' said All Jolson.
There was a moment of silence as they both pictured this meal. Fred Colon gave a little sigh.
'Butter on the slumpie?'
'You wouldn't insult me by suggesting I'd leave it off, would you?'
'A man could linger a long time over a meal like that,' said Fred. 'The trouble is, the Patrician, All, gets very short about carts parking on the street for more than ten minutes. He reckons that's a sort of crime.'
'Taking ten minutes to eat one of my lunches isn't a crime, Fred, it's a tragedy,' said All. 'It says here "City Watch — $15 removal", Fred. That's a couple of days' profits, Fred.'
'Thing is,' said Fred Colon, 'it'll be paperwork, see? I can't just wave that away. I only wish I could. There's all them counterfoils on the spike in my office. If it was me running the Watch, of course... but my hands are tied, see...'
The two men stood some way apart, hands in pockets, apparently paying little attention to one another. Sergeant Colon began to whistle under his breath.
'I know a thing or two,' said All, carefully. 'People think waiters ain't got ears.'
'I know lots of stuff, All,' said Colon, jingling his pocket change.
Both men stared at the sky for a while.
'I may have some honey ice cream left over from yesterday—'
Sergeant Colon looked down at the cart.
'Here, Mister Jolson,' he said, in a voice of absolute surprise. 'Some complete bastard's put some sort of clamp on your wheel! Well, we'll soon see about that.'


- 6 -
Colon pulled a couple of round, white-painted paddles from his belt, sighted on the Watch House semaphore tower peeking over the top of the old lemonade factory, waited until the watching gargoyle signalled him, and with a certain amount of verve and flair ripped off an impression of a man with stiff arms playing two games of table tennis at once.
'The team'll be along any minute — ah, watch this...'
A little further along the street two trolls were carefully clamping a hay wagon. After a minute or two one of them happened to glance at the Watch House tower, nudged his colleague, produced two bats of his own and, with rather less elan than Sergeant Colon, sent a signal. When it was answered the trolls looked around, spotted Colon and lumbered towards him.
'Ta-da!' said Colon proudly.
'Amazing, this new technology,' said All Jolson admiringly. 'And they must've been, what, forty or fifty yards away?'
''s'right, All. In the old days I'd've had to blow a whistle. And they'll arrive here knowin' it was me who wanted 'em, too.'
'Instead of having to look and see it was you,' said Jolson.
'Well, yeah,' said Colon, aware that what had transpired might not be the brightest ray of light in the new dawn of the communications revolution. 'Of course, it'd have worked just as well if they'd been streets away. On the other side of the city, even. And if I told the gargoyle to, as we say, "put" it on the "big" tower over on the Tump they'd have got it in Sto Lat within minutes, see?'
'And that's twenty miles.'
'At least.'
'Amazing, Fred.'
'Time moves on, All,' said Colon, as the trolls reached them.
'Constable Chert, who told you to clamp my friend's cart?' he demanded.
'Well, sarge, dis morning you said we was to clamp every—'
'Not this cart,' said Colon. 'Unlock it right now, and we'll say no more about it, eh?'
Constable Chert seemed to reach the conclusion that he wasn't being paid to think, and this was just as well because Sergeant Colon did not believe trolls gave value for money in that department. 'If you say so, sarge...'


- 7 -
'While you're doing that, me and All here will have a little chat, right, All?' said Fred Colon.
'That's right, Fred.'
'Well, I say chat, but I'll be mostly listenin', on account of having my mouth full.'
Snow cascaded from the fir branches. The man forced his way through, stood fighting for breath for a moment, and then set off across the clearing at a fast trot.
Across the valley he heard the first blast on the horn.
He had an hour, then, if he could trust them. He might not make it to the tower, but there were other ways out.
He had plans. He could outwit them. Keep off the snow as much as you can, double back, make use of the streams... It was possible, it had been done before. He was sure of that.
A few miles away sleek bodies set out through the forest. The hunt was on.
Elsewhere in Ankh-Morpork, the Fools' Guild was on fire.
This was a problem, because the Guild's fire brigade consisted largely of clowns.
And this was a problem because if you show a clown a bucket of water and a ladder he knows only one way to act. Years of training take over. It's something in the red nose speaking to him. He can't help himself.
Sam Vimes of the Ankh-Morpork City Watch leaned against a wall and watched the show.
'We really must put that proposal for a civic fire service to the Patrician again,' he said. Across the street a clown picked up a ladder, turned, knocked the clown behind him into a bucket of water, then turned again to see what the commotion was, thus sending his rising victim into the bucket again with a surprising parping noise. The crowd watched silently. If it was funny, clowns wouldn't be doing it.
'The Guilds are all very much against it,' said Captain Carrot Ironfoundersson, his second in command, as the clown with the ladder had a bucket of water poured down his trousers. 'They say it'd be trespass.'
The fire had taken hold in a first-floor room.
'If we let it burn it'd be a blow for entertainment in this city,' said Carrot earnestly.


- 8 -
Vimes looked sideways at him. That was a true Carrot comment. It sounded as innocent as hell, but you could take it a different way.
'It certainly would,' he said. 'Nevertheless, I suppose we'd better do something.' He stepped forward and cupped his hands.
'All right, this is the Watch! Bucket chain!' he shouted.
'Aw, must we?' said someone in the crowd.
'Yes, you must,' said Captain Carrot. 'Come on, everyone, if we form two lines we'll have this done in no time at all! What d'you say, eh? It might even be fun!'
And they did it, Vimes noted. Carrot treated everyone as if they were jolly good chaps and somehow, in some inexplicable way, they couldn't resist the urge not to prove him wrong.
And to the disappointment of the crowd the fire was soon put out, once the clowns were disarmed and led away by kind people.
Carrot reappeared, wiping his forehead, as Vimes lit a cigar.
'Apparently the fire-eater was sick,' he said.
'It's just possible we might never be forgiven,' said Vimes as they set off on patrol again. 'Oh, no... what now?'
Carrot was staring upwards, towards the nearest clacks tower.
'Riot in Cable Street,' he said. 'It's All Officers, sir.'
They broke into a run.. You always did for an All Officers. The people in trouble might well be you.
There were more dwarfs on the streets as they got nearer, and Vimes recognized the signs. The dwarfs all wore preoccupied looks and were walking in the same direction.
'It's over,' he said, as they rounded a corner. 'You can tell by the sudden increase of suspiciously innocent bystanders.'
Whatever else the emergency had been, it had been a big one. The street was strewn with debris, and a fair amount of dwarfs. Vimes slowed down.
'Third time this week,' he said. 'What's got into them?'
'Hard to say, sir,' said Carrot. Vimes shot him a glance. Carrot had been raised by dwarfs. He also, if he could possibly avoid it, never told a lie.


- 9 -
'That isn't the same as I don't know, is it?' he said.
The captain looked awkward.
'I think it's... sort of political,' he said.
Vimes noted a throwing axe buried in a wall.
'Yes, I can see that,' he said.
Someone was coming along the street, and was probably the reason why the riot had broken up. Lance-Constable Bluejohn was the biggest troll Vimes had ever met. He loomed. He was so big that he didn't stand out in a crowd because he was the crowd; people failed to see him because he was in the way. And, like many overgrown people, he was instinctively gentle and rather shy and inclined to let others tell him what to do. If fate had led him to join a gang, he'd be the muscle. In the Watch, he was the riot shield. Other watchmen were peering around him.
'Looks like it started in Gimlet's Delicatessen,' said Vimes, as the rest of the Watch moved in. 'Get a statement off Gimlet.'
'Not a good idea, sir,' said Carrot firmly. 'He didn't see anything.'
'How do you know he didn't see anything? You haven't asked him.'
'I know, sir. He didn't see anything. He didn't hear anything, either.'
'With a mob trashing his restaurant and scrapping in the street outside?'
'That's right, sir.'
'Ah. I get it. There's none so deaf as those that won't hear, are you saying?'
'Something like that, sir, yes. Look, it's all over, sir. I don't think anyone's seriously hurt. It'll be for the best, sir. Please?'
'Is this one of those private dwarf things, captain?'
'Yes, sir—'
'Well, this is Ankh-Morpork, captain, not some mine in the mountains, and it's my job to keep the peace, and this, captain, doesn't look like it. What're people going to say about rioting in the streets?'
'They'll say it's another day in the life of the big city, sir,' said Carrot woodenly.


- 10 -
'Yes, I suppose they would, at that. However—' Vimes picked up a groaning dwarf. 'Who did this?' he demanded. 'I'm not in the mood for being messed around. Come on, I want a name!'
'Agi Hammerthief,' muttered the dwarf, struggling.
'All right,' said Vimes, letting him go. 'Write that down, Carrot.'
'No, sir,' said Carrot.
'Excuse me?'
'There is no Agi Hammerthief in the city, sir.'
'You know every dwarf?'
'A lot of them, sir. But Agi Hammerthief is only found down mines, sir. He's a sort of mischievous spirit, sir. For example, "Put it where Agi puts the coal," sir, means—'
'Yes, I can guess,' said Vimes. 'You're telling me that that dwarf just said this riot was started by Sweet Fanny Adams?' The dwarf had disappeared smartly around a corner.
'More or less, sir. Excuse me a moment, sir.' Carrot stepped across the street, pulling two white-painted paddles out of his belt. 'I'll just get a line of sight on a tower,' he said. 'I'd better send a clacks.'
'Why?'
'Well, we've kept the Patrician waiting, sir, so it'd be good manners to let him know we're late.'
Vimes pulled out his watch and stared at it. It was turning out to be one of those days... the sort that you got every day.
It is in the nature of the universe that the person who always keeps you waiting ten minutes will, on the day you are ten minutes tardy, have been ready ten minutes early and will make a point of not mentioning this.
'Sorry we're late, sir,' said Vimes as they entered the Oblong Office.
'Oh, are you late?' said Lord Vetinari, looking up from his paperwork. 'I really hadn't noticed. Nothing serious, I trust.'
'The Fools' Guild caught fire, sir,' said Carrot.
'Many casualties?'


- 11 -
'No, sir.'
'Well, that is a blessing,' said Lord Vetinari carefully. He put down his pen.
'Now... what do we have to discuss... ?' He pulled another document towards him and read it swiftly.
'Ah... I see that the new traffic division is having the desired effect.' He indicated a large pile of paper. 'I am getting any amount of complaints from the Carters' and Drovers' Guild. Well done. Do pass on my thanks to Sergeant Colon and his team.'
'I will, sir.'
'I see in one day they clamped seventeen carts, ten horses, eighteen oxen and one duck.'
'It was parked illegally, sir.'
'Indeed. However, a strange pattern seems to emerge.'
'Sir?'
'Many of the carters say that they were not in fact parked but had merely halted while an extremely old and extremely ugly lady
crossed the road extremely slowly.'
'That's their story, sir.'
'They know she was an old lady by her constant litany on the lines of "Oh deary me, my poor old feet," and similar expressions.'
'Certainly sounds like an old lady to me, sir,' said Vimes, his face wooden.
'Quite so. What is rather strange is that several of them then report seeing the old lady subsequently legging it away along an alley rather fast. I'd discount this, of course, were it not for the fact that the lady has apparently been seen crossing another street, very slowly, some distance away shortly afterwards. Something of a mystery, Vimes.'
Vimes put his hand over his eyes. 'It's one I intend to solve quite quickly, sir.'
The Patrician nodded and made a short note on the list in front of him.
As he went to move it aside he uncovered a much grubbier, much-folded scrap of paper. He picked up two letter knives and, using them fastidiously, unfolded the paper and inched it across the desk towards Vimes.


- 12 -
'Do you know anything about this?' he said.
Vimes read, in large, round, crayoned letters:
'DeEr Cur, The CruELt to HOMLIss DoGs In thIs CITY Is A DIssGrays, WaT arE The WaTCH Do Ing A BouT ITZ SiNeD The LeAK AgyANsct CrUle T To DoGs.'
'Not a thing,' he said.
'My clerks say that one like it is pushed under the door most nights,' said the Patrician. 'Apparently no one is seen.'
'Do you want me to investigate?' said Vimes. 'It shouldn't be hard to find someone in this city who dribbles when he writes and spells even worse than Carrot.'
'Thank you, sir,' said Carrot.
'None of the guards report noticing anyone,' said the Patrician. 'Is there any group in Ankh-Morpork particularly interested in the welfare of dogs?'
'I doubt it, sir.'
'Then I shall ignore it pro tem,' said Vetinari. He let the soggy letter splash into the wastepaper basket.
'On to more pressing matters,' he said briskly. 'Now, then... What do you know about Bonk?'
Vimes stared.
There was a polite cough from Carrot. 'The river or the town, sir?' he said.
The Patrician smiled. 'Ah, captain, you have long ago ceased to surprise me. Yes, I was referring to the town.'
'It's one of the major towns in Uberwald, sir,' said Carrot. 'Exports: precious metals, leather, timber and of course fat from the deep fat mines at Schmaltzberg—'
'There's a place called Bonk?' said Vimes, still marvelling at the speed with which they'd got here from a damp letter about dogs.
'Strictly speaking, sir, it's more correctly pronounced Beyonk,' said Carrot.
'Even so—'


- 13 -
'And in Beyonk, sir, "Morpork" sounds exactly like their word for an item of ladies' underwear,' said Carrot. 'There's only so many syllables in the world, when you think about it.'
'How do you know all this stuff, Carrot?'
'Oh, you pick it up, sir. Here and there.'
'Really? So exactly which item of—'
'Something extremely important will be taking place there in a few weeks,' said Lord Vetinari. 'Something which, I have to add, is vital to the future prosperity of Ankh-Morpork.'
'The crowning of the Low King,' said Carrot.
Vimes stared from him to the Patrician, and back again.
'Is there some kind of circular that goes around which doesn't get as far as me?' he said.
'The dwarf community has been talking about little else for months, sir.'
'Really?' said Vimes. 'You mean the riots? Those fights every night in the dwarf bars?'
'Captain Carrot is correct, Vimes. It will be a grand occasion, attended by representatives of many governments. And from various Uberwald principalities, of course, because the Low King only rules those areas of Uberwald that are below ground. His favour is valuable. Borogravia and Genua will be there, without a doubt, and probably even Klatch.'
'Klatch? But they're even further from Uberwald than we are! What are they bothering to go for?'
He paused for a moment and then added: 'Hah. I'm being stupid. Where's the money?'
'I beg your pardon, commander?'
'That's what my old sergeant used to say when he was puzzled, sir. Find out where the money is and you've got it half solved.'
Vetinari stood up and walked over to the big window, with his back to them.
'A large country, Uberwald,' he said, apparently addressing the glass. 'Dark. Mysterious. Ancient...'


- 14 -
'Huge untapped reserves of coal and iron ore,' said Carrot. 'And fat, of course. The best candles, lamp oils and soap come ultimately from the Schmaltzberg deposits.'
'Why? We've got our own slaughterhouse, haven't we?'
'Ankh-Morpork uses a great many candles, sir.'
'It certainly doesn't use much soap,' said Vimes.
'There are so many uses for fats and tallows, sir. We couldn't possibly supply ourselves.'
'Ah,' said Vimes.
The Patrician sighed. 'Obviously I hope that we may strengthen our trading links with the various nations within Uberwald,' he said. 'The situation there is volatile in the extreme. Do you know much about Uberwald, Commander Vimes?'
Vimes, whose knowledge of geography was microscopically detailed within five miles of Ankh-Morpork and merely microscopic beyond that, nodded uncertainly.
'Only that it's not really a country,' said Vetinari. 'It's—'
'It's rather more what you get before you get countries,' said Carrot. 'It's mainly fortified towns and fiefdoms with no real boundaries and lots of forest in between. There's always some sort of feud going on. There's no law apart from whatever the local lords enforce, and banditry of all kinds is rife.'
'So unlike the home life of our own dear city,' said Vimes, not quite under his breath. The Patrician gave him an impassive glance.
'In Uberwald the dwarfs and trolls haven't settled their old grievances,' Carrot continued, 'there are large areas controlled by feudal vampire or werewolf clans, and there are also tracts with much higher than normal background magic. It is a chaotic place, indeed, and you'd hardly think you were in the Century of the Fruitbat. It is to be hoped that things will improve, however, and Uberwald will, happily, be joining the community of nations.'
Vimes and Vetinari exchanged looks. Sometimes Carrot sounded like a civics essay written by a stunned choirboy.
'Well put,' said the Patrician at last. 'But until that joysome day Uberwald remains a mystery inside a riddle wrapped in an enigma.'
'Let me see if I've got this right,' said Vimes. 'Uberwald is like this big suet pudding that everyone's suddenly noticed, and now with this coronation as an


- 15 -
excuse we've all got to rush there with knife, fork and spoon to shovel as much on our plates as possible?'
'Your grasp of political reality is masterly, Vimes. You lack only the appropriate vocabulary. Ankh-Morpork must send a representative, obviously. An ambassador, as it were.'
'You're not suggesting I should go to this affair, are you?' said Vimes.
'Oh, I couldn't send the Commander of the City Watch,' said Lord Vetinari. 'Most of the Uberwald countries have no concept of a modern civil peacekeeping authority.'
Vimes relaxed.
'I'm sending the Duke of Ankh instead.'
Vimes sat bolt upright.
'They are mostly feudal systems,' Vetinari went on. 'They set great store by rank—'
'I'm not being ordered to go to Uberwald!'
'Ordered, your grace?' Vetinari looked shocked and concerned. 'Good heavens, I must have misunderstood Lady Sybil... She told me yesterday that a holiday a long way from Ankh-Morpork would do you the world of good...'
'You spoke to Sybil?'
'At the reception for the new President of the Tailors' Guild, yes. I believe you left early. You were called away. Some emergency, I understand. Lady Sybil happened to mention how you seemed to be, as she put it, constantly on the job, and one thing led to another. Oh dear, I do hope I haven't caused some marital misunderstanding...'
'I can't leave the city now of all times!' said Vimes desperately. 'There's so much to do!'
'That is exactly why Sybil says you ought to leave the city,' said Vetinari.
'But there's the new training school—'
'Ticking over nicely now, sir,' said Carrot.
'The whole carrier-pigeon network is a complete mess—'
'More or less sorted out, sir, now we've changed their feed. Besides, the clacks seems to be functioning very well.'


- 16 -
' 'We've got to get the River Watch set up—'
'Can't do much for a week or two, sir, until we've dredged up the boat.'
'The drains at the Chitterling Street station are—'
'I've got the plumbers working on it, sir.'
Vimes knew that he had lost. He had lost as soon as Sybil was involved, because she was always a reliable siege engine against the walls of his defences. But there was such a thing as going down fighting.
'You know I'm no good at diplomatic talk,' he said.
'On the contrary, Vimes, you appear to have amazed the diplomatic corps here in Ankh-Morpork,' said Lord Vetinari. 'They're not used to plain speech. It confuses them. What was it you said to the Istanzian ambassador last month?' He riffled through the papers on his desk. 'Let me see, the complaint is here somewhere... Oh, yes, on the matter of military incursions across the Slipnir river, you indicated that further transgressions would involve him, personally, that is to say the ambassador, and I quote "going home in an ambulance".'
'I'm sorry about that, sir, but it had been a long day and he was really getting on my—'
'Since when their armed forces have pulled back so far that they are nearly in the next country,' said Lord Vetinari, moving the paper aside. 'I have to say that your observation complied only with the general thrust of my view in this matter but was, at least, succinct. Apparently you also looked at the ambassador in a very threatening way.'
'It was only the way I usually look.'
'To be sure. Happily, in Uberwald you will only need to look friendly.'
'Ah, but you don't want me saying things like "How about selling us all your fat really cheap?" do you?' said Vimes desperately.
'You will not be required to do any negotiating, Vimes. That will be dealt with by one of my clerks, who will set up the temporary embassy and discuss such matters with his opposite numbers among the courts of Uberwald. All clerks speak the same language. You will simply be as ducal as you can. And, of course, you will take a retinue. A staff,' Vetinari added, seeing Vimes's blank look. He sighed. 'People to go with you. I suggest Sergeant Angua, Sergeant Detritus, and Corporal Littlebottom.'
'Ah,' said Carrot, nodding encouragingly.


- 17 -
'Sorry?' said Vimes. 'I think there must have been a whole piece of conversation just then that I must have missed.'
'A werewolf, a troll and a dwarf,' said Carrot. 'Ethnic minorities, sir.'
'... but in Uberwald they are ethnic majorities,' said Lord Vetinari. 'All three officers come from there originally, I believe. Their presence will speak volumes.'
'So far it hasn't sent me a postcard,' said Vimes. 'I'd rather take—'
'Sir, it will show people in Uberwald that Ankh-Morpork is a multicultural society, you see?' said Carrot.
'Oh, I see. "People like us". People you can do business with,' said Vimes glumly.
'Sometimes,' Vetinari said testily, 'it really does seem to me that the culture of cynicism in the Watch is... is...'
'Insufficient?' said Vimes. There was silence.
'All right,' he sighed, 'I'd better go off and polish the knobs on my coronet, hadn't I...?'
'The ducal coronet, if I remember my heraldry, does not have knobs on. It is decidedly... spiky,' said the Patrician, pushing across the desk a small pile of papers topped by a gold-edged invitation card. 'Good. I will have a... a clacks sent immediately. You will be more fully briefed later. Do — give my regards to the Duchess. And now, please do not let me detain you further...'
'He always says that,' muttered Vimes as the two men hurried down the stairs. 'He knows I don't like being married to a duchess.'
'I thought you and Lady Sybil—'
'Oh, being married to Sybil is fine, fine,' said Vimes hurriedly. 'It's just the duchess bit I don't like. Where is everyone tonight?'
'Corporal Littlebottom's on pigeon duty, Detritus is on night patrol with Swires, and Angua's on special duty in the Shades, sir. You remember? With Nobby?'
'Oh gods, yes. Well, when they come in tomorrow you'd better get them to report to me.
Incidentally, get that bloody wig off Nobby and hide it, will you?' Vimes leafed through the paperwork. 'I've never heard of the Low King of the dwarfs. I thought that "king" in dwarfish just meant a sort of senior engineer.'
'Ah, well, the Low King is rather special,' said Carrot.


- 18 -
,Why?,
'Well, it all starts with the Scone of Stone, sir.'
'The what?'
'Would you mind a little detour on the way back to the Yard, sir? It'll make things clearer.'
The young woman stood on a corner in the Shades. Her general stance indicated that she was, in the specialized patois of the area, a lady-in-waiting. To be more precise, a lady-in-waiting for Mr Right, or at least Mr Right Amount.
She idly swung her handbag.
This was a very recognizable signal, for anyone with the brains of a pigeon. A member of the Thieves' Guild would have passed carefully by on the other side of the lane, giving her nothing more than a gentlemanly and above all nonaggressive nod. Even the less-polite freelance thieves who lurked in this area would have thought twice before eyeing the handbag. The Seamstresses' Guild operated a very swift and non-reversible kind of justice.
The skinny body of Done It Duncan, however, did not have the brains of a pigeon. The little man had been watching the bag like a cat for fully five minutes, and now the very thought of its contents had hypnotized him. He could practically taste the money. He rose on his toes, lowered his head, dashed out of the alley, grabbed the bag and got several inches before the world exploded behind him and he ended up flat in the mud.
Something right by his ear started to drool. And there was a long, very long-drawn-out growl, not changing in tone at all, just unrolling a deep promise of what would happen if he tried to move.
He heard footsteps, and out of the corner of his eyes saw a swirl of lace.
'Oh, Done It,' said a voice. 'Bag-snatching? That's a bit low, isn't it? Even for you. You could've got really hurt. It's only Duncan, miss. He'll be no trouble. You can let him up.'
The weight was removed from Duncan's back. He heard something pad off into the gloom of an alley.
'I done it, I done it!' said the little thief desperately as Corporal Nobbs helped him to his feet.


- 19 -
'Yes, I know you did, I saw you,' said Nobby. 'And you know what'd happen to you if the Thieves' Guild spotted you? You'd be dead in the river with no time off for good behaviour.'
'They hate me 'cos I'm so good,' said Duncan through his matted beard. "ere, you know the robbery at All Jolson's last month? I done that.'
'That's right, Duncan. You done that.'
'An' that haul at the gold vaults last week, I done that too. It wasn't Coalface and his boys.'
'No, it was you, wasn't it, Duncan?'
'An' that job at the goldsmith's that everyone says Crunchie Ron done—'
'You done it, did you?'
''s'right,' said Duncan.
'And it was you what stole fire from the gods, too, wasn't it, Duncan?' said Nobby, grinning evilly under his wig.
'Yeah, that was me.' Duncan nodded. He sniffed. 'I was a bit younger then, of course.' He peered shortsightedly at Nobby Nobbs.
'Why've you got a dress on, Nobby?'
'It's hush-hush, Duncan.'
'Ah, right.' Duncan shifted uneasily. 'You couldn't spare me a bob or two, could you, Nobby? I ain't eaten for two days.'
Small coins gleamed in the dark.
'Now push off,' said Corporal Nobbs.
'Thanks, Nobby. You got any unsolved crimes, you know where to find me.'
Duncan lurched off into the night.
Sergeant Angua appeared behind Nobby, buckling on her breastplate.
'Poor old devil,' she said.
'He was a good thief in his day,' said Nobby, taking a notebook out of his handbag and jotting down a few lines.
'Kind of you to help him,' said Angua.


- 20 -
'Werl, I can get the money back out of petty cash,' said Nobby. 'An' now we know who did the bullion job, don't we? That'll be a feather in my cap with Mister Vimes.'
'Bonnet, Nobby.'
'What?'
'Your bonnet, Nobby. It's got a rather fetching band of flowers around it.'
'Oh... yeah...'
'It's not that I'm complaining,' said Angua, 'but when we were assigned this job I thought it was me who was going to be the decoy and you who was going to be the back-up, Nobby.'
'Yeah, but what with you bein'...' Nobby's expression creased as he edged his way into
unfamiliar linguistic territory, 'mor... phor... log... ic.. ally gifted...'
'A werewolf, Nobby. I know the word.'
'Right... well, obviously, you'd be a lot better at lurkin', an'... an' obviously it's not right, women havin' to act as decoys in police work...'
Angua hesitated, as she so often did when attempting to talk to Nobby on difficult matters, and waved her hands in front of her as if trying to shape the invisible dough of her thoughts.
'It's just that... I mean, people might...' she began. 'I mean... well, you know what people call men who wear wigs and gowns, don't you?'
'Yes, miss.'
'You do?'
'Yes, miss. Lawyers, miss.'
'Good. Yes. Good,' said Angua slowly. 'Now try another one...'
'Er... actors, miss?'
Angua gave up. 'You look good in taffeta, Nobby,' she said.
'You don't think it makes me look too fat?'
Angua sniffed. 'Oh, no...' she said quietly.
'I thought I'd better put scent on for verysillymitude,' said Nobby quickly.


- 21 -
'What? Oh...' Angua shook her head, took another breath. 'I can smell... some... thing... else...'
'That's surprising, 'cos this stuff's a bit on the pungent side and frankly I don't think lily of the valley is supposed to smell like this...'
'It's not perfume.'
'.. but the lavender stuff they had you could clean brass with...'
'Can you get back to the Chitterling station by yourself, Nobby?' said Angua. Despite her rising panic, she mentally added: after all, what could happen? I mean, really?
'Yes, miss.'
'There's something I'd better... sort out.'
Angua hurried away, the new scent filling her nostrils. It would have to be powerful to combat Eau de Nobbs, and it was. Oh, it was.
Not here, she thought. Not now.
Not him.
The running man swung along a branch wet with snow, and managed at last to lower himself on to a branch belonging to the next tree. That took him a long way from the stream. How good was their sense of smell? Pretty damn good, he knew. But this good?
He'd got out of the stream on to another overhanging branch. If they followed the banks, and they'd be bright enough to do that, they'd surely never know he'd left the stream.
There was a howl, away to the left.
He headed right, into the gloom of the forest.
Vimes heard Carrot scrabble around in the gloom, and the sound of a key in the lock.
'I thought the Campaign for Equal Heights was running this place now,' he said.
'It's so hard to find volunteers,' said Carrot, ushering him through the low door and lighting a candle. 'I come in every day just to keep an eye on things, but no one else seems very interested.'
'I can't imagine why,' said Vimes, looking around the Dwarf Bread Museum.


- 22 -
The one positive thing you could say about the bread products around him was that they were probably as edible now as they had been on the day they were baked.
'Forged' was a better term. Dwarf bread was made as a meal of last resort and also as a weapon and a currency. Dwarfs were not, as far as Vimes knew, religious in any way, but the way they thought about bread came close.
There was a tinkle and a scrabbling noise somewhere in the gloom.
'Rats,' said Carrot. 'They never stop trying to eat dwarf bread, poor things. Ah, here we are. The Scone of Stone. A replica, of course.'
Vimes stared at the misshapen thing on its dusty display stand. It was vaguely scone-like, but only if someone pointed this out to you beforehand. Otherwise, the term 'a lump of rock' was pretty accurate. It was about the size, and shape, of a well sat-on cushion. There were a few fossilized currants visible.
'My wife rests her feet on something like that when she's had a long day,' he said.
'It's fifteen hundred years old,' said Carrot, with something like awe in his voice.
'I thought this was the replica.'
'Well, yes... but it's a replica of a very important thing, sir,' said Carrot.
Vimes sniffed. The air had a certain pungent quality. 'Smells strongly of cats in here, doesn't it?'
'I'm afraid they get in after the rats, sir. A rat who's nibbled on dwarf bread tends not to be able to run very fast.'
Vimes lit a cigar. Carrot gave it a look of uncertain disapproval. 'We do thank people for not smoking in here, sir,' he said.
'Why? You don't know they're not going to,' said Vimes. He leaned against the display cabinet. 'All right, captain. Why am I really going to... Bonk? I don't know a lot about diplomacy, but I do know it's never just about one thing. What's the Low King? Why're our dwarfs scrapping?'
'Well, sir... Have you heard of kruk?'
'Dwarf mining law?' said Vimes.
'Well done, sir. But it's a lot more than that. It's about... how you live. Laws of ownership, marriage laws, inheritance, rules for dealing with disputes of all kinds, that sort of thing. Everything, really. And the Low King... well, you could call him


- 23 -
the final court of appeal. He's advised, of course, but he's got the last word. Still with me?'
'Makes sense so far.'
'And he is crowned on the Scone of Stone and sits on it to2 give his judgements because all the Low Kings have done that ever since B'hrian Bloodaxe, fifteen hundred years ago. It... gives authority.'
Vimes nodded dourly. That made sense, too. You did something because it had always been done, and the explanation was 'But we've always done it this way.' A million dead people can't have been wrong, can they?
'Does he get elected, or born or what?' he said.
'I suppose you could say he's elected,' said Carrot. 'But really a lot of senior dwarfs arrange it among themselves. After listening to other dwarfs, of course. Taking soundings, it's called. Traditionally he's from one of the big families. But... er...'
'Yes?'
'Things are a little different this year. Tempers are a bit... stretched.'
Ah, thought Vimes.
'Wrong dwarf won?' he said.
'Some dwarfs would say so. But it's more that the whole process has been called into question,' said Carrot. 'By the dwarfs in the biggest dwarf city outside Uberwald.'
'Don't tell me, that must be that place Hubwards of—'
'It's Ankh-Morpork, sir.'
'What? We're not a dwarf city!'
'Fifty thousand dwarfs now, sir.'
'Really?'
'Yes, sir.'
'Are you sure?'
2 The dwarfs have quite an inventive mythology about minerals.


- 24 -
'Yes, sir.'
Of course he is, Vimes thought. He probably knows them all by name.
'You have to understand, sir, that there's a sort of big debate going on,' said Carrot. 'On how you define a dwarf.'
'Well, some people might say that they're called dwarfs because—'
'No, sir. Not size. Nobby Nobbs is shorter than many dwarfs, and we don't call him a dwarf.'
'We don't call him a human, either,' said Vimes.
'And, of course, I am also a dwarf.'
'You know, Carrot, I keep meaning to talk to you about that—'
'Adopted by dwarfs, brought up by dwarfs. To dwarfs I'm a dwarf, sir. I can do the rite of k'zakra, I know the secrets of h'ragna, I can ha'lk my g'rakha correctly... I am a dwarf.'
'What do those things mean?'
'I'm not allowed to tell non-dwarfs.' Carrot tactfully tried to stand out of the way of the cigar smoke. 'Unfortunately, some of the mountain dwarfs think that dwarfs who've moved away aren't proper dwarfs either. But this time the kingship has been swung by the views of the Ankh-Morpork dwarfs, and a lot of dwarfs back home don't like it. There's been a lot of bad feeling all round. Families falling out, that sort of thing. Much pulling of beards.'
'Really?' Vimes tried not to smile.
'It's not funny if you're a dwarf.'
'Sorry.'
'And I'm afraid this new Low King is only going to make matters worse, although of course I wish him well.'
'Tough, is he?'
'Er, I think you can assume, sir, that any dwarf who rises sufficiently in dwarf society to even be considered as a candidate for the kingship did not get there by singing the hi-ho song and bandaging wounded animals in the forest. But by dwarf standards, King Rhys Rhysson is a modern thinker, although I hear he doesn't like Ankh-Morpork very much.'
'Sounds like a very clear thinker, too.'


- 25 -
'Anyway, this has upset a lot of the more, er, traditional mountain dwarfs who thought the next king would be Albrecht Albrechtson.'
'Who is not a modern thinker?'
'He thinks even coming up above ground is dangerously non-dwarfish.'
Vimes sighed. 'Well, I can see there's a problem, Carrot, but the thing about this problem, the key point, is that it's not mine. Or yours, dwarf or not.' He tapped the Scone's case.
'Replica, eh?' he said. 'Sure it's not the real one?'
'Sir! There is only one real Scone. We call it the "thing and the whole of the thing".'
'Well, if it's a good replica, who'd know?'
'Any dwarf would, sir,'
'Only joking.'
There was a hamlet down there, where two rivers met. There would be boats.
This was working. The slopes behind him were white and free of dark shapes. No matter how good they were, let them try to outswim a boat...
Hard-packed snow crunched under his feet. He staggered past the few rough hovels, saw the jetty, saw the boats, fought with the frozen rope that moored the nearest one, grabbed an oar and pushed himself out into the current.
There was still no movement on the hills.
Now, at last, he could take stock. It was a bigger boat than one man could handle, but all he had to do was fend off the banks. That'd do for tonight. In the morning he could leave it somewhere, perhaps ask someone to get a message through to the tower, and then he'd buy a horse and...
Behind him, under the tarpaulin in the bows, something started to growl.
They really were very clever.
In a castle not far away the vampire Lady Margolotta sat quietly, leafing through Twurp's Peerage.
It wasn't a very good reference book for the countries on this side of the Ramtops, where the standard work was The Almanac de Gothick, in which she


- 26 -
herself occupied almost four pages3, but if you needed to know who thought they were who in Ankh-Morpork it was invaluable.
Her copy was now bristling with bookmarks. She sighed and pushed it away.
Beside her was a fluted glass containing a red liquid. She took a sip and made a face. Then she stared at the candlelight, and tried to think like Lord Vetinari.
How much did he suspect? How much news got back? The clacks tower had only been up for a month, and it was being roundly denounced
throughout Bonk as an intrusion. But it seemed to be doing a good if stealthy local traffic.
Who would he send?
His choice would tell her everything, she was sure. Someone like Lord Rust or Lord Selachii... ? Well, she'd think a lot less of him. From all that she had heard, and Lady Margolotta heard a lot of things, the Ankh-Morpork diplomatic corps as a whole could not find its backside with a map. Of course, it was good business for a diplomat to appear stupid, right up to the moment where he'd stolen your socks, but Lady Margolotta had met some of Ankh-Morpork's finest and no one could act that well.
The growing howling outside began to get on her nerves. She rang for her butler.
'Yeth, mithtreth?' said Igor, materializing out of the shadows.
'Go and tell the children of the night to make vonderful music somevhere else, Vill you? I have a headache.'
'Indeed, mithtreth.'
Lady Margolotta yawned. It had been a long night. She'd think better after a good day's sleep.
As she went to blow out the candle she glanced again at the book. There was a marker in the Vs.
But... surely even the Patrician couldn't know that much...
She hesitated and then pulled the bellrope above the coffin. Igor reappeared, in the way of Igors.
'Those keen young men at the clacks tower Vill be avake, von't they?'
3 Vampires evolve long names. It's something to do to pass the long years.


- 27 -
'Yeth, mithtreth.'
'Send a clacks to our agent asking for everything about Commander Vimes of the Vatch, vill you?'
'Ith he a diplomat, mithtreth?'
Lady Margolotta lay back. 'No, Igor. He's the reason for diplomats. Close the lid, vill you?'
Sam Vimes could parallel-process. Most husbands can. They learn to follow their own line of thought while at the same time listening to what their wives say. And the listening is important, because at any time they could be challenged and must be ready to quote the last sentence in full. A vital additional skill is being able to scan the dialogue for telltale phrases, such as 'and they can deliver it tomorrow' or 'so I've invited them for dinner' or 'they can do it in blue, really quite cheaply'.
Lady Sybil was aware of this. Sam could coherently carry an entire conversation while thinking about something completely different.
'I'll tell Willikins to pack winter clothes,' she said, watching him. 'It'll be pretty cold up there at this time of year.'
'Yes. That's a good idea.' Vimes continued to stare at a point just above the fireplace.
'We'll have to host a party ourselves, I expect, so we ought to take a cartload of typical Ankh-Morpork food. Show the flag, you know. Do you think I should take a cook along?'
'Yes, dear. That would be a good idea. No one outside the city knows how to make a knuckle sandwich properly.'
Sybil was impressed. Ears operating entirely on automatic had nevertheless triggered the mouth into making a small but pertinent contribution.
She said, 'Do you think we ought to take the alligator with us?'
'Yes, that might be advisable.'
She watched his face. Small furrows formed on Vimes's brow as the ears nudged the brain. He blinked.
'What alligator?'
'You were miles away, Sam. In Uberwald, I expect.'
'Sorry.'


- 28 -
'Is there a problem?'
'Why's he sending me, Sybil?'
'I'm sure Havelock shares with me a conviction that you have hidden depths, Sam.'
Vimes sank gloomily into his armchair. It was, he felt, a persistent flaw in his wife's otherwise practical and sensible character that she believed, against all evidence, that he was a man of many talents. He knew he had hidden depths. There was nothing in them that he'd like to see float to the surface. They contained things that should be left to lie.
There was also a nagging worry that he couldn't quite pin down. Had he been able to, he might have expressed it like this: policemen didn't go on holiday. Where you got policemen, as Lord Vetinari was wont to remark, you got crime. So if he went to Bonk, however you pronounced the damn place, there would be a crime. It was something the world always laid on for policemen.
'It'll be nice to see Serafine again,' said Sybil.
'Yes, indeed,' said Vimes.
In Bonk he would not, officially, be a policeman. He did not like this at all. He liked this even less than all the other things.
On the few occasions he'd been outside Ankh-Morpork and its surrounding fiefdom he'd either been going to other local cities where the Ankh-Morpork badge carried some weight or he had been in hot pursuit, that most ancient and honourable of police procedures. From the way Carrot talked, in Bonk his badge would merely figure as extra roughage on someone's menu.
His brow wrinkled again. 'Serafine?'
'Lady Serafine von Uberwald,' said Sybil. 'Sergeant Angua's mother? You remember me telling you last year? We were at finishing school together. Of course, we all knew she was a werewolf, but nobody would ever dream of talking about that sort of thing in those days. Well, you just didn't. There was all that business over the ski instructor, of course, but I'm certain in my own mind that he must have fallen down some crevasse or other. She married the Baron, and they live just outside Beyonk. I write to her with a little news every Hogswatch. A very old Werewolf family.'
'A good pedigree,' said Vimes absently.
'You know you wouldn't like Angua to hear you say that, Sam. Don't worry so. You'll have a chance to relax, I'm sure. It'll be good for you.'


- 29 -
'Yes, dear.'
'It'll be like a second honeymoon,' said Sybil.
'Yes indeed,' said Vimes, remembering that what with one thing and another they'd never really had a first one.
'On that, er, subject,' said Sybil, a little more hesitantly, 'you remember I told you I was going to see old Mrs Content?'
'Oh, yes, how is she?' Vimes was staring at the fireplace again. It wasn't just old schoolfriends. Sometimes it seemed Sybil kept in touch with anyone she'd ever met. Her Hogswatch card list ran to a second volume.
'Quite well, I believe. Anyway, she agrees that—'
There was a knocking at the door.
She sighed. 'It's Willikins' evening off,' she said. 'You'd better answer it, Sam. I know you want to.'
'I've told them not to disturb me unless it's serious,' said Vimes, getting up.
'Yes, but you think all crime is serious, Sam.'
Carrot was on the doorstep. 'It's a bit... political, sir,' he said.
'What's so political at a quarter to ten at night, captain?'
'The Dwarf Bread Museum's been broken into, sir,' said Carrot.
Vimes looked into Carrot's honest blue eyes.
'A thought occurs to me, captain,' he said slowly. 'And the thought is: a certain item has gone missing.'
'That's right, sir.'
'And it's the replica Scone.'
'Yes, sir. Either they broke in just after we left, or,' Carrot licked his lips nervously, 'they were hiding while we were there.'
'Not rats, then.'
'No, sir. Sorry, sir.'
Vimes fastened his cloak and took his helmet off its peg.


- 30 -
'So someone has stolen a replica of the Scone of Stone a few weeks before the real one is due to be used in a very important ceremony,' he said. 'I find this intriguing.'
'That's what I thought too, sir.'
Vimes sighed. 'I hate the political ones.'
When they'd gone, Lady Sybil sat for a while staring at her hands. Then she took a lamp into the library and pulled down a slim volume bound in white leather on which had been embossed in gold the words 'Our Wedding'.
It had been a strange event. Ankh-Morpork's high society — so high that it's stinking, Sam always said — had turned up, mostly out of curiosity. She was Ankh-Morpork's most eligible spinster, who'd never thought she'd be married, and he was 'a mere captain of the guard who tended to annoy a lot of people.
And here were the iconographs of the event. There she was, looking rather more expansive than radiant, and there Sam was, scowling at the viewer with his hair hastily smoothed down. There was Sergeant Colon with his chest inflated so much his feet had almost left the ground, and Nobby grinning widely or perhaps just making a face; it was so hard to tell with Nobby.
Sybil turned over the pages with care. She had put a sheet of tissue between each one to protect them.
In many ways, she told herself, she was very lucky. She was proud of Sam. He worked hard for a lot of people. He cared about people who weren't important. He always had far more to cope with than was good for him. He was the most civilized man she'd ever met. Not a gentleman, thank goodness, but a gentle man.
She never really knew what it was he did. Oh, she knew what the job was, but by all accounts he didn't spend much time behind his desk. When he eventually came to bed, he tended to drop his clothes straight into the laundry basket, so she'd only hear later from the laundry girl about the bloodstains and the mud. There were rumours of chases over rooftops, hand-to-hand and knee-to-groin fights with men who had names like Harry 'The Boltcutter' Weems...
There was a Sam Vimes she knew, who went out and came home again, and out there was another Sam Vimes who hardly belonged to her and lived in the same world as all those men with the dreadful names.
Sybil Ramkin had been brought up to be thrifty, thoughtful, genteel in an outdoor sort of way, and to think kindly of people.


- 31 -
She looked at the pictures again, in the silence of the house. Then she blew her nose loudly and went off to do the packing and other sensible things.
Corporal Cheery Littlebottom pronounced her name 'Cheri'. She was a she, and therefore a rare bloom in Ankh-Morpork.
It wasn't that dwarfs weren't interested in sex. They saw the vital need for fresh dwarfs to- leave their goods to and continue the mining work after they had gone. It was simply that they also saw no point in distinguishing between the sexes anywhere but in private. There was no such thing as a dwarfish female pronoun or, once the children were on solids, any such thing as women's work.
Then Cheery Littlebottom had arrived in Ankh-Morpork and had seen that there were men out there who did not wear chain-mail or leather underwear4 , but did wear interesting colours and exciting make-up, and these men were called 'women'5. And in the little bullet head the thought had arisen: 'Why not me?'
Now she was being denounced in cellars and dwarf bars across the city, as the first dwarf in Ankh-Morpork to wear a skirt. It was hardwearing brown leather and as objectively erotic as a piece of wood but, as some older dwarfs would point out, somewhere under there were his knees.6
Worse, they were now finding that among their sons were some — they choked on the word —'daughters'. Cheery was only the frothy bit on the tip of the wave. Some younger dwarfs were shyly wearing eyeshadow and declaring that, as a matter of fact, they didn't like beer. A current was running through dwarf society.
Dwarf society was not against a few wellthrown rocks in the direction of those bobbing on the current, but Captain Carrot had put the word on the street that this would be assault on an officer, a subject on which the Watch held views, and however short the miscreants their feet really would not touch the ground.
Cheery had retained her beard and round iron helmet, of course. It was one thing to declare that you were female, but quite unthinkable to declare that you weren't a dwarf. '
'Open and shut case, sir,' she said when she saw Vimes come in. 'They opened the window in the back room to get in, a very neat job, and didn't shut the front door after they left. Smashed the Scone's case. There's the glass all round the stand. Didn't take anything else that I can see. Left a lot of footprints in the dust.
4 At least, of the sort she normally wore.
5 And, just lately, Corporal Nobbs.
6 They couldn't bring themselves to utter the word 'her'.


- 32 -
I took a few pictures, but they're scuffed up and weren't much good in the first place. That's about it, really.'
'No dropped fag-ends, wallets or bits of paper with an address on them?' said Vimes.
'No, sir. They were inconsiderate thieves.'
'They certainly were,' said Carrot grimly.
'A question that springs to mind,' said Vimes, 'is: why does it reek even worse of cat's piss now?'
'It is rather sharp, isn't it?' said Cheery. 'With a hint of sulphur, too. Constable Ping said it was like this when he arrived, but there's no cat prints.'
Vimes crouched down and looked at the broken glass. 'How did we find out about this?' he said, prodding a few fragments.
'Constable Ping heard the tinkle, sir. He went round the back and saw the window was open.
Then the crooks got out through the front door.' 'Sorry about that, sir,' said Ping, stepping forward and saluting. He was a cautious-looking young man who appeared permanently poised to answer a question.
'We all make mistakes,' said Vimes. 'You heard glass break?'
'Yessir. And someone swore.'
'Really? What did they say
'Er... "Bugger", sir.'
'And you went around the back and saw the broken window and you... ?'
'I called out, "Is there anyone there?" sir.'
'Really? And what would you have done if a voice had said "No"? No, don't answer that. What happened next?'
'Er... I heard a lot more glass break and when I got round to the front the door was open and they were gone. So I legged it back to the Yard and told Captain Carrot, sir, knowing he sets a lot of store by this place.'
'Thank you... Ping, is it?'
'Yessir.' Entirely unasked, but obviously prepared to answer, Ping said, 'It's a dialect word meaning "watermeadow", sir.'


- 33 -
'Off you go, then.'
The lance-constable visibly sagged with relief, and left.
Vimes let his mind unfocus a little. He enjoyed moments like these, the little bowl of time when the crime lay before him and he believed that the world was capable of being solved. This was the time you really looked to see what was there, and sometimes the things that weren't there were the most interesting things of all.
The Scone had been kept on a plinth about three feet high, inside a case made of five sheets of glass forming a box that was screwed down on the plinth.
'They smashed the glass by accident,' he said eventually.
'Really, sir?'
'Look here, see?' Vimes pointed to three loose screws, neatly lined up. 'They were trying to take the box apart carefully. It must have slipped.'
'But what's the point?' said Carrot. 'It's just a replica, sir! Even if you could find a buyer, it's not worth more than a few dollars.'
'If it's a good one you could swap it with the real thing,' said Vimes.
'Well, yes, I suppose you could try,' said Carrot. 'There would be a bit of a problem, though.'
'What is it?'
'Dwarfs aren't stupid, sir. The replica has got a big cross carved into the underside. And it's only made of plaster in any case.'
'Oh.'
'But it was a good idea, sir,' Carrot said encouragingly. 'You weren't to know.'
'I wonder if the thieves knew.'
'Even if they didn't, they wouldn't have a hope of getting away with it, sir.'
'The real Scone is very well guarded,' said Cheery. 'It's very rare that most dwarfs get a chance to see it.'
'And other people would notice if you had a great lump of rock up your jumper,' said Vimes, more or less to himself. 'So, this was a stupid crime. But it doesn't feel stupid. I mean, why go to all this trouble? The lock on that door is a joke. You could kick it right out of the woodwork. If I was going to pinch this thing, I could be in here and out again before the glass had stopped tinkling. What would be the point of being quiet at this time of night?'


- 34 -
The dwarf had been rummaging under a nearby display cabinet. She drew her hand out. Drying blood glistened on the blade of a screwdriver.
'See?' said Vimes. 'Something slipped, and someone cut their hand. What's the point of all this, Carrot? Cat's piss and sulphur and screwdrivers... I hate it when you get too many clues. It makes it so damn hard to solve anything.'
He threw the screwdriver down. By sheer luck it hit the floorboards tip first and stood there shuddering.
'I'm going home,' he said. 'We'll find out what this is all about when it starts to smell.'
Vimes spent the following morning trying to learn about two foreign countries. One of them turned out to be called Ankh-Morpork.
Uberwald was easy. It was five or six times bigger than the whole of the Sto Plains, and stretched all the way up to the Hub. It was so thickly forested, so creased by little mountain ranges and beset by rivers, that it was largely unmapped. It was mostly unexplored, too7. The people who lived there had other things on their minds, and the people from outside who came to explore went into the forests and never came out again. And for centuries no one had bothered about the place. You couldn't sell things to people hidden by too many trees.
It was probably the coach road that had changed everything, a few years back, when they drove it all the way through to Genua. A road is built to follow. Mountain people had always gravitated to the plains, and in recent years Uberwald folk had joined them. The news got back home: there's money to be made in Ankh-Morpork, bring the kids. You don't need to bring the garlic, though, because all the vampires work down at the kosher butchers'. And if you're pushed in Ankh-Morpork, you're allowed to push back. No one cares enough about you to want to kill you.
Vimes could just about tell the difference between the Uberwald dwarfs and the ones from Copperhead, who were shorter, noisier and rather more at home among humans. The Uberwald dwarfs were quiet, tended to scuttle around corners, and often didn't speak Morporkian. In some of the alleys off Treacle Mine Road you could believe you were in another country. But they were what every copper desires in a citizen. They were no trouble. They mostly had jobs working for one another, they paid their taxes rather more readily than humans did, although to be honest there were small piles of mouse droppings that yielded more money than most Ankh-Morpork citizens, and generally any problems they
7 At least by proper explorers. Just living there doesn't count.


- 35 -
had they sorted out amongst themselves. If such people ever come to the attention of the police, it's usually only as a chalk outline.
It turned out, though, that within the community, behind the grubby facades of all those tenements and workshops in Cable Street and Whalebone Lane, there were vendettas and feuds that, had their origins in two adjoining mine shafts five hundred miles away and a thousand years ago. There were pubs you only drank in if you were from a particular mountain. There were streets you didn't walk down if your clan mined a particular lode. The way you wore your helmet, the way you parted your beard spoke complicated volumes to other dwarfs. They didn't even hand a piece of paper to Vimes.
'Then there's the way you krazak your G'ardrgh,' said Corporal Littlebottom.
'I won't even ask,' said Vimes.
'I'm afraid I can't explain in any case,' said Cheery.
'Have I got a Gaadrerghuh?' said Vimes.
Cheery winced at the mispronunciation. 'Yes, sir. Everyone has. But only a dwarf can krazak his properly,' she said. 'Or hers,' she added.
Vimes sighed and looked down at the pages of scrawl in his notebook under the heading 'Uberwald'. He wasn't-strictly aware of it, but he treated even geography as if he was investigating a crime ('Did you see who carved out the valley? Would you recognize that glacier if you saw it again?').
'I'm going to make a lot of mistakes, Cheery,' he said.
'I shouldn't worry about that, sir. Humans always do. But most dwarfs can spot if you're trying not to make them.'
'Are you sure you don't mind coming?'
'Got to face it sooner or later, sir.'
Vimes shook his head sadly. 'I don't get it, Cheery. There's all this fuss about a female dwarf trying to act like, like—'
'A lady, sir?'
'Right, and yet no one says anything about Carrot being called a dwarf, but he's a human—'
'No, sir. Like he says, he's a dwarf. He was adopted by dwarfs, he's performed the Y grad, he observes the j'kargra insofar as that's possible in a city. He's a dwarf.'


- 36 -
'He's six foot high!'
'He's a tall dwarf, sir. We don't mind if he wants to be a human as well. Not even the drudak'ak would have a problem with that.'
'I'm running out of throat sweets here, Cheery. What was that?'
'Look, sir, most of the dwarfs here are... well, I suppose you'd call them liberal, sir. They're mainly from the mountains behind Copperhead, you know? They get along with humans. Some of them even acknowledge that... they've got daughters, sir. But some of the more... oldfashioned... Uberwald dwarfs haven't got out so much. They act as if B'hrian Bloodaxe was still alive. That's why we call them drudak'ak.'
Vimes had a go, but he knew that to really speak dwarfish you needed a lifetime's study and, if at all possible, a serious throat infection.
'"above ground"... "they negatively"...' he faltered.
'"They do not get out in the fresh air enough,"' Cheery supplied.
'Ah, right. And everyone thought the new king was going to be one of these?'
'They say Albrecht's never seen sunlight in his life. His clan never goes above ground in daylight. Everyone was certain it'd be him.'
And as it turned out it wasn't, thought Vimes. Some of the Uberwald dwarfs hadn't supported him. And the world had moved on. There were plenty of dwarfs around now who had been born in Ankh-Morpork. Their kids went around with their helmets on back to front and spoke dwarfish only at home. Many of them wouldn't know a pick-axe if you hit them with it8. They weren't about to be told how to run their lives by an old dwarf sitting on a stale bun under some distant mountain.
He tapped his pencil on his notebook thoughtfully. And because of this, he thought, dwarfs are punching one another on my streets.
'I've seen more of those dwarf sedan chair things around lately,' he said. 'You know, the ones carried by a couple of trolls. They have thick leather curtains...'
'Drudak'ak,' said Cheery. 'Very... traditional dwarfs. If they have to go out in daylight, they don't look at it.'
'I don't recall them a year ago.'
8 At least, if you hit them hard enough.


- 37 -
Cheery shrugged. 'There's lots of dwarfs here now, sir. The drudak'ak feel they're among dwarfs now. They don't have to deal with humans for anything.'
'They don't like us?'
'They won't even talk to a human. They're fairly choosy about talking to most dwarfs, to tell you the truth.'
'That's daft!' said Vimes. 'How do they get food? You can't live on fungi! How do they trade ore, dam streams, get wood for shoring up their shafts?'
'Well, either other dwarfs are paid to do it or humans are employed,' said Cheery. 'They can afford it. They're very good miners. Well, they own very good mines, in any case.'
'Sounds to me they're a bunch of—' Vimes stopped himself. He was aware that a wise man should always respect the folkways of others, to use Carrot's happy phrase, but Vimes often had difficulty with this idea. For one thing, there were people in the world whose folkways consisted of gutting other people like clams and this was not a'procedure that commanded, in Vimes, any kind of respect at all.
'I'm not thinking diplomatically, am I?' he said. Cheery watched him with a carefully blank expression.
'Oh, I don't know about that, sir,' she said. 'You didn't actually finish the sentence. And, well, a lot of dwarfs respect them. You know... feel better for seeing them.'
Vimes looked puzzled. Then understanding dawned.
'Oh, I get it,' he said. 'I bet they say things like "Thank goodness people are keeping up the old ways," eh?'
'That's right, sir. I suppose that inside every dwarf in Ankh-Morpork is a little part of him — or her — that knows real dwarfs live underground.'
Vimes doodled on his notepad. 'Back home,' he thought. Carrot had innocently talked about dwarfs 'back home'. To all dwarfs far, away, the mountains were 'back home'. It was funny how people were people everywhere you went, even if the people concerned weren't the people the people who made up the phrase 'people are people everywhere' had traditionally thought of as people. And even if you weren't virtuous, as you had been brought up to understand the term, you did like to see virtue in other people, provided it did not cost you anything.
'Why have these d'r... these traditional dwarfs come here, though? Ankh-Morpork's full of humans. They must have their work cut out avoiding humans.'


- 38 -
'They're... needed, sir. Dwarf law is complicated, and there's often disputes. And they conduct marriages and that sort of thing.'
'You make them sound more like priests.'
'Dwarfs aren't religious, sir.'
'Of course. Oh, well. Thank you, corporal. Off you go. Any fallout from last night? No sulphurous incontinent cats have come forward to confess?'
'No, sir. The Campaign for Equal Heights has put out a pamphlet saying it was another example of the second-class treatment of dwarfs in the city, but it was the same one they always put out. You know, the one with blanks to fill in the details.'
'Nothing changes, Cheery. See you tomorrow morning, then. Send Detritus up.'
Why him? Ankh-Morpork was lousy with diplomats. It was practically what the upper classes were for, and it was easy for them because half the foreign bigwigs they'd meet were old chums they'd played Wet Towel Tag with back at school. They tended to be on first-name terms, even with people whose names were Ahmed or Fong. They knew which forks to use. They hunted, shot and fished. They moved in circles that more or less overlapped the circles of their foreign hosts, and were a long way from the rather grubby circles that people like Vimes went around in every working day. They knew all the right nods and winks. What chance had he got against a tie and a crest?
Vetinari was throwing him amongst the wolves. And the dwarfs. And the vampires. Vimes shuddered. And Vetinari never did anything without a reason.
'Come in, Detritus.'
It always amazed Sergeant Detritus that Vimes knew he was at the door. Vimes had never mentioned that the office wall creaked and bent inwards as the big troll made his way along the corridor.
'You want to see me, sir.'
'Yes. Sit down, man. It's this Uberwald business.'
'Yessir.'
'How do you feel about visiting the old country?'
Detritus's face remained impassive, as it always did when he was waiting patiently for things to make sense.
'Uberwald, I mean,' Vimes prompted.


- 39 -
'Dunno, sir. I was just a pebble when we left dere. Dad wanted a better life in der big city.'
'There'll be a lot of dwarfs, Detritus.' Vimes didn't bother to mention vampires and werewolves. Either of those who attacked a troll was making the last big mistake of its career in any case. Detritus carried a 2,OOOlb-draw crossbow as a hand weapon.
'Days Okay, sir. I'm very modern 'bout dwarfs.'
'These might be a bit old-fashioned about you, though.'
'Dem deep-down dwarfs?'
'That's right.'
'I heard about dem.'
'There's still wars with trolls up near the Hub, I hear. Tact and diplomacy will be called for.'
'You have come to der right troll for dat, sir,' said Detritus.
'You did push that man through that wall last week, Detritus.'
'It was done with tact, sir. Quite a fin wall.'
Vimes let it go at that. The man in question had just laid out three watchmen with a club, which Detritus had broken in one hand before selecting the suitably tactful wall.
'See you tomorrow, then. Best dress armour, remember. Send Angua now, please.'
'She's not here, sir.'
'Blast. Put out some messages for her, will you?'.
Igor lurched through the castle corridors, dragging one foot after the other in the approved fashion.
He was Igor, son of Igor, nephew of several Igors, brother of Igors and cousin of more Igors than he could remember without checking up in his diary. Igors did not change a winning formula9.
9 Especially if it was green, and bubbled.


- 40 -
And, as a clan, Igors liked working for vampires. Vampires kept regular hours, were generally polite to their servants and, an important extra, didn't require much work in the bedmaking and cookery department, and tended to have cool, roomy cellars where an Igor could pursue his true calling. This more than made up for those occasions when you had to sweep up their ashes.
He entered Lady Margolotta's crypt and knocked politely on the coffin lid. It moved aside a fraction.
'Yes?'
'Thorry to wake you in the middle of the afternoon, your ladythip, but you did thay—'
'All right. And-?'
'It's going to be Vimeth, ladythip.'
A dainty hand came out of the partly opened coffin and punched the air.
'Yes!'
'Meth, ladythip.'
'Veil, veil. Samuel Vimes. Poor devil. Do the doggies know?'
Igor nodded. 'The Baron'th Igor wath altho collecting a methage, ladythip.'
'And the dwarfs?'
'It ith an official appointment, ladythip. Everyone knowth. Hith Grathe the Duke of Ankh-Morpork, Thir Thamuel Vimeth, Commander of the Ankh-Morpork Thity Watch.'
'Then the midden has hit the windmill, Igor.'
'Very well put, ladythip. No one liketh a thort thower of thit.'
'I imagine, Igor, that he'll leave them behind.'
Let us consider a castle from the point of view of its furniture.
This one has chairs, yes, but they don't look very lived in. There is a huge sofa near the fire, and that is ragged with use, but other furnishings look as if they're there merely for show.
There is a long oak table, well polished and looking curiously unused for such an old piece of furniture. Possibly the reason for this is that on the floor around it are a large number of white earthenware bowls.


- 41 -
One of them has 'Father' written on it.
The Baroness Serafine von Uberwald slammed shut Twurp's Peerage, irritably.
'The man is a... a nothing,' she said. 'A paper man. A man of straw. An insult.'
`The name Vimes goes back a long time,' said Wolfgang von Uberwald, who was doing one-handed press-ups in front of the fire.
'So does the name Smith. What of it?'
Wolf changed to the other hand, in mid-air. He was naked. He liked his muscles to get an airing. They shone. Someone with an anatomical chart could have picked out every one. They might also have remarked on the unusual way his blond hair grew not only on his head but down and across his shoulders as well.
'He is a duke, Mother.'
'Hah! Ankh-Morpork hasn't even got a king!'
'... nineteen, twenty... I hear stories about that, Mother...'
'Oh, stories. Sybil writes silly little letters to me every year! Sam this, Sam that. Of course, she had to be grateful for what she could get, but... the man is just a thief-taker, after all. I shall refuse to see him.'
'You will not do that, Mother,' Wolf grunted. 'That would be... twenty-nine, thirty... dangerous. What do you tell Lady Sybil about us?'
'Nothing! I don't write back, of course. A rather sad and foolish woman.'
'And she still writes every year?... thirty-six, thirty-seven...'
'Yes. Four pages, usually. And that tells you everything about her you need to know. Where is your father?'
A flap in the bottom of a nearby door swung back and a large, heavy-set wolf trotted in. It glanced around the room and then shook itself vigorously. The Baroness bridled.
'Guye! You know what I said! It's after six! Change when you come in from the garden!'
The wolf gave her a look and strolled behind a massive oak screen at the far end of the room. There was a... noise, soft and rather strange, not so much an actual sound as a change in the texture of the air.
The Baron walked around from behind the screen, doing up the cord of a tattered dressing gown. The Baroness sniffed.


- 42 -
'At least your father wears clothes,' she said.
'Clothes are unhealthy, Mother,' said Wolf calmly. 'Nakedness is purity.'
The Baron sat down. He was a large, red-faced man, insofar as a face could be seen under the beard, hair, moustache and eyebrows, which were engaged in a bitter four-way war over the remaining areas of bare skin.
'Well?' he growled.
'Vimes the thief-taker from Ankh-Morpork is going to be the alleged ambassador!' snapped the Baroness.
'Dwarfs?'
'Of course they'll be told.'
The Baron sat staring at nothing, with the same expression Detritus used when a new thought was being assembled.
'Bad?' he ventured, at last.
'Guye, I've told you about this a thousand times!' said the Baroness. 'You're spending far too much time changed! You know what you're like afterwards. Supposing we had official visitors?'
'Bite 'em!'
'You see? Go on off to bed and don't come down until you're fit to be human!'
'Vimes could ruin everything, Father,' said Wolfgang. He was now doing handstands, using one hand.
'Guye! Down!'
The Baron stopped trying to scratch his ear with his leg. 'Do?' he said.
Wolfgang's gleaming body dipped a moment as he changed hands again.
'City life makes men weak. Vimes will be fun. They do say he likes running, though.' He gave a little laugh. 'We shall have to see how fast he is.'
'His wife says he's very soft-hearted- Guye!
Don't you dare do that! If you're going to do that sort of thing do it upstairs!'
The Baron looked only moderately ashamed, but readjusted his clothing anyway.
'Bandits!' he said.


- 43 -
'Yes, they could be a problem at this time of year,' said Wolfgang.
'At least a dozen,' said the Baroness. 'Yes, that should—'
Wolf grunted, upside down. 'No, Mother. You are being stupid. His coach must get here safely. You understand? When he is here... that is a different matter.'
The Baron's massive eyebrows tangled with a thought. 'Plan! King!'
'Exactly.'
The Baroness sighed. 'I don't trust that little dwarf.'
Wolf somersaulted on to his feet. 'No. But trustworthy or not, he's all we've got. Vimes must get here, with his soft heart. He may even be useful. Perhaps we should... assist matters.'
'Why?' snapped the Baroness. 'Let Ankh-Morpork look after their own!'
There was a knock on the door while Vimes was having breakfast. Willikins ushered in a small thin man in neat but threadbare black clothes, whose overlarge head gave him the appearance of a lolly nearing the last suck. He carried a black bowler hat the way a soldier carries his helmet, and walked like a man who had something wrong with his knees.
'I am so sorry to disturb your grace...'
Vimes laid down his knife. He'd been peeling an orange. Sybil insisted he eat fruit.
'Not your grace,' he said. 'Just Vimes. Sir Samuel, if you must. Are you Vetinari's man?'
'Inigo Skimmer, sir. Mhm-mhm. I am to travel with you to Uberwald.'
'Ah, you're the clerk who's going to do all the whispering and winking while I hand around the cucumber sandwiches, are you?'
'I will try to be of service, sir, although I'm not much of a winker. Mhm-mhm.'
'Would you like some breakfast?'
'I ate already, sir. Mhm-mhm.'
Vimes looked the clerk up and down. It wasn't so mush that his head was big, it was simply that someone appeared to have squeezed the bottom half of it and forced everything up into the top. He was going bald, too, and had carefully teased the remaining strands of hair across the pink dome. It was hard to tell his age. He could be twenty-five and a big worrier, or a fresh-faced forty. Vimes


- 44 -
inclined to the former — the man had the look of someone who had spent his life watching the world over the top of a book. And there was that... well, was it a nervous laugh? A giggle? An unfortunate way of clearing his throat?
And that strange way he walked...
'Not even some toast? A piece of fruit? These oranges are fresh from Klatch, I really can recommend them.'
Vimes tossed one at the man. It bounced off his arm, and Skimmer took a step backwards, mildly appalled at the upper class's habit of fruithurling.
'Are you all right, sir? Mhm-mhm?'
'Sorry about that,' said Vimes. 'I was carried away by fruit.'
He laid aside his napkin and got up from the table, putting his arm around Skimmer's shoulders.
'I'll just take you into the Mildly Yellow drawing room where you can wait,' he said, walking him towards the door and patting him on the arm in a friendly way. 'The coaches are loaded up. Sybil is re-grouting the bathroom, learning Ancient Klatchian and doing all those other little last-minute things women always do. You're with us in the big coach.'
Skimmer recoiled. 'Oh, I couldn't do that, sir! I'll travel with your retinue. Mhm-mhm. Mhmmhm.'
'If you mean Cheery and Detritus, they're in there with us,' said Vimes, noting the look of horror deepen slightly. 'You need four for a decent game of cards and the road's as boring as hell for most of the way.'
'And, er, your servants?'
'Willikins and the cook and Sybil's maid are in the other coach.'
'Oh.'
Vimes smiled inwardly. He remembered the saying from his childhood: too poor to paint, but too proud to whitewash...
'Bit of a tough choice, is it?' he said. 'I'll tell you what, you can come in our coach but we'll give you a hard seat and patronize you from time to time, how about that?'
'I am afraid you are making a mockery of me, Sir Samuel. Mhm-mhm.'


- 45 -
'No, but I may be assisting. And now, if you'll excuse me, I've got to nip down to the Yard to sort out a few last-minute things...'
A quarter of an hour later Vimes walked into the charge room at the Yard. Sergeant Stronginthearm looked up, saluted, and then ducked to avoid the orange that was tossed at his head.
'Sir?' he said, bewildered.
'Just testing, Stronginthearm.'
'Did I pass, sir?'
'Oh, yes. Keep the orange. It's full of vitamins.'
'My mother always told me those things could kill you, sir:'
Carrot was waiting patiently in Vimes's office. Vimes shook his head. He knew all the places to tread in the corridor and he knew he didn't make a sound, and he'd never once caught Carrot reading his paperwork, not even upside down. Just once it'd be nice to catch him out at something. If the man was any straighter you could use him as a plank.
Carrot stood up and saluted:
'Yes, yes, we haven't got a lot of time for that now,' said Vimes, sitting behind his desk. 'Anything new overnight?'
'An unattributed murder, sir. A tradesman called Wallace Sonky. Found in one of his own vats with his throat cut. No Guild seal or note or anything. We're treating it as suspicious.'
'Yes, I think that sounds fairly suspicious,' said Vimes. `Unless he has a record as a very careless shaver. What kind of vat?'
'Er, rubber, sir.'
'Rubber comes in vats? Wouldn't he bounce out?'
'No, sir. It's a liquid in the vat, sir. He makes rubber... things.'
'Hang on, I remember seeing something once... Don't they make things by dipping them in the rubber? You make, sort of, the right shapes and dip them in to get gloves, boots... that sort of thing?'
'Er, that, er, sort of thing, sir.'
Something about Carrot's uneasy manner got through to Vimes. And the little file at the back of his brain eventually waved a card.


- 46 -
'Sonky, Sonky... Carrot, we're not talking about Sonky as in "a packet of Sonkies", are we?'
Now Carrot was bright red with embarrassment. 'Yes, sir!'
'My gods, what was he dipping in the vat?'
'He'd been thrown in, sir. Apparently.'
'But he's practically a national hero!'
'Sir?'
'Captain, the housing shortage in Ankh-Morpork would be a good deal worse if it wasn't for old man Sonky and his penny-a-packet preventatives. Who'd want to do away with him?'
'People do have Views, sir,' said Carrot coldly.
Yes, you do, don't you? Vimes thought. Dwarfs don't hold with that sort of thing.
'Well, put some men on it. Anything else?'
'A Carter assaulted Constable Swires last night for clamping his cart.'
'Assault?'
'Tried to stamp on him, sir.'
Vimes had a mental picture of Constable Swires, a gnome six inches tall but a mile high in pent-up aggression.
'How is he?'
'Well, the man can speak, but it'll be a little while before he can climb back on a cart again. Apart from that, it's all run-of-the-mill stuff.'
'Nothing more about the Scone theft?'
'Not really. Lots of accusations in the dwarf community, but no one really knows anything. Like you say, sir, we'll probably know more when it goes bad.'
'Any word on the street?'
'Yes, sir. It's "Halt", sir. Sergeant Colon painted it at the top of Lower Broadway. The carters are a lot more careful now. Of course, someone has to shovel the manure off every hour or so.'
'This whole traffic thing is not making us very popular, captain.'


- 47 -
'No, sir. But we aren't popular anyway. And at least it's bringing in money for the city treasury. Er... there is another thing, sir.'
'Yes?'
'Have you seen Sergeant Angua, sir?'
'Me? No. I was expecting her to be here.' Then Vimes noticed just the very edge of concern in Carrot's voice. 'Something wrong?'
'She didn't turn up for duty last night. It wasn't full moon, so it's a bit... odd. Nobby said she was rather concerned about something when they were on duty the other day.'
Vimes nodded. Of course, most people were concerned about something if they were on duty with Nobby. They tended to look at clocks a lot.
'Have you been to her lodgings?'
'Her bed hadn't been slept in,' said Carrot. 'Or her basket, either,' he added.
'Well, I can't help you there, Carrot. She's your girlfriend.'
'She's been a bit worried about the future, I think,' said Carrot.
'Um, you... she... the, er, werewolf thing?' Vimes stopped, acutely embarrassed.
'It preys on her mind,' said Carrot.
'Perhaps she's just gone somewhere to think about things.' Like how on earth could she go out with a young man who, magnificent though he was, blushed at the idea of a packet of Sonkies.
'That's what I hope, sir,' Carrot said. 'She does that sometimes. It's really quite stressful, being a werewolf in a big city. I know we'd have heard if she'd run into any trouble—'
There was the sound of a harness outside, and the rattle of a coach. Vimes was relieved. Seeing Carrot worried was so unusual that it had the shock of the unfamiliar.
'Well, we'll have to go without her,' he said. 'I want to be kept in touch about everything, captain. A fake Scone going missing a week or two before a big dwarf coronation- That sounds like another shoe is about to drop and it might just hit me. And while you're about it, put the word out that I'm to be sent anything about Sonky, will you? I don't like mysteries. The clacks do a skeleton service as far as Uberwald now, don't they?'


- 48 -
Carrot brightened up. 'It's wonderful, sir, isn't it? In a few months they say we'll be able to send messages all the way from Ankh-Morpork to Genua in less than a day!'
'Yes indeed. I wonder if by then we'll have anything sensible to say to each other.'
Lord Vetinari stood at his window watching the semaphore tower on the other side of the river. All eight of the big shutters facing him were blinking furiously — black, white, white, black, white...
Information was flying into the air. Twenty miles behind him, on another tower in Sto Lat. someone was looking through a telescope and shouting out numbers.
How quickly the future comes upon us, he thought.
He always suspected the poetic description of Time like an ever-rolling stream. Time, in his experience, moved more like rocks... sliding, pressing, building up force underground and then, with one jerk that shakes the crockery, a whole field of turnips mysteriously slips sideways by six feet.
Semaphore had been around for centuries, and everyone knew that knowledge had a value, and everyone knew that exporting goods was a way of making money. And then, suddenly, someone realized how much money you could make by exporting to Genua by tomorrow things known in Ankh-Morpork today. And some bright young man in the Street of Cunning Artificers had been unusually cunning.
Knowledge, information, power, words... flying through the air, invisible...
And suddenly the world was tap-dancing on quicksand.
In that case, the prize went to the best dancer.
Lord Vetinari turned away, took some papers from a desk drawer, walked to a wall, touched a certain area, and stepped quickly through the hidden door that noiselessly swung open.
Beyond was a corridor, lit by borrowed light from high windows and paved with small flagstones. He walked forward, hesitated, said 'No, this is Tuesday,' and moved his descending foot so that it landed on a stone that in every respect appeared to be exactly the same as its fellows10.
Anyone overhearing his progress along the passages and stairs might have caught muttered phrases on the lines of 'The moon is waxing...' and 'Yes, it is
10 Except that the ones around it were not good stones to tread on if it was a Tuesday.


- 49 -
before noon.' A really keen listener would have heard the faint whirring and ticking inside the walls.
A really keen and paranoid listener would have reflected that anything Lord Vetinari said aloud even while he was alone might not be totally worth believing. Not, certainly, if your life depended on it.
Eventually he reached a door, which he unlocked.
There was a large attic room beyond, suddenly airy and bright and cheerful with sunlight from the windows in the roof. It seemed to be a cross between a workshop and a storeroom. Several bird skeletons hung from the ceiling and there were a few other bones on the worktables, along with coils of wire and metal springs and tubes of paint and more tools, many of them probably unique, than you normally saw in any one place. Only a narrow bed, wedged between a thing like a loom with wings and a large bronze statue, suggested that someone actually lived here. They were clearly someone who was obsessively interested in everything.
What interested Lord Vetinari right now was the device all by itself on a table in the middle of the room. It looked like a collection of copper balls balanced on one another. Steam was hissing gently from a few rivets, and occasionally the device went blup
'Your lordship!'
Vetinari looked around. A hand was waving desperately at him from behind an upturned bench.
And something made him look up, as well. The ceiling above him was crusted with some brownish substance, which hung from it like stalactites.
Blup
With quite surprising speed the Patrician was behind the bench. Leonard of Quirm smiled at him from underneath his home-made protective helmet.
'I do apologize,' he said. 'I'm afraid I wasn't expecting anyone to come in. I'm sure it will work this time, however.'
Blup
'What is it?' said Vetinari.
Blup
'I'm not quite sure, but I hope it's a—'


- 50 -
And then it was, suddenly, too noisy to talk.
Leonard of Quirm never dreamed that he was a prisoner. If anything, he was grateful to Vetinari for giving him this airy work space, and regular meals, and laundry, and protecting him from those people who for some reason always wanted to take his perfectly innocent inventions, designed for the betterment of mankind, and use them for despicable purposes. It was amazing how many of them there were — both the people and the inventions. It was as if all the genius of a civilization had funnelled into one head which was, therefore, in a constant state of highly inventive spin. Vetinari often speculated upon the fate of mankind should Leonard keep his mind on one thing for more than an hour or so.
The rushing noise died away. Blup.
Leonard peered cautiously over the bench and smiled broadly. 'Ah! Happily, we appear to have achieved coffee,' he said.
'Coffee?'
Leonard walked over to the table and pulled a small lever on the device. A light. brown foam cascaded into a waiting cup with a noise like a clogged drain.
'Different coffee,' he said. 'Very fast coffee. I rather think you will like it. I'm calling this the Very-Fast-Coffee machine.'
'And that's today's invention, is it?' said Vetinari.
'Well, yes. It would have been a scale model of a device for reaching the moon and other celestial bodies, but I was thirsty.'
'How fortunate.' Lord Vetinari carefully removed an experimental pedal-powered shoepolishing machine from a chair and sat down. 'And I've brought you some more little... messages.'
Leonard almost clapped his hands. 'Oh, good! And I've finished the other ones you gave me last night.'
Lord Vetinari carefully removed a moustache of frothy coffee from his upper lip. 'I beg your-? All of them? You broke the cyphers on all those messages from Uberwald?'
'Oh, they were quite easy after I'd finished the new device,' said Leonard, rummaging through the piles of paper on a bench and handing the Patrician several closely written sheets. 'But once you realize that there are only a limited number of birth dates a_ person can have, and that people do tend to think the same way, cyphers are really not very hard.'


- 51 -
'You mentioned a new device?' said the Patrician.
'Oh, yes. The... thingy. It's all very crude at the moment, but it suffices for these simple codes.'
Leonard pulled a sheet off something vaguely rectangular. It seemed to Vetinari to be all wooden wheels and long thin spars which, he saw when he moved closer, were inscribed thickly with letters and numbers. A number of the wheels were not round but oval or heartshaped or some other curious curve. When Leonard turned a handle, the whole thing moved with a complex oiliness quite disquieting in something merely mechanical.
'And what are you calling it?'
'Oh, you know me and names, my lord. I think of it as the Engine for the Neutralizing of Information by the Generation of Miasmic Alphabets, but I appreciate that it does not exactly roll off the tongue. Er...'
'Yes, Leonard?'
'Er... it's not... wrong, is it — reading other people's messages?'
Vetinari sighed. The worried man in front of him, who was so considerate of life that he carefully dusted around spiders, had once invented a device that fired lead pellets with tremendous speed and force. He thought it would be useful against dangerous animals. He'd designed a thing that could destroy whole mountains. He thought it would be useful in the mining industries. Here was a man who, in his tea break, would doodle an instrument for unthinkable mass destruction in the blank spaces around an exquisite drawing of the fragile beauty of the human smile. With a list of numbered parts. And if you taxed him with it he'd say: ah, but such a thing would make war completely impossible, you see? Because no one would dare use it.
Leonard brightened up as a thought apparently struck him. 'But, on the other hand, the more we know about one another the more we will learn to understand. Now, you asked me to construct some more cyphers for you. I'm sorry, my lord, but I must have misunderstood your requirements. What was wrong with the first ones I did?'
Vetinari sighed. 'I'm afraid they were unbreakable, Leonard.'
'But surely—'
'It's hard to explain,' said Vetinari, aware that what to him were the lucid waters of politics were so much mud to Leonard. 'These new ones you have are... merely devilishly difficult?'


- 52 -
'You specified fiendishly, sir,' said Leonard, looking worried.
'Oh, yes.'
'There does not appear to be a common standard for fiends, my lord, but I did some research in the more accessible occult texts and I believe these cyphers will be considered "difficult" by more than 96 per cent of fiends.'
'Good.'
'They may perhaps verge on the diabolically difficult in places—'
'That is not a problem. I shall use them forthwith.'
Leonard still seemed to have something on his mind. 'It would be so easy to make them archdemonically diff—'
'But these will suffice, Leonard,' said Vetinari.
'My lord,' Leonard almost wailed, 'I really cannot guarantee that sufficiently clever people will be unable to read your messages!'
'Good.'
'But, my lord, they will know what you are thinking!'
Vetinari patted him on the shoulder. 'No, Leonard. They will merely know what is in my messages.'
'I really do not understand, my lord.'
'No, but on the other hand I cannot make exploding coffee. What would the world be like if we were all alike?'
Leonard's face clouded for a moment. 'I'm not sure,' he said, 'but if you'd like me to work on the problem I may be able to devise a—'
'It was merely a figure of speech, Leonard.'
Vetinari shook his head ruefully. It often seemed to him that Leonard, who had pushed intellect into hitherto undiscovered uplands, had discovered there large and specialized pockets of stupidity. What would be the point of cyphering messages that very clever enemies couldn't break? You'd end up not knowing what they thought you thought they were thinking...
'There was one rather strange message from Uberwald, my lord,' said Leonard. 'Yesterday morning.'
'Strange?'


- 53 -
'It was not cyphered.'
'Not at all? I thought everyone used codes.'
'Oh, the sender and recipient are code names, but the message is quite plain. It was a request for information about Commander Vimes, of whom you have often spoken.'
Lord Vetinari went quite still.
'The return message was mostly clear, too. A certain amount of... gossip.'
'All about Vimes? Yesterday morning? Before I-?'
'My lord?'
'Tell me,' said the Patrician. 'This message from Uberwald. It yields no clue at all to the sender?'
Sometimes, like a ray of light through clouds, Leonard could be quite perceptive. 'You think you might know the originator, my lord?'
'Oh, in my younger days I spent some time in Uberwald,' said the Patrician. 'In those days rich young men from Ankh-Morpork used to go on what we called the Grand Sneer, visiting farflung countries and cities in order to see at first hand how inferior they were. Or so it seemed, at any rate. Oh, yes. I spent some time in Uberwald.'
It was not often that Leonard of Quirm paid attention to what people around him were doing, but he saw the faraway look in Lord Vetinari's eye.
'You have fond memories, my lord?' he ventured.
'Hmm? Oh, she was a very... unusual lady but, alas, rather older than me,' said Vetinari.
'Much older, I have to say. But it was a long time ago. Life teaches us its small lessons and we move on.' There was that distant look again. 'Well, well, well...'
'And no doubt the lady is now dead,' said Leonard. He was not much good at this sort of conversation.
'Oh, I very much doubt that,' said Vetinari. 'I have no doubt she thrives.' He smiled. The world was becoming more... interesting. 'Tell me, Leonard,' he said. 'Has it ever occurred to you that one day wars will be fought with brains?'
Leonard picked up his coffee cup. 'Oh dear. Won't that be rather messy?' he said.


- 54 -
Vetinari sighed again. 'Not perhaps as messy as the other sort,' he said, trying the coffee. It really was rather good.
The ducal coach rolled past the last of the outlying buildings and on to the vast, flat Sto Plains. Cheery and Detritus had tactfully decided to ride on the top for the morning, leaving the Duke and Duchess alone inside. Skimmer was indulging in some uneasy class solidarity and riding with the servants for a while.
'Angua seems to have gone into hiding,' said Vimes, watching the cabbage fields pass by.
'Poor girl,' said Sybil. 'The city's not really the place for her.'
'Well, you couldn't winkle Carrot out of it with a big pin,' said Vimes. 'And that's the problem, I suppose.'
'Part of the problem,' said Sybil.
Vimes nodded. The other part, which no one talked about, was children.
Sometimes it seemed to Vimes that everyone knew that Carrot was the true heir to the redundant throne of the city. It just so happened that he didn't want to be. He wanted to be a copper, and everyone went along with the idea. But kingship was a bit like a grand piano -you could put a cover over it, but you could still see what shape it was underneath.
Vimes wasn't sure what you got if a human and a werewolf had kids. Possibly you just got someone who had to shave twice a day around full moon and occasionally felt like chasing carts. And when you remembered what some of the city's rulers had been like, a known werewolf as ruler ought to hold no terrors. It was the buggers who looked human all the time that were the problem. That was just his view, though. Other people might see things differently. No wonder she'd gone off to think about things.
He realized he was looking, unseeing, out of the window.
To take his mind off this he opened the package of papers that Skimmer had handed him just as he got on the coach. It was called 'briefing material'. The man seemed to be an expert on Uberwald, and Vimes wondered how many other clerks there were in the Patrician's palace, beavering away, becoming experts. He settled down glumly and began to read.
The first page showed the crest of the Unholy Empire that had once ruled most of the huge country. Vimes couldn't recall much about it, except that one of the emperors once had a man's hat nailed to his head for a joke. Uberwald seemed to be a big, cold, depressing place, so perhaps people would do anything for a laugh.


- 55 -
The crest was altogether too florid for Vimes's taste, and was dominated by a double-headed bat.
The first document was entitled: The Fatbearing Strata of the Schmaltzberg Region ('the Land of ').
He knew the legend, of course. There had once been five elephants, not four, standing on the back of Great A'Tuin, but one had lost its footing or had been shaken loose and had drifted off into a curved orbit before eventually crashing down, a billion tons of enraged pachyderm, with a force that had rocked the entire world and split it up into the continents people know today. The rocks that fell back had , covered and compressed the corpse and the rest, after millennia of under ground cooking and rendering, was fat history. According to legend, gold and iron and all the other metals were also part of the carcase. After all, an elephant big enough to support the world on its back wasn't going to have ordinary bones, was it?
The notes in front of him were a little more believable, talking about some unknown catastrophe that had killed millions of the mammoths, bison, and giant shrews and then covered them over, pretty much like  in the story. There were notes about old troll sagas and legends of the dwarfs. Possibly ice had been involved. Or a flood. In the case of the trolls, who were believed to be the first species in the world, maybe they'd been there and seen the elephant trumpeting across the sky.
The result, anyway, was the same. Everyone well, everyone except Vimes — knew the best fat came from the Schmaltzberg wells and mines. It made the whitest, brightest candles, the creamiest soap, the hottest, cleanest lamp oil. The yellow tallow from Ankh-Morpork's boilers didn't come close.
Vimes didn't see the point. Gold... now that was important. People died for it. And iron Ankh-Morpork needed iron. Timber, too. Stone, even. Silver, now, was very...
He flicked back to a page headed 'Natural Resources', and under 'Silver' read: 'Silver has not been mined in Uberwald since the Diet of Bugs in Am 1880, and the possession of the metal is technically illegal.'
There was no explanation. He made a note to ask Inigo. After all, where you got werewolves, didn't you need silver? And things must have been pretty bad if everyone had to eat insects.
Anyway, silver was useful, too, but fat was just... fat. It was like biscuits, or tea, or sugar. It was just something that turned up in the cupboard. There was no style to it, no romance. It was stuff in tubs.


- 56 -
A note was clipped to the next page. He read:
' as a metaphor also appears in the Uberwald languages. Depending on context it can mean "a thing that does not exist" (as we would say, "Klatchian mist"), "a thing that is other than it seems" and "a thing that, while unseen, controls events" (in the same way that we would use the term eminence grise).'
I wouldn't, thought Vimes. I don't use words like that.
'Constable Shoe,' said Constable Shoe, when the door of the bootmaker's factory was opened. 'Homicide.'
'You come 'bout Mister Sonky?' said the troll who'd opened the door. Warm damp air blew out into the street, smelling of incontinent cats and sulphur.
'I meant I'm a zombie,' said Reg Shoe. 'I find that telling people right away saves embarrassing misunderstandings later on. But coincidentally, yes, we've come about the alleged deceased.'
'We?' said the troll, making no comment about Reg's grey skin and stitch marks.
'Doon here, bigjobs!'
The troll looked down, not a usual direction in Ankh-Morpork, where people preferred not to see what they were standing in.
'Oh,' he said, and took a few steps backwards.
Some people said that gnomes were no more belligerent than any other race, and this was true. However, the belligerence was compressed down into a body six inches high and, like many things when they are compressed, had an inclination to explode. Constable Swires had been on the force only for a few months, but news had gone around and already he inspired respect, or at least the bladder-trembling terror that can pass for respect on these occasions.
'Don't just stand there gawpin', where's yon stiff?' said Swires, striding into the factory.
'We put him in der cellar,' said the troll. 'And now we got half a ton of liquid rubber runnin' to waste. He'd be livid 'bout that... if he was alive, o'course.'
'Why's it wasted?' said Reg.
'Gone all thick and manky, hasn't it? I'm gonna have to dump it later on, and days not easy. We was supposed to be dippin' a load of Ribbed Magical Delights today, too, but all der ladies felt faint when I hauls him outa der vat and dey went off home.'


- 57 -
Reg Shoe looked shocked. He was not, for various reasons, a patron of Mr Sonky's wares, romance not being a regular feature of the life of the dead, but surely the world of the living had some standards, didn't it?
'You employ ladies here?' he said.
The troll looked surprised. 'Yeah. Sure. It's good steady work. Dey're good workers, too. Always laughing and tellin' jokes while dey're doin' der dippin' and packin', 'specially when we're doin' der Big Boys.' The troll sniffed. 'Pers'nally, I don't unnerstan' der jokes.'
'Them Big Boys are bloody good value for a penny,' said Buggy Swires.
Reg Shoe stared at his tiny partner. There was just no way that he was going to ask the question. But Swires must have seen his expression.
'After a bit of work wi' yon scissors, ye won't find a better mackintosh in the whole city,' said the gnome, and laughed nastily.
Constable Shoe sighed. He knew that Mr Vimes had an unofficial policy of getting ethnic minorities into the Watch,11 but he wasn't sure this was wise in the case of gnomes, even though there was, admittedly, no ethnic group that was more minor. They had an inbuilt resistance to rules. This didn't just apply to the law, but to all the invisible rules that most people obeyed unthinkingly, like 'Do not attempt to eat this giraffe' or 'Do not headbutt people in the ankle just because they won't give you a chip'. It was best to think of Constable Swires simply as a small independent weapon.
'You'd better show us the d- the person who is currently vitally challenged,' he said. They were led downstairs. What was hanging from a beam there would have frightened the life out of anyone who wasn't already a zombie.
'Sorry 'bout dat,' said the troll, pulling it down and tossing it into a corner, where it coiled into a rubbery heap.
'What d'heel wazzit?' said Constable Swires.
'We had to pull der rubber off'f him,' said the troll. 'Sets quick, see? Once you get it out in der air.'
'Hey, that's a' biggest Sonky I ever saw,' chuckled Buggy. 'A whole-body Sonky! Reckon that's the way he wanted to go?'
11 As a member of the dead community Reg Shoe naturally thought of himself as an ethnic majority.


- 58 -
Reg looked at the corpse. He didn't mind being sent out on murders, even messy ones. The way he saw it, dying was really just a career change. Been there, done that, worn the shroud... And then you got over it and got on with your life. Of course, he knew that many people didn't, for some reason, but he thought of them as not prepared to make the effort.
There was a ragged wound in the neck.
'Any next of kin?' he said.
'He got a brother in Uberwald. We've sent word,' the troll added. 'On der clacks. It cost twenty dollars! Dat's murder!'
'Can you think of any reason why someone would kill him?'
The troll scratched his head. 'Well, 'cos dey wanted him dead, I reckon. Dat's a good reason.'
'And why would anyone want him dead, do you think?' Reg Shoe could be very, very patient. 'Has there been any trouble?'
'Business ain't been so good, I know dat.'
'Really? I'd have thought you'd be coining money here.'
'Oh, yeah, days what you'd fink, but not everyfing people calls a Sonky is made by us, see? It's to do wid us becomin" — the troll's face screwed up with cerebral effort — 'jer-nair-rick. Lots of other buggers are jumpin' up and down on der bandwagon, and dey got better plant and new ideas like makin' 'em in cheese-and-onion flavour an' wid bells on an' stuff like dat. Mister Sonky won't have nothin' to do wid dat kind of frog and days been costin' us sales.'
'I can see this would worry him,' said Reg, in a keep-on-talking tone of voice.
'He's been locking himself in his office a lot.'
'Oh? Why's that?' said Reg.
'He's der boss. You don't ask der boss. But he did say dat dere was a special job comin' up and data put us back on our feets.'
'Really?' said Reg, making a mental note. 'What kind of job?'
'Dunno. You don't—'
'-ask the boss,' said Reg. 'Right. I suppose no one saw the murder, did they?'
Once again the troll screwed up its enormous face in thought.


- 59 -
'Der murderer, yeah, an' prob'ly Mister Sonky.'
'Was there a third party?'
'I dunno, I never get invited to dem frogs.'
'Apart from Mister Sonky and the murderer,' said Shoe, still as patient as the grave, 'was there anyone else here last night?'
'Dunno,' said the troll.
'Thank you, you've been very helpful,' said Shoe. 'We'll have a look around, if you don't mind.'
'Sure.'
The troll went back to his vat.
Reg Shoe hadn't expected to find anything and was not disappointed. But he was thorough. Zombies usually are. Mr Vimes had told him never to get too excited about clues, because clues could lead you a dismal dance. They could become a habit. You ended up finding a wooden leg, a silk slipper and a feather at the scene of a crime and constructing an elegant theory involving a one-legged ballet dancer and a production of Chicken Lake.
The door to the office was open. It was hard to tell if anything had been disturbed; Shoe got the impression that the mess was normal. A desk was awash with paperwork, Mr Sonky having followed the usual 'put it down somewhere' method of filing. A bench was covered with samples of rubber, bits of sacking, large bottles of chemicals and some wooden moulds that Reg refrained from looking at too closely.
`Did you hear Corporal Littlebottom talking about that museum theft when we came on duty today, Buggy?' he said, opening a jar of yellow powder and sniffing it.
No.
'I did,' said Reg.
He put the lid on the sulphur again and sniffed the air of the factory. It smelled of liquid rubber, which is very much like the smell of incontinent cats.
`And some things stick in the mind,' he said. 'Special job, eh?'
It was Constable Visit -The-Infidel-WithExplanatory-Pamphlets's week as Communications Officer, which largely meant looking after the pigeons and keeping an eye on the clacks, with of course the assistance of Constable


- 60 -
Downspout. Constable Downspout was a gargoyle. When it came to staring fixedly at one thing you couldn't beat a gargoyle. The gargoyles were getting a lot of employment in the clacks industry.
Constable Visit quite enjoyed the pigeons. He sang them hymns. They listened to short homilies, cocking their heads from side to side. After all, he reasoned, had not Bishop Horn preached to the molluscs of the sea? And there was no record of them actually listening, whereas he was certain that the pigeons were taking it in. And they seemed to be interested in his pamphlets on the virtues of Omnianism, admittedly as nesting material at the moment, but this was certainly a good start.
A pigeon fluttered in as he was scraping the perches.
'Ah, Zebedinah,' he said, lifting her up and removing the message capsule from her leg. 'Well done. This is from Constable Shoe. And you shall have some corn, provided locally by Josiah Frument and Sons, Seed Merchants, but ultimately by the grace of Om.'
There was a whirr of wings and another pigeon settled on the perch. Constable Visit recognized it as Wilhelmina, one of Sergeant Angua's pigeons.
He removed the message capsule. The thin paper inside was tightly folded and on it someone had written 'Cpt. Carrot, Personal.'
He hesitated, then put the message from Reg Shoe into the pneumatic tube and heard the whoosh of the suction as it headed off to the main office. The other one, he decided, required a more careful delivery.
Carrot was working in Vimes's office but, Visit noticed, not at the Commander's desk. Instead he'd set up a folding table in the corner. The tottering piles of paperwork on the desk were slightly less alpine than yesterday. There were even occasional patches of desktop.
'Personal message for you, captain.'
'Thank you.'
`And Constable Shoe wants a sergeant down at Sonky's boot factory.'
'Did you send the message down to the office?'
'Yes, sir. The pneumatic tube is very useful,' Visit added dutifully.
'Commander Vimes isn't very keen on it but I'm sure it will eventually save us time,' said Carrot. He unfolded the note.
Visit watched him. Carrot's lips moved slightly as he read.


- 61 -
'Where did the pigeon come from?' he said at last, screwing up the note.
'It looks pretty worn out, sir. Not from inside the city, I'm sure.'
'Ah. Right. Thank you.'
'Bad news, sir?' Visit angled.
'Just news, constable. Don't let me detain you.'
'Right, sir.'
When the disappointed Visit had gone, Carrot went and looked out of the window. There was a typical Ankh-Morpork street scene outside, although people were trying to separate them.
After a few minutes he went back to his table, wrote a short note, put it into one of the little carriers and sent it away with a hiss of air.
A few minutes later Sergeant Colon came panting along the corridor. Carrot was very keen on modernizing the Watch, and in some strange way sending a message via the tube was so much more modern than simply opening the door and shouting, which is what Mr Vimes did.
Carrot gave Colon a bright smile. 'Ah, Fred. Everything going well?'
'Yessir?' said Fred Colon uncertainly.
'Good. I'm off to see the Patrician, Fred. As senior sergeant you are in charge of the Watch until Mister Vimes gets back.'
'Yessir. Er... until you get back, you mean...'
'I shall not be coming back, Fred. I am resigning.'
The Patrician looked at the badge on his desk.
'... and well-trained men,' Carrot was saying, somewhere in front of him. 'After all, a few years ago there were only four of us in the Watch. Now it's functioning just like a machine.'
'Yes, although bits of it do go boing occasionally,' said Lord Vetinari, still staring at the badge. 'Could I invite you to reconsider, captain?'
'I've reconsidered several times, sir. And it's not-captain, sir.'
'The Watch needs you, Mister Ironfoundersson.'
'The Watch is bigger than one man, sir,' said Carrot, still looking straight ahead.


- 62 -
'I'm not sure if it's bigger than Sergeant Colon, though.'
'People get mistaken about old Fred, sir. He's a man with a solid bottom to his character.'
'He's got a solid bottom to his bottom, ca- Mister Ironfoundersson.'
'I mean he doesn't flap in an emergency, sir.'
'He doesn't do anything in an emergency,' said the Patrician. 'Except possibly hide. I might go so far as to say that the man appears to consist of an emergency in his own right.'
'My mind is made up, sir.'
Lord Vetinari sighed, sat back and stared up at the ceiling for a moment.
'Then all I can do is thank you for your services, captain, and wish you good luck in your future endeavour. Do you have enough money?'
'I've saved quite a lot, sir.'
'Nevertheless, it is a long way to Uberwald.'
There was silence.
'Sir?'
'Yes?'
'How did you know?'
'Oh, people measured it years ago. Surveyors and so forth.'
'Sir!'
Vetinari sighed. 'I think the term is... deduction. Be that as it may — captain — I am choosing to believe that you are merely taking an extended leave of absence. I understand that you've never taken a holiday while you've been here. I'm sure you're owed a few weeks.'
Carrot said nothing.
'And if I was you, I'd begin my search for Sergeant Angua at the Shambling Gate,' Vetinari added.
After a while Carrot said quietly: 'Is that as a result of information received, my lord?'


- 63 -
Vetinari smiled a thin little smile. 'No. But Uberwald is going through some troubling times, and of course she is from one of the aristocratic families. I surmise that she has been called away. Beyond that, I cannot be of much help. You will have to follow, as they say, your nose.'
'No, I think I can find a much more reliable nose than mine,' said Carrot.
'Good.' Lord Vetinari went back to his desk and sat down. 'I wish you well in your search. Nevertheless, I'm sure we'll be seeing you again. A lot of people here depend on you.'
'Yes, sir.'
'Good day to you.'
When Carrot had gone, Lord Vetinari got up and walked across to the other side of the room, where a map of Uberwald was unrolled on a table. It was quite old, but in recent years any mapmakers who had wandered off the beaten track in that country had spent all their time trying to find it again. There were a few rivers, their courses mostly guesswork, and the occasional town or at least the name of a town, probably put in to save the cartographer the embarrassment of filling his chart with, as they said in the trade, MMBU12.
The door opened and Vetinari's head clerk, Drumknott, eased his way in with the silence of a feather falling in a cathedral.
'A somewhat unexpected development, my lord,' he said quietly.
'An uncharacteristic one, certainly,' said Vetinari.
'Do you wish me to send a clacks to Vimes, sir? He could be back in a day or so.'
Vetinari was looking intently at the blind, blank map. It was, he felt, very much like the future; a few things were outlined, there were some rough guesses, but everything else was waiting to be created...
'Hmm?' he said.
'Do you wish me to recall Vimes, sir?'
'Good heavens, no. Vimes in Uberwald will be more amusing than an amorous armadillo in a bowling alley. And who else could I send? Only Vimes could go to Uberwald.'
'But surely this is an emergency, sir?'
12 Miles and Miles of Bloody Uberwald.


- 64 -
'Hmm?'
'What else are we to call it, sir, when a young man of such promise throws away his career for the pursuit of a girl?'
The Patrician stroked his beard and smiled at something.
There was a line across the map: the progress of the semaphore towers. It was mathematically straight, a statement of intellect in the crowding darkness of miles and miles of bloody Uberwald.
'Possibly, a bonus,' he said. 'Uberwald has much to teach us. Fetch me the papers on the werewolf clans, will you? Oh, and although I swore I would never ever do this, please prepare a message for Sergeant Colon, too. Promotion, alas, beckons.'
A grubby cloth cap lay on the pavement. On the pavement beside the cap someone had written in damp chalk: Plese HelP This LiTTle doGGie.
Beside it sat a small dog.
It was not cut out by nature to be a friendly little waggy-tailed dog, but it was making the effort. Whenever someone walked by it sat up on its hind legs and whined pitifully.
Something landed in the cap. It was a washer.
The charitable pedestrian had gone only a few steps further along the road when he heard: 'And I hope your legs fall off, mister.'
The man turned. The dog was watching- him intently.
'Woof?' it said.
He looked puzzled, shrugged, and then turned and walked on.
'Yeah, bloody woof woof,' said the strange voice, as he was about to turn the corner.
A hand reached down and picked up the dog by the scruff of its neck. 'Hello, Gaspode. I believe I've solved a little mystery.'
'Oh, no...' the dog moaned.
'That's not being a good dog, Gaspode,' said Carrot, lifting the dog so they could meet eye to eye.
'All right, all right, put me down, will you? This hurts, you know.'


- 65 -
'I need your help, Gaspode.'
'Not me. I don't help the Watch. Nothing personal, but it doesn't do anything for my street cred.'
'I'm not talking about helping the Watch, Gaspode. This is personal. I need your nose.' Carrot lowered the dog to the pavement and rubbed his hand on his shirt. 'Unfortunately, this means I need the rest of you as well, although of course I am aware that under that itchy exterior beats a heart of gold.'
'Really,' said Gaspode. 'Nothing good starts with "I need your help."'
[92: Bookmark] <markup_guid-5FCEE23461974B3A8EBB695C026C8AE1.html>'It's Angua.'
'Oh dear.'
'I want you to track her.'
'Huh, not many dogs could track a werewolf, mister. They're cunning.'
'Go to the best, I always say,' said Carrot.
'Finest nose known to man or beast,' said Gaspode, wrinkling it. 'Where's she gone, then?'
'To Uberwald, I think.'
Carrot moved fast. Gaspode's flight was hindered by the hand gripping his tail.
'That's hundreds of miles away! And dog miles is seven times longer! Not a chance!'
'Oh? All right, then. Silly of me to suggest it,' said Carrot, letting go. 'You're right. It's ridiculous.'
Gaspode turned, suddenly full of suspicion. 'No, I didn't say it was ridiculous,' he said. 'I just said it was hundreds of miles away...'
'Yes, but you said you had no chance.'
'No, I said that you had no chance of getting me to do it.'
'Yes, but winter's coming on and, as you say, a werewolf is very hard to track and on top of that Angua's a copper. She'll work out that I'd use you, so she'll be covering her trail.'


- 66 -
Gaspode whined. 'Look, mister, respect is hard to earn in this dog's town. If I'm not smelled around the lamp-posts for a couple of weeks my stock is definitely in the gutter, right?'
'Yes, yes, I understand. I'll make some other arrangements. Nervous Nigel's still around, isn't he?'
'What? That spaniel? He couldn't smell his own bottom if you put it in front of him!'
'They say he's pretty good, nasally.'
'And he widdles every time anyone looks at him!' snapped Gaspode.
'I heard he can smell a dead rat two miles away.'
'Yeah? Well, I can smell what colour it is!'
Carrot sighed. 'Well, I've got no choice, I'm afraid. You can't do it, so I'll—'
'I didn't say—' Gaspode stopped, and then went on, 'I'm going to do it, aren't I? I'm bloody well going to do it. You're going to trick me or blackmail me or whatever it takes, aren't you...?'
'Yes. How do you manage to write, Gaspode?'
'I holds the chalk in me mouth. Easy.'
'You're a smart dog. I've always said so. The world's only talking dog, too.'
'Lower your voice, lower your voice!' said Gaspode, looking around. 'Here, Uberwald's wolf country, isn't it?'
'Oh, yes.'
'I could've bin a wolf, you know. With diff'rent parents, of course.' Gaspode sniffed and looked furtively up and down the street again.
'Steak?'
'Every night.'
'Right.'
Sergeant Colon was a picture of misery drawn on a lumpy pavement in bad crayon on a wet day. He sat on a chair and occasionally glanced at the message that had just been delivered, as if hoping that the words would somehow fade away.


- 67 -
'Bloody hell, Nobby,' he moaned.
'There, there, Fred,' said Nobby, currently a vision in organdie.
'I can't be promoted! I'm not an officer! I am base, common and popular!'
'I've always said that about you, Fred. You got common off to a treat.'
'But it's writ down, Nobby! Look, his lordship's signed it!'
'We-ell, the way I see it, you've got three choices,' said Nobby.
'Yeah?'
'You can go and tell him you're not doing it...'
The panic in Colon's face was replaced by glazed grey terror.
'Thank you very much, Nobby,' he said bitterly. 'Let me know if you've got any more suggestions like that, 'cos I'll need to go and change my underwear.'
'Or you could accept it and make such a cockup of it that he takes it away from you...'
'You're doing this on purpose, Nobby!'
'Might be worth a try, Fred.'
'Yeah, but the thing about cock-ups, Nobby, is that it's hard for you to be, you know, precise. You might think you're making a little cock-up and then it blows up in your face and it turns out to be in fact a big cock-up, and in those circumstances, Nobby, I'm sort of worried that what his lordship might take away from me wouldn't just be the job. I hope I don't have to draw you a picture.'
'Good point, Fred.'
'What I'm saying is, cock-ups is like... well,
cock-ups is... well, the thing about cock-ups is you never know what size they're going to be.'
'Well, Fred, the third choice is you putting up with it.'
'That's not helpful, Nobby.'
'It'll only be for a couple of weeks, then Mister Vimes'll be back.'
'Yeah, but supposing he isn't? Nasty place, Uberwald. I heard where it's a misery wrapped in a enema. That doesn't sound too good. You can fall down things. Then I'm stuck, right? I don't know how to do officering.'


- 68 -
'No one knows how to do officering, Fred. That's why they're officers. If they knew anything, they'd be sergeants.'
Now Colon's face screwed up again in desperate thought. As a lifelong uniformed man, a three-striped peg that had found a three-striped hole very early in its career, he subscribed automatically and unthinkingly to the belief that officers as a class could not put their own trousers on without a map. He conscientiously excluded Vimes and Carrot from the list, elevating them to the rank of honorary sergeant.
Nobby was watching him with an expression of combined concern, friendliness and predatory intent.
'What shall I do, Nobby?'
'Well, "captain",' said Nobby, and then he gave a little cough, 'what officers mainly have to do, as you know, is sign things—'
The door was knocked on and opened at the same time by a flustered constable.
'Sarge, Constable Shoe says he really does need an officer down at Sonky's factory.'
'What, the rubber wally man?' said Colon. 'Right. An officer. Right. We'll be along.'
'And that's Captain Colon,' said Nobby quickly.
'Er... er... yes, and that's Captain Colon, thank you very much,' said Colon, adding as his resolve stiffened, 'and I'll thank you not to forget it!'
The constable stared at them, and then stopped trying to understand.
'And there's a troll downstairs who insists on speaking to whoever's in charge—'
'Can't Stronginthearm deal with it?'
'Er... is Sergeant Stronginthearm still a sergeant?' said the constable.
'Yes!'
'Even unconscious?'
'What?'
'He's flat on the floor right now, sar- captain.'
'What's the troll want?'


- 69 -
'Right now he wants to kill someone, but mainly I think he wants someone to take the clamp off'f his foot.'
Gaspode ran up and down, nose barely an inch from the ground. Carrot waited, holding his horse. It was a good one. Carrot hadn't spent a lot of his wages, up until now.
Finally the dog sat down and looked depressed.
'So tell me about this wonderful nose the, Patrician has got, then,' he said.
'Not a trace?'
'You'd better get Vetinari down here, if he's so good,' said Gaspode. 'What's the point of starting here? Worst place in the whole city! It's the gate to the cattle market, am I right? Trying not to smell stuff is the trick here, is the point I'm makin'. There's ground-in stink. If you wanted to get on the trail of somebody, this is the last place I'd start.'
'Very good point,' said Carrot carefully. 'So, what's the strongest smell heading Hubwards?'
'Dung carts, o'course. Yesterday. Always a big clear-out of the pens first thing Friday morning.'
'You can follow the smell?'
Gaspode rolled his eyes. 'With my head in a bucket.'
'Good. Let's go.'
'So,' said Gaspode, as they began to leave the gate's bustle behind, 'we're chasing this girl, right?'
'Yes.'
'Just you?'
'Yes.'
'Not like with dogs, then, where there might be twenty or thirty?'
'No.'
'So we're not looking at a bucket of cold water here?'
'No.'


- 70 -
Constable Shoe saluted, but a little testily. He'd been waiting rather a long time. 'Afternoon, sergeant—'
'That's captain,' said Captain Colon. 'See the pip on my shoulder, Reg?'
Reg looked closely. 'I thought it was bird doings, Sarge.'
'That's captain,' said Colon automatically. 'It's only chalk now because I ain't got time to get it done properly,' he said. 'So don't be cheeky.'
'What's up with Nobby?' said Reg. Corporal Nobbs was holding a damp cloth over one eye.
'Bit of a contry tomps with an illegally parked troll,' said Captain Colon.
'Shows what kind of troll he was, striking a lady,' muttered Nobby.
'But you ain't a lady, Nobby. You're just wearing your traffic-calming disguise.'
'He wasn't to know.'
'You'd got your helmet on. Anyway, you shouldn't have clamped him.'
'He was parked, Fred.'
'He'd been knocked down by a cart,' said Captain Colon. 'And that's captain.'
'Well, they always have excuses,' said Nobby sullenly.
'You'd better show us the corpus, Reg,' said Colon.
The body in the cellar was duly inspected.
'... and I remember Cheery saying there was a smell of cat's pee and sulphur at the Dwarf Bread Museum,' said Reg.
'Certainly hangs about,' said Colon. 'You wouldn't have blocked sinuses if you worked here for a day.'
'And I thought, "I wonder if someone'd tried to make a mould of the replica Scone", sir,' said Reg.
'Now that is clever,' said Fred Colon. 'You'd get the real one back then, wouldn't you?'
'Er, no, Barge- captain. But you'd get a copy of the. replica.'
'Would that be legal?'
'Can't say, sir. I wouldn't think so. It wouldn't fool a dwarf for five minutes.'


- 71 -
'Then who'd want to kill him?'
'A father of thirteen kids, maybe?' said Nobby. 'Haha.'
'Nobby, will you stop pinching the merchandise?' said Colon. 'And don't argue, I just saw you put a couple of dozen in your handbag.'
'Dat don't matter,' rumbled the troll. 'Mister Sonky always said dey was free to the Watch.'
'That was very... civic of him,' said Captain Colon.
'Yeah, he said der last frog we wanted was more bloody coppers around the city.'
A pigeon chose that diplomatic moment to flutter into the factory and land on Colon's shoulder, where it promoted him. Colon reached up, removed the message capsule and unfolded the contents.
'It's from Visit,' he said. 'There's a Clue, he says.'
'What to?' said Nobby.
'Not to anything, Nobby. Just a Clue.' He took off his helmet and wiped his brow. This was what he'd hoped to avoid. In his heart of battered hearts, he suspected that Vimes and Carrot were good at putting clues next to other clues and thinking about them. That was their talent. He had others... well, he was good with people, and he had a shiny breastplate, and he could sergeant in his sleep 'All right, write up your report,' he said. 'Well done. We're going back to the Yard.
'I can see this is going to get on top of me,' said Colon, as they walked away. 'There's paperwork, too. You know me and paperwork, Nobby.'
'You're a very thorough reader, that's all, Fred,' said Nobby. 'I've seen you take ages over just one page. Digesting it magisterially, I thought.'
Colon brightened a little. 'Yes, that's what I do,' he said.
'Even if it's only the menu down at the Klatchian Take-Away, I've seen you staring at one line for a minute at a time.'
'Well, obviously you can't let people put one over on you,' said Colon, sticking out his chest, or at least sticking it further up.
'What you need is an aide de camp,' said Nobby, lifting his dress to step over a puddle.
'I do?'


- 72 -
'Oh, yes. 'Cos of you being a figurehead and setting an example to your men,' said Nobby.
'Ah. Right. Yes,' said Colon, grasping the idea with relief. 'A man can't be expected to do all that and read long words, am I right?'
'Exactly. And, of course, we're down one sergeant at the Yard now,' said Nobby.
'Good point, Nobby. It's going to be busy.'
They walked on for a while.
'You could promote someone,' Nobby prompted.
'Could I?'
'What good's being the boss if you can't?'
'That's true. And it's sort of an emergency. Hmm... any thoughts, Nobby?'
Nobby sighed inwardly. A penny could drop through wet cement faster than it could drop for Fred Colon.
'A name springs to mind,' he said.
'Ah, right. Yes. Reg Shoe, right? Good at writing, a keen thinker, and of course he's cool headed,' said Colon. 'Icy, practically.'
'But a bit on the dead side,' said Nobby.
'Yes, I suppose that counts against him.'
'And he goes to pieces unpredictably,' said Nobby.
'That's true,' said Captain Colon. 'No one likes shaking hands and ending up with more fingers than they started with.'
'So p'raps it might be best to consider someone who has been unreasonably overlooked,' said Nobby, going for broke. 'Someone whose face dunt fit, p'raps. Someone whose experience in the Watch genially and in Traffic in particular could be of great service to the city if people wouldn't go on about one or two lapses which didn't happen in any case.'
The dawn of intelligence rose across the vistas of Colon's face.
'Ah,' he said. 'I see. Well, why didn't you come right out with that at the start, Nobby?'
'Well, it's your decision, Fred... I mean, captain,' said Nobby earnestly.


- 73 -
'But s'posing Mister Vimes doesn't agree? He'll be back in a couple of weeks.'
'That'll be long enough,' said Nobby.
'And you don't mind?'
'Me? Mind? Not me. You know me, Fred, always ready to do my bit.'
'Nobby?'
'Yes, Fred?'
'The dress...'
'Yes, Fred?'
'I thought we weren't doing the... traffic calming any more?'
'Yes, Fred. But I thought I'd keep it on ready to swing into action just in case you decided that we should.'
A chilly wind blew across the cabbage fields.
To Gaspode it brought, besides the overpowering fumes of the cabbage and the dark red smell of the dung carts, hints of pine, mountains, snow, sweat and stale cigar smoke. The last came from the cart men's habit of smoking large, cheap cigars. They kept the flies off.
It was better than vision. The world of smell stretched before Gaspode.
'My paws hurt,' he said.
'There's a good dog,' said Carrot.
The road forked. Gaspode stopped and snuffled around. 'Well, here's an int'resting frog,' he said. 'Some of the dung's jumped down off'f the cart and headed away across the fields here. You were right.'
'Can you smell water anywhere around?' said Carrot, scanning the flat plain.
Gaspode's mottled nose wrinkled up in effort. 'Pond,' he said. 'Not very big. 'bout a mile away.'
'She'll be heading towards it. Very meticulous about cleanliness, Angua. That's not usual in werewolves.'
'Never been one for water myself,' said Gaspode.
'Is that a fact?'


- 74 -
'Here, no need for that! I had a B-A-T-H once, you know, it's not as if I don't know what it's like.'
The pond was in a clump of wind-blown trees. Dry grass rustled in the breeze. A single coot scuttled into the reeds as Carrot and Gaspode approached.
'Yeah, here we are,' said Gaspode. 'A lot of muck goes in, and' — he sniffed at the stirred-up mud — 'er, yeah, she comes out. Um.'
'Is there a problem?' said Carrot.
'What? Oh, no. Clear scent. Headin' for the mountains, just like you said. Um.' Gaspode sat down and scratched himself with a hind leg.
'There's a problem, isn't there... ?' said Carrot.
'Well, supposin' there was something really bad that you wouldn't really want to know, and I knew what it was... How'd you feel about me tellin' you? I mean, some peopled rather not know. It's a pers'nal thing.'
'Gaspode!'
'She's not alone. There's another wolf.'
'Ah.' Carrot's mild, uninformative smile did not change.
'Er, of the male persuasion,' said Gaspode. 'A boy wolf. Er. Very much so.'
'Thank you, Gaspode.'
'Extremely male. Um. In a very def'nite way. Unmistakably.'
'Yes, I think I understand.'
'And this is just words. In smell, it's a lot more, well, emphatic.'
'Thank you for that, Gaspode. And they're heading...'
'Still straight for the mountains, boss,' said Gaspode, as kindly as he could. He wasn't certain of all the details of human sexual relationships, and the ones he was certain of he still couldn't quite believe, but he knew that they were a lot more complicated than those enjoyed by the doggy fraternity.
'This smell...'
'The extremely male one I was talkin' about?'
'The very one, yes,' said Carrot levelly. 'You could still smell it if you were on the horse, could you?'


- 75 -
'I could smell it with my nose in a sack of onions.'
'Good. Because I think we should move a little faster now.'
'Yes, I thought you'd think that.'
Constable Visit saluted when Nobby and Colon entered Pseudopolis Yard.
'I thought you ought to know about this right away, sir,' he said, flourishing a square of paper. 'I just got it off Rodney.'
'Who?'
'The imp on the bridge, sir. He paints pictures of carts going too fast? No one had been feeding him,' Visit added, in a mildly accusing tone.
'Oh. Someone speeding,' said Colon. 'So?' He looked again. 'That's one of those sedan chairs
the deep-down dwarfs use, isn't it? Them trolls must've been moving!'
'It was just after the Scone was stolen,' said Visit. 'Rodney writes the time in the corner, see? A bit odd, I thought. Like a kind of getaway vehicle, sir?'
'What'd a dwarf want to steal a worthless lump of rock for?' said Colon. 'Especially them dark dwarfs. They give me the creeps in those stupid clothes they wear.'
Angry silence rang like a dropped girder in a temple. There were three dwarfs in the room.
'You two! You ought to be out on patrol!' barked Sergeant Stronginthearm. 'I've got business down at Chitterling Street!'
All three dwarfs marched out, somehow contriving even to walk angrily.
'Well, what was that about?' said Fred Colon. 'Bit touchy, aren't they? Mister Vimes says that sort of thing all the time and no one minds.'
'Yes, but that's because he's Sam Vimes,' said Nobby.
'Oh? And are you inferring I'm not?' said Captain Colon.
'Well, yes, Fred. You're Fred Colon,' said Nobby patiently.
'Oh, I am, am I?'
'Yes, Captain Colon.'
'And they'd better bloody remember it!' Colon snapped. 'I'm not a soft touch, me. I'm not going to take insubordination like that! I've always said Vimes was a bit


- 76 -
too soft on those dwarfs! They gets the same pay as us and they're only half the size!'
'Yes, yes,' said Nobby, waving his hands placatingly in a desperate attempt to calm things down. 'But, Fred, trolls are twice as big as us and they get paid the same, so it—'
'But they've only got a quarter of the brains, so it's just the same, like I said—'
The noise they heard was long and drawn out and menacing. It was the sound of LanceConstable Bluejohn's chair being pushed back.
The floor creaked as he shambled past Colon, removed his helmet from its peg with one enormous hand and headed for the door.
''m goin' on patrol,' he mumbled.
'You're not on patrol for another hour,' said Constable Visit.
''m goin' now,' said Bluejohn. The room was darkened for a moment as he eclipsed the doorway, and then he was gone.
'Why's everyone so tetchy all of a sudden?' said Colon. The remaining constables tried not to catch his eye.
'Did I hear someone snigger?' he demanded.
'I didn't hear anyone snigger, Sarge,' said Nobby.
'Oh? Oh? You think I'm a sergeant, do you, Corporal Nobbs?'
'No, Fred, I- Oh, gawds...'
'I can see things have got pretty slack around here,' said Captain Colon, an evil little gleam in his eye. 'I bet you were all thinking, oh, it's only fat old Fred Colon, it's all going to be gravy from now on, eh?'
'Oh, Fred, no one thinks you're old- Oh, gawds...'
'Just fat, eh?' Fred glowered around the room. Suddenly, and against all previous evidence, everyone was vitally interested in their paperwork.
'Right! Well, from now on things are going to be different,' said Captain Colon. 'Oh, yes. I'm on to all your little tricks- Who said that?'
'Said what, captain?' said Nobby, who'd also heard the little whispered 'We learned 'em all from you, sarge,' but at this moment would eat live coals rather than admit it.


- 77 -
'Someone said something blotto voice,' said Captain Colon.
'I'm sure they didn't, captain,' said Nobby.
'And I won't be eyeballed like that, neither!'
'No one's looking at you!' wailed Nobby.
'Aha, you think I don't know that one?' Colon shouted. 'There's plenty of ways to eyeball someone without lookin' at 'em, corporal. That man over there is earlobing me!'
'I think Constable Ping is just really interested in the report he's writing, Fre- sar- captain.'
Colon's ruffled feathers settled a little. 'Well, all right. And now I'm going up to my office, all right? There'll be some changes around here. And someone bring me a cup of tea.'
They watched him go up the stairs, enter the office and slam the door.
'Well, the—' Constable Ping began, but Nobby, who had a lot more experience of the Colon personality, waved one hand frantically for silence while he held the other one to his ear, very theatrically.
Then they all heard the door click open again, quietly.
'A change is as good as a rest, I suppose,' said Constable Ping.
'As the prophet Ossory says, better an ox in the potters' fields of Hersheba than a sandal in the wine presses of Gash,' said Constable Visit.
'Yeah, so I've heard,' said Nobby. 'Well, I'll just make him his tea. Everyone feels better after a cup of tea.'
A couple of minutes later the constables heard Colon shouting, even through the door.
'What is wrong with this mug, corporal?!'
'Nothing, sa- sir. It's yer mug. You always have your tea in it.'
'Ah, but, you see, it is a sergeants mug, corporal. And what is it that officers drink out of?'
'Well, Carrot and Mister Vimes have got their own mugs—'


- 78 -
'No, they may choose to drink out of mugs, corporal, but Watch regulations say officers have a cup and saucer. Says so right here, regulation 301, sub-section c. Do you understand me?'
'I don't think we've got any—'
'You know where the petty cash is. Usually you're the only person that does. You're dismissed, corporal.'
Nobby came down the stairs white-faced, holding the offending receptacle.
The door opened again.
'And none of you are to gob in it, neither!' shouted Colon. 'I know that one! And it's to be stirred with a spoon, understand? I know that one, too.' The door slammed.
Constable Visit took the mug from Nobby's shaking hand and patted him on the shoulder.
'Chalky the troll does some very good seconds, I understand—' he began.
The door opened. 'Bloody china, too!'
The door slammed.
'Anyone seen the petty cash lately?' said Constable Ping.
Nobby reached mournfully into his pocket and pulled out some dollars. He handed them to Visit.
'Better go to that posh shop in Kings Way,' he said. 'Get one of those cups and saucers thin enough to see through. You know, with gold around the rim.' He looked around the other constables. 'What're you lot doing here? You won't catch many criminals in here!'
'Does the petty cash count, Nobby?' said Ping.
'Don't you Nobby me, Ping! You just get out there! And the rest of you!'
Days rolled by. More accurately, they rattled by. It was a comfortable coach, as coaches went, and as coaches on this road went over continual potholes, it swayed and rocked like a cradle. Initially, the motion was soothing. After a day or two it palled. So did the scenery.
Vimes stared glumly out of the window.
There was another clacks tower on the horizon. They were putting them near the. road, he recalled, even though that wasn't the direct route. Only a fool would


- 79 -
build them across the badlands. You had to remember, sometimes, that within a few hundred miles of Ankh-Morpork there were still trolls who hadn't caught on to the fact that humans weren't digestible. Besides, most of the settlements were near the road.
The new Guild must be coining money. Even from here he could see the scaffolding, as workers feverishly attached still more gantries and paddles to the main tower. The whole thing would likely be matchsticks after the next hurricane, but by then the owners would probably have earned enough to build another five. Or fifty.
It had all happened so fast. Who'd have believed it? But all the components had been there for years. Semaphore was ancient — a century ago the Watch had used a few towers to relay messages to patrolling officers. And gargoyles had nothing to do all day but sit and watch things, and usually were too unimaginative to make mistakes.
What had happened was that people thought differently about news now. Once upon a time they'd have used something like this to relay information about troop movements and the death of kings. True, those were things that people needed to know, but they didn't need to know them every day. No, what they needed to know every day were things like How much are cattle selling for in Ankh-Morpork today? Because if they weren't fetching much maybe it was better to drive them to Quirm instead. People needed to know these little things. Lots and lots of little things. Little things like Did my ship get there safely? That's why the Guild was driving hell-bent across the mountains on to Genua, four thousand miles away. It took many months for a ship to round Cape Terror. How much, exactly, would a trader pay to know, within a day, when it had arrived? And how much the cargo was worth? Had it been sold? Was there credit to the trader's name in Ankh-Morpork?
Coining money? Oh, yes!
And it had caught on as fast as every other craze did in the big city. It seemed as though everybody who could put together a pole, a couple of gargoyles and some second-hand windmill machinery was in on the business. You couldn't go out to dinner these days without seeing people nip out of the restaurant every five minutes to check that there weren't any messages for them on the nearest pole. As for those who cut out the middleman and signalled directly to their friends across a crowded room, causing mild contusions to those nearby...
Vimes shook his head. That was messages without meaning: telepathy without brains.


- 80 -
But it had been good, hadn't it, last week? When Don't Know Jack had pinched that silver in Sto Lat and then galloped at speed to the sanctuary of the Shades in Ankh-Morpork? And Sergeant Edge of the Sto Lat Watch, who'd trained under Vimes, had put a message on the clacks which arrived on Vimes's desk more than an hour before Jack sauntered through the city gates and into the waiting embrace of Sergeant Detritus? Legally it had been a bit tricky, since the offence hadn't been committed on Ankh-Morpork soil and a semaphore message did not, strictly speaking, come under the heading of 'hot pursuit', but Jack had kindly solved that one by taking a wild swing at the troll, resulting in his arrest for Assault on a Watch Officer and treatment for a broken wrist...
There was a gentle snore from Lady Sybil. A marriage is always made up of two people who are prepared to swear that only the other one snores.
Inigo Skimmer was hunched in a corner, reading a book. Vimes watched him for some time.
'I'm just going up top for some air,' he said at last, opening the door. The clattering of the wheels filled the tiny, hot space, and dust blew in.
'Your grace—' Inigo began, standing up.
Vimes, already clambering up the side of the coach, stuck his head back in. 'You're not making any friends with that attitude,' he said, and kicked the door shut with his foot.
Cheery and Detritus had made themselves comfortable on the roof. It was a lot less stuffy and at least there was a view, if vegetables were your idea of a panorama.
Vimes worked himself into a niche between two bundles and leaned towards Cheery.
'You know about the clacks, right?' he said.
'Well, sort of, sir...'
'Good.' Vimes passed her a piece of paper. 'There's bound to be a tower near where we stop tonight. Cypher this and send it to the Watch, will you? They ought to be able to turn it around in an hour, if they ask the right people. Tell them to try Washable Topsy, she does the laundry there. Or Gilbert Gilbert; he always seems to know what's going on.'
Cheery read the message, and then stared at Vimes.
'Are you sure, sir?' she said.


- 81 -
'Maybe. Make sure you send the description. Names don't mean much.'
'May I ask what makes you think—'
'His walk. And he didn't catch an orange,' said Vimes. 'Mhm. Mhm.'
Constable Visit was cleaning out the old pigeon loft when the message arrived on the clacks.
He was spending more and more time with the pigeons these days. It wasn't a popular job, so no one had tried to take it away from him, and at least up here the shouts and door-slammings were muffled.
The perches gleamed.
Constable Visit enjoyed his job. He didn't have many friends in the city. Truth to tell, he didn't have many friends in the Watch, either. But at least there were people to talk to, and he was making headway with the religious instruction of the pigeons.
But now there was this...
It was addressed to Captain Carrot. That meant it probably ought to be delivered to Captain Colon now, and personally, because Captain Colon thought that people were spying on his messages sent via the suction tube.
Constable Visit had been fairly safe until now. Omnians were good at not questioning orders, even ones that made no sense. Visit instinctively respected authority, no matter how crazy, because he'd been brought up properly. And he had plenty of time to keep his armour bright.
Brightly polished armour had suddenly become very important in the Watch, for some reason.
Even so, going into Colon's office needed all the courage that the legendary Bishop Horn had shown when entering the city of the Oolites, and everyone knew what they did to strangers.
Visit climbed down from the loft and made his nervous way to the main building, taking care to walk smartly.
The main office was more or less empty. There seemed to be fewer watchmen around these days. Usually people preferred to loaf indoors in this chilly weather, but suddenly everyone was keen to be out of Captain Colon's view.
Visit went up to the office and knocked on the door.
He knocked again.


- 82 -
When there was no reply he pushed open the door, walked carefully over to the sparkling clean desk, and went to tuck the message flimsy under the ink bottle in case it blew away
'Aha!'
The ink soared up as Visit's hand jerked. He had a vision of the blue-black shower passing his eye, and heard the splat as it hit something behind him.
He turned like an automaton, to see a Captain Colon who would have, been white-faced if it wasn't for the ink.
'I see,' said Colon. 'Assault on a superior officer, eh?'
'It was an accident, captain!'
'Oh, was it? And why, pray, were you sneaking into my office?'
'I didn't think you were in here, captain!' Visit gabbled.
'jai'
'Sorry?'
'Sneaking a look at my private papers, eh?'
'No, captain!' Visit rallied a little bit. 'Why were you standing behind the door, captain?'
'Oh? I'm not allowed to stand behind my own door, is that it?'
It was then that Constable Visit made his next mistake. He tried to smile.
'Well, it is a bit odd, sir—'
'Are you suggesting there is anything odd about me, constable?' said Captain Colon. 'Is there anything about me that you finds funny?'
Visit stared at the mottled face speckled with ink. 'Not a thing, sir.'
'You've been working acceptably, constable,' said Colon, standing slightly too close to Visit, 'and therefore I don't intend to be harsh with you. No one could call me an unfair man. You is demoted to lance-constable, understand? Your pay will be adjusted and backdated to the beginning of the month.'
Visit saluted. It was probably the only way to get out of there alive. One of Colon's eyes was twitching.


- 83 -
'However, you could redeem yourself,' said Colon, 'if you was to tell me who has been stealing, I said stealing, the sugar lumps.'
'Sir?'
'I knows there was forty-three last night. I counted 'em very thoroughly. There's fortyone this morning, constable. And they're locked in the desk. Can you explain that?'
If Visit had been suicidal and honest, he would have said: well, captain, while of course I think you have many worthy qualities, I have known you count your fingers twice and come up with different answers.
'Er... mice?' he said weakly.
'Hah! Off you go, lance-constable, and just you think about what I said!'
When the dejected Visit had gone, Captain Colon sat down at his big, clean desk.
The little flickering part of his brain that was still sparking coherent thought through the fog of mind-numbing terror that filled Colon's head was telling him that he was so far out of his depth that the fish had lights on their noses.
Yes, he did have a clean desk. But that was because he was throwing all the paperwork away.
It wasn't that he was illiterate, but Fred Colon did need a bit of a think and a run-up to tackle anything much longer than a list and he tended to get lost in any word that had more than three syllables. He was, in fact, functionally literate. That is, he thought of reading and writing like he thought about boots — you needed them, but they weren't supposed to be fun, and you got suspicious about people who got a kick out of them.
Of course, Mr Vimes had kept his desk piled high with paperwork, but it occurred to Colon that maybe Vimes and Carrot between them had developed a way of keeping just ahead of the piles, by knowing what was important and what wasn't. To Colon, it was all gut-wrenchingly mysterious. There were complaints and memos and invitations, and letters requesting 'a few minutes of your time' and forms to fill in, and reports to read, and sentences containing words like 'iniquitous' and 'immediate action', and they tottered in his mind like a great big wave, poised to fall on him.
The sane core of Colon was wondering if the purpose of officers wasn't to stand between the sergeants and all this sh- this slush, so that they could get on with sergeanting.
Captain Colon took a deep, wobbly breath.


- 84 -
On the other hand, if people were nicking the sugar lumps, no wonder things weren't working properly! Get the sugar lumps right, and everything else would work out!
That made sense!
He turned and his eye caught the huge accusing heap of paperwork in the corner.
And the empty fireplace, too.
That was what officering was all about, wasn't it? Making decisions!
Lance-Constable Visit walked dejectedly back down to the main office, which had filled up for a Watch change.
Everyone was clustered around one of the desks on which lay, looking slightly muddy, the Scone of Stone.
'Constable Thighbiter found it in Zephire Street, just lying there,' said Sergeant Stronginthearm. 'The thief must've got scared.'
'A long way from the museum, though,' said Reg Shoe. 'Why lug it all the way across the city and leave it in a posh part of town where someone's bound to trip over it?'
'Oh, woe is me, for I am undone,' said Constable Visit, who felt he was playing a poor second fiddle to what he would call, if he had no use for his legs, a pagan image.
'Could be draughty,' said Corporal Nobbs, a man of little sympathy.
'I mean I have been reduced to lanceconstable,' said Visit:
'What? Why?' said Sergeant Stronginthearm.
'I'm... not sure,' said Visit.
'That just about does it!' said the dwarf. 'He sacked three of the officers up at Dolly Sisters yesterday. Well, I'm not waiting for it to happen to me. I'm off to Sto Lat. They're always looking for trained watchmen. I'm a sergeant. I could name my price.'
'But, look, Vimesy used to say that sort of thing too. I heard him,' said Nobby.
'Yeah, but that was different.'
'How?'


- 85 -
'That was Mister Vimes,' said Stronginthearm. 'Remember that riot in Easy Street last year? Bloke came after me with a club when I was on the ground, and Mister Vimes caught it on his arm and punched the man right in the head.'
'Yeah,' said Constable Hacknee, another dwarf. 'When your back's against the wall, Mister Vimes is right behind you.'
'But old Fred... you all know old Fred Colon, boys,' Nobby wheedled, taking a kettle off the
office stove and pouring the boiling water into a teapot. 'He knows coppering inside and out.'
'His kind of coppering, yeah,' said Hacknee.
'I mean, he's been a copper longer than anyone in the Watch,' said Nobby.
One of the dwarfs said something in dwarfish. There were a few smiles from the shorter watchmen.
'What was that?' said Nobby.
'Well, roughly translated,' said Stronginthearm, "'My bum has been a bum for a very long time but I don't have to listen to anything it says."'
'He fined me half a dollar for mumping,' said Hacknee. 'Fred Colon! He practically goes on patrol with a shopping bag! And all I had was a free pint at the Bunch of Grapes and I found out that Posh Wally is suddenly flashing a lot of money lately. That's worth knowing. I remember going out on patrol with Fred Colon when I started and you could practically see him tucking his napkin under his chin whenever we walked past a cafe. "Oh, no, Sergeant Colon, wouldn't dream of seeing you pay." They used to lay the table when they saw him turn the corner.'
'Everyone does it,' said Stronginthearm.
'Captain Carrot never did,' said Nobby.
'Captain Carrot was... special.'
'But what am I supposed to do with this?' said Visit, waving the ink-speckled message. 'Mister Vimes wants some information urgently, he says!'
Stronginthearm took the paper and read it.
'Well, this shouldn't be hard,' he said. 'Old Wussie Staid in Kicklebury Street was a janitor there for years and he owes me a favour.'


- 86 -
'If we're going to send a clacks to Mister Vimes then we ought to tell him about the Scone and Sonky,' said Reg Shoe. 'You know he left a message about that. I've done a report.'
'Why? He's hundreds of miles away.'
'I'd just feel happier if he knew,' said Reg. "cos it worries me.'
'What good will it do sending it to him, then?'
'Because then it'll worry him, and I can stop worrying,' said Reg.
'Corporal Nobbs!'
'He listens at the door, I'll swear he does,' said Stronginthearm. 'I'm off.'
'Coming, captain!' shouted Nobby. He pulled open the bottom drawer of his battered and stained desk and took out a packet of chocolate biscuits, some of which he arranged daintily on a plate.
'Does me no good at all to see you acting like this,' Stronginthearm went on, winking at the other dwarfs. 'You've got it in you to be a really bad copper, Nobby. Breaks my heart to see you throwin' it all away to become a really bad waitress.'
'Ha ha ha,' said Nobby. 'Just you wait, that's all I'm saying.' He raised his voice. 'Coming right now, captain!'
There was a sharp smell of burned paper in the captain's room when Nobby entered.
'Nothing cheers up the day like a good fire, I always say,' he said, putting the tray on the desk.
But Captain Colon wasn't paying any attention. He'd removed the sugar bowl from the locked drawer of his desk and had laid the cubes out in rows.
'Do you see anything wrong with these lumps, corporal?' he said quietly.
'Well, they're a bit manky where you've been handling them every—'
'There's thirty-seven, corporal.'
'Sorry about that, captain.'
'Visit must've pinched them when he was in here. He must've used some fancy foreign trick. They can do that, you know. Climb ropes and disappear up the top of 'em, that sort of thing.'


- 87 -
'Did he have a rope?' said Nobby.
'Are you making fun of me, corporal?'
Nobby saluted. 'Nossir! Maybe it was a invisible one, sir. After all, if they can disappear up a rope, they can make the rope disappear, too. Obviously.'
'Good thinking, corporal.'
'On the subject of thinking, sir,' said Nobby, plunging in, 'have you had time in your busy schedule to give some thought to the promotion of the new sergeant?'
'I have, as a matter of fact, put that very thing in hand, corporal.'
'Good, sir.'
'I've borne in mind everything you said, and the choice was starin' me in the face.'
'Yessir!' said Nobby, sticking out his chest and saluting.
'I just hope it don't cause loss of morals. It can do that, when people are promoted. So if there's any trouble like that, I want the sugar-stealing person reported to me right away, understand?'
'Yessir!' Nobby's feet had almost left the ground.
'And I shall rely on you, corporal, to let me know if Sergeant Flint has any trouble.'
'Sergeant Flint,' said Nobby, in a little voice.
'I know he's a troll, but I won't have it said I'm an unfair man.'
`Sergeant Flint.'
'I knows I can rely on you, corporal.'
'Sergeant Flint.'
'That will be all. I've got to go and see his lordship in an hour and I want some time to think. That's what my job is, thinking.'
'Sergeant Flint.'
'Yes. I should go and report to him if I was you.'
White chicken feathers were scattered across the field. The farmer stood at the door of his henhouse, shaking his head. He glanced up as a horseman approached.


- 88 -
'Good morrow, sir! Are you experiencing trouble?'
The farmer opened his mouth for a witty or at least snappy response, but something stopped him. Perhaps it was the sword the horseman had slung across his back. Perhaps it was the man's faint smile. The smile was somehow more frightening.
'Er, somethin's been at my fowls,' he ventured. 'Fox, I reckon.'
'Wolf, I suspect,' said the rider.
The man opened his mouth to say, 'Don't be daft, we don't get wolves down here this time of the year,' but again the confident smile made him hesitate.
'Got many hens, did they?'
'Six,' said the farmer.
'And they got in by...'
'Well, that's the strange th- Here, keep that dog away!'
A small mongrel had leapt down from the saddle and was sniffing around the henhouses.
'He won't be any trouble,' said the rider.
'I shouldn't push your luck, mate, he's in a funny mood,' said a voice behind the farmer. He turned around quickly.
The dog looked up at him innocently. Everyone knew that dogs didn't talk.
'Woof? Bark? Whine?' it said.
'He's highly trained,' said the rider.
'Yeah, right,' said the voice behind the farmer. He felt an overpowering desire to see the back of the horseman. The smile was getting on his nerves, and now he was hearing things.
'I can't see how they got in,' he said. 'The door's latched...'
'And wolves don't usually leave payment, right?' said the rider.
'How the hell did you know that?'
'Well, several reasons, sir, but I couldn't help noticing that you clenched your fist tightly as soon as you heard me, and I surmise therefore that you found — let me


- 89 -
see — three dollars left in the chicken house. Three dollars would buy six fine birds in Ankh-Morpork.'
The man opened his fist, wordlessly. The coins glinted in the sunlight.
'But... but I sells 'em at the gate for tenpence!' he wailed. 'They only had to arsk!'
'Probably didn't want to bother you,' said the horseman. 'Since I am here, sir, I would be grateful if you could sell me a chicken—'
Behind the farmer the dog said, 'Woof woof!'
'-two chickens, and I will not trespass further upon your time.'
'Woof woof woof.'
'Three chickens,' said the rider wearily. 'And if you have them dressed and cooked while I tend to my horse I will gladly pay a dollar each.'
'Woof, woof.'
'Without garlic or any seasoning on two of the chickens, please,' said the rider.
The farmer nodded wordlessly. A dollar a chicken wasn't chickenfeed. You didn't turn up your nose at an offer like that. But most importantly, you didn't disobey a man with that faint little smile on his face. It didn't seem to move or change. As smiles went, you wanted this one to go as far away as possible.
He hurried off to the yard that held his best fowls, reached down to select the fattest... and paused. A man who was mad enough to pay a dollar for a good chicken might be quite content with just a reasonable chicken, after all. He stood up.
'Only the best, mister.'
He spun around. There was no one except the little scruffy dog, which had followed him and was now raising a cloud of dust as it scratched itself.
'Woof?' it said.
He threw a stone at it and it trotted off. Then he selected three of the very best chickens.
Carrot was lying down under a tree, trying to make his head comfortable on a saddlebag.
'Did you see where she'd almost rubbed out her footprints in the dust?' said Gaspode.


- 90 -
'Yes,' said Carrot, closing his eyes.
'Does she always pay for chickens?'
'Yes.'
'Why?'
Carrot turned over. 'Because animals don't.'
Gaspode looked at the back of Carrot's head. On the whole he enjoyed the unusual gift of speech, but something about the reddening of Carrot's ears told him that this was the time to employ the even rarer gift of silence.
He settled down in the pose he almost unconsciously categorized as Faithful Companion Keeping Watch, got bored, scratched himself absentmindedly, curled up in the pose- known as Faithful Companion Curled Up With His Nose Pressed On His Bottom13, and fell asleep.
He awoke shortly afterwards to the sound of voices. There was also a faint smell of roast chicken coming from the direction of the farmhouse.
Gaspode rolled over and saw the farmer talking to another man on a cart. He listened for a moment and then sat up, locked in a metaphysical conundrum.
Finally he woke Carrot by licking his ear.
'Fzwl... What?'
'You got to promise to collect the roast chicken first, all right?' said Gaspode urgently.
'What?' Carrot sat up.
'Get the chickens and then we gotta go, right? You gotta promise.'
'All right, all right, I promise. What's happening?'
'You ever heard of a town called Scant Cullot?'
'I think it's about ten miles from here.'
'One of Mister Farmer's neighbours has just told him that they've caught a wolf there.'
'Killed it?'
13 One that no other creature in the world would ever adopt.


- 91 -
'No, no, no, but the wolf-hunters... there's wolf-hunters in these parts, see, 'cos of the sheep up on the hills and.. they have to train their dogs first remember you promised about the chickens!'
At precisely eleven o'clock there was a smart rap on Lord Vetinari's door. The Patrician gave the woodwork a puzzled frown. At last he said: 'Come.'
Fred Colon entered with difficulty. Vetinari watched him for a few moments until pity overcame even him.
'Acting captain, it is not necessary to remain to attention at all times,' he said kindly. 'You are allowed to unbend enough for the satisfactory manipulation of a doorknob.'
'Yes, sah!'
Lord Vetinari raised a hand to his ear protectively. 'You may be seated.'
'Yes, sah!'
'You may be quieter, too.'
'Yes, sah!'
Lord Vetinari retreated to the protection of his desk. 'May I commend you on the gleam of your armour, acting captain—'
'Spit and polish, sah! No substitute for it, sah!' Sweat was streaming down Colon's face.
'Oh, good. Clearly you have been purchasing extra supplies of spit. Now then, let me see...' Lord Vetinari drew a sheet of paper from one of the small stacks in front of him.
'Now then, acti—'
'Sah!'
'To be sure. I have here another complaint of over-enthusiastic clamping. I'm sure you know to what I refer.'
'It was causing serious traffic congestion, sah!'
'Quite so. It is well known for it. But it is, in fact, the opera house.'
'Sah!'


- 92 -
'The owner feels that big yellow clamps at each corner detract from what I might call the tone of the building. And, of course, they do prevent him from driving it away.'
'Sah!'
'Indeed. I think that this is a case where discretion might be advisable, acting captain!'
'Got to make an example to the others, sah!'
'Ah. Yes.' The Patrician held another piece of paper delicately between thumb and forefinger, as though it was some rare and strange creature. 'The others being... let me see if I can recall, some things do stick in the mind so... ah, yes... three other buildings, six fountains, three statues and the gibbet in Nonesuch Street. Oh, and my own palace.'
'I fully understand you're parked on business, sah!'
Lord Vetinari paused. He found it difficult to talk to Frederick Colon. He dealt on a daily basis with people who treated conversation as a complex game, and with Colon he had to keep on adjusting his mind in case he overshot.
'Pursuing the business of your recent career with, I have to admit, some considerable and growing fascination, I am moved to ask you why the Watch now appears to have a staff of twenty.'
'Sah?'
'You had around sixty a little while ago, I'm sure.'
Colon mopped his face. 'Cutting out the dead wood, sah! Making the Watch leaner an' fitter, sah!'
'I see. The number of internal disciplinary charges you have laid against your men' — and here the Patrician picked up a much thicker document — 'seems somewhat excessive. I see no fewer than one hundred and seventy-three offences of eyeballing, earlobing and nostrilling, for example.'
'Sah!'
'Nostrilling, acting captain?'
'Sah!'
'Oh. And I see, ah yes, one charge of "making his arm fall off in an insubordinate way" laid against Constable Shoe. Commander Vimes has always given me glowing reports about this officer.'


- 93 -
Ole's a nasty piece of work, sah! You can't trust the dead ones!'
'Nor, it would seem, most of the live ones.'
'Sah!' Colon leaned forward, his face twisted in a ghastly grimace of conspiratoriality. 'Between you and me, sir, Commander Vimes was a good deal too soft on them. He let them get away with too much. No sugar is safe, sah!'
Vetinari's eyes narrowed, but the telescopes on Planet Colon were far too unsophisticated to detect his mood.
'I certainly recall him mentioning a couple of officers whose time-keeping, demeanour, and all-round uselessness were a dreadful example to the rest of the men,' said the Patrician.
'There's my point,' said Colon triumphantly. 'One bad apple ruins the whole barrel!'
'I think there's only a basket now,' said the Patrician. 'A punnet, possibly.'
'Don't you worry about a thing, your lordship! I'll turn things around. I'll soon get them smartened up!'
'I am sure you have it in you to surprise me even further,' said Vetinari, leaning back. 'I shall definitely keep my eye on you as the man to watch. And now, acting- captain, do you have anything else to report?'
'All nice and quiet, sah!'
'I would that it was,' said Vetinari. 'I was just wondering if there was anything going on involving any person in this city called' — he looked down at another sheet of paper —'Sonky?'
Captain Colon almost swallowed his tongue. 'Minor matter, sah!' he managed.
'So, Sonky is alive?'
'Er... found dead, sah!'
'Murdered?'
'Sah!'
'Dear me. Many people would not consider that a minor matter, acting captain. Sonky, for one.'
'Well, sah, not everyone agrees with what he does, sah.'


- 94 -
'Are we by any chance talking about Wallace Sonky? The manufacturer of rubber goods?'
'Sah!'
'Boots and gloves seem non-controversial to me, acting captain.'.
'It's, er, the other stuff, sah!' Colon coughed nervously. 'He makes them rubber wallies, sah.'
'Ah. The preventatives.'
'Lot of people don't agree with that sort of thing, sah.'
'So I understand.'
Colon drew himself up to attention again. 'Not natural, in my view, sah. Not in favour of unnatural things.'
Vetinari looked perplexed. 'You mean, you eat your meat raw and sleep in a tree?'
'Sah?'
'Oh, nothing, nothing. Someone in Uberwald seems to be taking an interest in him lately. And now he's dead. I would not dream of telling the Watch their job, of course.'
He watched Colon carefully to see if this had sunk in.
'I said that it is entirely up to you to choose what to investigate in this bustling city,' he prompted.
Colon was lost in unfamiliar country without a map. 'Thank you, sah!' he barked.
Vetinari sighed. 'And now, acting captain, I'm sure there's much that needs your attention.'
'Sah! I've got plans to—'
'I meant, do not let me detain you.'
'Oh, that's all right, sir, I've got plenty of time—'
'Goodbye; Acting Captain Colon.'
Out in the anteroom Fred Colon stood very still for a while, until his heartbeat wound down from a whine to at least a purr.


- 95 -
It had, on the whole, gone quite well. Very well. Amazingly well, really. His lordship had practically taken him into his confidence. He'd called him 'a man to watch'.
Fred wondered why he'd been so scared of officering all these years. There was nothing to it, really, once you got the bull between your teeth. If only he'd started years ago! Of course, he wouldn't hear a word said about Mr Vimes, who should certainly be looking after himself in those dangerous foreign parts... but, well, Fred Colon had been a sergeant when Sam Vimes was a rookie, hadn't he? It was only his nat'ral deference that'd held him back all these years. When Sam Vimes came back, and with the Patrician there to put in a good word for him, Fred Colon would definitely be on the promotion ladder.
Only to full captain, of course, he thought as he strutted down the stairs — with great care, because strutting is usually impossible while walking downwards. He wouldn't want to outrank Captain Carrot. That would be... wrong.
This fact shows that, however crazed with power someone may be, a tiny instinct for selfpreservation always remains.
He got the chickens first, thought Gaspode, winding his way through the legs of the crowd. Amazin'.
They hadn't stopped to eat them, though. Gaspode had been stuffed into the other saddlebag and would not like to have to go through ten miles like that again, especially so close to the smell of roast chicken.
It looked as though there was a market going on, and the wolf-baiting had been saved as a sort of closing ceremony. Hurdles had been arranged in a rough circle. Men were holding the collars of dogs — big, heavy, unpleasant-looking dogs, which were already wild with excitement and deranged stupidity.
There was a coop by the hurdles. Gaspode made his way to it and peered through the wooden bars at the heap of matted grey fur in the shadows.
'Looks like you're in a spot of strife, friend,' he said.
Contrary to legend — and there are so many legends about wolves, although mostly they are legends about the way men think about wolves — a trapped wolf is more likely to whine and fawn than go wild with rage.
But this one must have felt it had nothing to lose. Foam-flecked jaws snapped at the bars.
'Where's the rest of your pack, then?' said Gaspode.
'No pack, shorty!'


- 96 -
'Ah. A lone wolf, eh?' The worst kind, Gaspode thought.
'Roast chicken isn't worth this,' he muttered. Out loud, he growled, 'You seen any other wolves around here?'
'Yes!'
'Good. You want to get out of here alive?'
'I'll kill them a11!'
'Right, right, but there's dozens of 'em, see. You won't stand a chance. They'll tear you to bits. Dogs're a lot nastier than wolves.'
In the shade the eyes narrowed.
'Why're you telling me, dog?'
''cos I'm here to help you, see? You do what I tell you, you could be out of here in half an hour. Otherwise you're a rug on someone's floor tomorrow. Your choice. O'course, there might not be enough of you left to make a rug.'
The wolf listened to the baying of the dogs. There was no mistaking their intent.
'What did you have in mind?' it said.
A few minutes later the crowd was gently nudged aside as Carrot edged his horse towards the pen. The hubbub died. A sword on a horse always commands respect; the rider is often a mere courtesy detail, but in this case it was not so. The Watch had put the final swell and polish on Carrot's muscles.
And there was that faint smile. It was the sort you backed away from.
'Good day. Who is in charge here?' he said.
There was a certain amount of comparison of status, and a man cautiously raised his hand.
'I'm the deputy mayor, y'honour,' he said.
'And what is this event?'
'We'm about to bait a wolf, y'honour.'
'Really? I myself own a wolfhound of unusual strength and prowess. May I test it against the creature?'
There was more mumbling among the bystanders, the general consensus being: why not? Anyway, there was that smile...


- 97 -
'Go ahead, y'honour,' said the deputy mayor.
Carrot stuck his fingers in his mouth and whistled. The townspeople watched in astonishment as Gaspode walked out from between their legs and sat down. Then the laughter started.
It died away after a while, because the faint smile didn't.
'Is there a problem?' said Carrot.
'It'll get torn limb from limb!'
'Well? Do you care what happens to a wolf?'
Laughter broke out again. The deputy mayor had a feeling he was being got at.
'It's your dog, mister,' he said, shrugging.
The little dog barked.
'And to make it interesting we'll wager a pound of steak,' said Carrot.
The dog barked again.
'Two pounds of steak,' Carrot corrected himself.
'Oh, I reckon it's going to be interesting enough as it is,' said the deputy mayor. The smile was beginning to prey on his nerves. 'All right, boys, fetch the wolf!'
The creature was dragged into the ring of hurdles, slavering and snarling.
'No, don't tie it up,' said Carrot, as a man went to wrap the halter around a post.
'It'll get away if we don't.'
'It won't have a chance, believe me.'
They looked at the smile, dragged the muzzle from the wolf and leapt to safety.
'Now, just in case you were havin' second thoughts about our agreement,' said Gaspode to the wolf, 'I suggest you look at the face of the bloke on the horse, right?'
The wolf glanced up. It saw the wolverine smile on the face of the rider.
Gaspode barked. The wolf yelped and rolled over.
The crowd waited. And then
'Is that it?'


- 98 -
'Yes, that's how it normally goes,' said Carrot. 'It's a special bark, you see. All the blood in the victim congeals in an instant, out of sheer terror.'
'It hasn't even worried the body!'
'What,' said Carrot, 'would be the point of that?'
He got down from the horse, pushed his way into the ring, picked up the body of the wolf and flung it across the saddle.
'It grunted! I heard it—' someone began.
'That was probably air being expressed from the corpse,' said Carrot. The smile still hadn't gone, and at that point it suggested very subtly that Carrot had heard the last gasp of hundreds of corpses.
'Yeah, that's right,' said a voice in the crowd. 'Everyone knows that. And now what about the steak for the brave little doggie?'
The people looked around to see who had said this. None of them looked down, because dogs can't talk.
'We can forgo the steak,' said Carrot, mounting up.
'No, w- No you can't,' said the voice. 'A deal's a deal. Who was risking their life here, that's what I'd like to know.'.
'Come, Gaspode,' said Carrot.
Whining and grumbling, the little dog emerged from the crowd and trailed after the horse.
It wasn't until they were at the edge of the town square that one of the people said, 'Oh, what the hell happened there?' and the spell broke. But by then both horse and dog were travelling really, really fast.
Vimes hated and despised the privileges of rank, but they had this to be said for them: at least they meant that you could hate and despise them in comfort.
Willikins would arrive at an inn an hour before Vimes's coach and, with an arrogance that Vimes would never dare employ, take over several rooms and install Vimes's own cook in the kitchen. Vimes complained about this to Inigo.
'But you see, your grace, you're not here as an individual but as Ankh-Morpork. When people look at you, they see the city, mhm, mhm.'
'They do? Should I stop washing?'


- 99 -
'That is very droll, sir. But you see, sir, you and the city are one. Mhm, mhm. If you are insulted, Ankh-Morpork is insulted. If you befriend, Ankh-Morpork befriends.'
'Really? What happens when I go to the lavatory?'
`That's up to you, sir. Mmhm, mmph.'
At breakfast next morning Vimes sliced the top off a boiled egg, thinking: this is Ankh-Morpork slicing the top off a boiled egg. If I cut my toast into soldiers we're probably at war.
Corporal Littlebottom entered carefully and saluted.
'Your message came back, sir,' she said, handing him a scrap of paper. 'From Sergeant Stronginthearm. I've deciphered it for you. Er... the Scone from the Museum's been found, sir.'
'Well, that's the other shoe dropped,' said Vimes. 'I was worried there for a moment.'
'Er, in fact Constable Shoe is bothered about it,' said Cheery. 'It's 'a bit hard to follow what he says, but he seems to think someone made a copy of it.'
'What, a fake of a fake? What good's that?'
'I really couldn't say, sir. Your other... surmise was correct.'
Vimes glanced at the paper. 'Hah. Thanks, Cheery. We'll be down shortly.'
'You're humming, Sam,' said Sybil, after a while. 'That means something awful is going to happen to somebody.'
'Wonderful thing, technology,' said Vimes, buttering a slice of toast. 'I can see it has its uses.'
'And when you grin in that shiny sort of way it means that someone's playing silly buggers and doesn't know you've just thrown a six.'
'I don't know what you mean, dear. It's probably the country air agreeing with me.'
Lady Sybil put down her teacup. 'Sam?'
'Yes, dear?'
'This is probably not the best time to mention it, but you know I told you I went to see old Mrs Content? Well, she says—'


- 100 -
There was another knock at the door. Lady Sybil sighed.
This time it was Inigo who entered.
'We should be leaving, your grace, if you don't mind. I would like us to be at Slake by lunchtime and through the pass at Wilinus before dark, mhm, mhm.'
'Do we have to rush so?' sighed Sybil.
'The pass is... slightly dangerous,' said Inigo. 'Somewhat lawless. Mhm, mhm.'
'Only somewhat?' said Vimes.
'I will just feel happier when it is behind us,' said Inigo. 'It would be a good idea if the second coach follows, us closely and your men stay alert, your grace.'
'They teach you tactics in Lord Vetinari's political office, do they, Inigo?' said Vimes.
'Just common sense, mhm, mhm, sir.'
'Why don't we wait until tomorrow before attempting the pass?'
'With respect, your grace, I suggest not. For one thing, the weather is worsening. And I'm sure we're being watched. We must demonstrate that there is no yellow in the Ankh-Morpork flag, mhm, mhm.'
'There is,' said Vimes. 'It's on the owl and the collars of the hippos.'
'I mean,' said Inigo, 'that the colours of Ankh-Morpork do not run.'
'Only since we got the new dyes,' said Vimes. 'All right, all right. I know what you mean. But, look, I'm not risking the servants if there's any danger. And there's to be no arguing, understand? They can stay here and take the mail coach tomorrow. No one attacks the mail coaches any more.'
'I suggest Lady Sybil remains here too, sir. Mhm.'
'Absolutely not,' said Sybil. 'I wouldn't hear of it! If it's not too dangerous for Sam, it's not too dangerous for me.'
'I wouldn't argue with her if I was you,' said Vimes to Inigo. 'I really wouldn't.'
The wolf was not very happy about being tethered to a tree but, as Gaspode said, never trust nobody.
They'd paused a while in a wood about five miles from the town. It'd be a brief stop, Carrot had said. Some of the people in the square looked the sort who treasured their lack of a sense of humour.


- 101 -
After some barking and growling Gaspode said, 'You got to understand that matey here is pers'nally non gratis in local wolf society, being a bit of, ahaha, lone wolf...'
'Yes?' Carrot was taking the roast chickens out of their sack. Gaspode's eyes fixed on them.
'But he hears the howlin' at night.'
'Ah, wolves communicate?'
'Basic'ly your wolf howl is just another way of pissin' against a tree to say it's your damn tree, but there's always bits of news, too. Something pasty's happenin' in Uberwald. He doesn't know what.' Gaspode lowered his voice. 'Between you and me, our friend here was well behind the door when the brains was handed out. If wolves was people, he'd be like Foul Ole Ron.'
'What's his name?' said Carrot thoughtfully.
Gaspode gave Carrot a Look. Who cared what a wolf was called?
'Wolf names is difficult,' he said. 'More like a description, see? It's not like callin' yourself Mr Snuggles or Bonzo, you understand...'
'Yes, I know. So what is his name?'
'You want to know what his name is, then?'
'Yes, Gaspode.'
'So, in fact, it's the name of this wolf you want to know?'
'That is correct.'
Gaspode shifted uneasily. 'Arsehole,' he said.
'Oh.' To the dog's frank astonishment, Carrot blushed.
'That's basic'ly a summary, but it's a pretty good translation,' he said. 'I wouldn't have mentioned it, but you did ask...'
Gaspode stopped and whined for a moment, trying to convey the message that he was losing his voice due to lack of chicken.
'Er, there's been a lot on the howl about Angua,' he went on, when Carrot seemed unable to take the hint. 'Er, they think she's bad news.'
'Why? She's travelling as a wolf, after all.'


- 102 -
'Wolves hate werewolves.'
'What? That can't be right! When she's wolf-shaped she's just like a wolf!'
'So? When she's human-shaped she's just like a human. And what's that got to do with anything? Humans don't like werewolves. Wolves don't like werewolves. People don't like wolves that can think like people, an' people don't like people who can act like wolves. Which just shows you that people are the same everywhere,' said Gaspode. He assessed this sentence and added, 'Even when they're wolves.'
'I never thought of it like that.'
'And she smells wrong. Wolves are very sensitive to that sort of thing.'
'Tell me more about the howl.'
'Oh, it's like the clacky thing. News gets spread for hundreds of miles.'
'Do the howls... mention her... companion?'
'No, If you like, I'll ask Ars—'
'I'd prefer a different name, if it's all the same to you,' said Carrot. 'Words like that aren't clever.'
Gaspode rolled his eyes. 'There's nothing wrong with the word among us pedestically gifted species,' he said. 'We're very smelloriented.' He sighed. 'How about "bum"? In the sense of, er, migratory worker? He's a freelance chicken -throttler, style of frog?'
He turned to the wolf and spoke in canine. 'Now then, Bum, this human is insane and believe me I know a mad human when I see one. He's frothing at the mouth inside and he'll rip your hide off and nail it to a tree if you aren't straight with us, understand?'
"What was that you just told him?" said Carrot.
"Just explainin' we're friends," said Gaspode. To the cowering wolf he barked: "Okay, he's prob'ly going to do that anyway, but I can talk to him, so your only chance is to tell us everything—"
"Know nothing!" the wolf whined. "She was with a big he-wolf from Uberwald! From the Clan That Smells Like This!"
Gaspode sniffed. "He's a long way from home, then."
"He's a bad news wolf!"


- 103 -
"Tell it there'll be roast chicken for its trouble," said Carrot.
Gaspode sighed. It was a hard life, being an interpreter.
"All right," he growled. "I'll persuade him to untie you. It'll take some doing, mark you. If he offers you a chicken, don't take it 'cos it'll be poisoned. Humans, eh?"
Carrot watched the wolf flee.
"Odd," he said. "You've have thought it'd be hungry, wouldn't you?"
Gaspode looked up from the roast chicken. "Wolves, eh?" he said, indistinctly.
That night, when they heard the wolves howling in the distant mountains, Gaspode picked up one solitary, lonely howl behind them.
The towers followed them up into the mountains although, Vimes noticed, there were some differences in construction. Down on the plains they were more or less just a high wooden gantry with a shed at the bottom but here, although the design was the same, it was clearly temporary. Next to it men were at work on a heavy stone base — fortifications, he realized, which meant that he really was beyond the law. Of course, technically he'd been beyond his law since leaving Ankh-Morpork, but laws were where you could make it stick and these days a City Watch badge would at least earn respect, if not actual cooperation, everywhere on the plains. Up here, it was just an ugly brooch.
Slake turned out to be a stone-walled coaching inn and not much else. It had, Vimes noticed, very heavy shutters on the window. It also had what he thought was a strange iron griddle over the fireplace until he recognized it for what it was, a sort of portcullis that could block off the chimney. This place expected to withstand the occasional siege that might include enemies who could fly.
It was sleeting when they went out to the coaches.
"A storm's closing in, mmm, mhm," said Inigo. "We shall have to hurry."
"Why?" said Sybil.
"The pass will probably be closed for several days, Your Ladyship. If we wait, we may even miss the coronation. And ... er ... there may be slight bandit activity ..."
"Slight bandit activity?" said Vimes.
"Yes, sir."
"You mean they wake up and decide to go back to bed? Or they just steal enough for a cup of coffee?"


- 104 -
"Very droll, sir. They do, notoriously, take hostages—"
"Bandits don't frighten me," said Sybil.
"If I may—" Inigo began.
"Mister Skimmer," said Lady Sybil, drawing herself up to her full width, "I did in fact just tell you what we are going to do. See to it, please. There are servants at the consulate, aren't there?"
"There is one, I believe—"
"Then we shall happily make do as best we can. Won't we, Sam?"
"Certainly, dear."
It was seriously snowing by the time they left, in great feather lumps which fell with a faint damp hiss, muffling all other sound. Vimes wouldn't have known that they'd reached the pass if the coaches hadn't stopped.
"The coach with your ... men on it should go in front," said Inigo, as they stood in the snow beside the steaming horses. "We should follow close behind. I'll ride with our driver, just in case."
"So that if we are attacked by anyone you can give them a potted summary of the political situation?" said Vimes. "No, you will ride inside with Lady Sybil, and I'll ride on the box. Got to protect the civilians, eh?"
"Your Grace, I—"
"However, your suggestion is appreciated," Vimes went on. "You get inside, Mister Skimmer"
The man opened his mouth. Vimes raised an eyebrow.
"Very well, Your Grace, but it is extremely—"
"Good man."
"I should like my leather case down from the roof, though."
"Certainly. A bit of fact-finding will take your mind of things."
Vimes walked forward to the other carriage, poked his head inside and said, "We're going to be ambushed, lads."
"Dat's interestin'," said Detritus. He grunted slightly as he wound the windlass of his crossbow.


- 105 -
"Oh," said Cheery.
"I don't think they'll try to kill us," Vimes went on.
"Does dat mean we don't try to kill dem?"
"Use your own judgment."
Detritus sighted along a thick bundle of arrows. They were his idea. Since his giant crossbow was capable of sending an iron bolt through the gates of a city under siege, he had felt it rather a waste to use it on just one person, so he had adapted it to fire a sheaf of several dozen arrows all at once. The threads holding them together were supposed to snap under acceleration. They did so. Quite often the arrows also shattered in midair as they failed to withstand the enormous pressure.
He called it the Piecemaker. He'd only tried it once, down at the butts; Vimes had seen a target vanish. So had the targets on either side of it, the earth bank behind it, and a spiraling cloud of feathers floating down had been all that remained of a couple of seagulls who had been in the wrong place at the wrong time. In this instance, the wrong place had been vertically above Detritus.
Now no other watchmen would go on patrol with the troll unless they could stay at least a hundred yards directly behind him. But the test had the desired effect, because someone saw everything in Ankh-Morpork and news about the targets had got around. Now just the knowledge that Detritus was on his way cleared a street much faster than any weapon.
"I got lots of judgment," he said.
"You be careful with that thing," said Vimes. "You could hurt someone."
The party started out again, through the swirls of snow. Vimes made himself comfortable among the luggage, lit a cigar and then, when he was sure that the rattling of the coach would mask the sounds, rummaged farther under the tarpaulin and drew out Inigo's cheap, scarred leather case.
From his pocket he took a small roll of black cloth, and unrolled it on his knee. Intricate little lockpicks glinted for a moment in the light of the coach lamps.
A good copper has to be able to think like a criminal. Vimes was a very good copper.
He was also a very alive copper and intended to remain that way. That was why, when the case's lock went click, he laid it down on the shaking roof with its lid opening away from him and, leaning back, carefully lifted the lid with his boot.


- 106 -
A long blade flicked out. It would have terminally ruined the digestion of a casual thief. Someone obviously expected very bad hotel security on this journey.
Vimes carefully eased it back into its spring-loaded sheath, looked upon the contents of the case, smiled in a not very happy way, and carefully lifted out something that gleamed with the silvery light of carefully designed, beautifully engineered and very compact evil.
He thought: Sometimes it would be nice to be wrong about people.
Gaspode knew they were in the high foothills now. Places to buy food were getting scarce. However carefully Carrot knocked at the door of some isolated farmstead, he'd end up having to talk to people who were hiding under the bed. People here were not used to the idea of muscular men with swords who were actually anxious to buy things.
In the end it generally worked out quicker to walk in, go through the contents of the pantry, and leave some money on the table for when the people came up out of the cellar.
It had been two days since the last cottage, and there was so little there that Carrot, to Gaspode's disgust, had just left some money.
The forest thickened. Alder became pine. There were snow showers every night. The stars were pinpoints of frost.
And, colder and harder, rising with the sunset, was the howl.
It went up on every side, a great mournful ululation across the freezing forests.
"They're so close I can smell 'em," said Gaspode. "They've been shadowing us for days."
"There has never been an authenticated case of an unprovoked wolf attacking an adult human being," said Carrot. They were both huddling under his cloak.
After a while Gaspode said, "An' that's good, is it?"
"What do you mean?"
"We-ell, o'course us dogs only has little brains, but it seems to me that what you just said was pretty much the same as sayin' 'no unprovokin' adult human bein' has ever returned to tell the tale, 'right? I mean, your wolf has just got to make sure they kill people in quiet places where no one'll ever know, yes?"
More snow settled on the cloak. It was large, and heavy, and a relic of many a long night in the Ankh-Morpork rain. In front of it, a fire flickered and hissed.


- 107 -
"I wish you hadn't said that, Gaspode."
These were big, serious flakes of snow. Winter was moving fast down the mountains.
"You wish I hadn't said it?"
"But... no, I'm sure there's nothing to be afraid of."
A drift had nearly covered the cloak.
"You shouldn't've traded the horse for those snowshoes back at the last place," said Gaspode.
"The poor thing was done in. Anyway, it wasn't exactly a trade. The people wouldn't come down out of the chimney. They did say to take anything we wanted."
"They said to take everything, only spare their lives."
"Yes. I don't know why. I smiled at them."
There was a doggy sigh.
"Trouble is, see, you could carry me on the horse, but this is deep snow and I am a little doggie. My problems are closer to the ground. I hope I don't have to draw you a picture."
"I've got some spare clothes in my pack. I might be able to make you a ... coat—"
"A coat wouldn't do the trick."
Another howl began, quite close this time.
The snow was falling a lot faster. The hissing of the fire turned into a sizzle. Then it went out.
Gaspode was not good at snow. It was not a precipitation he normally had to face. In the city, there was
Another howl began, quite close this time.
The snow was falling a lot faster. The hissing of the fire turned into a sizzle. Then it went out.
Gaspode was not good at snow. It was not a precipitation he normally had to face. In the city, there was always somewhere warm if you knew where to look.


- 108 -
Anyway, snow only stayed snow for an hour or two, and then it became brown slush and was trodden into the general slurry of the streets.
Streets. Gaspode really missed streets. He could be wise on streets. Out here, he was dumb on mud.
"Fire's gone out," he said.
There was no answer from Carrot.
"Fire's gone out, I said ..."
This time there was a snore.
"Hey, you can't go to sleep!" Gaspode whined. "Not now. We'll freeze to death."
The next voice in the howl seemed only a few trees away. Gaspode thought he could see dark shapes in the endless curtain of snow.
"... if we're lucky," he mumbled. He licked Carrot's face, a move that usually resulted in the lickee chasing Gaspode down the street with a broom. There was merely another snore.
Gaspode's mind raced.
Of course, he was a dog, and dogs and wolves ... well, they were the same, right? Everyone knew that. So-oo, said a treacherous inner voice ... maybe it wasn't exactly Gaspode and Carrot in trouble. Maybe it was only Carrot. Yeah, right on, brothers! Let us join together in wild runs in the moonlight! But first, let us eat this monkey!
On the other paw...
He'd got hard pad, soft pad, the swinge, licky end, scroff, mange and something rather strange on the back of his neck that he couldn't quite reach. Gaspode somehow couldn't imagine the wolves saying Hey, he's one of us!
Besides, while he'd begged, fought, tricked and stolen, he'd never actually been a Bad Dog.
You needed to be a moderately good theological disputant to accept this, especially since a fair number of sausages and prime cuts had disappeared from butchers' slabs in a blur of grey and a lingering odour of lavatory carpet, but nevertheless Gaspode was clear in his own mind that he'd never crossed the boundary from merely being a Naughty Boy. He'd never bitten a hand that fed


- 109 -
him14. He'd never done It on the carpet. He'd never shirked a Duty. It was a bugger, but there you were. It was a dog thing.
He whined when the ring of dark shapes closed in.
Eyes gleamed.
He whined again, and then growled as unseen fanged death surrounded him.
This was clearly impressing no one, not even Gaspode.
He wagged his tail nervously. 'Just passin' through!' he said in a strangulatedly cheerful voice. 'No trouble to anyone!'
There was a definite feeling that the shadows beyond the snowflakes were getting more crowded.
'So, have you had your holidays yet?' he squeaked.
This also did not appear to be well received.
Well, this was it, then. Famous Last Stand. Plucky Dog Defends His Master. What a Good Dog. Shame there'd be no one left to tell anyone...
He barked, 'Mine! Mine!' and leapt snarling towards the nearest shape.
A huge paw swatted him out of the air and then pinned him down, spreadeagled, in the snow.
He looked up past white fangs and a long muzzle into eyes that seemed familiar.
'Hmine,' growled the wolf. It was Angua.
The coaches slowed to a walk on a road that was rough with potholes under the unbroken snow, every one a wheel-breaking trap in the dark.
Vimes nodded to himself when he saw lights flickering beside the road a few miles into the pass. On either side, old landslides had formed banks of scree, down which the forests had spilled.
He dropped quietly off the back of the coach and vanished into the shadows.
The leading coach stopped at a log which had been dropped across the road. There was some movement, and then the driver swung himself down into the mud and set off at a dead run back down the pass.
14 After all, this made it so much harder for the hand to feed you tomorrow.


- 110 -
Figures moved out of the trees. One of them stopped at the door of the first coach and tried the handle.
For a moment the world held its breath. The figures must have sensed it, because the man was already leaping aside when there was a click and the whole door and its surrounding frame blew outwards in a cloud of splinters.
The thing about fires, Vimes had once observed, was that only an idiot got between them and a troll holding a 2,OOOlb crossbow. All Hell hadn't been let loose. It was merely Detritus. But from a few feet away you couldn't tell the difference.
Another figure reached for the door of the second coach just before Vimes fired out of the darkness and hit his shoulder with a butcher's sound. Then Inigo dived out through the window, rolled with unclerk-like grace as he hit the ground, rose in front of one of the bandits and brought his hand around, edge first, on the man's neck.
Vimes had seen this trick before. Usually it just made people angry. Occasionally it managed an incapacitating blow.
He'd never seen it remove a head.
'Everybody stop!'
Sybil was pushed out of the coach. Behind her a man stepped out. He was holding a crossbow.
'Your Grace Vimes!' he shouted. The word bounced back and forth between the cliffs.
'I know you're here, Your Grace Vimes! And here is your lady! And there are many of us! Come out, Your Grace Vimes!'
Flakes of snow hissed over the fires.
There was a whisper in the air followed by a second smack of steel into muscle. One of the hooded figures collapsed into the mud, clutching at its leg.
Inigo got slowly to his feet. The man holding the crossbow appeared not to notice.
'It is like chess, Your Grace Vimes! We have disarmed the troll and the dwarf! And I have the queen! And if you shoot at me can you be sure I won't have time to fire?'
Firelight glowed on the twisted trees bordering the road.


- 111 -
Several seconds passed.
Then the sound of Vimes's crossbow landing in the circle of light was very loud.
'Well done, Your Grace Vimes! And now yourself, if you please!'
Inigo made out the shape that appeared at the very edge of the light, with both hands up.
'Are you all right, Sybil?' said Vimes.
'A bit cold, Sam.'
'You're not hurt?'
'No, Sam.'
'Keep your hands where I can see them, Your Grace Vimes!'
'And are you going to promise me you'll let her go?' said Vimes.
A flame flickered near Vimes's face, a bright pool in the darkness, as he lit a cigar.
'Now, Your Grace Vimes , whyever should I do that? But I am sure Ankh-Morpork will pay a lot for you!'
'Ah. I thought so,' said Vimes. He shook the match out, and the cigar end glowed for a moment. 'Sybil?'
'Yes, Sam?'
'Duck.'
There was a second filled only with the indrawing of breath, and then as Lady Sybil dived forward Vimes's hand came around from behind him in an arc, there was a silken sound, and the man's head was flung back.
Inigo leapt and caught the man's crossbow as it was dropped, then rolled and came up firing. Another figure staggered.
Vimes was aware of a commotion elsewhere as he grabbed Sybil and helped her back into the coach. Inigo had vanished, but a scream in the dark didn't sound like anyone Vimes knew.
And then... only the hiss of snow in the fire.
'I... think they're gone, sir,' said Cheery's voice.
'Not as fast as us! Detritus?'


- 112 -
'Sir?'
'Are you Okay?'
'Feelin' very tactful, sir.'
'You two take that coach, I'll take this, and let's get the hell out of here, shall we?'
'Where's Mister Skimmer?' said Sybil.
There was another scream from the woods.
'Forget him!'
'But he's—'
'Forget him!'
The snow was falling thicker as they climbed the pass. The deep snow dragged at the wheels, and all Vimes could see were the darker shapes of the horses against the whiteness. Then the clouds parted briefly and he wished they hadn't, because here they revealed that the darkness on the left of him was no longer rock but a sheer drop.
At the top of the pass the lights of an inn glowed out on to the thickening snow. Vimes drove the carriage into the yard.
'Detritus?'
'Sir?'
'I'll watch our backs. Make sure this place is Okay, will you?'
'Yessir.'
The troll jumped down, slotting a fresh bundle of arrows into the Piecemaker. Vimes spotted his intention just in time.
'Just knock, sergeant.'
'Right you are', sir.'
The troll knocked and entered. The buzz of sound from inside suddenly ceased. Vimes heard, muffled by the door, 'Der Duke of Ankh-Morpork is coming in. Anyone have a problem wid dis? Just say der word.' And in the background, the little humming, singing noise the Piecemaker made under tension.
Vimes helped Sybil down from the coach. 'How do you feel now?' he said.


- 113 -
She smiled faintly. 'I think this dress will have to go for dusters,' she said. She smiled a little more when she saw his expression.
'I knew you'd come up with something, Sam. You go all slow and cold and that means something really dreadful's going to happen. I wasn't frightened.'
'Really? I was scared shi- stiff,' said Vimes.
'What happened to Mister Skimmer? I remember him rummaging in his case and cursing—'
'I suspect Inigo Skimmer is alive and well,' said Vimes grimly. 'Which is more than can be said for those around him.'
There was silence in the main room of the inn. A man and a woman, presumably the landlord and his wife, were standing flat against the back of the bar. The dozen or so other occupants lined the walls, hands in the air. Beer dribbled from a couple of spilled mugs.
'Everyt'ing normal an' peaceful,' said Detritus, turning round.
Vimes realized that everyone was staring at him. He looked down. His shirt was torn. Mud and blood caked his clothes. Melted snow dripped off him. In his right hand, unregarded, he was still holding his crossbow.
'Bit of trouble on the road,' he said. 'Er, you know how it is.'
No one moved.
'Oh, good gods. Detritus, put that damn thing down, will you?'
'Right, sir.'
The troll lowered his crossbow. Two dozen people all began to breathe again.
Then the skinny woman stepped around from behind the bar, nodded at Vimes, carefully took Lady Sybil's hand from his, and pointed towards the wide wooden stairs. The black look she gave Vimes puzzled him.
Only then did he realize that Lady Sybil was shaking. Tears were running down her face.
'And, er, my wife is a bit shaken up,' he said weakly. 'Corporal Littlebottom!' he yelled, to cover his confusion.
Cheery stepped through the doorway.
'Go with Lady Syb—'


- 114 -
He stopped because of the rising hubbub. One or two people pointed. Someone laughed. Cheery stopped, looking down.
'What's up?' Vimes hissed.
'Er, it's me, sir. Ankh-Morpork dwarf fashions haven't really caught on here, sir,' said Cheery.
'The skirt?' said Vimes.
'Yes, sir.'
Vimes looked around at the faces. They seemed more shocked than angry, although he spotted a couple of dwarfs in one corner who were definitely unhappy.
'Go with Lady Sybil,' he repeated.
'It might not be a very good id—' Cheery began.
'Gods damn it!' shouted Vimes, unable to stop himself. The crowd went silent. A ragged bloodstained madman holding a crossbow can command a rapt audience. Then he shuddered. What he wanted now was a bed, but what he wanted, before bed, more than anything, was a drink. And he couldn't have one. He'd learned that long ago. One drink was one too many.
'All right, tell me,' he said.
'All dwarfs are men, sir,' said Cheery. 'I mean... traditionally. That's how everyone thinks of it up here.'
'Well, stand outside the door, or... or shut your eyes or something, Okay?'
Vimes lifted Lady Sybil's chin. 'Are you all right, dear?' he said.
'Sorry to let you down, Sam,' she whispered. 'It was just so awful.'
Vimes, designed by Nature to be one of those men unable to kiss their own wives in public, patted her helplessly on the shoulder. She thought she'd let him down. It was unbearable.
'You just... I mean, Cheery will... and I'll... sort things out and be along right away,' he said. 'We'll get a good bedroom, I suspect.'
She nodded, still looking down.
'And... I'm just going out for some fresh air.'


- 115 -
Vimes stepped outside. The snow had stopped for now. The moon was half hidden by clouds and the air smelled of frost.
When the figure dropped down from the eaves it was amazed at the way Vimes spun and rushed it bodily against the wall.
Vimes looked through a red mist at the moonlit face of Inigo Skimmer.
'I'll damn well—' he began.
'Look down, your grace,' said Skimmer. 'Mhm, mhm.'
Vimes-realized he could feel the faintest prick of a knife blade on his stomach. 'Look down further,' he said.
Inigo looked down. He swallowed. Vimes had a knife, too. 'You really are no gentleman, then,' he said.
'Make a sudden move and neither are you,' said Vimes. 'And now it appears that we have reached what Sergeant Colon persists in referring to as an imp arse.'
'I assure you I will not kill you,' said Inigo.
'I know that,' said Vimes. 'But will you try?'
'No. I'm here for your protection, mhm, mhm.'
'Vetinari sent you, did he?'
'You know we never divulge the name of—'
'That's true. You people are very honourable,' Vimes spat the word, 'in that respect.'
Both men relaxed a little.
'You left me alone surrounded by enemies,' said Inigo, but without much accusation in his tone.
'Why should I care what happens to a bunch of bandits?' said Vimes. 'You're an assassin.'
'How did you find out? Mmph?'
'A copper watches the way people walk. The Klatchians say a man's leg is his second face, did you know that? And that little clerky, I'm-so-harmless walk of yours is too good to be true.'
'You mean that just from my walk you—'


- 116 -
'No. You didn't catch the orange,' said Vimes.
'Come now—'
'No, people either catch or flinch. You saw it wasn't a danger. And when I took your arm I felt metal under your clothes. Then I just sent a clacks back with your description.'
He let go of Inigo and walked over to the coach, leaving his back exposed. He took something down from the box and came back and waved it at the man.
'I know this is yours,' he said. 'I pinched it out of your luggage. If I ever catch anyone with one of these in Ankh-Morpork I will make their life a complete misery as only a copper knows how. Is that understood?'
'If you ever catch anyone with one of these in Ankh-Morpork, your grace, mhm, they will still be lucky that the Assassins' Guild didn't find them first, mmph. They are on our forbidden list within the city. But we're a long way from Ankh-Morpork now. Mmph, mmph.'
Vimes turned the thing over and over in his hands. It looked vaguely like a long-handled hammer, or perhaps a strangely made telescope. What it was, basically, was a spring. That's all a crossbow was, after all.
'It's a devil to load,' he said. 'I nearly ruptured myself cocking it against a rock. You'd only get one shot.'
'But it's the shot no one expects, mhm, mhm.'
Vimes nodded. You could even conceal this thing down your pants, although the thought of all that coiled power so close would require nerves of steel and other parts of steel, too, if it came to it.
'This is not a weapon. This is for killing people,' he said.
'Uh, most weapons are,' said Inigo.
'No, they're not. They're so you don't have to kill people. They're for... for having. For being seen. For warning. This isn't one of those. It's for hiding away until you bring it out and kill people in the dark. And where's that other thing?'
'Your grace?'
'The palm dagger. Don't try to lie to me.'
Inigo shrugged. The movement shot something silver out of his sleeve; it was a carefully shaped blade, padded on one side, which slid along the edge of his hand. There was a click from somewhere inside his jacket.


- 117 -
'Good gods,' breathed Vimes. 'Do you know how often people have tried to assassinate me, man?'
'Yes, your grace. Nine times. The Guild has set your fee at $600,000. The last time an approach was made no Guild member volunteered. Mhm, mhm.'
'Hah!'
'Incidentally, and very informally of course, we would appreciate knowing the whereabouts of the body of the Honourable Eustace BassinglyGore, mhm, mhm.'
Vimes scratched his nose. 'Was he the one who tried to poison my shaving cream?'
'Yes, your grace.'
'Well, unless his body is an extremely strong swimmer, it's still on a ship bound for Ghat via Cape Terror,' said Vimes. 'I paid the captain a thousand dollars not to take the chains off before Zambingo, too. That'll give it a nice long walk home through the jungles of Klatch where I'm sure its knowledge of rare poisons will come in very handy, although not as handy perhaps as a knowledge of antidotes.'
'A thousand dollars!'
'Well, he had twelve hundred dollars on him. I donated the rest to the Sunshine Sanctuary for Sick Dragons. I got a receipt, by the way. You chaps are keen on receipts, I think.'
'You stole his money? Mhm, mhm.'
Vimes took a deep breath. His voice, when it emerged, was flat calm. 'I wasn't going to waste any of my own. And he had just tried to kill me. Think of it as an investment, for the good of his health. Of course, if in due course he cares to come and see me, I shall make sure he gets what's coming to him.'
'I'm... astounded, your grace. Mhm, mhm. Bassingly-Gore was an extremely competent swordsman.'
'Really? I generally never wait to find out about that sort of thing.'
Inigo smiled his thin little smile. 'And two months ago Sir Richard Liddleley was found tied to a fountain in Sator Square, painted pink and with a flag stuck—'
'I was feeling generous,' said Vimes. 'I'm sorry, I don't play your games.'
'Assassination is not a game, your grace.'
'It is the way you people play it.'


- 118 -
'There have to be rules. Otherwise there would just be anarchy. Mhm, mhm. You have your code and we have ours.'
'And you've been sent here to protect me?'
'I have other skills, but... yes.'
'What makes you think I'll need you?'
'Well, your grace, here they don't have rules. Mhm, mhm.'
'I've spent most of my life dealing with people who don't have rules!'
'Yes, of course. But when you kill them, they don't get up again.'
'I've never killed anyone!' said Vimes.
'You shot that bandit in the throat.'
'I was aiming for the shoulder.'
'Yes, the thing does pull to the left,' said Inigo. 'You mean that you have never tried to kill anyone. I have, on the other hand. And here hesitation may not be an option. Mmph.'
'I didn't hesitate!'
Inigo sighed. 'In the Guild, your grace, we don't... grandstand.'
'Grandstand?'
'That business with the cigar...'
'You mean, when I shut my eyes and they had to look at a flame in the darkness?'
'Ah...' Inigo hesitated. 'But they might have shot you there and then.'
'No. I wasn't a threat. And you heard his voice. I hear that sort of voice a lot. He's not going to shoot people too soon and spoil the fun. I can assume that you have not got a contract on me?'
'That is correct.'
'And you'd still swear to that?'
'On my honour as an assassin.'
'Yes,' said Vimes. 'That's where I hit a difficulty, of course. And, I don't know how to put this, Inigo, but you don't act like a typical assassin. Lord this, Sir that...


- 119 -
The Guild is the school for gentlemen but you — and gods know I don't mean any offence here — are not exactly—'
Inigo touched his forelock. 'Scholarship boy, sir,' he said.
My gods yes, thought Vimes. You can find your average, amateur killers on every street. They're mostly deranged or drunk or some poor woman who's had a hard day and the husband has raised his hand once too often and suddenly twenty years of frustration takes over. Killing a stranger without malice or satisfaction, other than the craftsman's pride in a job well done, is such a rare talent that armies spend months trying to instil it into their young soldiers. Most people will shy away from killing people they haven't been introduced to.
The Guild had to have one or two people like Inigo. Didn't some philosophical bastard once say that a government needed butchers as well as shepherds? He indicated the little crossbow. 'All right, take it,' he said. 'But you can put the word about that if I ever, ever see one on the street the owner will find it put where the sun does not shine.'
'Ah,' said Inigo, 'that's the amusingly named place in Lancre, isn't it? It's only about fifty miles from here, I believe. Mhm, mhm.'
'Rest assured that I can find a short-cut.'
Gaspode tried blowing in Carrot's ear again.
'Time to wake up,' he growled.
Carrot opened his eyes, blinked the snow out of them, and then tried to move.
'You just lie still, right?' said Gaspode. 'If it helps, try thinking of them as a very heavy eiderdown.'
Carrot struggled feebly. The wolves piled on top of him shifted position.
'Warming you up a treat,' said Gaspode, grinning nervously. 'A wolf blanket, — see? O'course, you're going to be a bit whiffy for a while, but better to be itchy than dead, eh?' He scratched an ear industriously with a hind leg. One of the wolves growled at him. 'Sorry. Grub'll be up in a moment.'
'Food?' muttered Carrot.
Angua appeared in Carrot's vision, dressed in a leather shirt and leggings. She stood looking down at him, hands on her hips. To Gaspode's amazement, Carrot actually managed to push himself up on his elbows, dislodging several wolves.
'You were tracking us?' he said.


- 120 -
'No, they were,' said Angua. 'They thought you were a bloody fool. I heard it on the howl. And they were right! You haven't eaten anything for three days! And up here winter doesn't drop a few hints over a month or so. It turns up in one night! Why were you so stupid?'
Gaspode looked around the clearing. Angua had rekindled the fire. Gaspode wouldn't have believed it if he hadn't seen it, but actual wolves had dragged in actual fallen wood for her. And then another had turned up with a small deer, still fat after the autumn. He dribbled at the smell of it roasting.
Something human and complicated was going on between Carrot and Angua. It sounded like an argument but it didn't smell like one. Anyway, recent events all made perfect sense to Gaspode. The female ran away and the male chased her. That's how it went. Actually, it was usually about twenty males of all sizes, but obviously, Gaspode conceded, things were a bit different for humans. Pretty soon, he reckoned, Carrot would notice the big male wolf sitting by the fire. And then the fur would fly. Humans, eh?
Gaspode wasn't sure of his own ancestry. There was some terrier, and a touch of spaniel, and probably someone's leg, and an awful lot of mongrel. But he took it as an article of faith that there was in all dogs a tiny bit of wolf, and his was urgently sending messages that the wolf by the fire was one you didn't even stare directly at.
It wasn't that the wolf was obviously vicious. He didn't need to be. Even sitting still he radiated the assurance of competent power. Gaspode was, if not the victor, then at least the survivor of many a street fight, and as such would not have gone against this animal even if backed up by a couple of lions and a man with an axe.
Instead he sidled over to a female wolf who was watching the fire haughtily.
'Yo, bitch,' he said.
'Vot vas zat?'
Gaspode reconsidered his strategy. 'Hi, foxy... er... wolf lady,' he tried.
A certain lowering of the temperature suggested that this one hadn't worked either.
''ullo, miss,' he said hopefully.
Her muzzle turned to point at him. Her eyes narrowed. 'Vot har you?' Ice slithered off every syllable.


- 121 -
'Gaspode's the name,' barked Gaspode, with insane cheerfulness. " 'm a dog. That's a kind of wolf, sort of thing. So, what's your name, then?'
'Go avay.'
'No offence meant. 'ere, I heard tell wolves mate for life, right?'
'Vell?'
'Wish I could.'
Gaspode froze as the she-wolf's muzzle snapped an inch from his nose.
'Ver I come from ve eat things like you,' she said.
'Fair enough, fair enough,' muttered Gaspode, backing away. 'I don't know, you try to be friendly and this is what you get...'
Nearer the fire the humans were getting complicated. Gaspode slunk back and lay down.
'You could have told me,' Carrot was saying.
'It would've taken too long. You always want to understand things. Anyway, it's none of your business. This is family.'
Carrot waved a hand towards the wolf. 'He's a relative?' he said.
'No. He's a... friend.'
Gaspode's ears waggled. He thought: whoops.
'He's very big for a wolf,' said Carrot slowly, as if filing new information.
'He's a very big wolf,' said Angua, shrugging.
'Another werewolf?'
'No.'
'Just a wolf?'
'Yes,' said Angua sarcastically. 'Just a wolf.'
'And his name is... ?'
'He would not object to being called Gavin.'
'Gavin?'
'He once ate someone called Gavin.'


- 122 -
'What, all of him?'
'Of course not. Just enough to make certain that the man set no more wolf traps.' Angua smiled. 'Gavin is... quite unusual.'
Carrot looked at the wolf and smiled. He picked up a piece of wood and tossed it gently towards him. The wolf snapped it, dog-like, out of the air.
'I'm sure we'll be friends,' he said.
Angua sighed. 'Wait.'
Gaspode, the unheeded spectator, watched as Gavin, without taking his eyes off Carrot, very slowly bit the wood in two.
'Carrot?' said Angua sweetly. 'Don't do that again. Gavin isn't even in the same clan as these wolves, and he took over the pack without anyone even whining. He's not a dog. And he's a killer, Carrot. Oh, don't look like that. I don't mean he pounces on wandering kids or eats up the odd grandmother. I mean that if he thinks a human ought to die, that human is dead. He will always, always fight. He's very uncomplicated like that.'
'He's an old friend?' said Carrot.
'Yes.'
'A... friend.'
'Yes.' Angua rolled her eyes and said, in a voice of sing-song sarcasm, 'I was out in the woods one day and I fell into some old pit trap under the snow and some wolves found me and would have killed me but Gavin turned up and faced them down. Don't ask me why. People do things sometimes. So do wolves. End of story.'
'Gaspode said wolves and werewolves don't get on,' said Carrot patiently.
'He's right. If Gavin wasn't here they'd have torn me to pieces. I can look like a wolf but I'm not a wolf. I'm a werewolf! I'm not a human, either. I'm a werewolf! Get it? You know some of the remarks people make? Well, wolves don't make remarks. They go for the throat. Wolves have got a very good sense of smell. You can't fool it. I can pass for human, but I can't pass for wolf.'
'I never thought of it like that. I mean, you would just think that wolves and werewolves—'
'That's how it is,' sighed Angua.
'You said this was family,' said Carrot, as if working down a mental checklist.


- 123 -
'I meant it's personal. Gavin came all the way into Ankh-Morpork to warn me. He even slept on the timber wagons during the day so that he'd keep moving. Can you imagine how much nerve that took? It's got nothing to do with the Watch. It's got nothing to do with you.'
Carrot looked around. The snow was falling again, turning into rain above the fire.
'I'm here now.'
'Go away. Please. I can sort this out.'
'And then you'll come back to Ankh-Morpork? Afterwards?'
'I...' Angua hesitated.
'I think I should stay' said Carrot.
'Look, the city needs you,' said Angua. 'You know Vimes relies on—'
'I've resigned.'
For a moment Gaspode thought he could hear the sound of every settling snowflake.
'Not really?'
'Yes.'
'And what did old Stoneface say?'
'Er, nothing. He'd already left for Uberwald.'
'Vimes is coming to Uberwald?'
'Yes. For the coronation.'
'He's got mixed up in this?' said Angua.
'Mixed up in what?'
'Oh, my family's been... stupid. I'm not quite sure I know everything, but the wolves are worried. When werewolves make trouble, it's the real wolves that always suffer. People'll kill anything with fur.' Angua stared at the fire for a moment and then said, with forced brightness, 'So who's been left in charge?'
'I don't know. Fred Colon's got seniority.'
'Ha, yes. In his nightmares.' Angua hesitated. 'You really left?'
'Yes.'


- 124 -
'Oh.'
Gaspode listened to some more snowflakes.
'Well, you won't get far by yourselves now,' said Angua, standing up. 'Rest for another hour. And then we'll be going through the deep forest. Not too much snow there yet. We've got a lot of ground to cover. I hope you can keep up.'
At breakfast early next morning Vimes noticed that the other guests were keeping so far away from him that they were holding on to the walls.
'The men who went out came back around midnight, sir,' said Cheery quietly.
'Did they catch anyone?'
'Um... sort of, sir. They found seven dead bodies.'
'Seven?'
'They think some others might have got away where there's a path up the rocks.'
'But, seven? Detritus got one, and... I got one, and a couple were wounded, and Inigo got... one...' Vimes's voice tailed off.
He stared at Inigo Skimmer, who was sitting on the other side of the room at a crowded public table. The places around Vimes and Lady Sybil were deserted; Sybil had put it down to deference. The little man was eating soup in a little neat self-contained world among the waving arms and intrusive elbows. He'd even tucked a napkin under his chin.
'They were... very dead, sir,' Cheery whispered.
'Well, that was... interesting,' said Sybil, wiping her mouth delicately. 'I've never had soup with sausages in it for breakfast before. What is it called, Cheery?'
'Fatsup, your ladyship,' said Cheery. 'It means "fat soup". We're close to the Schmaltzberg fat layers now, and, well, it's nourishing and keeps out the cold.'
'How very interesting.' Lady Sybil looked at her husband. He hadn't taken his eyes off Inigo.
The door opened and Detritus ducked inside, banging snow off his knuckles.
'It's not too bad,' he said. 'Dey say it'd be a good idea to make an early start, sir.'
'I bet they do,' said Vimes, and thought: they don't want someone like me hanging around. There's no knowing who'll die next.


- 125 -
Several faces he vaguely recalled from last night were missing now. Presumably some travellers had started off even earlier, which meant that the news was probably running ahead of him. He'd staggered in, covered in blood and mud, carrying a crossbow and, d'you know, when they went back to look there were seven dead men. By the time that sort of story had gone ten miles he'd be carrying an axe as well, and make that thirty dead men and a dog.
The diplomatic career had certainly got off to a good start, eh?
As they got into the coach he saw the little dart stuck in the door jamb. It was metallic, with metal fins, and overall had a look of speed, as if, when you touched it, you'd burn your fingers.
He walked around to the back of -the coach. There was another, much larger arrow high in the woodwork.
'They tried to catch up with you on the upgrade,' said Inigo, behind him.
'You killed them.'
'Some got away.'
'I'm surprised.'
'I've only got one pair of hands, your grace.'
Vimes glanced up at the inn sign. Crudely painted on the boards was a large red head, complete with trunk and tusks.
'This is the Inn of ,' said Inigo. 'You left the law behind when we passed Lancre, your grace. Here it's the lore. What you keep is what you can. What's yours is what you fight for. The fittest survive.'
'Ankh-Morpork is pretty lawless too, Mister Skimmer.'
'Ankh-Morpork has many laws. It's just that people don't obey them. And that, your grace, is quite a different bowl of fat, mmhm, mmph.'
They set off in convoy. Detritus sat on the roof of the leading coach, which lacked a door and most of one side. The view was flat and white, a featureless expanse of snow.
After a while they passed a clacks tower. Burn marks on one side of the stone base suggested that someone had thought that no news was good news, but the semaphore shutters, were clacking and twinkling in the light.
'The whole world is watching,' said Vimes.


- 126 -
'But it's never cared,' said Skimmer. 'Up until now. And now it wants to rip the top off the country and take what's underneath, mmph, mmhm.'
Ah, thought Vimes, our killer clerk does have more than one emotion.
'Ankh-Morpork has always tried to get on well with other nations,' said Sybil. 'Well, these days, at least.'
'I don't think we exactly try, dear,' said Vimes. 'It's just that we found that- Why're we stopping?'
He pulled down the window. 'What's happening, sergeant?'
'Waiting for dese dwarfs, sir,' the troll called down.
Several hundred dwarfs, four abreast, were trotting across the white plain towards them. There was, Vimes thought, something very determined about them.
'Detritus?'
'Yessir?'
'Try not to look too troll-like, will you?'
'Tryin' like hell, sir.'
The column was abreast of them before someone barked the command to halt. A dwarf detached himself from the rest and walked over to the coach.
'Ta grdzk?!' he bellowed.
'Would you like me to take care of this, your grace?' said Inigo.
'I'm the damn ambassador,' said Vimes. He stepped down.
'Good morning, dwarf [indicating miscreant], I am Overseer Vimes of the Look.'
Lady Sybil heard Inigo give a little groan.
'Krz? Gr'dazak yad?'
'Hang on, hang on, I know this one... I am sure you are a dwarf of no convictions. Let us shake our business, dwarf [indicating miscreant].'
'Yes, that will just about do it, I think,' said Inigo. 'Mmph, mmhm.'
The senior dwarf had gone red in those areas of his face that could be seen behind the hair. The rest of the squad were taking a renewed interest in the coach.


- 127 -
The leader took a deep breath. 'D'kraha?'
Cheery dropped down from the coach. Her leather skirt flapped in the wind.
As one dwarf, the column swivelled to stare at her. Their leader went pop-eyed.
'B'dan? K'raa! D'kraga "ka'ak "!'
Vimes saw the expression that appeared on Cheery's small round face.
Above him there was a clunk as Detritus rested the loaded Piecemaker on the edge of the coach.
'I know dat word he said to her,' he announced to the world. 'It is not a good word. I do not want to hear dat word again.'
'Well, this is all very jolly, mmph, mmhm,' said Inigo, getting down. 'And now if everyone will just relax for a moment we might get out of here alive, mmph.'
Vimes reached up and carefully pushed the end of Detritus's crossbow towards a less threatening direction.
Inigo talked very fast in what seemed to Vimes to be a torrent of perfect dwarfish, although he was sure he heard the occasional 'mmph'. He opened his leather case and produced a couple of documents fixed with big waxy seals. These were inspected with considerable suspicion. The dwarf pointed at Cheery and Detritus. Inigo flapped a hand impatiently, the universal symbol for dismissing that which was not important. More papers were examined.
Eventually, with more universal body language meaning 'I could do something bad to you but right now it's just too much bother,' the dwarf waved Inigo away, gave Vimes a look that suggested that, against all physical evidence, Vimes was beneath him, and strode back to his troops.
An order was barked. The dwarfs set off again, leaving the road and heading off towards the forest.
'Well, that all seems sorted out,' said Inigo, getting back into the coach. 'Miss Littlebottom was a bit of a sticking point, but a dwarf does respect very complicated documents. Something's up. He wouldn't say what it was. He wanted to search the coach.'
'The hell with that. What for?'
'Who knows? I persuaded him that we have diplomatic immunity.'
'And what did you tell him about me?'


- 128 -
'I tried to convince him that you were a bloody idiot, your grace. Mmph, mmhm.'
'Oh, really?' Vimes heard Lady Sybil repress a laugh.
'It was necessary, believe me. Street dwarfish wasn't a good idea, your grace. But when I pointed out that you were an aristocrat, he—'
'I am not an- Well, I'm not really a—'
'Yes, your grace. But if you'll be advised by me, a lot of diplomacy lies in appearing to be a lot more stupid than you are. You've made a good start, your grace. And now I think we'd better be moving, mmhm.'
'I'm glad to see you're being less deferential, Inigo,' said Vimes as they got under way again.
'Oh well, your grace, I've got to know you better now.'
Gaspode had confused recollections of the rest of that night. The pack moved fast, and he realized that most of them were running ahead of Carrot, to flatten down the snow.
It wasn't flat enough for Gaspode. Eventually a wolf picked him up by the scruff of the neck and carried him bodily, while making muffled comments about the foul taste.
The snow stopped after a while and there was a slip of moonlight behind the clouds.
And all around, near and far, was the howl. Occasionally the pack would stop, in a clearing or on the crisp white brow of a hill, and join in.
Gaspode limped to Angua while the cries went up around them. 'What's this for?' he said.
'Polities,' said Angua. 'Negotiation. We're crossing territories.'
Gaspode glanced at Gavin. He hadn't joined in the howl, but sat a little way off, regally dividing his attention between Carrot and the pack.
'He has to ask permission?' he said.
'He has to make sure they'll let me through.'
'Oh. That's giving him problems?'
'None that he can't bite through.'
'Oh. Er, is the howl saying anything about me?'


- 129 -
'"Small, horrible, smelly dog."'
'Ah, right.'
They set off again a few minutes later, down a long snow-crusted slope in the moonlight towards the forest, and Gaspode saw shadows angling fast across the snowfield towards them. For a moment he was flanked by two packs, the old and the new, and then their original escort dropped away.
So we've got a new honour guard, he thought, as he ran in the centre of a wall of blurred grey legs. Wolves we haven't met before. I just hope the howl added 'doesn't taste nice'.
Then Carrot fell over in the snow. It was a moment before he pushed himself up again. The wolves circled uncertainly, occasionally glancing at Gavin. Gaspode caught up with Carrot, jumping awkwardly through the snow.
'You all right?'
'Hard... to... run..
'I don't want to, you know, worry you or anything,' whined Gaspode, 'but we're not exactly among friends here, know what I mean? Our Gavin isn't going to win the prize for the wolf with the waggiest tail anywhere.'
'When did he last sleep?' Angua demanded, pushing her way through the wolves.
'Dunno, really,' said Gaspode. 'We've been moving pretty fast the last few days.'
'No sleep, no food and no proper clothing,' snarled Angua. 'Idiot!'
There was growling and whining from some of the wolves around Gavin. Gaspode sat down by Carrot's head and watched as Angua... argued.
He couldn't speak pure wolf and, besides, gesture and body language played a far greater part than it did in canine. But you didn't have to be bright to see that things weren't going well. There was def'nitely a lot of Atmosphere in the atmosphere. And Gaspode had a feeling that, if things went all pear-shaped in a hurry, one small dog had all the survival chances of a chocolate kettle on a very hot stove.
There was a lot of whining and growling. One wolf — Gaspode mentally named him Awkward — was not happy. It looked as though a number of wolves were agreeing with him. One of them bared its teeth at Angua.
Then Gavin stood up. He shook some snowflakes off his coat, looked around in an offhand fashion, and padded towards Awkward.


- 130 -
Gaspode felt every hair on his body stand on end.
The other wolves crouched back. Gavin ignored them. When he was a few feet away from Awkward he put his head on one side and said, 'Hrurrrm?'
It was almost a pleasant noise. But right down inside Gaspode's bones it bounced a harmonic which said: at this point, we could go two ways. There is the easy way, and that is very easy.
You'll never know about the hard way.
Awkward held eye-contact for a while, and then looked down.
Gavin snarled something. Half a dozen of the wolves, led by Angua, loped off towards the forest.
They returned twenty minutes later. Angua was human again — at least, Gaspode corrected himself, human shaped — and the wolves were harnessed to a big dog sled.
'Borrowed it from a man in the village over the hill,' she said, as it slid to a halt by Carrot.
'Nice of him,' said Gaspode, and decided not to pursue the subject. 'I'm surprised to see wolves in harness, though.'
'Well, this was the easy way,' said Angua.
It's odd, Gaspode mused, as he lay in the sled alongside the slumbering Carrot. He was so int'rested when Bum talked about the howl and how it could send messages right up into the mountains. If I was a suspicious dog, I'd wonder if he knew that she'd come back for him if he was really in trouble, if he decided to gamble everything on it...
He poked his head out from under the blanket. Snow stung his eyes. Running alongside the sled, only a few feet away from Carrot and glowing silver in the moonlight, was Gavin.
This is me, thought Gaspode; stuck between the humans and the wolves. It's a dog's life.
This is the life, thought Acting Captain Colon. Hardly any paperwork was coming up here now, and by dint of much effort he'd entirely cleared the backlog. It was a lot quieter, too.
When Vimes was here — and Fred Colon suddenly found himself thinking the word 'Vimes' without prefixing it with 'Mister' — the main office was full of so


- 131 -
much noise and bustle you could hardly hear yourself speak. Completely inefficient, that was. How could anyone hope to get anything done?
He counted the sugar again. Twenty-nine. But he'd had two in his tea, so that was all right. Toughness was paying off.
Colon went and opened his door a fraction so that he could just see down into the office. It was amazing how you could catch them out that way.
Quiet. And neat, too. Every desk was clear. Much better than the mess you used to get.
He went back to the desk and counted the sugar lumps. There were twenty-seven.
Ah-ha! Someone was trying to drive him mad. Well, two could play at that game.
He counted the lumps again. There were twenty-six, and there was a knock at the door.
This caused it to swing inwards, and Colon to jump up in evil triumph.
'Ah -ha! Burst in on me, eh? Oh...'
The 'oh' was because the knocker was Constable Dorfl, the golem. He was taller than the doorway and strong enough to tear a troll in half; he'd never done this, since he was an intensely moral being, but not even Colon was going to pick an argument with someone who had glowing red holes where his eyes should be. Ordinary golems would not harm a human because they had magic words in their head that ordered them not to. Dorfl had no magic words but he didn't harm people because he'd decided that it wasn't moral. This left the worrying possibility that, given enough provocation, he might think again.
Beside the golem was Constable Shoe, saluting smartly.
'We've come to pick up the wages chitty, sir,' he said.
'The what?'
'The wages chitty, sir. The monthly chitty, sir. And then we take it to the Palace and bring back the wages, sir.'
'I don't know anything about that!'
'I put it on your desk yesterday, sir. Signed by Lord Vetinari, sir.'
Colon couldn't hide the flicker in his eyes. The black ash in the fireplace was, by now, overflowing.


- 132 -
Shoe followed his gaze.
'I haven't seen any such thing,' said Colon, while the colour drained from his face like a sucked ice-lolly.
'I'm sure I did, sir,' said Constable Shoe. 'I wouldn't forget a thing like that, sir. In fact, I distinctly remember saying to Constable Visit, "Washpot, I'm just going to take this-"'
'Look, you can see I'm a busy man!' snapped Colon. 'Get one of the sergeants to sort it out!'
'There's no sergeants left except Sergeant Flint, sir, and he spends all his time going round asking people what he should be doing,' said Constable Shoe. 'Anyway, sir, it's the senior officer who must sign the chitty—'
Colon stood up, leaning on his knuckles, and shouted, 'Oh, I "must", must I? That's a nerve and no mistake! "Must", eh? Most of you lot are lucky anyone even gives you a job! Bunch of zombies and loonies and lawn ornaments and rocks! I've had it up to here with you!'
Shoe leaned back out of range of the spittle. 'Then I'm afraid I must take this up with the Guild of Watchmen, sir,' he said.
'Guild of Watchmen? Hah! And since when has there been a Guild of Watchmen?'
'Dunno. What's the time now?' said Corporal Nobbs, ambling into the room. 'Got to be a couple of hours, at least. Morning, captain.'
'What are you doing here, Nobby?'
'That's Mister Nobbs to you, captain. And I'm President of the Guild of Watchmen, since you ask.'
'There's no such bloody thing!'
'All legit, captain. Registered at the Palace and everything. Amazin' how people rushed to join, too.' He pulled out his grubby notebook. 'Got a few matters to take up with you,
if you have a moment. Well, I say a few—'
'I'm not putting up with this!' bellowed Colon, his face crimson. 'This is high treason! You're all sacked! You're all—'
'We're all on strike,' said Nobby calmly.
'You can't go on strike while I'm sacking you!'


- 133 -
'Our strike headquarters are in the back room of the Bucket in Gleam Street,' said Nobby.
'Here, that's my boozer! I forbid you to go on strike in my own pub!'
'We'll be there when you wish to talk terms. Come, brothers. We are now officially in a dispute situation.'
They marched out.
'Don't bother to come back!' Colon shouted after them.
Bonk wasn't what Vimes had expected. In fact he'd find it hard to say what he had expected, except that this wasn't it.
It occupied a narrow valley with a white-water river winding through it. There were city walls. They were not like those of Ankh-Morpork, which had become at first a barrier to expansion and then a source of masonry for it. These had an inside and an outside. There were castles on the hills. There were castles on most hills in these parts. And there were high gates across the road.
Detritus thumped on the side of the coach. Vimes stuck his head out.
'Dere's guys in der road,' said the troll. 'Dey got halibuts.'
Vimes looked out of the windows. There were half a dozen guards, and they did indeed have halberds.
'What are they after?' he said.
'I expect they'll also want to see our papers and make a search of the coaches,' said Inigo.
'Papers are one thing,' said Vimes, getting out of the coach, 'but no one is rummaging in our stuff. I know that trick. They're not looking for anything, they just want to show us who's boss. You come along and do the translating.' He added, 'Don't worry, I'll be diplomatic.'
The two men barring the way did have helmets and they were holding weapons, but their uniforms did not conform to normal uniformity. No guards, Vimes thought, should be dressed in red, blue and yellow. People would be able to see them coming. Vimes liked a uniform you could lurk in.
He pulled out his badge and held it up, advancing with an ingratiating smile.
'Just repeat this, Mister Skimmer.' Vimes raised his voice. 'Hello, fellow officer, as you can see I am Commander V—'


- 134 -
A blade swung around. If Vimes hadn't stopped he'd have walked into it.
Inigo stepped forward, leather case already open, one hand holding several impressive pieces of paper, mouth already framing some suitable sentences. A guard took one of the pieces of paper and stared at it.
'This is a studied insult,' said Inigo, contriving to speak out of the corner of his mouth while maintaining a smile. 'Someone wishes to see how you react, mmph, mmhm.'
'Them?'
'No. We're being watched.'
The paper was handed back. There was a terse conversation.
'The captain of the guard says there are special circumstances and he will search the coaches,' said Inigo.
'No,' said Vimes, taking in the expression on the captain's white face. 'I know when people are playing silly buggers, 'cos I've done it myself.'
He pointed to the door of his coach. 'See this?' he said. 'Tell him this is an Ankh-Morpork crest. And this is an Ankh-Morpork coach, property of Ankh-Morpork. If they lay hands on it, that will constitute an act of war against Ankh-Morpork. Tell him that.'
He saw the man lick his lips nervously as Inigo translated. Poor sod, he thought. He didn't ask for this. He was probably expecting a quiet day on the gate. But someone gave him some orders.
Inigo said, 'He says he's very sorry, but those are his instructions, and he quite understands if his grace wishes to make a complaint at the highest level, mmph, mmhm.'
A guard turned the handle of the coach door. Vimes slammed it shut.
'Tell him the war will start right now,' he said. —'And then it'll work its way up.'
'Your grace!'
The guards looked at Detritus. It was quite hard to hold the Piecemaker nonchalantly, and he wasn't even making the attempt.
Vimes maintained eye-contact with the captain of the guard. If the man had any sense, he'd realize that if Detritus fired the thing it'd kill them all, besides sending the coach backwards at high speed.


- 135 -
Please just let him have the sense to know when to fold, he prayed.
In the corner of his ear he could hear the guards whispering to one another. He caught the word 'Wilinus'.
The captain stepped back and saluted. 'He apologizes for any inconvenience and hopes you will enjoy your stay in his beautiful city,' said Inigo. 'He particularly hopes you will visit the Chocolate Museum in Prince Vodorny Square, where his sister works.'
Vimes saluted. 'Tell him I think he is an officer with a great future,' he said. 'A future which, I trust, is going to very soon include opening the damn gates.'
The captain had nodded to the men before Inigo was halfway through the translation. Aha...
'And ask him his name,' he said. The man was bright enough not to respond until this had been translated.
'Captain Tantony,' Inigo said.
'I shall remember it,' said Vimes. 'Oh, and tell him he has a fly on his nose.'
Tantony won a prize. His eyes barely flickered. Vimes grinned.
As for the town itself... it was just a town. Roofs were steeper than in Ankh-Morpork, some maniac with a fretsaw had been allowed to amuse himself on the wooden architecture, and there was more paint than you saw back home.
Not that this told you anything; many a rich man had become rich by, metaphorically, not painting his house.
The coaches bowled over the cobbles. Not the right sort of cobbles, of course. Vimes knew that.
The coach stopped again. Vimes stuck his head out -of the window. Two rather scruffier guards had barred the road this time.
'Ah, I recognize this one,' said Vimes grimly. 'I reckon that this time we've just met Colonesque and Nobbski.'
He stepped out and walked up to them. 'Well?'
The fatter of the two hesitated, and then held out his hand. 'Pisspot,' he said.
'Inigo?' said Vimes quietly, without turning his head.
'Ah,' said Inigo, after some muttered exchanges. 'Now the problem seems to be Sergeant Detritus. No trolls are allowed in this part of town during the hours of


- 136 -
daylight, apparently, without a passport signed by their... owner. Uh... in Bonk the only trolls allowed are prisoners of war. They have to carry identification.'
'Detritus is a citizen of Ankh-Morpork and my sergeant,' said Vimes.
'However, he is a troll. Perhaps in the interests of diplomacy you could write a short—'
'Do I need a pisspot?'
'A passport... No, your grace.'
'Then he doesn't either.'
'Nevertheless, your grace—'
'There is no nevertheless.'
'But it may be advisable to—'
'There's no advisable either.'
A few other guards had drifted over. Vimes was aware of watching eyes.
'He could be ejected by force,' said Inigo.
'Now there's an experiment I wouldn't want to miss,' said Vimes.
Detritus made a rumbling noise. 'I don't mind goin' back if—'
'Shut up, sergeant. You're a free troll. That's an order.'
Vimes permitted himself another brief scan of the growing, silent crowd. And he saw the fear in the eyes of the men with the halberds. They did not want to be doing this, any more than the captain had.
'I'll tell you what, Inigo,' he said. 'Tell the guards that the Ambassador from Ankh-Morpork commends them for their diligence, congratulates them on their dress sense and will see that their instruction is obeyed forthwith. That should do it, shouldn't it?'
'Certainly, your grace.'
'And now turn the coach around, Detritus. Coming, Inigo?'
Inigo's expression changed rapidly.
'We passed an inn about ten miles back,' Vimes went on. 'Ought to make it by dark, do you think?'


- 137 -
'But you can't go, your grace!'
Vimes turned, very slowly. 'Would you repeat that, Mister Skimmer?'
'I mean—'
'We are leaving, Mister Skimmer. What you do, of course, is up to you.'
He sat down inside the coach. Opposite him Sybil made a fist and said, 'Well done!'
'Sorry, dear,' said Vimes, as the coach turned. 'It didn't look a very good inn.'
'Serves them right, the little bullies,' said Sybil. 'You showed them.'
Vimes glanced out and saw, at the edge of the crowd, a black coach with dark windows. He could make out a figure in the gloom within. The luckless guards were looking at it, as if for instructions. It Waved a gloved hand languidly.
He started counting under his breath. After eleven seconds Inigo trotted alongside the coach and jumped on to the running board.
'Your grace, apparently the guards acted quite without authority and will be punished—'
'No, they didn't. I was looking at 'em. They'd been given an order,' said Vimes.
'Nevertheless, diplomatically it would be a good idea to accept the explan—'
'So that the poor buggers can be hung up by their thumbs?' said Vimes. 'No. Just you go back and tell whoever's giving the orders that all our people can go anywhere they like in this city, d'you see, whatever shape they are.'
'I don't think you can actually demand that, sir—'
'Those lads had old Burleigh Fr. Stronginthearm weapons, Mister Skimmer. Made in Ankh-Morpork. So did the men on the gate. Trade, Mister Skimmer. Isn't that part of what diplomacy is all about? You go back and talk to whoever's in the black carriage, and then you'd better get them to lend you a horse, because I reckon we'll have gone a little way by then.'
'You could perhaps wait—'.
'Wouldn't dream of it.'
In fact the coach was outside the gates of the town before Skimmer caught up with it again.


- 138 -
'There will not be a problem with either of your requests,' he panted, and for a moment there appeared to be a touch of admiration in his expression.
'Good man. Tell Detritus to turn round again, will you?'
'You're grinning, Sam,' said Sybil as Vimes sat back.
'I was just thinking that I could take to the diplomatic life,' said Vimes.
'There is something else,' said Inigo, getting into the coach. 'There's some... historical artefact owned by the dwarfs, and there's a rumour—'
'How long ago was the Scone of Stone stolen?'
Inigo's mouth stayed open. Then he shut it and his eyes narrowed.
'How in the world did you know that, your grace? Mmph?'
'By the pricking of my thumbs,' said Vimes, his face carefully blank. 'I've got very odd thumbs, when it comes to pricking.'
'Really?'
'Oh, yes.'
Dogs had a much easier sex life than humans, Gaspode decided. That was something to look forward to, if he ever managed to have one.
It wasn't going to start here, that was definite. The female wolves snapped at him if he came too close, and they weren't just warnings, either. He was having to be very careful where he trod.
The really odd thing about human sex, though, was the way it went on even when people were fully clothed and sitting on opposite sides of a fire. It was in the things they said and did not say, the way they looked at one another and looked away.
The packs had changed again overnight. The mountains were higher, the snow was crisper. Most of the wolves were sitting at some distance from the fire Carrot had made — just enough distance, in fact, to establish that they were proud, wild creatures who didn't have to rely on this sort of thing, but close enough to get the benefit.
And then there was Gavin, sitting a little way off, turning to look from one to the other.
'Gavin's people hate my family,' Angua was saying. 'I told you, it's always wolves who suffer when werewolves get too powerful. Werewolves are smarter at


- 139 -
escaping from hunters. That's why wolves much prefer vampires. Vampires leave them alone. Werewolves sometimes hunt wolves.'
'I'm surprised,' said Carrot.
Angua shrugged. 'Why? They hunt humans, don't they? We're not nice people, Carrot. We're all pretty dreadful. But my brother Wolfgang is something special. Father's frightened of him and so's Mother if she'd only admit it, but she thinks he'll make the clan powerful so she indulges him.
He drove my other brother away and he killed my sister.'
'How-?'
'He said it was an accident. Poor little Elsa. She was a yennork, just like Andrei. That's a werewolf that doesn't change, you know? I'm sure I've mentioned it. Our family throws them up from time to time. Wolfgang and I were the only classic bi-morphs in the litter. Elsa looked human all the time, even at full moon. Andrei was always a wolf.'
'You mean you had a human sister and a wolf brother?'
'No, Carrot. They were both werewolves. But the, well, the little... switch... inside them didn't work. Do you understand? They stayed the same shape. In the old days the clan would kill off a yennork quickly, and Wolfgang is a traditionalist when it comes to nastiness. He says they made the blood impure. You see, a yennork would go off and be a human or be a wolf but they'd still be carrying the werewolf blood, and then they'd marry and have children... or pups... and, well, that's where the fairytale monsters come from. People with a bit of wolf and wolves with that extra capacity for violence that is so very human.' She sighed and glanced momentarily at Gavin. 'But Elsa was harmless. After that, Andrei didn't wait for it to happen to him. He's a sheepdog over in Borogravia now. Doing well, I hear. Wins championships,' she added sourly.
She poked the fire aimlessly. 'Wolfgang's got to be stopped. He's plotting something with some of the dwarfs. They meet in the forest, Gavin says.'
'He sounds very well informed for a wolf,' said Carrot. Angua almost snarled at him.
'He's not stupid, you know. He can understand more than eight hundred words. A lot of humans get by on less! And he's got a sense of smell that's almost as good as mine! The wolves see everything. The werewolves are out all the time now. They're chasing people down. The game, we call it. The wolves get the blame. It looks like they're breaking the arrangement. And there's been these meetings, right out in the forest where they think no one will see them. Some dwarfs have


- 140 -
got some sort of nasty scheme by the sound of it. They asked Wolfgang for help! That's like asking a vulture to pick your teeth.'
'What can you do?' said Carrot. 'If even your parents can't control him—'
'We used to fight when we were younger. "Rough and tumble", he'd call it. But I could send him off howling. Wolfgang hates to think there's anyone who can beat him, so I don't think he'll relish the thought of me turning up. He's got plans. This part of Uberwald has always, well, worked because no one was too powerful, but if the dwarfs start squabbling amongst themselves then Wolfgang's the lad to take advantage, with his stupid uniforms and his stupid flag.'
'I don't think I want to see you fighting, though.'
'Then you can look the other way! I didn't ask you to follow me! Do you think I'm proud of this? I've got a brother who's a sheepdog!'
'A champion sheepdog,' said Carrot earnestly.
Gaspode watched Angua's expression. It was one you'd never get on a dog.
'You mean that,' she said at last. 'You actually mean that, don't you? You really do. And if you'd met him it wouldn't worry you, would it? To you everyone's a person. I have to sleep in a dog basket seven nights a month and that doesn't worry you either, does it?'
'No. You know it doesn't.'.
'It should do! Don't ask me why, but it should do! You're so... unthinkingly nice about it! And sooner or later a girl can have too much nice!'
'I don't try to be nice.'
'I know. I know. I just wish you'd... oh, I don't know... complain a bit. Well, not exactly complain. Just sigh, or something.'
'Why?'
'Because... because it'd make me feel better! Oh, it's too hard to explain. It's probably a werewolf thing.'
'I'm sorry—'
'And don't be sorry all the time, either!'
Gaspode curled up so close to the fire that he steamed. Dogs had it a lot better, he decided.


- 141 -
The building that was to be the embassy was set back from the road in a quiet side street. They rattled under an arch into a small rear courtyard containing some stables. It reminded Vimes of a large coaching inn.
'It's really only a consulate at the moment,' said Inigo, leafing through his papers. 'We should be met by... ah, yes, Wando Sleeps. Been here for several years, mhm.'
Behind the coaches a pair of gates swung shut.
There was the sound of heavy bolts shooting home. Vimes stared at the apparition that came limping back towards the coach door.
'He looks it,' he said.
'Oh, I don't think this is—'
'Good evening, marthterth, mithtreth...' said the figure. 'Welcome to Ankh-Morpork. I'm Igor.'
'Igor who?' said Inigo.
'Jutht Igor, thur. Alwayth ... jutht Igor,' said Igor calmly, unfolding the step. 'I'm the odd-job man.'
'You don't say?' said Vimes, mesmerized.
'Have you had a terrible accident?' said Lady Sybil.
'I did thpill tea down my thirt thith morning,' said Igor. 'Kind of you to notith.'
'Where's Mister Sleeps?' said Inigo.
'I'm afraid Marthter Thleepth ith nowhere to be found. I wath rather hoping you would know what'd happened to him.'
'Us?' said Inigo. 'Mmhm, mmph! We assumed he was here!'
'He left rather urgently two weekth ago,' said Igor. 'He did not vouchthafe to me where he wath going. Do go inthide, and I will thee to the baggage.'
Vimes glanced up. A little bit of snow was falling now, but there was enough light to see that above them, across the whole courtyard, was an iron mesh. With the bolted doors and the walls of the building all around, they were in a cage.
'Jutht a little leftover from the old dayth,' said Igor cheerfully. 'Nothing to worry about, thur.'
'What a fine figure of a man,' said Sybil weakly, as they stepped inside.


- 142 -
'More than one man, by the look of him.'
'Sam!'
'Sorry. I'm sure his heart's in the right place.'
'Good.'
'Or someone's heart, anyway.'
'Sam, really!'
'All right, all right, but you must admit he does look a bit... odd.'
'None of us can help the way we're made, Sam.'
'He looks as if he tried- Good grief...'
'Oh, dear,' said Lady Sybil.
Vimes was not against hunting, if only because Ankh-Morpork seldom offered any better game than the large rats you got along the waterfront. But the sight of the walls of the new embassy might have been enough to make the keenest hunter take a step back and cry, 'Oh, I say, hold on...'
The previous occupant had been keen on hunting, shooting and fishing and, to have covered every single wall with the resultant trophies, he must have been doing all three at the same time.
Hundreds of glass eyes, obscenely alive in the light of the fire in the huge hearth, stared down at Vimes.
'It's just like my grandfather's study,' said Lady Sybil. 'There was a stag's head in there that used to frighten the life out of me.'
'There's just about everything here. Oh, no...'
'My gods,' whispered Lady Sybil.
Vimes looked around desperately. Detritus was just entering, carrying some of the trunks.
'Stand in front of it,' Vimes hissed.
'I'm not that tall, Sam! Or that wide!'


- 143 -
The troll looked up at them, then at the trophies, and then grinned. It's colder up here, Vimes thought. He's quicker on the uptake15. Even Nobby won't play poker with him in the winter. Damn!
'Something wrong?' said Detritus.
Vimes sighed. What was the point? He'd spot it sooner or later.
'I'm sorry about this, Detritus,' he said, standing aside.
Detritus looked at the horrible trophy and nodded.
'Yeah, dere used to be a lot of dat sort of fing in der old days,' he said calmly, putting down the luggage. 'Dey wouldn't be de real diamond teef, o'course. Dey'd take dem out and put bigger glass ones in.'
'You don't mind?' said Lady Sybil. 'It's a troll's head! Someone actually mounted a troll's head and put it on the wall!'
'Ain't mine,' said Detritus.
'But it's so horrible!'
Detritus stood in thought for a moment and then opened the stained wooden box that contained all he had felt it necessary to bring.
'Dis is der old country, after all,' he said. 'So if it'd make you feel better...'
He pulled out a smaller box and rummaged among what appeared to be bits of rock and cloth until he found something yellowy-brown and round, like a shallow cup.
'Should've bunged it away,' he said, 'but it's all I got to remember my old granny by. She kept fings in it.'
'It's a bit of human skull, isn't it?' said Vimes at last.
'Yep.'
'Whose?'
'Anyone ask dat troll dere his name?' said Detritus, and the glint in his voice had a brittle edge to it for a moment. Then he carefully put the bowl away. 'T'ings were diff'rent in dem days. Now you don't chop our heads off an' we don't make drums outa your skin. Everyt'ing is hunky-dory. Dat's all we have to know.'
15 Detritus's silicon-based brain was, as with most trolls, highly sensitive to changes in temperature. When the thermometer was very low he could be dangerously intellectual.


- 144 -
He picked up the boxes again and followed Lady Sybil towards the staircase. Vimes took another look at the trophy head. The teeth were longer, far longer than they'd be on a real troll. A hunter'd have to be very brave and very lucky to go up against a fighting troll and survive. It'd be so much easier to go after an old one and later replace the ground-down stumps with sparkly fangs.
My gods, the things we do...
'Igor?' he said, as the odd-job man lurched past under the weight of two more bags.
'Meth, your exthellenthy?'
'I'm an excellency?' said Vimes to Inigo.
'Yes, your grace.'
'And still my grace as well?'
'Yes, your grace. You are His Grace His Excellency the Duke of Ankh, Commander Sir Samuel Vimes, your grace.'
'Hang on, hang on. His Grace cancels out the Sir, I know that. It's like having an ace in poker.'
'Strictly speaking this is true, your grace, but great store is set by titles here and it is best to play with a full deck, mmph.'
'I was once blackboard monitor at school,' said Vimes sharply. 'For a whole term. Would that help? Dame Venting said no one could clean a blackboard like me.'
'A useful fact, your grace, which may possibly be helpful in the event of a tie-break, mmph, mmhm,' said Inigo, his face carefully blank.
'We Igorth have alwayth preferred marthter,' said Igor. 'What wath it you were requiring?'
Vimes gestured towards the heads that covered every wall.
'I want them taken down as soon as possible. I can do this, can't I, Mister Skimmer?'
'You are the ambassador, sir. Mmph, mmhm.'
'Well, they're coming down. All of them.'
Igor gave the camphor-smelling multitude a worried look. 'Even the thordfith?'
'Even the swordfish,' said Vimes firmly.


- 145 -
'And the thnow leopardth?'
'Both of them, yes.'
'What about the troll?'
'Especially the troll. See to it.'
Igor could have been said to have looked as if his world had fallen down around his ears were it not for the fact that he already looked as if this had happened.
'What do you want to do with them, marthter?'
'That's up to you. Throw them in the river, maybe. Ask Detritus about the troll... Maybe it should be buried or something. Is there any supper?'
'There'th fresh walago, noggit, thclott16, thwinefleth and thauthageth,' said Igor, still clearly upset about the trophies. 'I'll thop tomorrow, if her ladythip giveth me inthtructionth.'
'Is swineflesh the same as pork?' said Vimes. People in drought-stricken areas would have paid good money to have Igor pronounce 'sausages'.
'Yes,' said Inigo.
'And what's in the sausages?'
'Er... meat?' said Igor, looking as though he was ready to run.
'Good. We'll give them a try.'
Vimes went upstairs and followed the sound of conversation until he reached a bedroom, where Sybil was laying clothes on a bed the size of a small country. Cheery was assisting her.
The walls were carved panels of wood. The bed was carved panels of wood. And the mad fretworker had been hard at work here, too, the floors weren't wood; they were stone, and radiated cold.
'It's a bit like the inside of a cuckoo clock, isn't it?' said Sybil. 'Cheery has volunteered to be my lady's maid for now.'
Cheery saluted.
16 Only A kind of pastry made from curtains.
Buckwheat dumplings stuffed with stuff.
Bpread made from parsnips, and widely considered to be much tastier than the dull wheat kind.


- 146 -
'Why not?' said Vimes. After a day like this, a lady's maid with a long flowing beard seemed perfectly normal.
'The floors are a bit chilly, though. Tomorrow I'll measure up for some carpets,' said Sybil firmly. 'I know we won't be here long, but we ought to leave something for the next people.'
'Yes, dear. That would be a good idea.'
'There's a bathroom through there,' said Sybil, nodding. 'There's hot springs near here, apparently. They pipe them in. You'll feel better for a hot bath.'
Ten minutes later Vimes was happy to agree. The water was a funny colour and smelled a little of what he would politely call bad eggs, but it was good and hot and he could feel it drawing the tension out of his muscles.
The distressing scent of second-hand baked beans sloshed around him as he lay back. At the other end of the huge bath the lump of pumice stone that he'd been using to rasp the dead skin off his feet banged against the side. Vimes watched it, unseeing, while he filed the thoughts of the day.
Things were starting to smell, just like the bathwater. The Scone of Stone had been stolen, had it? Now there was a coincidence.
It had been a complete shot in the dark. But lately he was on the lucky side when it came to nocturnal targets. Someone had pinched the replica Scone, and now the real one had gone missing, and someone in Ankh-Morpork who was good at making rubber moulds had been found dead. You didn't need the brains of Detritus in a snowdrift to suspect a connection.
A recollection nagged at him. Someone had said something and he'd thought it odd at the time but then something else had happened and it had gone out of his mind. Something about... a welcome to Bonk. Only...
Well, he was here. No doubt about that.
Absolute confirmation of the fact was brought forth half an hour later, at supper.
Vimes cut into a sausage and stared. 'What is in these? All this... pink stuff?' he demanded.
'Er, that's meat, your grace,' said Inigo, on the other side of the table.
'Well, where's the texture? Where's the white bits and the yellow bits and those green bits you always hope are herbs?'
'To a connoisseur here, your grace, an Ankh-Morpork sausage would not be considered a sausage, mmph, mmhm.'


- 147 -
'Oh, really? So what would he call it?'
'A loaf, your grace. Or possibly a log. Here, a butcher can be hanged if his sausages are not all meat, and at that it must be from a named domesticated animal, and I perhaps should add that by named I do not mean that it should have been called "Spot" or "Ginger", mmm mmhm. I'm sure that if your grace would prefer the more genuine Ankh-Morpork taste, Igor could make up some side dishes of stale bread and sawdust.'
'Thank you for that patriotic comment,' said Vimes. 'However, these are... Okay, I suppose. They just came as a bit of a shock, that's all. No!'
He put his hand over his mug to prevent Igor from filling it with beer.
'Ith there thomething wrong, marthter?'
'Just water, please,' said Vimes. 'No beer.'
'The marthter doth not drink... beer?'
'No. And perhaps in a mug without a face on it?' He took another look at the stein. 'Why's it got a lid, by the way? Are you afraid of the rain getting in?'
'I've never been quite certain of that one,' said Inigo, as Igor shuffled off. 'From observation, though, I believe the purpose of the stein is to stop the beer being spilled while using the mug to conduct the singing, mmm, mhm.'
'Ah, the old quaffing problem,' said Vimes. 'What a clever idea.'
Sybil patted him on the knee. 'You're not in Ankh-Morpork any more, dear,' she said.
'Now we're alone; your grace,' said Inigo, leaning closer, 'I'm very worried about Mister Sleeps. The acting consul, you remember? He seems to have vanished, mmm, mhm. Some of his personal items have gone, too.'
'Holiday?'
'Not at a time like this, sir! And—'
There was a thud of wood against wood as Igor re-entered, pointedly carrying a stepladder. Inigo sat back.
Vimes found that he was yawning. 'We'd better talk about that in the morning,' he said, as the ladder was dragged towards the horrible hunting trophies. 'It's been a long day, what with one thing and another.'
'Of course, your grace.'


- 148 -
The bed's mattress was so soft that Vimes sank into it nervously, afraid it might close over the top of his head. That was just as well, because the pillow was... well, everyone knew a pillow was a sack full of feathers, didn't they? Not an apprentice eiderdown like this thing.
'Just fold it up, Sam,' said Sybil, from the depths of the mattress. 'G'night.'
'G'night.'
'Sam... ?'
There was a snore from Sam Vimes. Sybil sighed and turned over.
Vimes awoke a few times, to the sound of thuds from downstairs.
'Snow leopards,' he muttered, and drifted away again.
There was a louder crash.
'Moose,' murmured Lady Sybil.
'Elk?' mumbled Vimes.
'Def'nitely moose.'
Some time later there was a muffled scream, a thud, and a sound very much like the sound made when a huge wooden ruler is held against a desk and twanged.
'Swordfish,' said Sam and Sybil together, and went back to sleep.
'You should present your credentials to the rulers of Bonk,' said Inigo in the morning.
Vimes was looking out of the window. Two guards in the rainbow-coloured uniforms were standing stiffly to attention outside the embassy.
'What're they doing here?' he said.
'Guarding,' said Inigo.
'Guarding who from what?'
'Just generally guarding, mmph. I suppose it's thought that guards give such a finished look to an important building.'
'What was that you said about credentials?'
'They're just formal letters from Lord Vetinari, confirming your appointment. Mmph, mmm... the lore is a little complex, but at the moment the order of precedence is the future Low King, the Lady Margolotta and the Baron von


- 149 -
Uberwald. Each, of course, will pretend that you are not calling on the other two. It's called the arrangement. It's an awkward system but it keeps the peace.'
'If I understood your briefing,' said Vimes, still watching the guards, 'in the days of imperial Uberwald the whole bloody show was run by the werewolves and the vampires and everyone else was lunch.'
'Somewhat simplistic but broadly true, mhm,' said Inigo, brushing some dust off Vimes's shoulder.
'And then it all broke up and the dwarfs became powerful because there's dwarfs from one end of Uberwald to the other and they all keep in touch...'
'Their system certainly survives political upheaval, yes.'
'And then... what was it? A diet of beetles?'
'The Diet of Bugs, mmm. "Diet" being an Uberwaldean word for "meeting", and Bugs being an important town further upriver, famous for its pastries made from flax. Everyone came to an... arrangement. No one would wage war on any of the others, and everyone could live in peace. No garlic to be grown, no silver to be mined. And the werewolves and vampires promised that those things wouldn't be needed. Mmm, mmm.'
'Seems a bit trusting,' said Vimes.
'It appears to have worked, mhm.'
'What did the humans think about it all?'
'Well, humans have always been a bit of background noise in the history of Uberwald, your grace.'
'It must be a bit dull for the undead, though.'
'Oh, the bright ones know the old days can't come back.'
'Ah, well, that's always the trick, isn't it? Finding the bright ones?' Vimes put on his helmet. 'And what're the dwarfs like?'
'The future Low King is considered pretty clever, your grace. Mhm.'
'How does he stand on Ankh-Morpork?'
'He can take Ankh-Morpork or leave it alone, your grace. On balance, I believe he doesn't much like us.'
'I thought it was Albrecht who didn't like us?'


- 150 -
'No, your grace. Albrecht is the one who would be happy to see Ankh-Morpork burned to the ground. Rhys merely wishes we didn't exist.'
'I thought he was one of the good guys!'
'Your grace, I did hear you express some
negative sentiments about Ankh-Morpork on the way here, mhm, mhm.'
'Yes, but I live there! I'm allowed to! That's patriotic!'
'Across the whole of the world, your grace, there inexplicably appear to be definitions of, mmph, mmhm, "good guy" which do not automatically mean "likes Ankh-Morpork". You will find out, I daresay. The other two are a lot easier to deal with. It may have been the Lady Margolotta who tried the little trick with the guards last night. She was the one who got me to bring you back, anyway. She has invited you for drinks.'
'Oh.'
'She's a vampire, mmm, mmm.'
'What?'
Inigo sighed. 'Your grace, I thought you understood. Vampires are simply part of Uberwald. This is where they belong. I'm afraid this is something you will have to come to terms with. I understand that now they... obtain blood by arrangement. Some people are... impressed by a title, your grace.'
'Good grief.'
'Quite so. In any case, you will be safe. Remember your diplomatic immunity, mmm, mhm.'
'I didn't quite see that working in the Wilinus Pass the other day.'
'Oh, they were common bandits.'
'Really? Has your man Sleeps turned up? Haven't you taken this to the Watch here?'
'There's no Watch here, as you understand the term. You saw them. They're... gate guards, enforcers for the city rulers, mhm, mmm, not officers of the law. But enquiries are being made.'
'Does Sybil come with me for this bit?' said Vimes, and thought: we were guards like that, not so long ago...
'It is usually done by the new ambassador and his guards.'


- 151 -
'Well, Detritus is staying here to keep an eye on her, all right? She said this morning she really thinks this place would be better for some decent carpet, and there's no stopping her when she's in a tape-measure mood. I'll take Cheery and one of the lads from outside, for the look of the thing. I assume you're coming?'
'I won't be required, sir. Mmm. The new coachman knows the way. Morporkian is the diplomatic language, after all, and... I shall be making enquiries.'
'Delicate ones?'
'Indeed, your grace.'
'If he's been killed won't that be an act of war?'
'Yes and no, your grace.'
'What? Sleeps was- is our man!'
Inigo looked awkward. 'It would depend on... exactly where he was and what he was doing...'
Vimes gave him a blank look, and then the penny dropped and operated his brain. 'Spying?' — 'Acquiring information. Everyone does it, mmm, mhm.'
'Yes, but if you find a diplomat going too far you just send him home with a sharp note, don't you?'
'Around the Circle Sea, your grace, that is the case. Here they may have a different approach.'
'Something rather sharper than a note?'
'Exactly. Mmm.'
One of the guards was Captain Tantony. There was some minor difficulty, but the argument that, since he was guarding Vimes, he might as well be where Vimes was, eventually carried some weight. Tantony had the look of an agonizingly logical man.
He kept giving Vimes curious looks as the coach rattled out of the town. Beside him sat Cheery with her legs dangling. Vimes noticed, although it was not the kind of thing he generally made a habit of noticing, that the shape of her breastplate had been subtly altered, probably by the same armourer that Angua went to, to indicate that the chest underneath it was not quite the same shape of chest that you got under the armour of, say, Corporal Nobbs, although of course probably no one had a chest the same shape as that of Corporal Nobbs.
She was wearing her high-heeled iron boots, too.


- 152 -
'Look, you don't have to come,' he said out loud.
'Yes, I do.'
'I mean I could go and get Detritus instead. Although I suppose there'd be even more upshot if I took a troll into a dwarf mine. I mean, rather than a... a...'
'Girl,' said Cheery helpfully.
'Er, yes.' Vimes felt the coach slow to a halt, even though they hadn't left the town yet, and he looked out.
In front of them, across a small square, was a fort of sorts, but with much larger gates than you'd expect for its size. As Vimes stared at them they were swung open from within.
Inside was a slope. All the fort consisted of were four walls around a large, sloping tunnel.
'The dwarfs live underneath the town?' he said, as the light from outside was gradually replaced by the infrequent glow of torches. But they clearly showed the coach was rattling past a long, long line of stationary carts. The pools of light revealed horses, and drivers talking in groups.
'Under quite a lot of Uberwald,' said Cheery. 'This is just the nearest entrance, sir. We'll probably have to stop in a minute because the horses don't like- Ah.'
The coach stopped again, and the coachman banged on the side to indicate that this was the end of the line. The queue of carts wound off down another tunnel, but the coach had stopped in a small cave with a big door. A couple of dwarfs were waiting there. They had axes slung across their backs, although by dwarf standards this counted merely as 'politely dressed' rather than 'heavily armed'. Their attitude, however, was in the international language of people guarding gates everywhere. 'Commander Sam Vimes, Ankh-Morpork Ci- Ambassador from Ankh-Morpork,' said Vimes, handing one of them his papers. At least it was not hard to assume a lofty air with dwarfs.
To his surprise, the document was read thoroughly, one dwarf looking over the other one's shoulder and pointing out interesting sub clauses. The official seal was carefully examined.
One guard pointed to Cheery. 'Kra'k?'
'My official guard,' said Vimes. 'Included in "associated members of staff" on page two,' he added helpfully.
'Mhust searhch thy coash,' said the guard.


- 153 -
'No. Diplomatic immunity,' said Vimes. 'Tell 'em, Cheery.'
They listened to Cheery's urgent dwarfish. Then the other guard, whose face had indicated that there was something on his mind and it was jumping up and down, nudged his companion and pulled him aside.
There was a torrent of whispers. Vimes couldn't understand, but he caught the word 'Wilinus'. And, shortly afterwards, the word 'hr grag', dwarfish for 'thirty'.
'Oh gods,' he said. 'And a dog?'
'Good guess, sir,' said Cheery.
The document was handed back hurriedly. Vimes could read the body language, even written smaller than usual: there was probably an expensive problem here, so the guards were inclined to leave it to someone who earned more money than them.
One of them pulled a bellrope by the door. After some time the door slid open, revealing a small room.
'We have to go in, sir,' said Cheery.
'But there's no other doors!'
'It's all right, sir.'
Vimes stepped inside. The dwarfs slid the door back, leaving them in the room, which was lit by a single candle.
'Some kind of waiting room?' said Vimes.
Somewhere far off something went clonk. The floor trembled for a moment and then Vimes had an uneasy sensation of movement.
'The room moves?' he said.
'Yes, sir. Several hundred feet down, probably. I think it's all done by counterweights.'
They stood silently, unsure of what to say, as walls around them creaked and groaned. Then there was a rattle, a passing sensation of weight, and the room stopped moving.
'Wherever we're headed, keep your ears open,' said Vimes. 'Something's going on, I can feel it.'
The door slid back. Vimes looked out on to the night sky, underground. The stars were all around him... below him...


- 154 -
'I think we went down too far,' he said. And then his brain made sense of what his eyes had seen. The moving room had brought them out somewhere on the side of a huge cave. He was looking at a thousand points of candlelight, spread out on the cavern floor and in other galleries. Now that he could grasp the scale of things, he realized that many of them were moving.
The air was full of one huge sound made up of thousands of voices, echoed and re-echoed. Occasionally a shout or a laugh would stand out, but mostly it was just an endless sea of sound, beating on the shores of the eardrum.
'I thought you people lived in little mines,' said Vimes.
'Well, I thought humans lived in little cottages, sir,' said Cheery, taking a candle from a large rack beside the door and lighting it. 'And then I saw Ankh-Morpork.'
There was something recognizable about the way the lights were moving. A whole constellation of them was heading in towards one invisible wall, where reflected light now indicated, very faintly, the mouth of a large tunnel. In front of it was a row of lights.
Think of it as a lot of people heading for something that one row of people was... guarding.
'People down there aren't happy,' said Vimes. 'That looks like a mob to me. Look, you can tell by the way they move.'
'Commander Vimes?'
He turned. In the gloom he could make out several dwarfs, each with a candle fixed to his helmet. In front of them was, presumably, another dwarf.
He'd seen dwarfs like this in Ankh-Morpork, but always scurrying away. This was a deep-down dwarf.
The robe it was wearing was made of overlapping leather plates. Instead of the small round iron helmet which Vimes had always thought dwarfs were born with, it had a pointed leather hat with more leather flaps all round it. The one at the front had been tied up, to allow the wearer to look out at the world, or at least that part of it that was underground. The general effect was of a mobile cone.
'Er, yes, that's me,' said Vimes.
'Welcome to Schmaltzberg, your excellency. I am the King's jar'ahk'haga, which in your language you would call—'
But Vimes's lips had been moving fast as he tried to translate.
'Ideas... taster?' he said.


- 155 -
'Hah! That would be a way of putting it, yes. My name is Dee. Would you care to follow me? This should not take long.'
The figure swept away. One of the other dwarfs prodded Vimes very gently, indicating that he should follow.
The sound from far below redoubled. Someone was yelling.
'Is there a problem?' said Vimes, catching up with the fast-moving Dee.
'We have no problems.'
Ah, he's already lied to me, thought Vimes. We're being diplomatic.
Vimes trailed after the dwarf through more caves. Or tunnels... it was hard to tell, because in the darkness Vimes could only rely on a sense of the space around him. Occasionally they passed the lighted entrance to another cave or tunnel. Several guards, with candles on their helmets, stood at each one.
The well-honed copper's radar was beeping at him continuously. Something bad was going on. He could smell the tension, the sense of quiet panic. The air was thick with it. Occasionally other dwarfs scuttled past, distracted, on some mission. Something very bad. People didn't know what to do next, so they were trying to do everything. And, in the middle of this, important officers had to stop what they were doing because some idiot from some distant city had to hand over a piece of paper.
Eventually a door opened in the darkness. It led into a large, roughly oblong cave that, with its book-lined walls and paper-strewn tables, had the look of an office about it.
'Do be seated, commander.'
A match burst into life. One candle was lit, all lost and alone in the dark.
'We try to make guests feel welcome,' said Dee, scuttling behind his desk. He pulled off his pointed hat and, to Vimes's amazement, put on a pair of thick smoked glasses.
'You had papers?' he said. Vimes handed them over.
'It says here "His Grace",' the dwarf said, after reading them for a while.
'Yes, that's me.'
'And there's a sir.'
'That's me, too.'


- 156 -
'And an excellency.'
''fraid so.' Vimes narrowed his eyes. 'I was blackboard monitor for a while, too.'
There was the sound of angry voices from behind a door at the far end of the room.
'What does a blackboard monitor do?' said Dee, raising his voice.
'What? Er, I had to clean the blackboard after lessons.'
The dwarf nodded. The voices grew louder, more intense. Dwarfish was such a good language to be annoyed in.
'Erasing the teachings when they were learned!' said Dee, shouting to be heard.
'Er, yes!'
'A task given only to the trustworthy!'
'Could be, yes!'
Dee folded up the letter and handed it back, glancing briefly at Cheery.
'Well, these seem to be in order,' he said. 'Would you care for a drink before you go?'
'Sorry? I thought I had to present myself to your king.' The swearing from the other side of the door was threatening to burn through the woodwork.
'Oh, that won't be necessary' said Dee. 'At the moment he should. not be bothered with—'
'-trivial matters?' said Vimes. 'I thought it was how the thing ought to be done. I thought dwarfs always did the thing that ought to be done.'
'At the moment it... would not be advisable,' said Dee, raising his voice again over the noise. 'I'm sure you understand.'
'Let's assume I'm very stupid,' said Vimes.
'I assure you, your excellency, that what I see the King sees, and what I hear the King hears.'
'That's certainly true at the moment, isn't it?'
Dee drummed his fingers on his desk. 'Your excellency, I have spent only long enough in your... city to gain a general insight into your ways, but I might feel you are making fun of me.'


- 157 -
'May I speak freely?'
'From what I have heard of you, your monitorship, you usually do.'
'Have you found the Scone of Stone yet?'
The expression on Dee's face told Vimes that he had scored. And that, almost certainly, the next thing the dwarf said would be another lie.
'What a strange and untruthful thing to say! There is no possibility that the Scone could have been stolen! This has been firmly declared! This is not a lie we wish to hear repeated!'
'You told me I—' Vimes tried. By the sound of it, there was. a fight going on behind the door now.
'The Scone will be seen by all at the coronation! This is not a matter for Ankh-Morpork or anyone else! I protest at this intrusion into our private affairs!'
'I merely—'
'Nor do we have to show the Scone to any prying troublemaker! It is a sacred trust and well guarded!'
Vimes kept quiet. Dee was better than Done It Duncan.
'Every person leaving the Scone Cave is carefully watched! The Scone cannot be removed! It is perfectly safe!' Dee was shouting now.
'Ah, I understand,' said Vimes quietly.
'Good!'
'So, you haven't found it yet, then.'
Dee opened his mouth, shut it again, and then slumped back in his seat. 'I think, your grace, that you had better—'
The door at the other end of the room rolled back. Another dwarf, cone-shaped in his robes, stamped out, stopped, glared around him, went back through the door again, shouted some afterthoughts to whoever was beyond, and then made to head out of the room. He was brought up short when he almost walked into Vimes.
The dwarf tilted its head to look up at him. There was no real face there, just the suggestion of the glint of angry eyes between the leather flaps.
'Arnak-Morporak?'


- 158 -
'Yes.'
Vimes didn't understand the words that followed, but the nasty tone was unmistakable. The important thing was to keep smiling. That was the diplomatic way.
'Why, thank you,' he said. 'And may I say it—'
There was a grunt from the dwarf. He'd seen Cheery.
'Ha'ak!' he shouted.
Vimes heard a gasp. There were other dwarfs clustered around the doorway. Then he glanced down at Cheery. Her eyes were shut. She was trembling.
'Who is this dwarf?' he said to Dee.
'This is Albrecht Albrechtson,' said the Ideas Taster.
'The runner-up?'
'Yes,' said Dee hoarsely.
'Then can you tell the creature that if he uses that word again in the presence of myself or any of my staff there will be, as we diplomats say, repercussions. Wrap that up in diplomacy and give it to him, will you?'
The corners of Vimes's ears picked up a suggestion that not every dwarf listening was ignorant of the language. A couple of dwarfs were already heading purposefully towards them.
Dee babbled a stream of hysterical dwarfish, just as the other dwarfs caught up with the gaping Albrecht and led him quietly but firmly away, but not before one of them had whispered something to the Ideas Taster.
'The, er, the King wishes to see you,' he mumbled.
Vimes looked towards the doorway. More dwarfs were hurrying through it now. Some of them were dressed in what Vimes thought of as 'normal' dwarf clothing, others in the heavy black leathers of the deep-down clans. All of them glared at him as they went past.
Then there was just empty floor, all the way to the door.
'Do you come too?' he said.
'Not unless he asks for me,' said Dee. 'I wish you luck, your monitorship.'


- 159 -
Beyond the door was a room of bookshelves, stretching up, stretching away. Here and there a candle merely changed the density of the darkness. There were lots of them, though, punctuating the distance. Vimes wondered how big this room must be
'In here is a record of every marriage, every birth, every death, every movement of a dwarf from one mine to another, the succession of the king of each mine, every dwarf's progress through k'zakra, mining claims, the history of famous axes... and other matters of note,' said a voice behind him. 'And perhaps most importantly, every decision made under dwarf law for fifteen hundred years is written down in this room, look you.'
Vimes turned. A dwarf, short even by dwarf standards, was standing behind him. He seemed to be expecting a reply.
'Er, every decision?'
'Oh, yes.'
'Er, were they all good?' said Vimes.
'The important thing is that they were all made,' said the King. 'Thank you, young... dwarf, you may straighten up.'
Cheery was bowing.
'Sorry, should I be doing that?' said Vimes. 'You're... not the King, are you?'
'Not yet.'
'I, I'm, I'm sorry, I was expecting someone more, er...'
'Do go on.'
'... someone more... kingly.'
The Low King sighed.
'I meant... I mean, you look just like an ordinary dwarf,' said Vimes weakly.
This time the King smiled. He was slightly shorter than average for dwarfs, and dressed in the usual almost-uniform of leather and home-forged chain-mail. He looked old, but dwarfs started looking old around the age of five years and were still looking old three hundred years later, and he had that musical cadence to his speech that Vimes associated with Llamedos. If he'd asked Vimes to pass the ketchup in Gimlet's Whole Food Delicatessen, Vimes wouldn't have given him a second look.


- 160 -
'This diplomacy business,' said the King, 'Are you getting the hang of it, do you think?'
'It doesn't come easy, I must admit... er, your majesty.'
'I believe you have been, until now, a watchman in Ankh-Morpork?'
'Er, yes.'
'And you had a famous ancestor, I believe, who was a regicide?'
Here it comes, thought Vimes. 'Yers, Stoneface Vimes,' he said, as levelly as possible. 'I've always thought that was a bit unfair, though. It was only one king. It wasn't as if it was a hobby.'
'But you don't like kings,' said the dwarf.
'I don't meet many, sir,' said Vimes, hoping that this would pass for a diplomatic answer. It seemed to satisfy the King.
'I went to Ankh-Morpork once, when I was a young dwarf,' he said, walking towards a long table piled high with scrolls.
'Er, really?'
'Lawn ornament, they called me. And... what was it... ah, yes... shortarse. Some children threw stones at me.'
'I'm sorry.'
'I expect you'll tell me that sort of thing doesn't happen any more.'
'It doesn't happen as much. But you always get idiots who don't move with the times.'
The King 'gave Vimes a piercing glance. 'Indeed. The times... But now they're always Ankh-Morpork's times, see?'
'I'm sorry?'
'When people say "We must move with the times," they really mean "You must do it my way." And there are some who would say that Ankh-Morpork is... a kind of vampire. It bites, and what it bites it turns into copies of itself. It sucks, too. It seems all our best go to Ankh-Morpork, where they live in squalor. You leave us dry.'
Vimes was at a loss. It was clear that the little figure now sitting at the long table was a lot brighter than he was, although right now he felt as dim as a penny


- 161 -
candle in any case. It was also clear that the King hadn't slept for quite some time. He decided to go for honesty.
'Can't really answer that, sir,' he said, adopting a variant on his talking-to -Vetinari approach. 'But...'
'Yes?'
'I'd wonder... you know, if I was a king... I'd wonder why people were happier living in squalor in Ankh-Morpork than staying back home... sir.'
'Ah. You're telling me how I should think, now?'
'No, sir. Just how I think. There's dwarf bars all over Ankh-Morpork, and they've got mining tools wired to the wall, and there's dwarfs in 'em every night quaffing beer and singing sad songs about how they wish they were back in the mountains digging for gold. But if you said to them, fine, the gate's open, off you go and send us a postcard, they'd say, "Oh, well, yeah I'd love to, but we've just got the new workshop finished... Maybe next year we'll go to Uberwald."'
'They come back to the mountains to die,' said the King.
'They live in Ankh-Morpork.'
'Why is this, do you think?'
'I couldn't say. Because no one tells them how to, I suppose.'
'And now you want our gold and iron,' said the King. 'Is there nothing we can keep?'
'Don't know about that either, sir. I wasn't trained for this job.'
The King muttered something under his breath. Then, much louder, he said, 'I can offer you no favours, your excellency. These are difficult times, see.'
'But my real job is finding things out,' said Vimes, 'If there is anything that I could do to—'
The King thrust the papers at Vimes. 'Your letters of accreditation, your excellency. Their contents have been noted!'
And that shuts me up, Vimes thought.
'I would ask you one thing, though,' the King went on.
'Yes, sir?'
'Really thirty men and a dog?'


- 162 -
'No. There were only seven men. I killed one of them because I had to.'
'How did the others die?'
'Er, victims of circumstance, sir.'
'Well, then... your secret is safe with me. Good morning, Miss Littlebottom.'
Cheery looked stunned.
The King gave her a brief smile. 'Ah, the rights of the individual, a famous Ankh-Morpork invention, or so they say. Thank you, Dee, his excellency was just leaving. You may send in the Copperhead delegation.'
As Vimes was ushered out he saw another party of dwarfs assembled in the anteroom. One or two of them nodded at him as they were herded in.
Dee turned back to Vimes. 'I hope you didn't tire his majesty.'
'Someone else has already been doing that, by the look of it.'
'These are sleepless times,' said the Ideas Taster.
'Scone turned up yet?' said Vimes innocently.
'Your excellency, if you persist in this attitude a complaint will go to your Lord Vetinari!'
'He does so look forward to them. Was it this way out?'
It was the last word said until Vimes and his guards were back in the coach and the doors to daylight were opening ahead of them.
Out of the corner of his- eye Vimes saw that Cheery was shaking.
'Certainly hits you, doesn't it, the cold air after the warmth underground...' he ventured.
Cheery grinned in relief. 'Yes, it does,' she said.
'Seemed quite a decent sort,' said Vimes. 'What was that he muttered when I said I hadn't been trained?'
'He said, "Who has?", sir.'
'It sounded like it. All that arguing... it's not a case of sitting on the throne and saying, "Do this, do that," then.'
'Dwarfs are very argumentative, sir. Of course, many wouldn't agree. But none of the big dwarf clans are happy about this. You know how it is the Copperheads


- 163 -
didn't want Albrecht, and the Schmaltzbergers wouldn't support anyone called Glodson, the Ankh-Morpork dwarfs were split both ways, and Rhys comes from a little coalmining clan near Llamedos that isn't important enough to be on anyone's side...'
'You mean he didn't get to be king because
everyone liked him but because no one disliked him enough?'
'That's right, sir.'
Vimes glanced at the crumpled letters that the King had thrust into his hand. By daylight he could see the faint scribble on one corner. There were just two words.
MIDNIGHT, SEE?
Humming to himself, he tore the piece of paper off and rolled it into a ball.
'And now for the damn vampire,' he said.
'Don't worry, sir,' said Cheery. 'What's the worst she can do? Bite your head off?'
'Thank you for that, corporal. Tell me... those robes some of the dwarfs were wearing. I know they wear them on the surface so they're not polluted by the nasty sunlight, but why wear. them down there?'
'It's traditional, sir. Er, they were worn by the... well, it's what you'd call the knockermen, sir.'
'What did they do?'
'Well, you know about firedamp? It's a gas you get in mines sometimes. It explodes.'
Vimes saw the images in his mind as Cheery explained...
The miners would clear the area, if they were lucky. And the knockerman would go in wearing layer after layer of chain-mail and leather, carrying his sack of wicker globes stuffed with rags and oil. And his long pole. And his slingshot.
Down in the mines, all alone, he'd hear the knockers. Agi Hammerthief and all the other things that made noises, deep under the earth.
There could be no light, because light would mean sudden, roaring death. The knockerman would feel his way through the utter dark, far below the surface.
There was a type of cricket that lived in the mines. It chirruped loudly in the presence of firedamp. The knockerman would have one in a box, tied to his hat.


- 164 -
When it sang, a knockerman who was either very confident or extremely suicidal would step back, light the torch on the end of his pole and thrust it ahead of him. The more careful knockerman would step back rather more, and slingshot a ball of burning rags into the unseen death. Either way, he'd trust in his thick leather clothes to protect him from the worst of the blast.
Initially the dangerous trade did not run in families, because who'd marry a knockerman? They were dead dwarfs walking. But sometimes a young dwarf would ask to become one; his family would be proud, wave him goodbye, and then speak of him as if he was dead, because that made it easier.
Sometimes, though, knockermen came back. And the ones that survived went on to survive again, because surviving is a matter of practice. And sometimes they would talk a little of what they heard, all alone in the deep mines... the tap-tapping of dead dwarfs trying to get back into the world, the distant laughter of Agi Hammerthief, the heartbeat of the turtle that carried the world.
Knockermen became kings.
Vimes, listening with his mouth open, wondered why the hell it was that dwarfs believed that they had no religion and no priests. Being a dwarf was a religion. People went into the dark for the good of the clan, and heard things, and were changed, and came back to tell...
And then, fifty years ago, a dwarf tinkering in Ankh-Morpork had found that if you put a simple fine mesh over your lantern flame it'd burn blue in the presence of the gas but wouldn't explode. It was a discovery of immense value to the good of dwarfkind and, as so often happens with such discoveries, almost immediately led to a war.
'And afterwards there were two kinds of dwarf,' said Cheery sadly. 'There's the Copperheads, who all use the lamp and the patent gas exploder, and the Schmaltzbergers, who stick to the old ways. Of course we're all dwarfs,' she said, 'but relations are rather... strained.'
'I bet they are.'
'Oh, no, all dwarfs recognize the need for the Low King, it's just that...'
'.. they don't quite see why knockermen are still so powerful?'
'It's all very sad,' said Cheery. 'Did I tell you my brother Snorey went off to be a knockerman?'
'I don't think so.'


- 165 -
'He died in an explosion somewhere under Borogravia. But he was doing what he wanted to do.' After a moment she added, conscientiously, 'Well, up to the moment when the blast hit him. After that, I don't think so.'
Now the coach was rumbling up the mountain on one side of the town. Vimes looked down at the little round helmet beside him. Funny how you think you know about people, he thought.
The wheels clattered over the wood of a drawbridge.
As castles went, this one looked as though it could be taken by a small squad of not very efficient soldiers. Its builder had not been thinking about fortifications. He'd been influenced by fairytales and possibly by some of the more ornamental sorts of cake. It was a castle for looking at. For defence, putting a blanket over your head might be marginally safer.
The coach stopped in the courtyard. To Vimes's amazement, a familiar figure in a shabby black coat came shuffling up to open the door.
'Igor?'
'Yeth, marthter?'
'What the hell are you doing here?'
'Er, I'm opening thith here door, marthter,' said Igor.
'But why aren't you-?'
Then it stole over Vimes that Igor was different. This Igor had both eyes the same colour, and some of his scars were in different places.
'Sorry,' he mumbled. 'I thought you were Igor.'
'Oh, you mean my couthin Igor,' said Igor. 'He workth down at the embathy. How'th he getting on?'
'Er, he's looking... well,' said Vimes. 'Pretty... well. Yes.'
'Did he mention how Igor'th getting on, thur?' said Igor, shambling away so fast that Vimes had to run to keep up. 'Only none of uth have heard from him, not even Igor, who'th alwayth been very clothe.'
'I'm sorry? Is your whole family called Igor?'
'Oh, yeth, thur. It avoidth confuthion.'
'It does?'


- 166 -
'Yeth, thur. Anyone who ith anyone in Uberwald wouldn't dream of employing any other thervant but an Igor. Ah, here we are, thur. The mithtreth ith exthpecting you.'
They'd walked under an arch and Igor was opening a door with far more studs in it than was respectable. This led to a hallway.
'Are you sure you want to come?' said Vimes to Cheery. 'She is a vampire.'
'Vampires don't worry me, sir.'
'Lucky for you,' said Vimes. He glanced at the silent Tantony. The man was looking strained.
'Tell our friend here he won't be needed and he's to wait for us in the coach, the lucky devil,' he said. 'But don't translate that last bit.'
Igor opened an inner door as Tantony almost ran out of the hall. 'Hith grathe hith exthellenthy—'
'Ah, Sir Samuel,' said Lady Margolotta. 'Do come in. I know you don't like being your grace. Isn't this tiresome? But it has to be done, doesn't it?'
It wasn't what he'd expected. Vampires weren't supposed to wear pearls, or jumpers in pink. In Vimes's world they didn't wear sensible flat shoes, either. Or have a sitting room in which every conceivable piece of furniture was upholstered in chintz.
Lady Margolotta looked like someone's mother, although possibly someone who'd had an expensive education and a pony called Fidget. She moved like someone who had grown used to her body and, in general, looked like what Vimes had heard described as 'a woman of a certain age'. He'd never been quite certain what age that was.
But... things weren't quite right. There were bats embroidered on the pink jumper, and the pattern on the furniture had a sort of... bat look. The little dog with a bow round its neck, lying curled on a cushion, looked more like a rat than a dog. Vimes was less certain about that one, though; dogs of that nature tended to look a bit rat-like in any case. The effect was as if someone had read the music but had never heard it played.
He realized she was politely waiting for him and bowed, stiffly.
'Oh, don't bother with that, please,' said Lady Margolotta. 'Do take a seat.' She walked over to a cabinet and opened it. 'Do you fancy a Bull's Blood?'
'Is that the drink with the vodka? Because—'


- 167 -
'No,' said Lady Margolotta quietly. 'This, I am afraid, is the other kind. Still, ve have that in common, don't ve? Neither of us drinks... alcohol. I believe you ver an alcoholic, Sir Samuel.'
'No,' said Vimes, completely taken aback. 'I was a drunk. You have to be richer than I was to be an alcoholic.'
'Ah, vell said. I have lemonade, if you vish.
And Miss Littlebottom? Ve don't have beer, you'll be pleased to hear.'
Cheery looked at Vimes in amazement. 'Er, perhaps a sherry?' she said.
'Certainly. You may leave us, Igor. Isn't he a treasure?' she added as Igor retired.
'He certainly looks as though he's just been dug up,' said Vimes. This was not going according to his mental script.
'Oh, all Igors look like that. He's been in the family for almost two hundred years. Most of him, anyway.'
'Really?'
'Extremely popular vith the young ladies, for some reason. All Igors are. I've found it best not to speculate vhy.' Lady Margolotta gave Vimes a bright smile. 'yell, here's to your stay, Sir Samuel.'
'You-know a lot about me,' said Vimes weakly.
'Most of it good, I assure you,' she said. 'Although you're inclined. to forget your papervork, you get exasperated easily, you are far too sentimental, you regret your own lack of education and distrust erudition in others, you are immensely proud of your city and you vonder if you may be a class traitor. My... friends in Ankh-Morpork were unable to find out anything very bad and, believe me, they are pretty good at that sort of thing. And you loathe vampires.'
'I—'
'Quite understandable. Ve're dreadful people, by and large.'
'But you—'
'I try to look on the bright side,' said Lady Margolotta. 'But, anyvay — how did you like the King?'
'He's very... quiet,' said Vimes the diplomat.


- 168 -
'Try cunning. He vill have found out a lot more about you than you did about him, I'm sure. Vould you like a biscuit? I don't eat them myself, of course, but there's a little man down in the town who does vonderful chocolate. Igor?'
'Yeth, mithtreth,' said Igor. Vimes nearly sprayed his lemonade across the room.
'He was out of the room!' he said. 'I saw him go! I heard the door shut!'
'Igor has strange vays. Do give Sir Samuel a napkin, Igor.'
'You said the King was cunning,' said Vimes, mopping lemonade off his breeches.
Igor put down a plate of biscuits and shuffled out of the room.
'Did I? No, I don't think I could possibly have said that. It's not the diplomatic thing to say,' said Lady Margolotta smoothly. 'I'm sure ve all support the new Low King, the choice of dvarfdom in general, even if they thought they ver getting a traditionalist and got an unknown quantity.'
'Did you just say that last bit?' said Vimes, awash on a sea of diplomacy and damp trousers.
'Absolutely not. You know their Scone of Stone has been stolen?'
'They say it hasn't,' said Vimes.
'Do you believe them?'
'No.'
'The coronation cannot go ahead vithout it, did you know that?'
'We'll have to wait until they bake another one?' said Vimes.
'No. There vill be no more Low Kings,' said Lady Margolotta. 'Legitimacy, you see. The Scone represents continuity all the vay to B'hrian Bloodaxe. They say he sat on it while it is still soft and left his impression, as it were.'
'You mean kingship has passed from backside to backside?'
'Humans believe in crowns, don't they?'
'Yes, but at least they're at the other end!'
'Thrones, then.' Lady Margolotta sighed. 'People set such store by strange things. Crowns. Relics. Garlic. Anyway, there vill be a civil var over the leadership which Albrecht will surely vin, and he'll cease all trading with Ankh-Morpork. Did you know that? He thinks the place is evil.'


- 169 -
'I know it is,' said Vimes. 'And I live there.'
'I've heard that he plans to declare all dwarfs there d'hrarak,' the vampire went on. Vimes heard Cheery gasp. 'It means "not dwarfs".'
'That's very big of him,' said Vimes. 'I shouldn't think our lads'll worry about that.'
'Um,' said Cheery.
'Quite so. The young lady looks vorried, and you'd do vell to listen to her, Sir Samuel.'
'Excuse me,' said Vimes, 'but what is all this to you?'
'You really don't drink at all, Sir Samuel?'
'No.'
'Not even vun?'
'No,' said Vimes, more sharply. 'You'd know that if you knew anything about—'
'Yet you keep half a bottle in your bottom drawer as a sort of permanent test,' said Lady Margolotta. 'Now that, Sir Samuel, suggests a man who vears his hair shirts on the inside.'
'I want to know who's been saying all this!'
Lady Margolotta sighed. Vimes got the impression that he'd failed another test. 'I am rich, Sir Samuel. Vampires tend to be. Didn't you know? Lord Vetinari, I know, believes that information is currency. But everyvun knows that currency has alvays been information. Money doesn't need to talk, it merely has to listen.'
She stopped and sat watching Vimes, as if she'd suddenly decided to listen. Vimes moved uncomfortably under the steady gaze.
'How is Havelock Vetinari?' she said.
'The Patrician? Oh... fine.'
'He must be quite old now.'
'I've never really been certain how old he is,' said Vimes. 'About my age, I suppose.'
Then she stood up suddenly. 'This has been an interesting meeting, Sir Samuel. I trust Lady Sybil is vell?'
'Er, yes.'


- 170 -
'Good. I am so glad. Ve vill meet again, I am sure. Igor vill see you out. My regards to the Baron, vhen you see him. Pat him on the head for me:'
'What the hell was that all about, Cheery?' said Vimes, as the coach set off down the hill again.
'Which bit, sir?'
'Practically all of it, really. Why should Ankh-Morpork dwarfs object if someone says they're not dwarfs? They know they're dwarfs.'
'They won't be subject to dwarf law, sir.'
'I didn't know they were.'
'I mean, it's like... how you live your life, sir. Marriages, burials, that sort of thing. Marriages won't be legal. Old dwarfs won't be allowed to be buried back home. And that'd be terrible. Every dwarf dreams of going back home when he's old and starting up a little mine.'
'Every dwarf? Even the ones who were born in Ankh-Morpork?'
'Home can mean all sorts of things, sir,' said Cheery. 'There's other things, too. Contracts won't be valid. Dwarfs like good solid rules, sir.'
'We've got laws in Ankh-Morpork, too. More or less.'
'Between themselves dwarfs prefer to use their own, sir.'
'I bet the Copperhead dwarfs won't like it if that happens.'
'Yes, sir. There'll be a split. And another war.' She sighed.
'But why was she going on about drink?'
'I don't know, sir.'
'I don't like 'em. Never have done, never will.'
'Yes, sir.'
'Did you see that rat?'
'Yes, sir.'
'I think she was laughing at me.'
The coach rolled through the streets of Bonk once more.
'How big a war?'


- 171 -
'A worse one than the one fifty years ago, I expect,' said Cheery.
'I don't recall people talking about that one,' said Vimes.
'Most humans didn't know about it,' said Cheery. 'It mostly took place underground. Undermining passages and digging invasion tunnels and so on. Perhaps a few houses fell into mysterious holes and people didn't get their coal, but that was about it.'
'You mean dwarfs just try to collapse mines on other dwarfs?'
'Oh, yes.'
'I thought you were all law-abiding?'
'Oh, yes, sir. Very law-abiding. Just not very merciful.'
Ye gods, thought Vimes, as the coach rolled over the bridge in the centre of the town, I haven't been sent to a coronation. I've been sent to a war that hasn't started yet.
He glanced up. Tantony was watching him intently, but looked away quickly.
Lady Margolotta watched the coach until it reached the gates of the town. She stood back a little from the window. There was a slight overcast, but habits of preservation died hard.
'Vhat a very angry man, Igor.'
'Yeth, mithtreth.'
'You can see it piling up behind his patience. I vonder how far he can be pushed?'
'I've brought the hearthe around, mithtreth.'
'Oh, is it that late? We'd better be going, then. Everyvun feels despondent if I miss a meeting, you know.'
The castle on the other side of the valley was much more rugged than Lady Margolotta's confectionery item. Even so, the gates were wide open and didn't look as though they were often closed.
The main door was tall and heavy-looking. The only thing that suggested it hadn't been ordered from the standard castle catalogue was the smaller, narrow door, a few feet high, set into it.
'What's that for?' said Vimes. 'Even a dwarf would bump their head.'
'I suppose it depends on what shape you are when you go in,' said Cheery darkly.


- 172 -
The main door opened as soon as Vimes had laid his hand on the wolf's-head knocker. But he was ready this time..
'Good morning, Igor,' he said.
'Good day, your exthellenthy,' said Igor, bowing.
'Igor and Igor send their regards, Igor.'
'Thank you, your exthellenthy. Thinthe you mention it, could I put a parthel on your coach for Igor?'
'You mean the Igor at the embassy?'
'That'th who I thaid, thur,' said Igor patiently. 'He athked me if I could lend him a hand.'
'Yes, no problem there.'
'Good. It'th well wrapped up and the ithe will keep it nithe and freth. Would you thtep thith way? The marthter ith changing at the moment.'
Igor shambled into a wide hall, one side of which was mostly fireplace, and bowed out.
'Did he say what I thought he said?' said Vimes. 'About the hand and ice?'
'It's not what it sounds like, sir,' said Cheery.
'I hope so. My gods, look at that damned thing!'
A huge red flag hung from the rafters. In the middle of it was a black wolf's head, its mouth full of stylized flashes of lightning.
'Their new flag, I think,' said Cheery.
'I thought it was just a crest with the doubledheaded bat?'
'Perhaps they thought it was time for a change, sir—'
'Ah, your excellency! Isn't Sybil with you?'
The woman who had entered was Angua, but padded somewhat with years. She was wearing a long, loose green gown, very old fashioned by Ankh-Morpork standards, although there are some styles that never go out of date on the right figure. She was brushing her hair as she walked across the floor.
'Er, she's staying at the embassy today. We had rather a difficult journey. You would be the Baroness Serafine von Uberwald?'


- 173 -
'And you're Sam Vimes. Sybil's letters are all about you. The Baron won't be long. We were out hunting and lost track of time.'
'I expect it's a lot of work, seeing to the horses,' said Vimes politely.
Serafine's smile went strange for a moment. 'Hah. Yes,' she said. 'Can I get Igor to fetch you a drink?'
'No, thank you.'
She sat down on one of the overstuffed chairs and beamed at him. 'You've met the new king, your excellency?'
'This morning.'
'I believe he's having trouble.'
'What makes you think that?' said Vimes.
Serafine looked startled. 'I thought everyone knew?'
'Well, I've hardly been here five minutes,' said Vimes. 'I probably don't count as everyone.'
Now, he was pleased to note, she looked puzzled.
'We... just heard there was some problem,' she said.
'Oh, well... a new king, a coronation to organize... A few problems are bound to occur,' he said. Well, he thought, so this is diplomacy. It's like lying, only to a better class of people.
'Yes. Of course.'
'Angua is well,' said Vimes.
'Are you sure you won't have a drink?' said Serafine quickly, standing up. 'Ah, here is my husband—'
The Baron entered the room like a whirlwind that had swept up several dogs. They bounded ahead of him and danced around him.
'Hello! Hello!' he boomed.
Vimes looked at an enormous man — not fat, not tall, just built to perhaps one-tenth over scale. He didn't so much have a face with a beard as a beard with, peeking over the top in that narrow gap between the moustache and the eyebrows, small remnants of face. He bore down on Vimes in a cloud of leaping bodies, hair and a smell of old carpets.


- 174 -
Vimes was ready for the handshake when it came, but even so had to grimace as his bones were ground together.
'Good of you to come, hey? Heard so much about you!'
But not enough, Vimes thought. He wondered if he'd ever have the use of his hand again. It was still being gripped. The dogs had transferred their attention to him. He was being sniffed.
'Greatest respect for Ankh-Morpork, hey?' said the Baron.
'Er... good,' said Vimes. Blood was getting no further than his wrist.
'Have seat!' the Baron barked. Vimes had been trying to avoid the word, but that was exactly how the man spoke — in short, sharp sentences, every one an exclamation.
He was herded towards a chair. Then the Baron let go of his hand and flung himself on to the huge carpet, the excited dogs piling on top of him.
Serafine made a noise somewhere between a growl and the 'Tch!' of wifely disapproval. Obediently the Baron pushed the dogs aside and flung himself into a chair.
'You'll have to take us as you find us,' said Serafine, smiling with her mouth alone. 'This has always been a very informal household.'
'It's a very nice place,' said Vimes weakly, staring around the enormous room. Trophy heads lined the walls, but at least there were no trolls. No weapons, either. There were no spears, no rusty old swords, not even a broken bow, which was practically against the law of castle furnishing. He stared at the wall again, and then at the carving over the fireplace. And then his gaze travelled down.
One of the dogs, and Vimes had to be clear about this — he was using the term dogs merely because they were indoors and that was a place where the word wolf was not usually encountered — was watching him. He'd never seen such an appraising look on a creature's face. It was weighing him up.
There was something familiar about the pale gold hair that was a sort of mane. In fact it looked quite like Angua, but heavier set. And there was another difference, which was small yet horribly significant. Like Angua, it had this sense of movement stilled; but whereas Angua always looked as if she was poised to flee, this one looked poised to leap.
'The embassy is to your liking? We owned it, you know, before we sold it to Lord V... Ve...'


- 175 -
'Vetinari,' said Vimes, reluctantly taking his eyes off the wolf.
'Of course, your people made a lot of changes,' she went on.
'We've made a few more,' said Vimes, recalling all those patches of shiny woodwork where the hunting trophies had been removed. 'I must say I was really impressed with the bathroo- I'm sorry?'
There had been almost a yelp from the Baron. Serafine was glaring at her husband.
'Yes,' she said sharply, 'I gather interesting things have been done.'
'You're so lucky to have the thermal springs,' said Vimes. And this was diplomacy too, he thought, when you let your mouth chatter away while you watched people's eyes. It's just like being a copper. 'Sybil wants to go to take the waters at Bad Heisses Bad—'
Behind him he heard a faint growl from the Baron and saw the look of annoyance flash across Serafine's face.
'I'm saying the wrong thing?' he said innocently.
'My-husband is a little unwell at the moment,' said Serafine, in the special wife voice which Vimes recognized as meaning 'He think's he's fine right now but just you wait until I get him alone.'
'I suppose I'd better present my credentials,' said Vimes, pulling out the letter.
Serafine reached across quickly and took it from his hand. 'I shall read it,' she said, smiling sweetly. 'Of course, it's a mere formality. Everyone's heard of Commander Vimes. I mean no offence, of course, but we were a little surprised when the Patrician—'
'Lord Vetinari,' said Vimes helpfully, putting a slight stress on the first syllable and hearing the growl on cue.
'Yes, indeed... said that you would be coming. We were expecting one of the more... experienced... diplomats.'
'Oh, I can hand around the thin cucumber sandwiches like anything,' said Vimes. 'And if you want little golden balls of chocolate piled up in a heap, I'm your man.'
She gave him a slow, blank stare. 'Your pardon, your excellency,' she said. 'Morporkian is not my first language and I fear we may have inadvertently misled one another. I gather that you are, in real life, a policeman?'
'In real life, yes,' said Vimes.


- 176 -
'We've always been against a police force in Bonk,' said the Baroness. 'We feel it interferes with the liberties of the individual.'
'Well, I have certainly heard that argument advanced,' said Vimes. 'Of course, it depends on whether the individual you are thinking of is yourself or the one climbing out of the bathroom' — he noted the grimace —'window with the family silver in a sack.'
'Happily, security has never been a problem for us,' said Serafine.
'I'm not surprised,' said Vimes. 'I mean... because of all the walls and gates and things.'
'I do hope you will bring Sybil to the reception this evening. But I see that we are keeping you, and I know you must have much to do. Igor will show you out.'
'Yeth, mithtreth,' said Igor, behind Vimes.
Vimes could feel the river of fury building up behind the levees of his mind. 'I'll tell Sergeant Angua you asked after her,' he said, standing up.
'Indeed,' said Serafine.
'But right now I'm looking forward to a really relaxing bath,' said Vimes, and watched with satisfaction as both the Baron and his wife flinched. 'Good day to you.'
Cheery marched along beside him across the hallway.
'Don't say a word until we're out of here,' hissed Vimes.
'Sir?'
'Because I want to get out of here,' said Vimes.
Several of the dogs had followed them out.
They weren't growling, they hadn't bared their teeth, but they were carrying themselves with rather more purpose than Vimes had come to associate with groin-sniffers in general.
'I've put the parthel in the coach, your exthellenthy' said Igor, opening the coach door and knuckling his forehead.
'I'll be sure to give it to Igor,' said Vimes.
'Oh, not to Igor, thur. Thith ith for Igor.'
'Oh, right.'


- 177 -
Vimes looked out of the windows as the horses trotted away. The golden-haired wolf had come to the steps and was watching him leave.
He sat back as the coach rumbled out of the castle and closed his eyes. Cheery was wise enough to remain silent.
'No weapons on the walls, did you notice?' he said, after a while. His eyes were still shut, as if he was looking at a picture on the back of them. 'Most castles like that have the things hanging all over the place.'
'Well, they are werewolves, sir.'
'Does Angua ever talk about her parents?'
'No, sir.'
'They didn't want to talk about her, that's certain.' Vimes opened his eyes. 'Dwarfs?' he said. 'I've always got on with dwarfs. And werewolves... well, never had a problem with werewolves. So why is the only person who hasn't tried to blow me out this morning is the blood-sucking vampire?'
'I don't know, sir.'
'Big fireplace they had.'
'Werewolves like to sleep in front of the fire at night, sir,' said Cheery.
'The Baron certainly didn't seem comfortable in a chair, I spotted that. And what was the motto carved into that great big mantelpiece? "Homini..."'
"'Homo Homini Lupus", sir,' said Cheery. 'It means "Every man is a wolf to another man".'
'Hah! Why haven't I promoted you, Cheery?'
'Because I get embarrassed about shouting at other people, sir. Sir, did you notice the strange thing about the trophies they had on the wall?'
Vimes shut his eyes again. 'Stag, bears, some kind of mountain lion... What're you asking me, corporal?'
'And did you notice something just below them?'
'Let's see... I think there was just space below them.'
'Yes, sir. With three hooks in it. You could just make them out.'
Vimes hesitated. 'Do you mean,' he said carefully, 'three hooks that might have had trophies hanging from them until they were removed?'


- 178 -
'Very much that sort of hook, sir, yes. Only perhaps the heads haven't been hung up yet.'
'Trolls' heads?'
'Who knows, sir?'
The coach entered the town.
'Cheery, have you still got that silver chainmail vest you used to have?'
'Er, no, sir. I stopped wearing it because it seemed a bit disloyal to Angua, sir. Why?'
'Just a passing thought. Oh, ye gods, is that Igor's parcel under the seat?'
'I think so, sir. But look, I know about Igors. If that's a real hand, the original owner hasn't got a use for it, believe me.'
'What? He cuts bits off dead people?'
'Better than live people, sir.'
'You know what I mean!'
'Sir, it's considered good manners, if one of the Igors has helped you, to put it in your will that they can help themselves to any... parts that might help someone else. They never ask for any money. People just carry little cards. They're very respected in Uberwald. Very good men with a scalpel and a needle. It's a kind of vocation, really.'
'But they're covered in scars and stitches!'
'They won't do to anyone else what they're not prepared to try on themselves.'
Vimes decided to explore the full horror of this. It took his mind off the missing trophies. 'Are there any... Igorinas? Igorettes?'
'Well, any Igor is considered a good catch for a young lady...'
'He is?'
'And their daughters tend to be very attractive.'
'Eyes at the same height, that sort of thing?'
'Oh, yes.'


- 179 -
But the door, when it was finally opened in response to impatient knocking, revealed not the switchback features of Igor but the business end of Detritus's crossbow, which was marginally worse.
'It's us, sergeant,' said Vimes.
The crossbow was removed, and the door opened further.
'Sorry, sir, but you said I was to be on guard,' said Detritus.
'There's no need to—'
'Igor's been hurt, sir.'
Igor was sitting in the huge kitchen, a bandage round his head. Lady Sybil was fussing over him.
'I went to look for him a couple of hours ago and there he was, flat on the snow,' she said. She leaned closer to Sam Vimes. 'He doesn't remember very much.'
'Can you recall what you were doing, old chap?' said Vimes, sitting down.
Igor gave him a bleary look. 'Well, thur, I went out to unpack the foodthtuffth from the other coach, and I'd jutht got hold of thomething and then all the lightth went out, thur. I reckon I mutht've thlipped.'
'Or someone hit you?'
Igor shrugged. For a moment both of his shoulders were at the same level.
'There's nothing on the coach worth stealing!' said Lady Sybil.
'Not unless someone was dying for a knuckle sandwich,' said Vimes. 'Was anything taken?'
'I checked everyt'ing against der list her ladyship gave me, sir,' said Detritus, meeting Vimes's gaze. 'Dere wasn't anyfing missing, sir.'
'I'll just go and take a look for myself,' said Vimes.
When they were outside he walked over to the coach and looked at the snow around it. The cobbles were visible here and there. Then he looked up at the grating.
'All right, Detritus,' he said. 'Talk to me.'
'Just a feelin', sir,' rumbled the troll. 'I know "fick" is my middle name...'
'I didn't know you had a first name, sergeant.'


- 180 -
'I don't fink dis was one of dem accidents dat happens by accident.'
'He might have fallen off the coach when he was unloading it,' said Vimes.
'An' I might be the Fairy Clinkerbell, sir.'
Vimes was impressed. This was lowtemperature thinking from Detritus.
'Der street doors is open,' said Detritus. 'I reckon Igor disturbed someone who was pinchin' stuff.'
'But you said nothing was missing.'
'Maybe der thief took fright, sir.'
'What, at seeing Igor? Could be...'
Vimes looked at the bags and boxes. Then he looked again. Things had been thrown down any old how. That wasn't how you unpacked a coach, unless you were looking for something in a real hurry. Who'd go to these lengths to steal food?
'Nothing was missing...' He rubbed his chin. 'Who packed the coach, Detritus?'
'Dunno, sir. I fink her ladyship just ordered a lot of stuff.'
'And we left in a bit of a rush, too...' Vimes stopped. Best to leave it there. He had an idea but, well, where was the evidence? You could say: nothing that should have been there was missing, so what must have been taken was something that shouldn't have been there.
No. For now, it was just something to remember.
They walked into the hall, and Vimes's eye fell on a pile of cards on a table by the door.
'Der's been a lot of visitors,' said Detritus.
Vimes took a handful of cards. Some of them had gold edging.
'Dem diplomatics all want you to come for drinky-poos an' stories about chickens,' the troll added helpfully.
'Cocktails, I think you'll find,' said Vimes, reading through the pasteboards. 'Hmm, Klatch... Muntab... Genua... Lancre... Lancre? It's a kingdom you could spit across! They've got an embassy here?'
'No, sir, mostly dey've got a letterbox.'


- 181 -
'Will we all fit in?'
'Dey've rented a house for der coronation, sir.'
Vimes dropped the invitations back on to the table.
'I don't think I can face any of this stuff,' he said. 'A man can only drink so much fruit juice and listen to so many bad jokes. Where's the nearest clacks tower, Detritus?'
'About fifteen miles Hubwards, sir.'
'I'd like to find out what's going on back home. I think that this afternoon Lady Sybil and I will have a nice quiet ride in the country. It'll take her mind off things.'
And then he thought, I'll wait until midnight, see?
And it's still only lunchtime.
In the end Vimes took Igor as driver and guide, and the guards Tantony and the one he would forever think of as Colonesque. Skimmer still hadn't returned from whatever nefarious expedition was occupying his time, and Vimes was damned if he'd leave the embassy unguarded.
Yet another word for diplomat, Vimes mused, was 'spy'. The only difference was that the host government knew who you were. The game was to outwit them, presumably.
The sun was warm, the breeze was cold, the mountain air made every peak look as if Vimes could reach out and touch it. Outside the town snow-covered vineyards and farms clung to slopes that in Ankh-Morpork would be called walls, but after a while the pine forests closed in. Here and there, at a curve in the road, the river was visible far below.
Up on the box Igor was crooning a lament.
'He told me Igors heal very fast,' said Lady Sybil.
'They'd have to.'
'Mister Skimmer said they're very gifted surgeons, Sam.'
'Except cosmetically, perhaps.'
The coach slowed.
'Do you come up here a lot, Igor?' said Vimes.


- 182 -
'Mithter Thleep uthed to have me drive over onthe a week to collect methageth, marthter.'
'I'd have thought it'd be easier to have a pickup tower in Bonk.'
'The counthil are dead againtht it, thur.'
'And you?'
'I am very modern in my outlook, thur.'
The tower loomed quite close now. The first twenty feet or so were of stone with narrow, barred windows. Then there was a broad platform from which the main tower grew. It was a sensible arrangement. An enemy would find it hard to break in or set fire to it, there was enough storage room inside to see out a siege, and the enemy would be aware that the lads inside would have signalled for help thirty seconds after the attack began. The company had money. They were like the coaching agents in that respect. If a tower went out of action, someone would be along to ask expensive questions. There was no law here; the kind of people who'd turn up would be inclined to leave a message to the world that towers were not to be touched.
Everyone should know this, and therefore it was odd to see that the big signal arms were stationary.
The hairs rose on Vimes's neck. 'Stay in the carriage, Sybil,' he said.
'Is there something wrong?'
'I'm not sure,' said Vimes, who was sure. He stepped down and nodded to Igor.
'I'm going to have a look inside,' he said. 'If there is any... trouble, you're to get Lady Sybil back to the embassy, all right?'
Vimes leaned back into the coach and, trying not to look at Sybil, lifted up one of the seats and pulled out the sword he had hidden there.
'Sam!' she said accusingly.
'Sorry, dear. I thought I ought to carry a spare.'
There was a bellpull by the door of the tower. Vimes tugged at it and heard a clang somewhere above.
When nothing else happened he tried the door. It swung open.
'Hello?'
There was silence.


- 183 -
'This is the Wa—' Vimes stopped. It wasn't the Watch, was it? Not out here. The badge didn't work. He was just an inquisitive trespassing bastard.
'Anyone there?'
The room was piled high with sacks, boxes and barrels. A wooden stairway led up to the next floor. Vimes climbed up into a combined bedroom and mess room; there were only two bunks, their covers pulled back.
A chair was on the floor. A meal was on the table, knife and fork laid down carefully. On the stove something had boiled dry in an iron pot. Vimes opened the firebox door, and there was a whoomph as the inrushing air rekindled the charred wood.
And, from above, the chink of metal.
He looked at the ladder and trapdoor to the next floor. Anyone climbing it would be presenting their head at a convenient height for a blade or a boot.
'Tricky, isn't it, your grace?' said someone above him. 'You'd better come up. Mmm, mmhm.'
'Inigo?'
'It's safe enough, your grace. There's only me here. Mmm.'
'That counts as safe, does it?'
Vimes climbed the ladder. Inigo was sitting at a table, leafing through a stack of papers.
'Where's the crew?'
'That, your grace,' said Inigo, 'is one of the mysteries, mmm, mmm.'
'And the others are-?'
Inigo nodded towards the steps leading upwards. 'See for yourself.'
The controls for -the arms had been comprehensively smashed. Laths and bits of wire dangled forlornly from their complex framework.
'Several hours of repair work for skilled men, I'd say,' said Inigo, as Vimes returned.
'What happened here, Inigo?'
'I would say the men who lived here were forced to leave, mmph, mmhm. In some disorder.'


- 184 -
'But it's a fortified tower!'
'So? They have to cut firewood. Oh, the company has rules, and then they put three young men in some lonely tower for weeks at a time and they expect them to act like clockwork people. See the trapdoor up to the controls? That should be locked at all times. Now you, your grace, and myself as well, because we are... are—'
'Bastards?' Vimes supplied.
'Well, yes... mmm... we'd have devised a system that meant the clacks couldn't even be operated unless the trapdoor was shut, wouldn't we?'
'Something like that, yes.'
'And we'd have written into the rules that the presence of any visitor in the tower would, mmhm, be automatically transmitted to the neighbouring towers, too.'
'Probably. That'd be a start.'
'As it is, I suspect that any harmless-looking visitor with a nice fresh apple pie for the lads would be warmly welcomed,' sighed Inigo. 'They do two-month shifts. Nothing to look at but trees, mmm.'
'No blood, not much sign of a struggle,' said Vimes. 'Have you checked outside?'
'There should be a horse in the stable. It's gone. We're more or less on rock here. There's wolf tracks, but there's wolf tracks everywhere around here. And the wind's blown the snow. They've... gone, your grace.'
'Are you sure the men let someone in through the door?' Vimes said. 'Anyone who could land on the platform could be in one of these windows in an instant.'
'A vampire, mmm?'
'It's a thought, isn't it?'
'There's no blood around...'
'It's a shame to waste good food,' said Vimes. 'Think of those poor starving children in Muntab. What are these?'
He pulled a box from under the lower bunk. Inside it were several tubes, about a foot long, open at one end.
"Badger & Normal, Ankh-Morpork',' he read aloud. "'Mortar Flare (Red). Light Fuse. Do Not Place In Mouth." It's a firework, Mister Skimmer. I've seen them on ships.'


- 185 -
'Ah, there was something...' Inigo leafed through the book on the table. 'They could send up an emergency flare if there was a big problem. Yes, the tower nearest Ankh-Morpork will send out a couple of men, and a bigger squad comes up from the depot down on the plains. They take a downed tower very seriously.'
'Yes, well, it could cost them money,' said Vimes, peering into the mouth of the mortar. 'We need this tower working, Inigo. I don't like being stuck out here.'
'The roads aren't too bad yet. They could be here by tomorrow evening. I'm sure you shouldn't do that, sir!'
Vimes had pulled the mortar out of its tube. He looked at Inigo quizzically.
'They won't go off until you light the charge in the base,' he said. 'They're safe. And they'd make a stupid weapon, 'cos you can't aim them worth a damn and they're only made of cardboard in any case. Come on, let's get it on to the roof.'
'Not until dark, your grace, mmm. That way two or three towers on each side will see it, not just the closest.'
'But if the closest towers are watching they'll certainly see—'
'We don't know that there is anyone there to watch, sir. Perhaps what happened here has happened there too? Mmm?'
'Good grief! You don't think—'
'No, I don't think, sir, I'm a civil servant. I advise other people, mmm, mmph. Then they think. My advice is that an hour or two won't hurt, sir. My advice is that you return with Lady Sybil now, sir. I will send up a flare as soon as it's dark and make my way back to the embassy.'
'Hold on, I am Commander in—'
'Not here, your grace. Remember? Here you are a civilian in the way, mmhm, mmm. I'll be safe enough—'
'The crew weren't.'
'They weren't me, mmhm, mmhm. For the sake of Lady Sybil, your grace, I advise you to leave now.'
Vimes hesitated, hating the fact that Inigo was not only right but was, despite his claim to mindlessness, doing the thinking that he should be doing. He was supposed to be out for an afternoon's drive with his wife, for heaven's sake.
'Well, all right. Just one thing, though. Why are you here?'


- 186 -
'The last time Sleeps was seen he was on his way up here with a message.'
'Ah. And am I right in thinking that your Mister Sleeps was not exactly the kind of diplomat that hands around the cucumber sandwiches?'
Inigo smiled thinly. 'That's right, sir. He was... the other sort. Mmm.'
'Your sort.'
'Mmm. And now go, your grace. The sun will be setting soon. Mmm, mmm.'
Corporal Nobbs, President and Convenor of the Guild of Watchmen, surveyed his troops.
'All right, one more time,' he said. 'Whadda we want?'
The strike meeting had been going on for some time, and it had been going on in a bar. The watchmen were already a little forgetful.
Constable Ping raised his hand. 'Er... a proper grievance procedure, a complaints committee, an overhaul of the promotion procedures... er...'
'-better crockery in the canteen,' someone supplied.
'-freedom from unwarranted accusations of sucrose theft—' said someone else.
'-no more than seven days straight on nights—'
'-an increase in the boots allowance—'
'-at least three afternoons off for grandmothers' funerals per year—'
'-not having to pay for our own pigeon feed—'
'-another drink.' This last demand met with general approval.
Constable Shoe got to his feet. He was still, in his spare time, organizer of the Campaign for Dead Rights, and he knew how this sort of thing went.
'No, no, no, no, no,' he said. 'You've got to get it a lot simpler than that. It's got to have bounce. And rhythm. Like "Whadda we want? Dum-deedum-dee. When do we want it? Now!" See? You need one simple demand. Let's try it again. Whadda we want?'
The watchmen looked at one another, no one quite wanting to be the first.
'Another drink?' someone volunteered.
'Yeah!' said someone at the back. 'When do we want it? NOW!'


- 187 -
'Well, that one seems to have worked,' said Nobby as the policemen crowded round the bar. 'What else are we going to need, Reg?'
'Signs for the picket,' said Constable Shoe.
'We've got to picket?'
'Oh, yes.'
'In that case,' said Nobby firmly, 'we've got to have a big metal drum to burn old scrap wood in, while we're pickin' at it.'
'Why?' said Reg.
'You got to stand around warmin' your hands over a big drum,' said Nobby. 'That's how people know you're an official picket and not a bunch of bums.'
'But we are a bunch of bums, Nobby. People think we are, anyway.'
'All right, but let's be warm ones.'
The sun was a finger's width above the Rim when Vimes's coach set off from the tower. Igor whipped the horses up. Vimes looked out of the window at the road's edge, a few feet away and several hundred feet above the river.
'Why so fast?' he shouted.
'Got to be home by thunthet!' Igor shouted. 'It'th tradithional.'
The big red sun was moving through bars of cloud.
'Oh, let him, dear, if it gives the poor soul pleasure,' said Lady Sybil, shutting the window. 'Now, Sam, what happened at the tower?'
'I don't really want to worry you, Sybil.'
'Well, now that you've got me really worried, you may as well tell me. All right?'
Vimes gave in and explained the little that he knew.
'Someone's killed them?'
'Possibly.'
'The same people that ambushed us back in that gorge?'
'I don't think so.'
'This isn't turning out to be much of a holiday Sam.'


- 188 -
'It's being unable to do anything that makes me sick,' said Vimes. 'Back in Ankh-Morpork... well, I'd have leads, contacts, some kind of a map. Everyone here is, well, hiding something, I think. The new king thinks I'm a fool, the werewolves treated me as if I was something the cat dragged in. The only person who's been halfway civil was a vampire!'
'Not the cat,' said Sybil.
'What?' said Vimes, mystified.
'Werewolves hate cats,' said Sybil. 'I distinctly remember that. Definitely not cat people.'
'Hah. No. Dog people. They don't like words like bath or vet, either. I reckon if you threw a stick at the Baron he'd leap out of his chair to catch it—'
'I suppose I ought to tell you about the carpets,' said Sybil, as the coach rocked around a corner.
'What, isn't he house-trained?'
'I meant the carpets in the embassy. You know I said I'd measure up for them? Well, the measurements aren't right on the first floor...'
'I don't want to sound impatient, dear, but is this a carpet moment?'
'Sam?'
'Yes, dear?'
'Just stop thinking like a husband and start listening like a... a copper, will you?'
Vimes marched into the embassy and summoned Detritus and Cheery. 'You two are coming with us to the ball tonight,' he said. 'It'll be posh. Have you got anything to wear apart from your uniform, sergeant?'
'No, sir.'
'Well, go and see Igor. There's a good man with a needle if I ever saw one. How about you, Cheery?'
'I do, er, have a gown,' said Cheery, looking down shyly.
'You do?'
'Yes, sir.'
'Oh. Well. Good. I'm putting the two of you on the embassy staff, too. Cheery, you're... you're Military Attache.'


- 189 -
'Oh,' said Detritus, disappointed.
'And, Detritus, you're Cultural Attache.'
The troll brightened up considerably. 'You will not regret dis, sir!'
'I'm sure I won't,' said Vimes. 'Right now, I'd like you to come with me.'
'Is dis a cultural matter, sir?'
'Broadly. Perhaps.'
Vimes led the troll and Sybil up the stairs and into the office, where he stopped in front of a wall.
'This one?' he said.
'Yes,' said his wife. 'It's hard to notice until you measure the rooms, but that wall really is rather thick—'
Vimes ran his hands along the panelling, looking for anything that might go 'click'. Then he stood back.
'Give me your crossbow, sergeant.'
'Here we are, sir.'
Vimes staggered under its weight but managed to get it pointed at the wall.
'Is this wise, Sam?' said Sybil.
Vimes stood back to take aim, and the floorboard moved under his heel. A panel in the wall swung gently.
'You scared der hell out of it, sir,' said Detritus loyally.
Vimes carefully handed the crossbow back and tried to look as though he'd meant things to happen this way.
He'd expected a secret passage. But this was a tiny workroom. There were jars on shelves labelled 'New Suet Strata, Area 21', 'Grade A Fat, the Big Hole'. There were lumps of crumbling rock, with neat cardboard tags attached to them saying things like 'Level #3, Shaft 9, Double-Pick Mine'.
There was a set of drawers. One of them was full of make-up, including a selection of moustaches.
Wordlessly, Vimes opened one of a stack of notebooks. The first pages had a pencil-drawn streetmap of Bonk, with red lines threading through it.


- 190 -
'Good grief, look at this,' he breathed, flicking onwards. 'Maps. Drawings. There's pages of stuff about the assaying of fat deposits. Huh, says here "The new suets, while initially promising, are now suspected of having high levels of BCBs and are likely to be soon exhausted." And here it says "A werewolf putsch is clearly planned in the chaos following the loss of the Scone... K. reports that many of the younger werewolves now follow W., who has changed the nature of the game..." This stuff... this stuff is spying. I wondered how Vetinari always seems to know so much!'
'Did you think it came to him in dreams, dear?'
'But there's loads of details here... notes about people, lots of figures about dwarf mining production, political rumours... I didn't know we did this sort of thing!'
'You use spies all the time, dear,' said Sybil.
'I do not!'
'Well, what about people like Foul Ole Ron and No Way Jose and Cumbling Michael?'
'That is not spying, that is not spying! That's just "information received". We couldn't do the job if we didn't know what's happening on the street!'
'Well, perhaps Havelock just thinks in terms of... a bigger street, dear.'
'There's loads more of this muck. Look. Sketches, more bits of ore... What the hell's this?'
It was oblong, and about the size of a cigarette packet. There was a round glass disc on one face, and a couple of levers on one side.
Vimes pushed one of them. A tiny hatch opened and the smallest head that he'd ever seen that could speak said, ''s?'
'I know dat!' said Detritus. 'Days a nano-imp! Dey cost over a hundred dollars! Dey're really small!'
'No one's bloody fed me for a fortnight!' the imp squeaked.
'It's an iconograph small enough to fit in a pocket,' said Vimes. 'Something for a spy... It's as bad as Inigo's damn one-shot crossbow. And look...'
Steps led downwards. He took them carefully and swung open the little door at the end.
Wet heat slapped into him.


- 191 -
'Pass me down a candle, will you, dear?' he said. And by its light he looked out into a long dank tunnel. Crusted pipes, leaking steam at every joint, lined the far wall.
'A way in and out where no one will see him, too,' he said. 'What a dirty world we live in...'
The clouds had covered the sky and the wind was whipping thick snowflakes around the tower when Inigo finished setting up the red mortar on the platform below the big square shutters.
He lit a couple of matches but the wind streamed them out before he could even cup his hands around them.
'Damn. Mhm, mmm.'
He slid down the ladder and into the warmth of the tower. It'd be better to spend the night here, he thought, as he rummaged in drawers. The night didn't hold many terrors for him, but this storm had the feel of another big snow and the mountain roads would soon be treacherous.
Finally an idea struck him, and he opened the door of the stove and pulled out a smouldering log with the tongs.
It burst into flame when he carried it out at the top of the tower, and he directed it into the touch hole at the base of the tube.
The mortar fired with a 'phut' that was lost in the wind. The flare itself tumbled invisibly up into the snow and then, a few seconds later, exploded a hundred feet overhead, casting a brief red glare over the forests.
Inigo had just got back into the room when there was a knock at the door, down on the ground.
He paused. There was a window and hatch at this level; the designers of the tower had at least known that it would be a good idea to be able to look down and see who was a-knocking.
There was no one there.
When he'd climbed back into the room the knock came again.
He hadn't locked the door after Vimes went. A bit late to regret that now, he realized. But Inigo Skimmer had trained in an academy that made the School of Hard Knocks look like a sandpit.
He lit a candle and crept down the ladder in the darkness, shadows fleeing and dancing among the stacks of provisions.


- 192 -
With the candle set down on a box, he pulled the one-shot crossbow from inside his coat and, with an effort, cocked it against the wall. Then he flexed his left arm and felt the palm dagger ease itself into position.
He clicked his heels in a certain way and sensed the tiny blades slide out from the toes.
And Inigo settled down to wait.
Behind him something blew the candle out.
As he turned, and the crossbow's one bolt whirred into darkness, and the palm dagger scythed at nothing, it occurred to Inigo Skimmer that you could knock on either side of a door.
They really were very clever...
'Mhm, m—'
Cheery twirled, or at least attempted to. It was not a movement that came naturally to dwarfs.
'You look very... nice,' said Lady Sybil. 'It goes all the way to the ground, too. I don't think anyone could possibly complain.'
Unless they were remotely fashion conscious, she had to admit. The problem was that the... well, she had to think of them as the new dwarf women, hadn't quite settled on a look.
Lady Sybil herself usually wore ballgowns of a light blue, a colour often chosen by ladies of a certain age and girth to combine the maximum of quiet style with the minimum of visibility. But dwarf girls had heard about sequins. They seemed to have decided in their bones that if they were going to overturn thousands of years of subterranean tradition they weren't going to go through all that for no damn twinset and pearls.
'And red is good,' said Lady Sybil sincerely. 'Red is a very nice colour. It's a nice red dress. Er. And the feathers. Er. The bag to carry your axe, er—'
'Not glittery enough?' said Cheery.
'No! No... if I was going to carry a large axe on my back to a diplomatic function I think I'd want it glittery too. Er. It is such a very large axe, of course,' she finished lamely.
'You think perhaps a smaller one might be better? For evening wear?'
'That would be a start, yes.'


- 193 -
'Perhaps with a few rubies set in the handle?'
'Yes,' said Lady Sybil weakly. 'Why not, after all?'
'What about me, ladyship?' Detritus rumbled.
Igor had certainly risen to the occasion, applying to a number of suits found in the embassy wardrobes the same pioneering surgical skills that he used on unfortunate loggers and other people who may have strayed too close to a bandsaw. It had taken him just ninety minutes to construct something around Detritus. It was definitely evening dress. You couldn't get away with it in daylight. The troll looked like a wall with a bow tie.
'How does it all feel?' said Lady Sybil, playing for safety.
'It are rather tight around der- What's dis bit called?'
'I really have no idea,' said Lady Sybil.
'It makes me lurch a bit,' said Detritus. 'But I feel very diplomatic.'
'Not the crossbow, however,' said Lady Sybil.
'She got her axe,' said Detritus accusingly.
'Dwarf axes are accepted as a cultural weapon,' said Lady Sybil. 'I don't know the etiquette here, but I suppose you could get away with a club.' After all, she added to herself, it's not as though anyone would try to take it off you.
'Der crossbow ain't cultural?'
'I'm afraid not.'
'I could put, like, glitter on it.'
'Not enough, I'm afraid- Oh, Sam...'
'Yes, dear?' said Vimes, coming down the stairs.
'That's just your Watch dress uniforml What about your ducal regalia?'
'Can't find it anywhere,' said Vimes innocently. 'I think the bag must have fallen off the coach in the pass, dear. But I've got a helmet with feathers in it and Igor's buffed up the breastplate until he could see his face in it, although I'm not sure why.' He quailed at her expression. 'Duke is a military term, dear. No soldier would ever go to war in tights. Not if he thought he might be taken prisoner.'
'I find this highly suspicious, Sam.'


- 194 -
'Detritus will back me up on this,' said Vimes.
'Days right, sir,' the troll rumbled. 'You distinctly said to say dat '
'Anyway, we'd better be goi- Good grief, is that Cheery?'
'Yes, sir,' said Cheery nervously.
Well, thought Vimes, she comes from a family where people go off in strange clothes to face explosions far away from the sun.
'Very nice,' he said.
Lamps were lit all along the tunnel to what Vimes had come to think of as Downtown Bonk. Dwarf guards waved the coach through after a mere glance at the Ankh-Morpork crest. The ones around the giant elevator were more uncertain. But Sam Vimes had learned a lot from watching Lady Sybil. She didn't mean to act like that, but she'd been born to it, into a class that had always behaved this way: you went through the world as if there was no possibility that anyone would stop you or question you, and most of the time that's exactly what didn't happen.
There were others in the elevator as it rumbled downwards. Mostly they were diplomats that Vimes didn't recognize, but there was also, now, in a roped-off corner, a quartet of dwarf musicians playing pleasant yet slightly annoying music that ate its way into Vimes's head as the interminable descent went on.
When the doors opened he heard Sybil gasp.
'I thought you said it was like a starry night down here, Sam!'
'Er, they've certainly turned the wick up...'
Candles by the thousand burned in brackets all around the walls of the huge cavern, but it was the chandeliers that caught the eye. There were scores of them, each at least four storeys high. Vimes, always ready to look for the wires behind the smoke and mirrors, made out the dwarfs working inside the gantries and the baskets of fresh candles being lowered through holes in the ceiling. If  wasn't a myth, at least one whole toe must be being burned tonight.
'Your grace!' Dee was advancing through the crowds.
'Ah, Ideas Taster,' said Vimes as the dwarf approached, 'do allow me to introduce you to the Duchess of Ankh... Lady Sybil.'
'Uh... er... yes... indeed... so delighted to make your acquaintance,' Dee- murmured, caught off guard by the charm offensive. 'But, er...'


- 195 -
Sybil had picked up the code. Vimes loathed the word 'Duchess', so if he was using it then he wanted her to out-dutch everyone. She enveloped Dee's pointy head in delighted Duchessness.
'Mister Dee, Sam has told me so much about you!' she trilled. 'I understand you're quite the right-hand man—'
'-dwarf—' hissed Vimes.
'-dwarf to his majesty! Please, you must tell me how you have achieved such a delightful lighting effect here!'
'Er, lots of candles,' Dee muttered, glaring at Vimes.
'I think Dee wishes to discuss some political matters with me, dear,' said Vimes smoothly, putting his hand on the dwarf's shoulder. 'If you'll just take the others down, I'll join you shortly, I'm sure.' And he knew that no power in the world was going to prevent Sybil sweeping on down to the reception. That woman could sweep. Things stayed swept after she'd gone past.
'You brought a troll, you brought a troll!' muttered Dee.
'And he's an Ankh-Morpork citizen, remember,' said Vimes. 'Covered by diplomatic immunity and a rather bad suit.'
'Even so—'
'There is no "even so",' said Vimes.
'We are at war with the trolls!'
'Well, that's what diplomacy is all about, isn't it?' said Vimes. 'A way to stop being at war? Anyway, I understand it's been going on for five hundred years, so obviously no one is trying very hard.'
'There will be complaints at the very highest level!'
Vimes sighed. 'More?' he said.
'Some are saying Ankh-Morpork is deliberately flaunting its wickedness before the King!'
'The King?' said Vimes pleasantly. 'He's not exactly King yet, is he? Not until the coronation, which involves a certain... object...'
'Yes, but of course that is a mere formality.'


- 196 -
Vimes moved closer. 'But it isn't, is it?' he said quietly. 'It is the thing and the whole of the thing. Without the magic, there is no king. Just someone like you, unaccountably giving orders.'
'Someone called Vimes teaches me about royalty?' said Dee miserably.
'And without the thing, all the bets are off,' said Vimes. 'There will be a war. Explosions underground.'
There was a tinny little- sound as he took out his watch and opened it. 'My word, it's midnight,' he said.
'Follow me,' Dee muttered.
'Am I being taken to see something?' said Vimes.
'No, your excellency. You are being taken to see where something is not.'
'Ah. Then I want to bring Corporal Littlebottom.'
'That? Absolutely not! That would be a desecration of—'
'No, it wouldn't,' said Vimes. 'And the reason is, she won't come with us because we're not going, are we? You're certainly not taking the representative of a potentially hostile power into your confidence and revealing that your house of cards is missing a card on the bottom layer, are you? Of course not. We are not having this conversation. For the next hour or so we'll be nibbling titbits in this room. I haven't even just said this, and you didn't hear me. But Corporal Littlebottom is the best scene-of-crime officer I've got, and so I want her to come along with us.'
'You've made your point, your excellency. Graphically, as always. Fetch her, then.'
Vimes found Cheery standing back to back, or at least back to knees, with Detritus. They were surrounded by a ring of the curious. Whenever Detritus raised his hand to sip his drink the nearby dwarfs jumped back hurriedly.
'Where are we going, sir?'
'Nowhere.'
'Ah. That sort of place.'
'But things are looking up,' said Vimes. 'Dee has discovered a new pronoun, even if he does spit it.'


- 197 -
'Sam!' said Lady Sybil, advancing through the throng, 'they're going to perform Bloodaxe and Ironhammer! Isn't that wonderful?'
'Er...'
'It's an opera, sir,' Cheery whispered. 'Part of the Koboldean Cycle. It's history. Every dwarf knows it by heart. It's about how we got laws, and kings... and the Scone, sir.'
'I sang the part of Ironhammer when we did it at finishing school,' said Lady Sybil. 'Not the full five-week version, of course. It'll be marvellous to see it done here. It's really one of the great romances of history.'
'Romances?' said Vimes. 'Like... a love story?'
'Yes. Of course.'
'Bloodaxe and Ironhammer were both... er... weren't both...' Vimes began.
'They were both dwarfs, sir,' said Cheery.
'Ah. Of course.' Vimes gave up. All dwarfs were dwarfs. If you tried to understand their world from a human point of view it all went wrong. 'Do, er, enjoy it, dear. I've got to... The King wants me to... I'll just be somewhere else for a while. Politics...'
He hurried away, with Cheery trailing behind him.
Dee led the way through dark tunnels. When the opera began it was a whisper far away, like the sea in an ancient shell.
Eventually they stopped at the edge of a canal, its waters lapping at the darkness. A small boat was tethered there, with a waiting guard. Dee urged them into it.
'It is important that you understand what you are seeing, your grace,' said Dee.
'Practically nothing,' said Vimes. 'And I thought I had good night vision.'
There was a clink in the gloom, and then a lamp was lit. The guard was punting the boat under an arch and into a small lake. Apart from the tunnel entrance, the walls rose up sheer.
'Are we at the bottom of a well?' said Vimes.
'That is quite a good way of describing it.' Dee fished under his seat. He produced a curved metal horn and blew one note which echoed up the rock walls.


- 198 -
After a few seconds another note floated down from the top. There was a clanking, as of heavy, ancient chains.
'This is quite a short lift compared to some up in the mountains,' said Dee, as an iron plate ground across the entrance, sealing it. 'There's one half a mile high that will take a string of barges.'
Water boiled beside the boat. Vimes saw the walls begin to sink.
'This is the only way to the Scone,' said Dee behind him.
Now the boat was rocking in the bubbling water and the walls were blurred.
'Water is diverted into reservoirs up near the peaks. Then it is simply a matter of opening and closing sluices, you see?'
'Yes,' mumbled Vimes, experiencing vertigo and seasickness in one tight green package.
The walls slowed. The boat stopped shaking. The water lifted them smoothly over the lip of the well and into a little channel, where there was a dock.
'Any guards below?' Vimes managed, stepping out on to the blessedly solid stone.
'There are usually four,' said Dee. 'For tonight I... arranged matters. The guards understand. No one is proud of this. I must tell you, I disapprove most strongly of this enterprise.'
Vimes looked around the new cave. A couple of dwarfs were standing on a lip of stone that overlooked what was now a placid pool. By the look of it, they were the ones who operated the machinery.
'Shall we proceed?' said the dwarf.
There was a passage leading off the cave, which rapidly narrowed. Vimes had to bend almost double along one length. At one point metal plates clanked under his feet, and he felt them shift slightly. Then he was standing almost upright again, passing under another arch, and there...
Either the dwarfs had cut into a huge geode or they had with great care lined this small cave with quartz crystals until every surface reflected the light of the two small candles that stood on pillars in the middle of the sandy floor. The effect dazzled even Vimes after the darkness of the tunnels.
'Behold,' said Dee gloomily, 'where the Scone should be.'
A round flat stone, midway between the candles and only a few inches high, clearly held nothing.


- 199 -
Behind it water bubbled up in a natural basin and split into two streams that flowed around the stone and disappeared again into another stone funnel.
'All right,' said Vimes. 'Tell me everything.'
'It was reported missing three days ago,' said Dee. 'Dozy Longfinger found it gone when he went in to replace the candles.'
'And his job is...'
'Captain of the Candles.'
Ah.
'It's a very responsible position.'
'I've seen the chandeliers. And how often does he go in there?'
'He went in there every day.'
'Went?'
'He no longer holds the position.'
'Because he's a prime suspect?' said Vimes.
'Because he's dead.'
'And how did that happen?' said Vimes, slowly and deliberately.
'He... took his own life. We're certain of this because we had to break down the door of his cave. He'd been Captain of the Candles for sixty years. I think he couldn't bear the thought of suspicion falling on him.'
'To me he does sound a likely suspect.'
'He did not steal the Scone. We know that much.'
'But the robes you people wear could hide practically anything. Was he searched?'
'Certainly not! But... I'll demonstrate,' said Dee. He walked off along the narrow, metalfloored corridor. 'Can you see me, your excellency?'
'Yes, of course.'
The floor rattled as Dee came back. 'Now this time I'll carry something... Your helmet, if you please? Just for the demonstration.'
Vimes handed it to him. The Ideas Taster walked back down the corridor. When he was halfway a gong boomed and two metal grilles dropped down out of the


- 200 -
ceiling. A few seconds after that guards appeared at the far grille, peering in suspiciously.
Dee said a few words to them. The faces vanished. After a while the grilles rose slowly.
'The mechanism is complex and quite old, but we keep it in good working order,' he said,
handing Vimes his helmet. 'If you weigh more going out than going in, the guards will want to know why. It's unavoidable, it is still accurate to within a few ounces, and does not violate privacy. The only way to beat it would be to fly. Can thieves fly, your excellency?'
'Depends on which sort,' said Vimes absently. 'Who else goes in there?'
'Once every six days the chamber is inspected by myself and two guards. The last inspection was five days ago.'
'Does anyone else go in there?' said Vimes. He noticed that Cheery had picked up a handful of the off-white sand that formed the floor of the Scone Cave and was letting it run between her fingers.
'Not lately. When the new king is crowned, of course, the Scone will often be brought forth for ceremonial purposes.'
'Do you only get that white sand in here?'
'Yes. Is that important?'
Vimes saw Cheery nod. 'I'm not... sure,' he said. 'Tell me, what intrinsic value has the Scone?'
'Intrinsic? It's priceless!'
'I know it's valuable as a symbol, but what is its value in itself?'
'Priceless!'
'I'm trying to work out why a thief might want to steal it,' said Vimes, as patiently as he could.
Cheery had lifted up the flat round stone and was looking underneath it. Vimes pursed his lips.
'What is... she doing?' said Dee. The pronoun dripped with distaste.
'Corporal Littlebottom is looking for clues,' said Vimes. 'They are what we call signs, which may help us. It's a skill.'


- 201 -
'Would this letter speed your search?' said Dee. 'It has writing on it. That is what we call... signs, which may help you.'
Vimes looked at the proffered paper. It was brown and quite stiff, and covered in runes.
'I, er, can't read those,' he said.
'It's a skill,' said Dee solemnly.
'I can, sir,' said Cheery. 'Allow me?'
She took the paper and read it. 'Er, it appears to be a ransom note, sir. From... the Sons of Agi Hammerthief. They say they have the Scone and will... They say they'll destroy it, sir.'
'Where's the money?' said Vimes.
'They say Rhys must renounce all claim to be Low King,' said Dee. 'There are no other conditions. The note turned up on my desk. But everyone puts paperwork on my desk these days.'
'Who are the Sons of Agi Hammerthief?' said Vimes, looking at Dee. 'And why didn't you tell me about this before?'
'We don't know. It's just a made-up name. Some malcontents, we assume. And I was told you would ask me questions.'
'But this isn't a real crime any more, is it?' said Vimes. 'This is politics. Why can't the King just renounce all claim, get the Scone back, and then say he had his fingers crossed? If it's done under duress—'
'We take our ceremonies seriously, your excellency. If Rhys renounces the throne, he cannot change his mind next day. If he allows the Scone to be destroyed, then the kingship has no legitimacy and there will—'
'-be trouble,' said Vimes. And it'll spread to Ankh-Morpork, he added to himself. At the moment it's only riots.
'Who'll become King if he abdicates?'
'Albrecht Albrechtson, as everyone knows.'
'And that will be trouble, too,' said Vimes. 'Civil war, from what I hear.'
'The King says,' said Dee quietly, 'that he is minded to step down nevertheless. Better any king than chaos. Dwarfs do not like chaos.'
'It's going to be chaos either way, though,' said Vimes.


- 202 -
'There've been rebellions against kings before. Dwarfdom survives. The Crown continues. The lore abides. The Scone remains. There is... a sanity to come back to.'
Oh, my gods, thought Vimes. Thousands of dwarfs die but that's all right if a lump of rock survives. 'I'm not a policeman here. What can I do?'
'This hasn't happened!' shrieked Dee, his nerve cracking. 'But everyone knows that foreigners from Ankh-Morpork do not mind their own business!'
'Ah, you mean... given that you don't want people to know about this... it would look bad if you appeared to be too excited, but you can't be blamed if a stupid flatfoot pokes his nose into things?'
Dee waved his hands in the air. 'This wasn't my idea!'
'Look, the security you've got here would disgrace a children's piggybank. I can think of two or three ways of getting the Scone out of here. What about the secret passage into this room?'
'I know of no secret passage into this room!'
'Oh, good. At least we've ruled out something. Go and wait by the boat. Corporal Littlebottom and I have to talk about some things.'
Dee left reluctantly. Vimes waited until the dwarf was visible in the glow of the candles beyond the weighbridge.
'What a mess,' he said. 'Locked-room mysteries are even worse when they leave the room unlocked.'
'You're thinking that Dozy might have worn bags of sand under his robes, aren't you, sir?' said Cheery.
No, thought Vimes, I wasn't. But now I know how a dwarf would solve this.
'Possibly,' he said aloud. 'Grubby white sand can't be uncommon. You'd add a bit of sand every day, yes? Just enough not to trigger the scales. Finally you've got... How much does the Scone weigh?'
'About sixteen pounds, sir.'
'All right. Dump the sand on the floor, shove the Scone under your robes, and... it might just work.'
'Risky, sir.'


- 203 -
'But no one thinks anyone is really going to try to steal the Scone. Would you try to tell me that four guards sitting in that little guardhouse on a twelve-hour shift will be alert all the time? That's enough for a hand of poker!'
'I suppose they rely on the fact that they know when a boat comes up, sir.'
'Right. Big mistake. And you know what? I bet that when a boat's just gone down that's the time they're least alert. Cheery, if a human could get in here they could get into the Scone Cave. They'd have to be nimble and a good swimmer, but they could do it.'
'The guards on the gates were pretty keen, sir.'
'Well, yes. Guards always are, just after a theft. Smart as foxes and sharp as knives, just in case anyone wonders if it was them who dropped off to sleep at the wrong time. I'm a copper, Cheery. I know how dull guarding can be. Especially when you know that no one is ever going to steal what you're guarding.' He scuffed the sand with his boot.
'They were looking hard at every cart that went in or out this morning. But that was because the Scone had been stolen. It's at times like this you get very official, very efficient and very pointless activity. Don't try to tell me that last week they opened every barrel and prodded every load of hay. Even the stuff coming in? Can you see Dee? Is he looking at me?'
Cheery peered around Vimes.
'No, sir.'
'Good.'
Vimes walked over to the tunnel, pressed his back against a wall, took a deep breath and walked his legs up the opposite wall. Then he eased his way out over the plates of the weighbridge, inched along with feet and shoulderblades and, wincing at every protest from his knees, eventually dropped down. He walked across to Dee, who was talking to the guards.
'How did—'
'Never. mind,' said Vimes. 'Let's just say I'm longer than a dwarf, shall we?'
'Have you solved it?'
'No. But I have an idea.'
'Really? Already?' said Dee. 'And what is that?'


- 204 -
'I'm still working it out,' said Vimes. 'But it's lucky the King told you to ask me, Dee. One thing I have found out is that no dwarf will give you the right answer.'
The opera was near the end as Vimes slipped into the seat beside Sybil. 'Have I missed anything?' he said.
'It's very good. Where have you been?'
'You wouldn't believe me.'
He stared, unseeing, at the stage. A couple of dwarfs were engaged in a very careful mock battle.
All right, then. If it was politics it was... well, politics. There was nothing he could do about politics. So, think about it as a crime...
What was the simple solution? Best to start with the first rule of policing: suspect the victim. Vimes wasn't quite sure who the victim was here, though. So suspect the witness. That was another good rule. That meant the late Dozy. He could have walked out with the Scone days before he 'discovered' the loss. He could have done just about anything. The way the thing was guarded was a joke. Nobby and Colon could have done it better. Much better, he corrected himself, because they had devious little minds and that was what made them coppers. The guards of the Scone were honourable dwarfs, the last people you wanted to entrust with anything. You wanted sneaky people for a job like this.
But it made no sense. He'd be the prime suspect. Vimes wasn't well up on dwarf law, but he figured there was not a huge friendly future in store for a prime suspect, especially if no other solution was forthcoming.
Maybe he'd snapped after sixty years of changing candles? That didn't sound right. Anyone who could put up with a job like that for ten years would probably run in their groove for the rest of eternity. Anyway, Dozy had now gone to the great big goldmine in the sky or deep underground or whatever it was dwarfs believed in. He wasn't going to be answering any questions.
He could solve this, Vimes told himself. Everything he needed was there, if only he asked the right questions and thought the right way.
But his Vimish instincts were trying to tell him something else.
This was a crime — if holding a piece of property to ransom was technically a crime — but it wasn't the crime.
There was another crime here. He knew it in the same way that a fisherman spots the shoal by the ripple on the water.


- 205 -
The fight on stage continued. It was slowed by the need to stop after every gingerly exchanged axe blow for a song, probably about gold.
'Er, what's this all about?' he said.
'It's nearly over,' whispered Sybil. 'They've only performed the bit concerning the baking of the Scone, really, but at least they've included the Ransom Aria. Ironhammer escapes from prison with the help of Skalt, steals the truth that Agi has hidden, conceals it by baking it into the Scone, and persuades the guards around Bloodaxe's camp to let him pass. The dwarfs believe that truth was once a, a thing... a sort of ultimate rare metal, really, and the last bit of it is inside the Scone. And the guards can't resist, because of the sheer power of it. The song is about how love, like truth, will always reveal itself, just as the grain of truth inside the Scone makes the whole thing true. It's actually one of the finest pieces of music in the world. Gold is hardly mentioned at all.'
Vimes stared. He got lost in any song more complex than the sort with titles like 'Where Has All The Custard Gone (Jelly's Just Not The Same)?'
'Bloodaxe and Ironhammer,' he muttered, aware that dwarfs around them were giving him annoyed looks. 'Which one was—'
'Cheery told you. They were both dwarfs,' said Sybil sharply.
'Ah,' said Vimes glumly.
He was always a little out of his depth in these matters. There were men, and there were women. He was clear on that. Sam Vimes was an uncomplicated man when it came to what poets called 'the lists of love'17. In some parts of the Shades, he knew, people adopted a more pick-and-mix approach. Vimes looked upon this as he looked upon a distant country; he'd never been there, and it wasn't his problem. It amazed him what people got up to when they had time on their hands.
He just found it hard to imagine a world without a map. It wasn't that the dwarfs ignored sex, it really didn't seem important to them. If humans thought the same way, his job would be a lot simpler.
There seemed to be a deathbed scene now. It was a little hard for Vimes, with his shaky command of , Ankh-Morpork street dwarfish, to follow what was going on. Someone was dying, and someone else was very sorry about it. Both the main
17 He'd noticed that sex bore some resemblance to cookery: it fascinated people, they sometimes bought books full of complicated recipes and interesting pictures, and sometimes when they were really hungry they created vast banquets in their imagination — but at the end of the day they'd settle quite happily for egg and chips. If it was well done and maybe had a slice of tomato.


- 206 -
singers had beards you could hide a chicken in. They weren't bothering to act, apart from infrequently waving an arm in the direction of the other singer.
But there were sobs all around him, and occasionally the trumpeting of a blown nose. Even Sybil's lower lip was trembling.
It's just a song, he wanted to say. It's not real. Crime and streets and chases... they're real. A song won't get you out of a tight corner. Try waving a large bun at an armed guard in Ankh-Morpork and see how far it gets you...
He shouldered his way through the throng after the performance, which from the humans present had received the usual warm reception that such things always got from people who hadn't really understood what was going on but rather felt that they should have done.
Dee was talking to a black-clad, heavily built young man who looked vaguely familiar to Vimes. Vimes must have looked familiar to him as well because he gave him a nod just short of offensiveness.
'Ah, your grace Vimes,' he said. 'And did you enjoy the opera?'
'Especially the bit about the gold,' said Vimes. 'And you are-?'
The man clicked his heels. 'Wolf von Uberwald!'
Something went 'bing' in Vimes's head. And his eyes picked up details — the slight lengthening of the incisors, the way the blond hair was so thick around the collar
'Angua's brother?' he said.
'Yes, your grace.'
'Wolf the wolf, eh?'
'Thank you, your grace,' said Wolf solemnly. 'That is very funny. Indeed, yes! It is quite some time since I heard that one! Your Ankh-Morpork sense of humour!'
'But you're wearing silver on your... uniform. Those... insignias. Wolf heads biting the lightning...'
Wolf shrugged. 'Ah, the kind of thing a policeman would notice. But they are nickel!'
'I don't recognize the regiment.'
'We are more of a... movement,' said Wolf.


- 207 -
The stance was Angua's, too. It was the poised, fight-or-flight look, as if the whole body was a spring eager to unwind and 'flight' wasn't an option. People in the presence of Angua when she was in a bad mood tended to turn up their collars without quite knowing why. But the eyes were different. They weren't like Angua's. They weren't even like the eyes of a wolf.
No animal had eyes like that, but Vimes saw them occasionally in some of Ankh-Morpork's less salubrious drinking establishments, where if you were lucky you'd get out the door before the drink turned you blind.
Colon called that sort of person a 'bottle covey', Nobby preferred 'soddin' nutter' but whatever the name Vimes recognized a headbutting, eye-gouging, down-and-dirty bastard when he saw one. In a fight you'd have no alternative but to lay him out or cut him down, because otherwise he'd do his very best to kill you. Most bar fighters wouldn't usually go that far, because killing a copper was known to be bad news for the murderer and anyone else who knew him, but your true nutter wouldn't worry about that because, while he was fighting, his brain was somewhere else.
Wolf smiled. 'There is a problem, your grace?'
'What? No. Just... thinking. I feel I've met you before... ?'
'You called on my father this morning.'
'Ah, yes.'
'We don't always change for visitors, your grace,' said Wolf. There was an orange light in his eyes now. Until then Vimes had thought that 'glowing eyes' was just a figure of speech.
'If you'll excuse me, I do need to talk to the Ideas Taster for a moment,' said Vimes. 'Politics.'
Dee followed him into a quiet spot. 'Yes?'
'Did Dozy go to the Scone Cave at the same time every day?'
'I believe so. It depended on his other duties.'
'So he didn't go in at the same time every day. Right. When does the guard change?'
'At each three o'clock.'
'Did he go in before the guards change or afterwards?'
'That would depend on—'


- 208 -
'Oh dear. Don't the guards write anything down?'
Dee stared at Vimes. 'Are you saying he could have gone in twice in one day?'
'Very good. But I'm saying someone might have. A dwarf comes up in a boat alone, carrying a couple of candles. Would the guards take that much interest? And if another dwarf carrying a couple of candles came up an hour or so later, when the new guards were there... well, is there any real risk? Even if our faker was noticed he'd just have to mutter something about... oh, bad candles or something. Damp wicks. Anything.'
Dee looked distant. 'It's still a great risk,' he said at last.
'If our thief was keeping an eye on the guard changes, and knew where the real Dozy was, it'd be worth it, wouldn't it? For the Scone?'
Dee shuddered and then nodded. 'In the morning the guards will be closely questioned,' he said.
'By me.'
'Why?'
'Because I know what kind of questions get answers. We'll set up an office here. We'll find out the movements of everyone and talk to all the guards, Okay? Even the ones on the gates. We'll find out who went in and out.'
'You already think you know something.'
'Let's say some ideas are forming, shall we?'
'I will... see to matters.'
Vimes straightened up and walked back to Lady Sybil, who stood like an island in a sea of dwarfs. She was talking animatedly to several of them who Vimes vaguely recognized as performers in the opera.
'What have you been up to, Sam?' she said.
'Politics, I'm afraid,' said Vimes. 'And trusting my instincts. Can you tell me who's watching. us?'
'Oh, it's that game, is it?' said Sybil. She smiled happily, and in the tones of someone chatting about inconsequential things said, 'Practically everyone. But if I was handing out prizes I'd choose the rather sad lady in the little group just off to your left. She's got fangs, Sam. And pearls, too. They don't exactly accessorize.'
'Can you see Wolfgang?'


- 209 -
'Er, no, not now you come to mention it. That's odd. He was around a moment ago. Have you been upsetting people?'
'I think I may let people upset themselves,' said Vimes.
'Good for you. You do that so well.'
Vimes half turned, like someone just taking in the view. In amongst the human guests the dwarfs moved and clustered. Five or six would come together and talk animatedly. Then one would drift away and join another group. He might be replaced. And sometimes an entire group would spread out like the debris of an explosion, each member heading towards another group.
Vimes got the impression that there was a kind of structure behind all this, some slow, purposeful dance of information. Mineshaft meetings, he thought. Small groups, because there wouldn't be room for more. And you don't talk too loudly. And then when the group decides, every member is an ambassador for that decision. The word spreads out in circles. It's like running a society on formal gossip.
It occurred to him that it was also a way in which two plus two could be debated and weighed and considered and discussed until it became four-and-a-bit, or possibly an egg18.
Occasionally a dwarf would stop and stare before hurrying away.
'We're supposed to go in for supper, dear,' said Sybil, indicating the general drift towards a brightly lit cave.
'Oh dear. Quaffing, do you think? Rats on sticks? Where's Detritus?'
'Over there, talking to the cultural attache from Genua. That's the man with the glazed expression.'
As they got closer Vimes heard Detritus's voice in full expansive explanation:
'-and den der's dis big room wid all seats in it, wid red walls and dem big gold babies climbin' up der pillar, only don't worry, 'cos dey're not real gold babies, dey're only made of plaster or somethin'...' There was a pause as Detritus considered matters. 'An' also I don't reckon it's real gold, neither, 'cos some
18 Vimes had once discussed the Ephebian idea of 'democracy' with Carrot, and had been rather interested in the idea that everyone* had a vote until he found out that while he, Vimes, would have a vote, there was no way in the rules that anyone could prevent Nobby Nobbs from having one as well. Vimes could see the flaw there straight away.
*Apart from the women, children, slaves, idiots and people who weren't really our kind of people.


- 210 -
bugger'd have pinched it if it was... and in front of der stage der's dis big pit where all der musicians sits. And days about it for dat room. In der next room der's all dese marble pillars, an' on der floor dey got red carpeting—'
'Detritus?' said Lady Sybil. 'I do hope you're not monopolizing this gentleman.'
'No, I bin tellin' him all about der culture we got in Ankh-Morpork,' said Detritus airily. 'I know just about every inch of der op'ra house.'
'Yes,' said the cultural attache in a stunned voice. 'And I must say I'm particularly interested in visiting the art gallery and seeing' — he shuddered — "'der picture of dis woman, I don't reckon der artist knew how to do a smile prop'ly, but der frame's got to be worth a bob or two." It sounds like the experience of a lifetime. Good evening to you.'
'You know, I don't fink he knows a lot of culture,' said Detritus as the man strode away.
'Do you think people will miss us if we slip away?' said Vimes, looking around. 'It's been a long day and I want to think about things—'
'Sam, you are the ambassador, and Ankh-Morpork is a world power,' said Sybil. 'We can't just sneak off! People will comment.'
Vimes groaned. So Inigo was right: when Vimes sneezes, Ankh-Morpork blows its nose.
'Your excellency?'
He looked down at two dwarfs.
'The Low King will see you now,' said one of them.
'Er...'
'We will have to be officially presented,' Lady Sybil hissed.
'What, even Detritus?'
'Yes!'
'But he's a troll!' It had seemed amusing at the time.
Vimes was aware of a drift in the crowds across the floor of the huge cave. There was a certain movement to them, a flow in the current of people towards one end of the cave. There was really no option but to join it.
The Low King was on a small throne under one of the chandeliers. There was a metal canopy over it, already encrusted with marvellous stalactites of wax.


- 211 -
Around him, watching the crowd, were four dwarfs, tall for dwarfs, and looking rather menacing in their dark glasses. Each one was holding an axe. They spent all their time staring hard at people.
The King was talking to the Genuan ambassador. Vimes looked sideways at Cheery and Detritus. Suddenly, bringing them here wasn't such a good idea. In his official robes the King looked a lot more... distant, and a lot harder to please.
Hang on, he told himself. They are Ankh-Morpork citizens. They're not doing anything wrong. And then he argued: they're not doing anything wrong in Ankh-Morpork.
The line moved along. Their party was almost in the presence. The armed dwarfs were all watching Detritus now, and holding their axes in a slightly less relaxed way. Detritus appeared not to notice.
'Dis place is even more cult'ral than the op'ra house,' he said, gazing around respectfully. 'Dem chandeliers must weigh a ton.'
He reached up and rubbed his head, and then inspected his fingers.
Vimes glanced up. Something warm, like a buttered raindrop, hit his cheek. As he brushed it away he saw the shadows move...
Things happened with treacle slowness. He saw it as if he was watching himself from a little way away. He saw himself push Cheery and Sybil roughly, heard himself shout something, and watched himself dive towards the King, snatching the dwarf up as an axe clanged into his backplate.
Then he was rolling, with the angry dwarf in his arms, and the chandelier was halfway through its fall, candle flames streaming, and there was Detritus, raising his hands with a calculating look on his face...
There was a moment of stillness and silence as the troll caught the descending mountain of light. And then physics returned, in an exploding cloud of dwarfs, debris, molten wax and tumbling, flaring candles.
Vimes woke up in darkness. He blinked and touched his eyes to make sure that they were open.
Then he sat up and his head thumped against stone, and then there was light, vicious yellow and purple lights, filling his life very suddenly. He lay back until they went away.
He took a personal itinerary. His cloak, helmet, sword and armour had all gone. He was left in his shirt and breeches, and while this place was not freezing it had a clamminess that was already working its way through to his bones.


- 212 -
Right...
He wasn't sure how long it took him to get a feel for the cell, but a feel it was. He moved by inches, waving his arms ahead of him like a man practising a very slow martial art against the darkness.
Even then the senses became unreliable in the total black. He followed the wall carefully, followed another wall, followed a wall which yielded, under his fingertips, the outline of a small door with a handle, and found the wall which had the stone slab against it on which he'd awoken.
What made this all the harder was having to do it with his head sunk against his chest. Vimes
wasn't a very tall man. If he had been, he'd probably have cracked his skull when he woke up.
Without any other aids to rely on, he walked the length of the walls using his copper's pace. He knew exactly how long it took him, swinging his legs easily, to walk across the Brass Bridge back home. A little bit of muzzy mental arithmetic was needed, but eventually he decided that the room was ten feet square.
One thing that Vimes did not do was shout 'Help! Help!' He was in a cell. Someone had put him in a cell. It was reasonable to assume, therefore, that whoever had done this wasn't interested in his opinions.
He groped his way to the stone slab again and lay down. As he did so something rattled.
His patted his pockets and brought out what felt and sounded very much like a box of matches. There were only three left.
So... resources: the clothes he stood up in and a few matches. Now to work out what the hell was going on.
He remembered seeing the chandelier. He thought he remembered seeing Detritus actually catch the thing. And there had been a lot of screaming and shouting and running around, while in his arms the King had sworn at Vimes as only a dwarf could swear. Then someone had hit him.
There was also an ache across his back where an axe had been turned aside by his armour. He felt a twitch of national pride at that thought. Ankh-Morpork armour had stood up to the blow! Admittedly it was probably made in
Ankh-Morpork by dwarfs from Uberwald, using steel smelted from Uberwald iron, but it damn well was Ankh-Morpork armour, just the same.


- 213 -
There was a pillow on the slab, made in Uberwald. As Vimes turned his head the pillow went, very faintly, clink. This was a sound he didn't associate with feathers.
In the darkness he picked up the sack and, after resorting to his teeth, managed to rip a hole in the heavy material.
If what he drew out had ever been part of a bird, it wasn't one Vimes would like to meet. It felt very much like Inigo's one-shot. A finger inserted very gingerly into the end told Vimes that it was loaded, too.
Just one shot, he remembered. But it was one people didn't know you had... On the other hand, the Tooth Fairy probably wasn't responsible for putting it in the pillow, unless she'd been having to face some particularly difficult children lately.
He slipped it back into the bag when he became aware of a light. It was the faintest glow, showing that the door contained a barred window and that there were shadowy figures on the other side of it.
'Are you awake, your grace? This is very unfortunate.'
'Dee?'
'Yes.'
'And you've come to tell me this has all been some terrible mistake?'
'Alas, no. I am convinced of your innocence, of course.'
'Really? Me too,' growled Vimes. 'In fact I'm so convinced of my innocence I don't even know what it is I'm innocent of! Let me out or—'
'- or you will stay in, I am afraid,' said Dee. 'It is a very strong door. You are not in AnkhMorpork, your grace. I will of course communicate your predicament to your Lord Vetinari as soon as possible, but I understand that the message tower has been badly damaged—'
'My predicament is that you've locked me up! Why? I saved your king, didn't I?'
'There is... conflict.'
'Someone let that chandelier down!'
'Yes, indeed. A member of your staff, it appears.'
'You know that can't be true! Detritus and Littlebottom were with me when—'
'Mister Skimmer was on your staff?'
'He... Yes, but... I... he wouldn't—'


- 214 -
'I believe you have such a thing in AnkhMorpork as the Guild of Assassins?' said Dee calmly. 'Correct me if I am wrong.'
'He was up at the tower!'
'The damaged tower?'
'It was damaged before he—' Vimes stopped. 'Why would he smash up one of the towers?'
'I did not say he would,' said Dee. The flat calm was still there. 'And then, your grace, it has been suggested that you gave a signal just before the thing came down...'
'What?'
'A hand to the cheek, or something. It has been suggested that you anticipated the event.'
'The thing was swaying! Look, let me talk to Skimmer!'
'Do you have supernatural powers, your grace?'
Vimes hesitated. 'He's dead?'
'We believe he became entangled in the winch mechanism in the process of releasing the chandelier. Three dwarfs were dead around him.'
'He wouldn't—' Vimes stopped again. Of course he wouldn't. It's just that he's a member of this Guild we have, and you certainly know that, don't you-
Dee must have seen his expression. 'Quite so, quite so. Everything will be investigated thoroughly. The innocent have nothing to fear.'
The news that they have nothing to fear is guaranteed to strike terror into the hearts of innocents everywhere.
'What have you done with Sybil?'
'Done, your grace? Why nothing. We are not barbarians. We have heard nothing but good reports of your wife. She is upset, of course.'
Vimes groaned. 'And Detritus and Littlebottom?'
'Well, of course they were under your command, your grace. And one is a troll and the other is... dangerously different. And that is why, and precisely for that reason, they are under house arrest in your own embassy. We do respect the traditions of diplomacy and we will not have it said that we have acted out of malice.' Dee sighed. 'And then, of course, there is the other matter—'


- 215 -
'Are you going to accuse me of stealing the Scone, too?'
'You laid hands on the King.'
Vimes stared. 'Huh? A ton of candlestick was about to fall on him!'
'This has been pointed out—'
'And I'm imprisoned for saving him from an assassination attempt I planned?'
'Are you?'
'No! Look, the thing was coming down, what else should I have done? Tugged at the carpet and tried to drag him away?'
'Yes, yes, I understand. But precedent in this area is very clear. In 1345, when the king at the time fell into a lake, not one member of his staff dared touch him because of the ruling, and the subsequent finding was that they had acted correctly. It is forbidden to touch the King. I have of course explained to the conclave that this is not the Ankh-Morpork way, but this is not Ankh-Morpork.'
'I don't need everyone reminding me about that!'
'You will remain... our guest while investigations continue. Food and drink will be brought to you.'
'And light?'
'Of course. Excuse our lack of consideration. Stand back from the door, please. The guards with me are armed and they are... uncomplicated people.'
The grille on the door was swung back. A glowing cage was put on the ledge.
'What's this? A sick glow-worm?'
'It is a kind of beetle, yes. You'll find that it will very soon seem quite bright. We are very accustomed to darkness.'
'Look,' said Vimes, as the grille was shut again, 'you know this is ridiculous! I don't know what the position is with Mister Skimmer, but I damn well intend to find out! And there's the Scone theft, I'm pretty certain I'm close to working that out, too. If you let me return to the embassy where else could I go?'
'We would not wish to find out. You may just feel that life would be more pleasant in Ankh-Morpork.'
'Really? And how would we get there?'
'You may have friends in unexpected places.'


- 216 -
Vimes thought of the evil little weapon in the pillow.
'You will not be badly treated. This is our way' said Dee. 'I will return when I have news.'
'Hey—'
But Dee was a retreating shape in the crepuscular, almost-not-there light.
In Vimes's cell the glow beetle was doing its best. All it managed to achieve, though, was to turn the darkness into a variety of green shadows. You could find your way around without walking into walls, but that was about the extent of it.
One shot, which they didn't know you had.
That'd probably get him out of the door. Into a corridor. Underground. Full of dwarfs.
On the other hand, it was amazing how the evidence could stack up against you when people wanted it to.
Anyway, Vimes was an ambassador! What had happened to diplomatic immunity? But that was hard to argue when you were faced with uncomplicated people with weaponry ; there was a risk that they'd experiment to see if it was true.
One shot they didn't expect...
Some time later there was a rattling of keys and the door was pulled open. Vimes could make out the shape of two dwarfs. One was holding an axe, the other was bearing a tray.
The dwarf with the axe motioned Vimes to step back.
An axe wasn't a good idea, Vimes considered. It was always the weapon of choice amongst dwarfs, but it wasn't sensible in a confined space.
He raised his hands and, as the other dwarf walked cautiously over to the stone slab, let them move towards the back of his neck.
These dwarfs were nervous of him. Perhaps they didn't see humans very often. They'd remember this one.
'Want to see a trick?' said Vimes.
'Grz'dak?'
'Watch this,' said Vimes, and brought his hands around and shut his eyes just before the match flared.


- 217 -
He heard the axe drop as its owner tried to cover his face. That was an unexpected bonus, but there wasn't time to thank the god of desperate men. Vimes plunged forward, kicked as hard as he could, and heard an 'oof' of expelled breath. Then he leapt into the patch of darkness that contained the other dwarf, found a head, spun around and rammed it into an unseen wall.
The first dwarf was trying to get to his feet. Vimes fumbled for him in the gloom, pulled him up by his jerkin and rasped: 'Someone left me a weapon. They wanted me to kill you. Remember that. I could have killed you.'
He punched the dwarf in the stomach. This was no time to play by the Marquis of Fantailler rules19.
Then he turned, snatched the little cage containing the light beetle and headed for the door.
There was a feeling of passageway, stretching off in both directions. Vimes paused for just long enough to sense the draught on his face and headed that way.
Another glow beetle was hanging in a cage a little distance off. It illuminated, if such a bright word could be used for a light that merely made the darkness less black, a huge circular opening in which a fan turned lazily.
The blades were so slow that Vimes was able to step between them, into the velvet cavern beyond.
Someone really wants me dead, he thought, as he inched his way along the nearest invisible wall with his face to the draught. One shot they weren't expecting... but someone was expecting it, weren't they?
If you want to get a prisoner out of the clink, then you give him a key, or a file. You don't give him a weapon. A key might get him out; a weapon would get him killed.
He stopped, one foot over emptiness. The glow beetle revealed a hole in the floor. It had the huge suckingness of depth.
19 The Marquis of Fantailler got into many fights in his youth, most of them as a result of being known as the Marquis of Fantailler, and wrote a set of rules for what he termed 'the noble art of fisticuffs', which mostly consisted of a list of places where people weren't allowed to hit him. Many people were impressed with his work and later stood with noble chest out-thrust and fists balled in a spirit of manly aggression against people who hadn't read the Marquis's book but did know how to knock people senseless with a chair. The last words of a surprisingly large number of people were 'Stuff the bloody Marquis of Fantailler—'


- 218 -
Then he gripped the beetle's cage between his teeth, took a few steps back and completely misjudged the distance. He hit the other side of the hole with every rib, both arms flat on the floor beyond.
A bit of Ankh-Morpork sense of humour hissed between his teeth.
He scrabbled his way on to the cave floor and got his breath back. Then he took the one-shot out of his pocket, fired it into the floor, tossed it into the hole — it clattered and echoed for some time — and moved on, keeping his face towards the cold air.
This wasn't a tunnel any more. It was the bottom of a shaft. But the green glow lit up something heaped in the middle.
Vimes picked up a handful of snow and, when he looked up, a flake melted on his face. He grinned in the dark. The beetle light just caught the edge of the spiral stairs fixed to the rock.
'Stairs' turned out to be a generous description. When the shaft had been cut, the dwarfs had made holes in the stone and hammered thick baulks of timber into them. He tried one or two. They seemed sturdy enough. With care, he'd be able to scramble...
He was a long way up before one log snapped. He flung out his hands and caught the next one, his grip slipping on the wet wood. The glow beetle disappeared downwards and Vimes, swinging back and forth from his precarious handhold, watched the circle of dim green light dwindle to a dot and vanish.
Then the realization crept over him that there was no way he would be able to pull himself up. His fingers were numb, but the rest of his entire life consisted of the amount of time they could maintain a grip on the clammy step above him.
Call it a minute, perhaps.
There were a lot of things that could profitably be done in a minute, but most of them couldn't be done with no hands while hanging in darkness over a long drop.
He lost his grip. A moment later he smacked into the spiral of logs one turn below, which parted company with the wall.
Man and timber fell one more turn. Vimes landed with a rib-bending thump across one step, while those around it gave way. Rocking gently on the one tough log, he listened to the thuds and booms as the fallen timber continued to the bottom of the shaft.
' !' Vimes had intended to swear, but the fall had knocked the breath out of him. He hung like a folded pair of old trousers.


- 219 -
It had been a long time since he'd slept. Whatever he'd been doing on the slab it hadn't been sleep. Normal sleep didn't leave your mouth feeling as though glue had been poured into it.
And only this morning the new ambassador for Ankh-Morpork had strolled out to present his credentials. Only this evening Ankh-Morpork's commander of police had set out to solve a simple little theft. And now he was dangling halfway up a freezing shaft, with a few inches of old and unreliable wood between him and a brief trip to the next world.
All he could hope for was that his whole life wasn't going to pass before his eyes. There were some bits of it he didn't want to remember.
'Ah... Sir Samuel. Bad luck. You vere doing so vell.'
He opened his eyes. A faint purple light just above him illuminated the form of the Lady Margolotta. She was sitting on empty space.
'Can I give you a lift?' she said.
Vimes shook his head muzzily.
'If it makes you feel any better, I really don't like doing this,' said the vampire. 'It's so... expected of vun. Oh dear. That rotten old log doesn't look very—'
The log snapped. Vimes landed spreadeagled on the turn below, but only for a moment. Several stairs broke and dropped him a further flight. This time he caught hold of one and was, once again, dangling.
Lady Margolotta descended regally.
Far below, the broken wood boomed.
'Now, in theory this might be an almost survivable vay of getting back down,' said the vampire. 'Unfortunately, I fear that the descending logs have smashed many of the vuns below.'
Vimes shifted. His handhold seemed secure. It might just be possible to pull himself up...
'I knew you were behind this,' he muttered, trying to will some life into his shoulder muscles.
'No, you didn't. You knew that the Scone wasn't stolen, though.'
Vimes stared at the serenely floating shape. 'The dwarfs wouldn't think that—' he began. The log under him gave the little nasty movement that announces to any luckless passengers that it is about to land.


- 220 -
Lady Margolotta drifted closer. 'I know you hate vampires,' she said. 'It's quite usual, for your personality type. It's the... penetrative aspect. But if I vas you, right now, I'd ask myself... do I hate them with all my life?'
She held out a hand.
'Just one bite'll end all my troubles, eh?' Vimes snarled.
'Vun bite vould be vun too many, Sam Vimes.'
The wood cracked. She grabbed his wrist.
If he'd thought about it at all, Vimes would have expected to be dangling from a vampire now. Instead, he was simply floating.
'Don't think of letting go,' said Margolotta as they rose gently up the shaft.
'One bite would be one too many?' said Vimes. He recognized -the mangled mantra. 'You're a... a teetotaller?'
'Almost four years now.'
'No blood at all?'
'Oh, yes. Animal. It's rather kinder to them than slaughter, don't you think? Of course, it makes them docile, but frankly a cow is unlikely ever to vin the Thinker of the Year avard. I'm on a vagon, Mister Vimes.'
'The wagon. We call it the wagon,' said Vimes weakly. 'And... that replaces human blood?'
'Like lemonade replaces whisky. Believe me. However, the intelligent mind can find a... substitute.' The sides of the shaft dropped away and they were in clear, freezing air, which knifed through Vimes's shirt. They drifted sideways a little, and then Vimes was dropped into kneedeep snow.
'Vun of the better things about our dwarfs is that they don't often try something new and they never let go of anything old,' said the vampire, hovering over the snow. 'You weren't hard to find.'
'Where am I?' Vimes looked around at rocks and trees mounded in snow.
'In the mountains, quite a long way viddershins of the town, Mister Vimes. Goodbye.'
'You're going to leave me here?'


- 221 -
'I'm sorry? You were the one who escaped. I am certainly not here. Me, a vampire, interfering in the affairs of the dwarfs? Unthinkable! But let us just say... I like people to have an even chance.'
'It's freezing! I haven't even got a coat! What is it you want?'
'You have freedom, Mister Vimes. Isn't that what everyvun wants? Isn't it supposed to give you a lovely warm glow?'
Lady Margolotta disappeared into the snow.
Vimes shivered. He hadn't realized how warm it had been underground. Or what time it was. There was a dim, a very dim light. Was this just after sunset? Was it almost dawn?
The flakes were piling up on his damp clothes, driven by the wind.
Freedom could get you killed.
Shelter... that was essential. The time of day and a precise location were no use to the dead. They always knew what time it was and where they were.
He moved away from the open shaft and staggered into the trees, where the snow was less deep. It gave off a light, fainter than a sick beetle, as if snow somehow absorbed it from the air as it fell.
Vimes wasn't good at forests. They were things you saw on the horizon. If he'd thought about them at all he'd imagined a lot of trees, standing like poles, brown at the bottom, bushy and green at the top.
Here there were humps, and bumps, and dark branches weighted and creaking under the snow. It fell around him with a hiss. Occasionally lumps of the stuff would slide from somewhere above, and there would be another shower of frigid crystals as a branch sprang back.
There was a track of sorts, or at least a wider, smoother expanse of snow. Vimes followed it, on the basis that there was no more sensible choice. The warm glow of freedom lasted only so long.
Vimes had city eyes. He'd watched coppers develop them. A trainee copper who glanced once at a street was just learning, and if he didn't learn quicker he'd become highly experienced at dying. One who'd been on the streets for a while paid attention, took in details, noted shadows, saw background and foreground and the people who were trying not to be in either. Angua looked at streets like that. She worked at it.


- 222 -
The long-term coppers, like even Nobby when he was on a good day, glanced once at a street and that was enough, because they'd seen everything.
Maybe there were... country eyes. Forest eyes. Vimes saw trees, mounds, snow and not much else.
The wind was getting up. It began to howl among the trees. Now the snow stung.
Trees. Branches. Snow.
Vimes kicked a mound beside the track. Snow slid off dark pine needles. He dropped to his hands and knees and pushed forward.
Ah...
It was still cold, and there was some snow on the dead needles, but the weighted branches had spread around the trunk like a tent. He pulled himself in, congratulating himself. It was windless here and, contrary to all common sense, the blanket of snow above him seemed to make it warmer. It even smelled warm... sort of... animal...
Three wolves, lying lazily around the trunk of the tree, were watching him with interest.
Vimes added metaphorical freezing to the other sort. The animals didn't seem frightened.
Wolves!
And that was about it. It made as much sense to say: snow! Or: wind! Right now, those were more certain killers.
He had heard somewhere that wolves wouldn't attack you if you faced them down.
The trouble was that he was going to sleep soon. He could feel it creeping over him. He wasn't thinking right, and every muscle ached.
Outside, the wind moaned. And His Grace the Duke of Ankh fell asleep.
He awoke with a snort and, to his surprise, all his arms and legs as well. A drop of chilled water, melted from the roof just above by the heat of his body, ran down his neck. His muscles didn't hurt any more. He couldn't feel most of them.
And the wolves had gone. There was trampled snow at the far end of the makeshift lair, and light so bright that he groaned.


- 223 -
It turned out to be daylight, from a bright sky bluer than any Vimes had seen, so blue that it seemed to shade into purple at the zenith. He stepped out into a sugar-frosted world, crunchy and glittering.
Wolf tracks led away between the trees. It occurred to Vimes that following them would not be a life-enhancing move; perhaps last night had been understood as time out, but today was a new day and probably the search was on for breakfast.
The sun felt warm, the air was cold, his breath hung in front of him.
There should be people around, shouldn't there? Vimes was hazy on rural issues, but weren't there supposed to be charcoal burners, woodcutters and... he tried to think... little girls taking goodies to granny? The stories Vimes had learned as a kid suggested that all forests were full of bustle, activity and the occasional scream. But this place was silent.
He set off in a direction that appeared to head downwards, on general principles. Food was the important thing. He'd still got a couple of matches and he could probably make a fire if he had to be out here mother night, but it was a long time since the canapes at the reception.
This is Ankh-Morpork, trudging over and through the snow...
After half an hour he reached the bottom of a shallow valley, where a stream splashed between encroaching banks of ice. It steamed.
The water was warm to the touch.
He followed the banks for some way. They were criss-crossed with animal tracks. Here and there the water pooled in deep hollows that smelled of rotten eggs. Around them the leafless bushes were heavy with ice, where the steam had frozen.
Food could wait. Vimes stripped off his clothes and stepped into one of the deeper pools, yelping at the heat, and then lay back.
Didn't they do something like this up in Nothingfjord? He'd heard stories. They had hot steamy baths and then ran around in the snow hitting one another with birch logs, didn't they? Or something. There was nothing really daft that some foreigner wouldn't do somewhere.
Gods, it felt good. Hot water was civilization. Vimes could feel the stiffness in his muscles melting away in the warmth.
After a moment or two he splashed over to the bank and rummaged through his clothes until he found a flattened cigar packet containing a couple of things that, after the events of the past twenty-four hours, looked like fossilized twigs.


- 224 -
He had two matches.
Well, the hell with it. Anyone could light a fire with one match.
He lay back in the water. That was a good decision. He could feel himself coming back together again, pulled into shape by the heat within and without
'Ah. Your grace...'
Wolf von Uberwald was sitting on the opposite bank. He was stark naked. A little vapour rose off him, as if he'd just been exerting himself. Muscles gleamed as though they'd been oiled. They probably had been.
'A run in the snow is such a thing, is it not?' said Wolf pleasantly. 'You are certainly learning the ways of Uberwald, your grace. Lady Sybil is alive and well and free to go back to your city when the passes are cleared. I know you would wish to hear that.'
Other figures were approaching through the trees, men and women, all of them as unselfconsciously naked as Wolf.
Vimes realized he was a dead man bathing. He could see it in Wolf's eyes. 'Nothing like a hot dip before breakfast,' he said.
'Ah, yes. We also have not, as yet, breakfasted,' said Wolf. He stood up, stretched, and cleared the pool from a standing start. Vimes's breeches were picked up and examined.
'I threw Inigo's damn thing away,' said Vimes. 'I don't think a friend put it there.'
'It is all a great game, your grace,' said Wolf. 'Do not reproach yourself! The strongest survive, which is as it should be!'
'Dee planned this, did he?'
Wolf laughed. 'The dear little Dee? Oh, he had a plan. It was a good little plan, although a touch insane. Happily, it will no longer be required!'
'You want the dwarfs to go to war?'
'Strength is good,' said Wolf, folding Vimes's clothes neatly. 'But like some other good things, it only remains good if it is not possessed by too many people.' He tossed the clothes as far as he could.
'What is it you want me to say, your grace?' Wolf continued. 'Something like "You are going to die anyway so I might as well tell you," perhaps?'
'Well, it'd be a help,' said Vimes.


- 225 -
'You are going to die anyway.' Wolf smiled. 'Why don't you tell me?'
Talking gained time. Maybe those woodcutters and charcoal burners would be along at any minute. If they hadn't brought their axes everyone was going to be in big trouble.
'I'm... pretty sure why the replica Scone was stolen in Ankh-Morpork,' said Vimes. 'I've just got the inkling of an idea that a copy was made of it, which was smuggled here on one of our coaches. Diplomats don't get searched.'
'Well done!'
'Shame Igor came to unload when one of your boys was there, wasn't it?'
'Oh, it's hard to hurt an Igor!'
'You don't care, do you?' said Vimes. 'A bunch of dwarfs want Albrecht on the thro- the Scone because they want to hang on to that old-time certainty, and you just want dwarfs fighting. And old Albrecht wouldn't even get the right Scone back!'
'Let us say that just now we find our interests converge, shall we?' said Wolf.
Out of the corner of his eye Vimes saw the other werewolves spreading out around the pool.
'And now you've set me up,' he said. 'Pretty amateurishly, I'd say. But impressive, because Dee couldn't have had much time after he thought I was getting close. It would have worked, too. People aren't good eye-witnesses. I know. They believe what they want to see and what people told them they saw. It was a nice touch giving me that damn one-shot. He really must have hoped I'd kill to escape—'
'Is it not time you got out of that... pool?' said Wolfgang.
'You mean bath?' said Vimes. Yes, there was a wince. Vimes registered it. Oh, you're walking upright and talking, my lad, and you look strong as an ox — but something between a human and a wolf has a bit of dog in them, doesn't it?
'We have an ancient custom here,' said Wolf, looking away. 'And it is a good one. Anyone can challenge us. It's a little... chase. The great game! A competition, if you like. If they outrun us they win four hundred crowns. That is a very good sum! A man may start a small business with it. Of course, as I can see you realize, if they don't outrun us the question of money does not arise!'
'Does anyone ever win?' said Vimes. Come on, woodcutters, the people need wood!


- 226 -
'Sometimes. If they train well and know the country! Many a successful man in Bonk owes his start in life to our little custom. In your case, we'll give you, oh, an hour's lead. For the sport of it!' He pointed. 'Bonk is five miles in that direction. The lore says that you must not enter a dwelling until you get there.'
'And if I don't run?'
'Then it will be a really short event! We do not like Ankh-Morpork. We do not want you here!'
'That's odd,' said Vimes.
Wolf's broad brow wrinkled. 'Your meaning?'
'Oh, it's just that everywhere I go in AnkhMorpork I seem to bump into people who come from Uberwald, you see. Dwarfs, trolls, humans. All beavering away quite happily and writing letters home saying, come on, it's great here -they don't eat you alive for a dollar.'
Wolf's lip curled, revealing a glint of incisor. Vimes had seen that look on Angua's face.. It meant she was having a bad hair ,day. And a werewolf can have a bad hair day all over.
He pushed his luck. It was clearly too weak to move by itself. 'Angua's getting on well—'
'Vimes! Mister Civilized! Ankh-Morpork! You will run!'
Hoping that his legs would support him, Vimes climbed out on the snow of the bank, as slowly as he dared. There was laughter from the werewolves.
'You go into the water wearing clothes?'
Vimes looked down at his streaming legs. 'You've never seen drawers before?' he said.
Wolf's lip curled again. He glanced triumphantly at the others. 'Behold... civilization!' he said.
Vimes, puffed life into his cigar and looked around the frozen woodland with as much hauteur as he could muster.
'Four hundred crowns, did you say?' he said.
'Yes!'
Vimes sneered at the forest again. 'What is that in Ankh-Morpork dollars, do you know? About a dollar fifty?'


- 227 -
'The question will not arise!' Wolf bellowed.
'Well, I don't want to have to spend it all here—'
'Run!'
'In the circumstances, then, I won't ask if you have the money on you.'
Vimes walked away from the werewolves, glad that they couldn't see his face and very much aware that the skin on his back wanted to crawl around to his front.
He kept moving calmly, his wet drawers beginning to crackle in the frosty air, until he was certain he was out of sight of the pack.
So, let's see... they've got better strength than you, they know the country, and if they're as good as Angua they could track a fart through a skunk's breakfast, and your legs hurt already.
So what are the pluses here? Well, you've made Wolf really angry.
Vimes broke into a run.
Not much of a plus there, then, all things considered.
Vimes broke into a faster run.
Off in the distance, wolves began to howl.
There is a saying: it won't get better if you picket.
Corporal Nobbs or, rather, Guild President C. W. St J. Nobbs, reflected on this. A little early snow was fizzling in the air over the metal drum which, in approved strike fashion, was glowing red-hot in front of the Watch House.
A main problem, as he saw it, was that there was something philosophically wrong with picketing a building that no one except a watchman wanted to enter in any case. It is impossible to keep people out of something that they don't want to go into. It can't be done.
The chant hadn't worked. An old lady had given him a penny.
'Colon, Colon, Colon! Out! Out! Out!' shouted Reg Shoe happily, waving his placard.
'That doesn't sound right, Reg,' said Nobby. 'Sounds like surgery.'
He looked at the other placards. Dorfl was holding a large, closely worded text, detailing their grievances in full, with references to Watch procedures and citing a number of philosophical texts. Constable Visit's sandwich-board, on the other


- 228 -
hand, proclaimed: 'What Profiteth it a Kingdom if the Oxen be Deflated? Riddles 11, v3.'
Somehow, these cogent arguments did not seem to be bringing the city to its knees.
He turned at the sound of a coach pulling up and looked up at a door which had a crest consisting mainly of-a black shield. And above that, looking out of the window, was the face of Lord Vetinari.
'Ah, none other than Corporal Nobbs,' said Lord Vetinari.
At this point Nobby would have given quite a lot to be anyone other than Corporal Nobbs.
He wasn't sure whether, as a striker, he should salute. He saluted anyway, on the basis that a salute was seldom out of place.
'I gather you have withdrawn your labour,' Lord Vetinari went on. 'In your case, I am sure this presented a good deal of difficulty.'
Nobby wasn't certain about that sentence, but the Patrician seemed quite amiable.
'Can't stand by when the security of the city's concerned, sir,' he said, oozing affronted loyalty from every unblocked pore.
Lord Vetinari paused long enough for the peaceful, everyday sounds of a city apparently on the brink of catastrophe to filter into Nobby's consciousness.
'Well, of course I wouldn't dream of interfering,' he said at last. 'This is Guild business. I'm sure his grace will understand fully when he returns.' He banged on the side of the coach. 'Drive on.'
And the coach was gone.
A thought that had been nudging Nobby for some time chose this moment to besiege him once again.
Mister Vimes is going to go spare. He's going to go mental.
Lord Vetinari sat back in his seat, smiling to himself.
'Er, did you mean that, sir?' said the clerk Drumknott, who was sitting opposite.
'Certainly. Make a note to have the kitchen send them down cocoa and buns around three o'clock. Anonymously, of course. It's been a crime-free day, Drurnknott. Very unusual. Even the Thieves' Guild is lying low.'


- 229 -
'Yes, my lord. I can't imagine why. When the cat's away...'
'Yes, Drumknott, but mice are happily unencumbered by apprehensions of the future. Humans, on the other hand, are. And they know that Vimes is going to be back in a week or so, Drumknott. And Vimes will not be happy. Indeed, he will not. And when a commander of the Watch is unhappy, he tends to spread it around with a big shovel.'
He smiled again. 'This is the time for sensible men to be honest, Drumknott. I only hope Colon is stupid enough to let it continue.'
The snow fell faster.
'How beautiful the snow is, sisters...'
Three women sat at the window of their lonely house, looking out at the white Uberwald winter.
'And how cold the vind is,' said the second sister.
The third sister, who was the youngest, sighed. 'Why do we always talk about the weather?'
'What else is there?'
'Well, it's either freezing cold or baking. I mean, that's it, really.'
'That is how things are in Mother Uberwald,' said the oldest sister, slowly and sternly. 'The vind and the snow and the boiling heat of summer...'
'You know, I bet if we cut down the cherry orchard we could put in a roller-skating rink—'
No.
'How about a conservatory? We could grow pineapples.'
No.
'If we moved to Bonk we could get a big apartment for the cost of this place—'
'This is our home, Irina,' said the oldest sister. 'Ah, a home of lost illusions and thwarted hopes...'
'We could go out dancing and everything.'
'I remember when we lived in Bonk,' said the middle sister dreamily. 'Things vere better then.'


- 230 -
'Things vere alvays better then,' said the oldest sister.
The youngest sister sighed and looked out of the window. She gasped. 'There's a man running through the cherry orchard!'
'A man? Vot could he possibly vant?'
The youngest sister strained to see. 'It looks like he wants... a pair of trousers...'
'Ah,' said the middle sister dreamily. 'Trousers ver better then.'
The hurrying pack stopped in a chilly blue valley when the howling filled the air. Angua loped back to the sledge, lifted out her bag of clothes with her jaws, glanced at Carrot and disappeared among the drifts. A few moments later she walked back again, doing up her shirt.
'Wolfgang's got some poor devil playing the game,' she said. 'I'm going to put a stop to it. It
was bad enough that Father kept the tradition going, but at least he played fair. Wolfgang cheats. They never win.'
'Is this the game you told me about?'
'That's right. But Father played by the rules. If the runner was bright and nimble he got four hundred crowns and Father had him to dinner at the castle.'
'If he lost, then your father had him for dinner out in the woods.'
'Thank you for reminding me.'
'I was trying not to be nice.'
'You may have an undiscovered natural talent,' said Angua. 'But no one had to run, is my point. I won't apologize. I've been a copper in Ankh-Morpork, remember. City motto: You May Not Get Killed.'
'Actually, it's—'
'Carrot! I know. And our family motto is Homo Homini Lupus. "A man is a wolf to other men!" How stupid. Do you think they mean that men are shy and retiring and loyal and kill only to eat? Of course not! They mean that men act like men towards other men, and the worse they are the more they think they'd really like being wolves! Humans hate werewolves because they see the wolf in us, but wolves hate us because they see the human inside — and I don't blame them!'


- 231 -
Vimes veered away from the farmhouse and sprinted towards the nearby barn. There had to be something in there. Even a couple of sacks would do. The chafing qualities of frozen underwear can be seriously underestimated.
He'd been running for half an hour. Well, for twenty-five minutes, really. The other five had been spent limping, wheezing, clutching at his chest and wondering how you knew if you were having a heart attack.
The inside of the barn was... barn-like. There were stacks of hay, dusty farm implements... and a couple of threadbare sacks hanging on a nail. He snatched one, gratefully.
Behind him the door creaked open. He spun round, clutching the sack to him, and saw three very sombrely dressed women watching him carefully. One of them was holding a kitchen knife in a trembling hand,
'Have you come here to ravish us?' she said.
'Madam! I'm being pursued by werewolves!'
The three looked at one another. To Vimes the sack suddenly seemed far too small.
'Er, vill that take you all day?' said one of the women.
Vimes held the sack more tightly. 'Ladies! Please! I need trousers!'
'Ve can see that.'
'And a weapon, and boots if you've got them! Please?'
They went into another huddle.
'We have the gloomy and purposeless trousers of Uncle Vanya,' said one, doubtfully.
'He seldom wore them,' said another.
'And I have an axe in my linen cupboard,' said the youngest. She looked guiltily at the other two. 'Look, just in case I ever needed it, all right? I wasn't going to chop anything down.'
'I would be so grateful,' said Vimes. He took in the good but old clothes, the faded gentility, and played the only card in his hand. 'I am His Grace the Duke of Ankh, although I appreciate this fact is not evident at the—'
There was a three-fold sigh.
'Ankh-Morpork!'


- 232 -
'You haf a magnificent opera house and many fine galleries.'
'Such vonderful avenues!'
'A veritable heaven of culture and sophistication and unattached men of quality!'
'Er, I said Ankh-Morpork,' said Vimes. 'With an A and an M.'
'Ve have always dreamed of going there.'
'I'll have three coach tickets sent along immediately I get home,' said Vimes, his mind's ear hearing the crunch of speeding paws over snow. 'But, dear ladies, if you could fetch me those things—'
They hurried away, but the youngest lingered by the door.
'Do you have long cold winters in Ankh-Morpork?' she said.
'Just muck and slush, usually.'
'Any cherry orchards?'
'I don't think we have any, I'm afraid.'
She punched the air. 'Yesss!'
A few minutes later Vimes was alone in the barn, wearing a pair of ancient black trousers that he'd tied at the waist with rope, and holding an axe that was surprisingly sharp.
He had five minutes, perhaps. Wolves probably didn't stop to worry about heart attacks.
There was no point in simply running. They could run faster. He needed to stay near civilization and its hallmarks, like trousers.
Maybe time was on Vimes's side. Angua was never very talkative about her world, but she had said that, in either shape, a werewolf slowly lost some of the skills of the other shape. After several hours on two legs her sense of smell dropped from uncanny to merely good. And after too long as a wolf... it was like being drunk, as far as Vimes understood it; a little inner part of you was still trying to give instructions, but the rest of you was acting stupid. The human part started to lose control.
He looked around the barn again. There was a ladder to an upper gallery. He climbed it and looked out of a glassless window across a snowy meadow. There was a river in the distance, and what looked very much like a boathouse.
Now, how would a werewolf think?


- 233 -
The werewolves slowed as they reached the building. Their leader glanced at a lieutenant and nodded. It loped off in the direction of the boathouse. The others followed Wolf inside. The last became human for a moment to pull the doors shut and drop the bar across.
Wolf stopped near the centre of the barn. Hay had been scattered over the floor in great fluffy piles.
He scraped gently with a paw, and wisps fell away from a rope that was stretched taut.
Wolf took a deep breath. The other werewolves, sensing what was going to happen, looked away. There was a moment of struggling shapelessness, and then he was rising slowly on two feet, blinking in the dawn of humanity.
That's interesting, thought Vimes, up on the gallery. For a second or two after changing, they're not entirely up on current events...
'Oh, your grace,' said Wolf, looking around. 'A trap? How very... civilized.'
He caught sight of Vimes, who was standing on the higher floor, by the window.
'What was it supposed to do, your grace?'
Vimes reached down to the oil lamp. 'It was supposed to be a decoy,' he said.
He hurled the lamp down on to the dry hay and flicked his cigar after it. Then he grabbed the axe and climbed through the window just as the spilled oil went whump.
Vimes dropped into the deep snow and ran towards the boathouse.
There were other tracks leading to it, not human. When he reached the door he swung wildly at the darkness just inside, and his reward was a cut-off yelp.
The skiff that was housed in the tumbledown shed was a quarter full of dark water, but he didn't dare.think about bailing yet. He grabbed the dusty oars and rowed with considerable effort and not much speed out on to the river.
He groaned. Wolf was trotting across the snow, with the rest of the pack behind him. They all seemed to be there.
Wolf cupped his hands. 'Very civilized, your grace! But, you see, when you set fire to a barn full of wolves, they panic, your grace! But when they're werewolves, one of them just opens the door! You cannot kill werewolves, Mister Vimes!'
'Tell that to the one in the boathouse!' Vimes shouted, as the current took the boat.


- 234 -
Wolf looked into the shadows for a moment and then cupped his hands again. 'He will recover, Mister Vimes!'
Vimes swore under his breath, because despite all his hopes a couple of werewolves had plunged into the water upstream and were swimming strongly towards the opposite bank. But that was a doggy thing, wasn't it? Leap joyfully into the water outdoors, but fight like hell against a tub.
Wolfgang had started to trot along the bank. The ones in the water emerged on the far bank. Now they were keeping pace with the boat on both sides.
But the current was carrying it along faster now. Vimes started to bail with both hands.
'You can't outrun the river, Wolf!' he shouted.
'We don' have to, Mister Vimes! That is not the question! The question is, can you outswim the waterfall? See you later, Civilized!'
Vimes looked around. In the distance the river had a foreshortened look. When he concentrated, the inner ear of terror could hear a distant roaring.
He snatched the oars again and tried to row upstream and, yes, it was possible to make headway against the current. But he couldn't keep rowing faster than wolves could run, and taking on two at once on the shore, when they were ready and waiting for him, was not an option.
If he went over the falls now, he might get to the bottom before they did.
That wasn't a good sentence, however he tried it.
He took his hands off the oars and pulled in the mooring rope. If I make a couple of loops, he thought, I can strap the axe on to my back-
He had a mental picture of what could happen to a man who plunged into the cauldron below a waterfall with a sharp piece of metal attached to his body-
GOOD MORNING.
Vimes blinked. A tall dark robed figure was now sitting in the boat.
'Are you Death?'
IT'S THE SCYTHE, ISN'T IT? PEOPLE ALWAYS NOTICE THE SCYTHE.
'I'm going to die?'
POSSIBLY.


- 235 -
'Possibly? You turn up when people are possibly going to die?'
OH, YES. IT'S QUITE THE NEW THING. IT'S BECAUSE OF THE UNCERTAINTY PRINCIPLE.
'What's that?'
I'M NOT SURE.
'That's very helpful.'
I THINK IT MEANS PEOPLE MAY OR MAY NOT DIE. I HAVE TO SAY IT'S PLAYING HOB WITH MY SCHEDULE, BUT I TRY TO KEEP UP WITH MODERN THOUGHT.
The roar was a lot louder now. Vimes lay back in the boat and gripped the sides.
I'm talking to Death, he thought, to take my mind off things.
'Didn't I see you last month? I was chasing Bigger-than-Small-Dave Dave along Peach Pie Street and I fell off that ledge?'
THAT IS CORRECT.
'But I landed on that cart. I didn't die!'
BUT YOU MIGHT HAVE DONE.
'But I thought we all had some kind of hourglass thing that said when we're going to die?'
Now the roar was almost physical. Vimes redoubled his grip on the boat.
OH, YES. You Do, said Death.
'But we might not?'
NO. YOU WILL. THERE IS NO DOUBT ABOUT THAT.
'But you said—'
YES, IT IS A BIT HARD TO UNDERSTAND, ISN'T IT? APPARENTLY THERE'S THIS THING CALLED THE TROUSERS OF TIME, WHICH IS QUITE ODD, BECAUSE TIME CERTAINLY DOESN'T-
The boat went over the waterfall.
Vimes had a thunderous sensation of pounding, thudding water, followed by the echoing ringing in his ears as he hit the pool below. He fought his way to what passed for the surface and felt the current take him, slam him into a rock and then roll him away in the white water.


- 236 -
He flailed blindly and caught another rock, his body swinging around into a pool of comparative calm. As he fought for breath he saw a grey shape leaping from stone to stone and then another dose of hell was unleashed as it landed, snarling, beside him.
He grabbed it desperately and hung on as it struggled to bite him. A paw flailed to gain purchase on the slippery stone and then, in sudden difficulties, responding automatically... it
changed...
It was as if the wolf shape became small and a man shape became bigger, in the same space, at the same time, with a moment of horrible distortion as the two forms passed through one another.
And then there was that moment he'd noticed before, a second of confusion-
It was just long enough to ram the man's head against the rock with every ounce of strength he could scrape together. Vimes thought he heard a crack.
Then he pushed himself back out into the current and let it carry him on, while he simply struggled to stay near the surface. There was blood in the water. He'd never killed someone with his bare hands before. Truth to tell, he'd never deliberately killed at all. There had been deaths, because when people are rolling down a roof and trying to strangle one another it's sheer luck who is on top when they hit the ground. But that was different. He went to bed every night believing that.
His teeth were chattering and the bright sun made his eyes ache, but he felt... good.
He wanted to beat his chest and scream, in fact.
They'd been trying to kill him!
Make them stay wolves, said a little inner voice. The more time they spent on four legs the less bright they'd become.
A deeper voice, red and raw, from much, much further inside, said, Kill 'em all!
The rage was boiling up now, fighting against the chill.
His feet touched bottom.
The river was broadening here, into something wide enough to be called a lake. A wide ledge of ice had crept out from the bank, covered here and there with blown snow. Fog drifted across it, fog with a sulphurous smell.


- 237 -
There were still cliffs on the far side of the river. A solitary werewolf, companion to the one now drifting on the current, was watching him from the nearest bank. Clouds were sliding across the sun and snow was falling again, in large, raggedy flakes.
Vimes waded to the rim of ice and tried to pull himself up out of the water, but it creaked ominously under his weight and cracks zigzagged across its surface.
The wolf came closer, moving with caution. Vimes made another desperate attempt, a slab of ice came free and tipped up, and he disappeared under the water. The creature waited a few moments and then inched further out over the ice, growling as fine cracks spread out like stars under its paws.
A shadow moved in the shallow water below it. There was an explosion of water and breath as Vimes broke through the ice under the werewolf, grabbed it around the waist and fell back.
A claw ripped along Vimes's side, but he gripped as hard as he could with arms and legs as they rolled under the ice. It was a desperate test of lung capacity, he knew. But he wasn't the one who'd just had the air squeezed out of him. He held on, while the water clanged in his ears and the thing scrabbled and scratched at him and then, when there was nothing else left but to let go or drown, he punched his way up to the air.
Nothing lashed at him. He cracked his way through the ice to the bank, dropped on his hands and knees and threw up.
Howling started, all around the mountains.
Vimes looked up. Blood was coursing down his arms. The air stank of rotten eggs. And there, high on a hill a mile or so off, was the clacks tower.
... with its stone walls and door that could be bolted...
He stumbled forward. The snow underfoot was already giving way to coarse grass and moss. The air was hotter now, but it was the clammy heat of a fever. And he looked around and realized where he was.
There was bare dirt and rock in front of him, but here and there parts of it were moving and going 'blup'.
Everywhere he looked there were fat geysers. Rings of ancient, congealed yellow fat, so old and rancid that even Sam Vimes wouldn't dip his toast in it unless he was really hungry, encircled sizzling little pools. There were even black floating bits, which on second glance turned out to be insects that were slow learners in a hot fat situation.


- 238 -
Vimes recalled something Igor had said. Sometimes dwarfs working the high strata, where the fat had congealed into a kind of tallow millennia ago, found strange ancient animals, perfectly preserved but fried to a crisp.
Probably... Vimes found himself laughing out
of sheer exhaustion... probably battered to death.
Mwahahaa.
The snow was falling heavily now, making the fat pools spit.
He sagged to his knees. He ached all over. It wasn't just that his brain was writing cheques that his body couldn't cash. It had gone beyond that. Now his feet were borrowing money that his legs hadn't got, and his back muscles were looking for loose change under the sofa cushions.
And still nothing was coming up behind him. Surely they must've crossed the river by now?
Then he saw one. He could have sworn it hadn't been there a moment ago. Another one trotted out from behind a nearby snowdrift.
They sat watching him.
'Come on, then!' Vimes yelled. 'What are you waiting for?'
The pools of fat hissed and bubbled around Vimes. It was warm here, though. If they weren't going to move, then neither was he.
He focused on a tree on the edge of the fat geysers. It looked barely alive, with greasy splashes on the end of the longer branches, but it also looked climbable. He concentrated on it, tried to estimate the distance and the speed he might be capable of.
The werewolves turned to look at it, too.
Another one had entered the clearing at a different point. There were three watching him now.
They weren't going to run until he did, he realized. Otherwise it wouldn't be fun.
He shrugged, turned away from the tree... and then turned back and ran. By the time he was halfway there he was afraid his heart was going to climb up his throat, but he ran on, jumped awkwardly, caught a low branch, slipped, struggled gasping to his feet, grabbed the branch again and managed to pull himself up, expecting at every second the first tiny puncture as teeth broke his skin.


- 239 -
He rocked on the greasy wood. The werewolves hadn't moved, but they were watching him with interest.
'You bastards,' Vimes growled.
They got up and picked their way carefully towards the tree, without hurrying. Vimes climbed a little further up.
'Ankh-Morpork! Mister Civilized! Where are your weapons now, Ankh-Morpork?'
It was Wolfgang's voice. Vimes peered around the snowdrifts, which were already filling up with violet shadows as the afternoon died.
'I got two of you!' he shouted.
'Yes, they will have big headaches later on! We are werewolves, Ankh-Morpork! Quite hard to stop!'
'You said that you—'
'Your Mister Sleeps could run much faster than you, Ankh-Morpork!'
'Fast enough?'
'No! And the man with the little black hat could fight better than you, too!'
'Well enough?'
'No!' shouted Wolfgang cheerfully.
Vimes growled. Even assassins didn't deserve that kind of death. 'It'll be sunset soon!' he shouted.
'Yes! I lied about the sunset!'
'Well, wake me up at dawn, then. I could do with the sleep!'
'You will freeze to death, Civilized Man!'
'Good!' Vimes looked around at the other trees. Even if he could jump to one, they were all conifers, painful to land in and easy to fall out of.
'Ah, this must be the famous Ankh-Morpork sense of humour, yes?'
'No, that was just irony,' Vimes shouted, still looking for an arboreal escape route. 'You'll know when we've got on to the famous AnkhMorpork sense of humour when I start talking about breasts and farting, you smug bastard!'
So, what were his options? Well, he could stay in the tree and die, or run for it and die. Of the two, dying in one piece seemed better.


- 240 -
YOU'RE DOING VERY WELL FOR A MAN OF YOUR AGE.
Death was sitting on a higher branch of the tree.
'Are you following me or what?'
ARE YOU FAMILIAR WITH THE WORDS 'DEATH WAS HIS CONSTANT COMPANION'?
'But I don't usually see you!'
POSSIBLY YOU ARE IN A STATE OF HEIGHTENED AWARENESS CAUSED BY LACK OF FOOD, SLEEP AND BLOOD?
'Are you going to help me?'
WELL... YES.
' When?'
ER, WHEN THE PAIN IS TOO MUCH TO BEAR. Death hesitated, and then went on. EVEN AS I SAY IT I REALIZE THAT THIS ISN'T THE ANSWER YOU WERE LOOKING FOR, HOWEVER.
The sun was near the horizon now, getting big and red.
Racing the sun... That was another Uberwald sport, wasn't it? Be home safe before the sun sets.
Half a mile or more, through deep snow on rising ground.
Someone was climbing up the tree. He felt it shake. He looked down. In the cold blue gloom a naked man was quietly pulling himself from branch to branch.
Vimes was enraged. They weren't supposed to do this!
There was a grunt from below as the climber slipped and recovered on the greasy wood.
HOW ARE YOU FEELING, IN YOURSELF?
'Shut up! Even if you are a hallucination!'
There must be something about werewolves he could use.
You have a second's grace when they are changing shape, but they knew he knew that...
No weapons. That's what he'd noticed in the castle. You always got weapons in castles. Spears, battleaxes, ridiculous suits of armour, huge old swords... Even


- 241 -
the vampires had a few rapiers on the walls. That was because, sometimes, even vampires had to use a weapon.
Werewolves didn't. Even Angua hesitated before reaching for a sword. To a werewolf a physical weapon would always be the second choice.
Vimes locked his legs together and swung around the branch as the werewolf came up. He caught it a blow on the ear and, as it looked up, managed another blow right on the nose.
It gave him a ringing slap and that would have ended it, except that it also pulled itself a little further up the tree and brought itself within the range of the Vimes Elbow.
It justified the capital letter. It had triumphed in a number of street fights. Vimes had learned early on in his career that the graveyards were full of people who'd read the Marquis of Fantailler. The whole idea of fighting was to stop the other bloke hitting you as soon as possible. It wasn't to earn marks. Vimes had often fought in circumstances where being able to use the hands freely was a luxury, but it was amazing how a well-placed elbow could make a point, possibly assisted by a knee.
He drove it into the werewolf's throat and was rewarded with a horrible noise. Then he grabbed a handful of hair and pulled, let go and slammed the palm of his hand into its face in a mad attempt to prevent it having a second to think. He couldn't allow that — he could see the size of the man's muscles.
The werewolf reacted instead.
There was that sudden moment of morphological inexactitude. A nose turned into a muzzle while Vimes's fist was en route, but when the wolf opened its mouth to lunge at him two things occurred to it.
One was that it was high in a tree, not a tenable position for a shape designed for fast-paced living on the ground. The other was gravity.
'Down there it's the lore,' Vimes panted, as its paws scrabbled for purchase on the greasy branch. 'But up here it's me.'
He reached up, grabbed the branch above him, and kicked down with his feet.
There was yelp, and another yelp as the wolf slid and hit the next branch down.
About halfway towards the ground it tried to change back again, combining in one falling shape all the qualities of something not good at staying in trees with something not good at landing on the ground.


- 242 -
'Gotcha!' screamed Vimes.
In the forest all around a howling went up.
The branch he was clinging to snapped. For a moment he hung by the gloomy trousers of Uncle Vanya, caught on a snag, and then their ancient fabric ripped off him and he dropped.
His progress was a little faster, since the falling werewolf had removed a lot of branches on the way down, but the landing was softer because the werewolf was just getting to its feet.
Vimes's flailing hand grabbed a broken branch.
A weapon.
Thought more or less stopped when his fingers closed. Whatever replaced it in the pathways of his brain was gushing up from somewhere else, thousands of years old.
The werewolf struggled up and turned on him. The branch caught it across the side of the head.
Steam rose off Sir Samuel Vimes as he lurched forward, snarling incoherently. He smacked the club down again. He roared. There were no words there. It was a sound from before words. If there was any meaning in it at all it was a lament that he couldn't cause enough pain...
The wolf whined, stumbled, rolled over... and changed.
The human extended a bleeding hand towards him in supplication. 'Ple-ease...'
Vimes hesitated, club raised.
The red rage drained away. He was on a freezing hillside against a cold sunset, and they'd left him alone, and he might just make it to the tower...
In one movement, changing from man to wolf as it moved, the werewolf sprang. Vimes went backwards into the snow. He could feel the breath and the blood, but not the pain
No talons ripped, no teeth tore.
And the weight was lifted. Hands pulled the body off him.
'Bit of a close one there, sir,' said a voice cheerfully. 'Best not to give them any quarter, really.' There was a spear right through the werewolf.
'Carrot?'


- 243 -
'We'll get a fire going. It's easy if you dip the wood in the fat springs first.'
'Carrot?'
'I shouldn't think you've eaten. There's not much game this close to the town, but we've still got some—'
'Carrot?'
'Er, yes, sir?'
'What the hell are you doing here?'
'It's all a bit complicated, sir. Here, let me help you up—'
Vimes shook him off as he tried to help him to his feet.
'I got this far, thank you, I think I'm capable of standing up,' he said, and forced his legs to support him.
'You seem to have lost your trousers, sir.'
'Yes, it's the famous Ankh-Morpork sense of humour,' growled Vimes.
'Only... Angua will be back soon, and... and...'
'Sergeant Angua's family, captain, are in the habit of running around the woods in the snow stark bol- stark naked!'
'Yes, sir, but... I mean... you know... it's not really...'
'I'll give you five minutes to find a clothes shop, shall I? Otherwise- Look, where the hell are all the werewolves, eh? I was expecting to drop into a heap of snarling jaws, and now you're here, thank you very much, and there's no werewolves!'
'Gavin's people chased them away, sir. You must've heard the howl go up.'
'Gavin's people, eh? Well, that's good! That's very good! I'm pleased about that! Well done, Gavin! Now, who the hell is Gavin?'
A howl went up from a distant hill.
'That's Gavin,' said Carrot.
'A wolf? Gavin's a wolf? I've been saved from werewolves by wolves?'
'It's all right, sir. When you think about it, it's not really any different from being saved from werewolves by people.'


- 244 -
'When I think about it, I think perhaps I was better off lying down,' said Vimes weakly.
'Let's get to the sleigh, sir. I was trying to say we have got your clothes. That's how Angua tracked you.'
Ten minutes later Vimes was sitting in front of a fire with a blanket around him, and the world seemed to make a little more sense. A slice of venison was going down well, and Vimes was far too hungry to bother much that the butcher appeared to have used his teeth.
'The wolves spy on the werewolves?' he said.
'Sort of, sir. Gavin keeps an eye on things for Angua. They're... old friends.'
The moment of silence went on just slightly too long.
'He sounds like a very bright wolf,' said Vimes, in the absence of anything more diplomatic to say.
'More than that. Angua thinks he might be part werewolf, from way back.'
'Can that happen?'
'She says so. Did I tell you that he came all the way into Ankh-Morpork? A big city? Can you imagine what that must have been like?'
Vimes turned at a faint sound behind him.
A large wolf was standing at the edge of the firelight. It was looking at him intently. It wasn't just the look of an animal sizing him up on the level of food/threat/thing. Behind that stare wheels were turning. And there was a small but rather proud mongrel at his side, scratching furiously.
'Is that Gaspode?' said Vimes. 'The dog that's always hanging around the Watch House?'
'Yes, he... helped me get here,' said Carrot.
'I just don't want to ask,' said Vimes. 'Any minute now a door's going to open in a tree and Fred and Nobby are going to step out, am I right?'
'I hope not, sir.'
Gavin lay down a short distance from the fire and started watching Carrot.
'Captain?' said Vimes.
'Yes, sir?'


- 245 -
'You'll notice I haven't pressed you on why you're here as well as Angua.'
'Yes, sir.'
'Well?' said Vimes. And now he thought he recognized the look on Gavin's face, even though it was on a face of an unusual shape. It was the look you got on the face of a gentleman lounging on a corner by a bank, watching the comings and goings, seeing how the place worked.
'I was admiring your diplomacy, sir.'
'Hmm? What?' said Vimes, still staring at the wolf.
'I appreciated the way you were avoiding asking questions, sir.'
Angua walked into the firelight. Vimes saw her glance around the circle and squat down on the snow exactly halfway between Carrot and Gavin.
'They're miles away now. Oh, hello, Mister Vimes.'
There was some more silence.
'Is anyone going to tell me something?' said Vimes.
'My family are trying to upset the coronation,' said Angua. 'They're working with some dwarfs that don't want- that want to keep Uberwald separate.'
'I think I've worked that one out. Running for your life through a freezing cold forest gives you a bit of an insight.'
'I have to tell you, sir, my brother killed the clacks signallers. His scent's all over the place up there.'
Gavin made a noise in his throat.
'And another man that Gavin didn't recognize, except that he spent a lot of time hiding in the forest and watching our castle.'
'I think that might have been a man called Sleeps. One of our... agents,' said Vimes.
'He did well. He managed to get to a boat a few miles downriver. Unfortunately there was a werewolf waiting in it.'
'It was a waterfall that did for me,' said Vimes.
'Permission to speak honestly, sir?' said Angua.
'Don't you always?'


- 246 -
'They could have got you any time they liked, sir. Really they could. They wanted you to get as far as the tower before they really attacked. I expect Wolfgang thought that'd be nicely symbolic or something.'
'I got three of them!'
'Yes, sir. But you wouldn't have been able to get three of them all at once. Wolfgang was having some fun. That's how he's always played the game. He's good at thinking ahead. He likes ambushes. He likes some poor soul to get within a few yards of the finish before he leaps out on them.' Angua sighed. 'Look, sir, I don't want there to be trouble—'
'He's been killing people!'
'Yes, sir. But my mother's just a rather ignorant snob and my father's half-gone now. He spends so much time as a wolf he hardly knows how to act human any more. They don't live in the real world. They really think Uberwald can stay the same. There isn't a lot up here, really, but it's ours. Wolfgang's a murderous idiot who thinks that werewolves were born to rule. The trouble is, sir, he hasn't broken the lore.'
'Oh, ye gods!'
'I bet he could find plenty of witnesses to say that he gave everyone the start the lore requires. That's the rules of the game.'
'And meddling with the dwarfs' affairs? He's stolen the Scone or swapped it or... something, I haven't worked it all out yet, but one poor dwarf's already dead because of it! Cheery and Detritus are under arrest! Inigo is dead! Sybil's locked up somewhere! And you're saying it's all Okay?'
'Things are different here, sir,' said Carrot. 'It wasn't until ten years ago that they replaced trial by ordeal here with trial by lawyer, and that was only because they found that lawyers were nastier.'
'I've got to get back to Bonk. If they've harmed Sybil I don't care what the damn lore is.'
'Mister Vimes! You look done in as it is!' said Carrot.
'I'll keep going. Come on. Get some of the wolves to pull the sleigh—'
'You don't get them to, sir. You ask Gavin if they will,' said Carrot.
'Oh. Er, can you explain the situation to him?'
I'm standing in the cold in the middle of a forest, thought Vimes a moment later, watching a quite handsome young woman growling a conversation with a wolf


- 247 -
who is watching her. This does not often happen. Not in AnkhMorpork, anyway. It's probably a daily occurrence up here.
Eventually six wolves allowed themselves to be harnessed, and Vimes was carried up the hill to the road.
'Stop!'
'Sir?' said Carrot.
'I want a weapon! There's got to be something in the tower I can use!'
'Sir, you can use my sword! And there's the... hunting spears.'
'You know what you can do with the hunting spears!'
Vimes kicked the door at the base of the tower. Fresh snow had blown in, smoothing the edges of wolf and human tracks.
He felt drunk. Bits of his brain were going on and off. His eyeballs felt as though they were lined with towelling. His legs seemed only vaguely under his control.
Surely the signallers must've had something?
Even the sacks and barrels had gone. Well, there were plenty of peasants in the hills, and winter was coming on, and the men who'd been here certainly had no further use for the food. Even Vimes wouldn't call that theft.
He climbed up to the next floor. The thrifty people of the forest had been up here, too. But they hadn't taken the bloodstains off the floor, or Inigo's little round hat which inexplicably was wedged into the wooden wall.
He pulled it out and saw where the thin felt on the brim had been pushed back to reveal the razor-sharp edge.
An assassin's hat, he thought. And then, no, not an assassin's hat. He remembered the street fights he'd seen when he was a kid, among the hard-drinking men who thought that even bareknuckle fighting was posh. Some of them would sew a razorblade into the brim of their cap, for a bit of help in a melee. This was the hat of a man who was always looking for that extra edge.
It hadn't worked here.
He dropped it on the floor and his eye caught, in the gloom, the box of mortars. Even that had been ransacked, but the tubes had simply been scattered across the floor. The gods alone knew what the scavengers thought they were.


- 248 -
He put them back in their box. Inigo was right about them, at least. A weapon so inaccurate that it probably couldn't hit a barn wall from inside the barn was no good as a weapon. But other things had been scattered around, too. The men who'd been living rough here had left a few personal items. Pictures had been thumbtacked to the wall. There was a diary, a pipe, someone's shaving gear. Boxes had been tipped out on the floor...
'We'd better be getting on, sir,' said Carrot from the ladder.
They'd been killed. They'd been sent racing off into the dark with monsters at their heels, and then some blank-faced peasants who'd done nothing to help had come in here and picked over the little things they'd left behind.
Damn it! Vimes growled and swept everything into a box and dragged it over to the ladder.
'We'll drop this lot off at the embassy,' he said. 'I'm not leaving anything here for scavengers. Don't think about arguing with me.'
'Wouldn't dream of it, sir. Wouldn't. dream of it.'
Vimes paused. 'Carrot? That wolf and Angua...' He stopped. How the hell did you continue a sentence like that?
'They're old friends, sir.'
'They are?'.
There was nothing but the usual completely open honesty anywhere in Carrot's expression.
'Oh... we... that's good, then,' Vimes finished.
A minute later they were on their way again. Angua was running as a wolf far ahead of the sleigh, alongside Gavin. Gaspode had curled up under the blankets.
And here I am again, thought Vimes, racing the sunset. Heavens know why. I'm in the company of a werewolf and a wolf that looks worse, and sitting in a sleigh drawn by wolves which I can't steer. Try looking that one up in the manual.
He dozed among the blankets, half-open eyes watching the disc of the sun flickering between pine trees.
How could you steal the Scone from its cave?
He'd said there were dozens of ways and there were, but they were all risky. They all depended too much on luck and sleepy guards. And this didn't feel like a crime that was going to rely on luck. It had to work.


- 249 -
The Scone wasn't important. It was important that the dwarfs ended in disarray — no king, violent arguments and fighting in the dark. And it would stay dark in Uberwald, too. And it seemed to be important that the King was blamed. After all, he was the one who'd lost the Scone.
Whatever the plan was, it had to be done quickly. Well, the clacks would have been useful. What had Wolfgang said? 'Those clever men in Ankh-Morpork'? Not dwarfs, but men.
Rubber Sonky, floating in his vat...
You dipped in a wooden hand, and out of the vat you got a glove. Hand in glove...
It isn't where you put it, it's where people think it is. That's what matters. That's the magic.
He remembered the very first thought he'd had when he'd seen Cheery staring at the floor of the Scone's cave, and the little policemen in Vimes's head started to clamour.
'What, sir?' said Carrot.
'Hmm?' Vimes forced open his eyes.
'You just shouted, sir.'
'What did I shout?'
'You shouted, "The bloody thing was never bloody stolen!" sir.'
'The bastards! I knew I nearly had it! It all fits together if you don't think like a dwarf! Let's make sure Sybil is all right and then, captain, we're going to—'
'Prod buttock, sir?'
'Right!'
'Only one thing, sir...'
'What?'
'You are an escaped criminal, aren't you?'
For a moment there was only the sound of the runners skimming over the snow.
'We-ell,' said Vimes, 'this isn't Ankh-Morpork, I know. Everyone keeps telling me. But, captain, wherever you are, wherever you go, watchmen are always watchmen.'


- 250 -
A solitary light burned in the window. Captain Colon sat by the candle, staring at nothing.
Regulations called for the Watch House to be manned at all hours, and that's what he was doing.
The floorboards in the room below creaked into a new position. For many months now they'd been walked on around the clock, because the main office never had fewer than half a dozen people in it. Chairs, too, accustomed 'to being warmed continuously by a relay of bottoms, groaned gently as they cooled.
There was only one thought buzzing around Fred Colon's head.
Mister Vimes is going to go completely bursar. He's going to go totally Librarian-poo.
His hand went down to the desk and came back automatically, while he looked straight ahead.
There was the crunch of a sugar lump being eaten..
Snow was falling again. The watchman that Vimes had named Colonesque was leaning in his box by the Hubward gate of Bonk. He'd perfected the art, and it was an art form, of going to sleep upright with his eyes open. It was one of the things you learned on endless nights.
A female voice by his ear said, 'Now, there are two ways this could go.'
His position didn't change. He continued to stare straight ahead.
'You haven't seen anything. That's the truth, isn't it? Just nod.'
He nodded, once.
'Good man. You didn't hear me arrive, did you? Just nod.'
Nod.
'So you won't know when I've gone, am I right? Just nod.'
Nod.
'You don't want any trouble. Just nod.'
Nod.
'They don't pay you enough for this. Just nod.'
This time the nod was quite emphatic.


- 251 -
'You get more than your fair share of night watches as it is; anyway.'
Colonesque's jaw dropped. Whoever was standing in the shadows was clearly reading his mind.
'Good man. You just stand here, then, and make sure no one steals the gate.'
Colonesque took care to continue to stare straight ahead. He heard the thud and creak of the gate being opened and closed.
It occurred to him that the speaker had not in fact mentioned what the other way was, and he was quite relieved about that.
'What was the other way?' said Vimes as they hurried through the snow.
'We'd go and look for another way in,' said Angua.
There were few people on the streets, which were whitening with the new snow again except where wisps of steam escaped from the occasional grating. In Uberwald, it seemed, sunset made its own curfew. This was just as well, because Gavin was growling continuously under his breath.
Carrot came back from the next corner.
'There's dwarfs on guard all round the embassy,' he said. 'They don't look open to negotiation, sir.'
Vimes looked down. They were standing on a grating.
Captain Tantony of the Bonk Watch was not happy with this duty. He'd been at the opera last night, and later on he'd thought he saw things happening in a way which, the burgomaster had instructed him, hadn't happened. Of course, the thing to do was obey orders. You were safe if you obeyed orders. Everyone in the watch knew that. But these didn't feel like safe orders.
He'd heard they did things differently in Ankh-Morpork. Milord Vimes would arrest anyone, they said.
Tantony had set up a desk in the embassy's hall so that he could keep an eye on the main doors. He'd taken some pains to position his men around the inside of the building; he didn't trust the dwarfs on guard outside. They'd said they'd got orders to kill Vimes on sight, and that didn't make any sense. There had to be some sort of a trial, didn't there?
There was a faint noise from upstairs. He stood up carefully and reached for his crossbow. 'Corporal Svetlz?'
There was another little sound. Tantony went to the bottom of the stairs.


- 252 -
Vimes appeared at the top of them. There was blood on his shirt, and crusted on the side of his face. To the captain's horror he began to walk down the steps.
'I will shoot you!'
'That's the order, is it?' said Vimes.
'Yes! Stop there!'
'But if I'm going to be shot anyway there's no point in stopping, is there?' said Vimes. 'I don't think you're the kind to do that, captain. You've got a brain.' Vimes steadied himself on the banister rail. 'Shouldn't you have called for the rest of the guards by now, by the way?'
'I tell you to stop!'
'You know who I am. If you're going to fire that damn thing, do it now. But first, I suggest it would be a really good career move to tug the bellpull over there. What's the worst that would happen? You've still got the bow pointed at me. There's something you really ought to know.'
Tantony gave him a suspicious look but took a few steps sideways and tugged the rope.
Igor stepped out from behind a pillar. 'Yeth, marthter?'
'Tell this young man where he is, will you?'
'He'th in Ankh-Morpork, marthter,' said Igor calmly.
'See?' said Vimes. 'And don't glare at Igor like that. I missed it when he welcomed me here, but it's true. This is an embassy, my son,' he went on, walking forwards again, 'and that means it's officially on the soil of the home country. Welcome to Ankh-Morpork. There's thousands of Uberwald people living in our city. You don't want to go starting a war, do you?'
'But... but... they said... my orders... you are a criminal!'
'The word is accused, captain. We don't kill people in Ankh-Morpork just because they're accused. Well, not on purpose. And not because someone tells us to.'
Vimes took the crossbow out of Tantony's unresisting hands and fired it into the ceiling.
'Now send your men away,' he said.
'I'm in Ankh-Morpork?' said the captain.
Even in his current state Vimes thought he recognized the harmonics.


- 253 -
'That's right,' he said, putting an arm around him. 'A city which, incidentally, always has a job in the Watch for a young man of ability—'
Tantony's body stiffened. He pushed Vimes's arm away. 'You insult me, milord. This is my country!'
'Ah.' Vimes was. aware of Carrot and Angua watching from the landing.
'But I will not see it dishonoured, either,' said the captain. 'This isn't right. I saw what happened last night. You swept up the King and your troll caught the chandelier! And then they said you'd tried to kill the King and you'd killed dwarfs when you escaped...'
'Are you in charge of the Watch here?'
'No. That's the job of the burgomaster.'
'And who gives him his orders?'
'Everyone,' said Tantony bitterly. Vimes nodded. Been there, he thought. Been there, done that, bought the doublet...
'Are you going to stop me taking my people out of here?'
'How can you do that? The dwarfs surround us!,
'We're going to use... diplomatic channels. Just show me where everyone is, and we'll be off. If it's any help I can hit you over the head and tie you up...'
'That will not be required. The dwarf and the troll are in the cellar. Her ladyship is... I assume she's wherever the Baron took her.'
Vimes felt the little trickle of superheated ice down his spine. 'Took her?' he said hoarsely.
'Well, yes.' Tantony stepped back from Vimes's expression. 'She knew the Baroness, sir! She said they were old friends! She said they could sort it all out! And then...' Tantony's voice became a mumble, seared into silence by the look on Vimes's face.
When Vimes spoke, it was in a monotone as threatening as a spear.
'You are standing there in your shiny breastplate and your silly helmet and your sword without a single notch in the blade and your stupid trousers and you are telling me that you let my wife be taken away by werewolves?'
Tantony took a step backwards. 'It was the Baron—'


- 254 -
'And you don't argue with barons. Right. You don't argue with anyone. Do you know what? I'm ashamed, ashamed to think that something like you is called a watchman. Now give me those keys.'
The man had gone red.
'You've obeyed any orders,' said Vimes. 'Don't... even... think... about... disobeying... that... one.'
Carrot reached the bottom of the stairs and put a hand on Vimes's shoulder.
'Steady, Mister Vimes.'
Tantony looked from — one to the other and made a life decision.
'I hope you... find your lady, milord.' He produced a bunch of keys and handed them over. 'I really do.'
Vimes, still fighting for breath, wordlessly passed the keys to Carrot. 'Let them out,' he said.
'Are you going to the werewolves' castle?' Tantony panted.
'Yes.'
'You won't stand a chance, milord. They do as they please.'
'Then they've got to be stopped.'
'You can't. The old one understood the rules, but Wolfgang, he doesn't obey anything!'
'All the more reason to stop him, then. Ah, Detritus.' The troll saluted. 'You've got your bow, I see. Treated you well, did they?'
'Dey called me a ficko troll,' said Detritus darkly. 'One of dem kicked me inna rocks.' 'Was it this one?'
'No.'
'But he is their captain,' said Vimes, stepping away from Tantony. 'Sergeant, I order you: shoot him down.'
In one movement the troll had the crossbow balanced on his shoulder and was sighting along the massive package of arrows. Tantony went pale.
'Well, go on,' said Vimes. 'It was an order, sergeant.'
Detritus lowered the bow. 'I ain't dat fick, sir.'


- 255 -
'I gave you an order!'
'Den you can do wid dat order what Boulder der Lintel did wid his bag of gravel, sir! Wid respect, o'course.'
Vimes walked across and patted the shaking Tantony on his shoulder.
'Just making a point,' he said.
'However,' said-Detritus, 'if you can find der man dat kicked me inna rocks, I should be happy to give him a flick around der earhole. I know which one it was. He's der one walkin' wid der limp.'
Lady Sybil drank her wine carefully. It didn't taste very nice. In fact, quite a lot of things weren't very nice.
She wasn't a good cook. She'd never been taught proper cookery; at her school it had always been assumed that other people would be doing the cooking and that in any case it would be for fifty people using at least four types of fork. Such dishes as she had mastered were dainty things on doilies.
But she cooked for Sam because she vaguely felt that a wife ought to and, besides, he was an eater who entirely matched her kitchen skills. He liked burnt sausages and fried eggs that went boing when you tried to stick a fork in them. If you gave him caviare, he'd want it in batter. He was an easy man to feed, if you always kept some lard in the house.
But the food here tasted as though it had been cooked by someone who had never even tried before. She'd seen the kitchens, when Serafine had given her the little tour, and they'd just about do for a cottage. The game larders, on the other hand, were the size of barns. She'd never seen so many dead things hanging up.
It was just that she was certain that venison shouldn't be served boiled, with potatoes that were crunchy. If they were potatoes, of course. Potatoes weren't usually grey. Even Sam, who liked the black lumpy bits you got in some mashed potatoes, would have commented. But Sybil had been brought up properly; if you can't find something nice to say about the food, find something else to be nice about.
'These are... really very interesting plates,' she said dutifully. 'Er, are you sure there's been no more news?' She tried to avoid watching the Baron. He was ignoring Sybil and his wife, and was prodding the meat around on his plate as if he'd forgotten what a knife and fork were for.
'Wolfgang and his friends are still out searching,' said Serafine. 'But this is terrible weather for a man to be on the run.'


- 256 -
'He is not on the run!' snapped Sybil. 'Sam is not guilty of anything!'
'Of course, of course. All the evidence is circumstantial. Of course,' said the Baroness soothingly. 'Now, I suggest that as soon as they have the passes clear, you and the, er, the staff get back to the safety of Ankh-Morpork before the real winter hits. We know the country, my dear. If your husband is alive, we can soon do something about it.'
'I will not have him shamed like this! You saw him save the King!'
'I'm sure he did, Sybil. I'm afraid I was talking to my husband at the time, but I don't disbelieve you for a minute. Is it true that he killed all those men in the Wilinus Pass?'
'What? But they were bandits!'
At the other end of the table the Baron had picked up a lump of meat and was trying to tear it apart with his teeth.
'Well, of course. Yes. Of course.'
Sybil pinched the bridge of her nose. Most of her would not have considered Sam Vimes guilty of murder, actual murder, even on the evidence of three gods and a message written on the sky. But stories did get back to her, in a roundabout way. Sam got wound up about things. Sometimes he unwound all at once. There'd been that bad business with that little girl and those men over at Dolly Sisters, and when Sam had broken into the men's lodging he found one of them had stolen one of her shoes, and she'd heard Detritus say that if he hadn't been there only Sam would have walked out of the room alive.
She shook her head. 'I really would like a bath,' she said. There was a clatter from the other end of the table.
'Dear, you will have to eat your dinner in the changing room,' said the Baroness, without looking round. She flashed Lady Sybil a brief, brittle smile. 'We do not, in fact, have a... have such a, a device in the castle.' A thought occurred to her. 'We use the hot springs. So much more hygienic.'
'Out in the forest?'
'Oh, it's quite close. And a quick run around in the snow really tones up the body.'
'I think perhaps I'll have a lie-down instead,' said Lady Sybil firmly. 'But thank you all the same.'
She made her way to the musty bedroom, fuming in a ladylike way.


- 257 -
She couldn't-bring herself to like Serafine, and this was shocking, because Lady Sybil even liked Nobby Nobbs, and that took breeding. But the werewolf scraped across her nerves like a file. She remembered that she'd never liked her at school, either.
Among the other unwanted baggage that had been heaped on the young Sybil to hamper her progress through life was the injunction to be pleasant to people and say helpful things. People took this to mean that she didn't think.
She'd hated the way Serafine had talked about dwarfs. She'd called them 'sub-human'. Well, obviously most of them lived underground, but Sybil rather liked dwarfs. And Serafine spoke of trolls as if they were things. Sybil hadn't met many trolls, but the ones she knew seemed to spend their lives raising their children and looking for the next dollar just like everyone else.
Worst of all, Serafine simply assumed that Sybil would naturally agree with her stupid opinions because she was a Lady. Sybil Ramkin had not had an education in these things, moral philosophy not having featured much in a curriculum that was heavy on flower-arranging, but she had a shrewd idea that in any possible debate the right side was where Serafine wasn't.
She'd only ever written all those letters to her because it was what you did. You always wrote letters to old friends, even if you weren't very friendly with them.
She sat on the bed and stared at the wall until the shouting started, and when the shouting started she knew Sam was alive and well, because only Sam made people that angry.
She heard the key click in the lock.
Sybil rebelled.
She was large and she was kind. She hadn't enjoyed school much. A society of girls is not a good one in which to be large and kind, because people are inclined to interpret that as 'stupid' and, worse, 'deaf'.
Lady Sybil looked out of the window. She was two floors up.
There were bars across it, but they'd been designed to keep something out; from the inside they could be lifted out of their slots. And there were musty but heavy sheets and blankets on the bed. None of this might have suggested very much to the average person, but life in a rather strict school for well brought-up young ladies can give someone a real insight into the tricks of escapology.
Five minutes after the key had turned there was only one bar in the window and it was jerking and creaking in the stonework, suggesting that quite a heavy weight was on the sheets that had been neatly knotted around it.


- 258 -
Torches streamed along the castle walls. The ghastly red and black flag snapped in the wind. Vimes looked over the side of the badge. The water was a long way down, and pure white even before it reached the waterfall. Forward and back were the only possible directions here.
He reviewed his troops. Unfortunately this did not take long. Even a policeman could count up to five. Then there was Gavin and his wolves, who were lurking in the trees. And finally, very definitely finally, there was Gaspode, the Corporal Nobbs of the canine world, who'd attached himself to the group uninvited.
What else was on his side? Well, the enemy preferred not to use weapons. This bonus evaporated somewhat when you remembered that they had, at will, some very nasty teeth and claws.
He sighed and turned to Angua. 'I know this is your family,' he said. 'I won't blame you if you hang back.'
'We'll see, sir, shall we?'
'How are we going to get in, sir?' said Carrot.
'How would you go about it, Carrot?'
'Well, I'd start by knocking, sir.'
'Really? Sergeant Detritus. Forward, please.'
'Sir!'
'Blow the bloody doors off!'
'Yessir!'
Vines turned back to Carrot as the troll gazed thoughtfully at the door and began making extra turns on his crossbow's winch, grunting as the springs fought back. Their fight was unsuccessful.
'This isn't Ankh-Morpork, see?' said Vines.
Detritus hoisted the bow on to his shoulders and took a step forward.
There was a thunk. Vines didn't see the bundle of arrows leave the bow. They were probably already fragments by the time they'd gone a few feet. Halfway towards the doors the expanding cloud of splinters exploded into flame from the air friction.
What hit the doors was a fireball as angry and unstoppable as  and travelling at an appreciable fraction of local lightspeed.


- 259 -
'My gods; Detritus,' muttered Vines as the thunder died away. 'That's not a crossbow, that's a national emergency.'
A few bits of charred door crashed on to the cobbles.
'The wolves won't come in, Mister Vines,' said Angua. 'Gavin will follow me, but they won't come, not even for him.'
'Why not?'
'Because they're wolves, sir. They don't feel at home in houses.'
The only sound was the squeak-squeak of Detritus winding up his bow again.
'The hell with it,' said Vines, drawing his sword and stepping forward.
Lady Sybil untucked her dress from her underwear and stepped carefully across the little courtyard. She was somewhere around the rear of the castle, as far as she could make out.
She flattened herself as best she could against the wall when she heard a sound, and tightened her grip on one of the iron bars that had formerly graced the window.
A large wolf came around the corner, holding a bone in its mouth. It did not look as if it was expecting her, and it certainly wasn't expecting the iron bar.
'Oh, I'm terribly sorry,' said Sybil automatically as it folded up on to the cobbles.
There was an explosion on the other side of the castle. That sounded like Sam.
'Do you think they heard us, sir?' said Carrot.
'Captain, people in Ankh-Morpork probably heard us. So where are all the werewolves?'
Angua pushed forward. 'This way,' she said.
She led them up a flight of low steps and tried one of the doors to the keep. It swung back slowly.
There were torches in the hall, too.
'They'll leave us somewhere to run,' she said. 'We always leave people somewhere to run.'
A pair of smaller doors at the far end of the hall were pushed open. No handles, Vines noted. Paws can't use handles.


- 260 -
Wolfgang stepped in. A couple of dozen werewolves escorted him, fanning out around the room and sitting down... sprawling down and then watching the intruders with keen interest.
'Ah, Civilized!' said Wolfgang cheerfully. 'You won the game! Would you like another go? When people have a second game we give them a handicap! We bite one of their legs off! Good joke, hey?'
'I think I prefer the Ankh-Morpork sense of humour,' said Vimes. 'Where's my wife, you bastard?' He could still hear the sound of Detritus winding. That was the trouble with the big bow. It was only a quick-fire weapon by geological standards.
'And Delphine! Look at what the dog dragged in!' said Wolfgang, ignoring Vimes. He stepped forward. Vimes heard a growl begin in Angua's throat, a sound which would cause instant obedience in many of Ankh-Morpork's criminal population when they encountered it in a dark alley. There was a deeper rumble from Gavin.
Wolfgang stopped.
'You haven't got the brains for this, Wolfie,' said Angua. 'And you couldn't plot your way out of a wet paper bag. Where's Mother?' She looked around at the lolling werewolves. 'Hello, Uncle Ulf... Aunt Hilda... Magweri... Nancy... Unity... The pack's all here, then? Except for Father, who I expect is off rolling in something. What a family—'
'I want these disgusting people out of here right away,' said the Baroness, stepping into the hall.
She glared at Detritus. 'How dare you bring a troll into this house!'
'O-kay, it's all wound up,' said Detritus cheerfully, hoisting the humming bow on to his shoulder. 'Where should I fire it, Mister Vimes?'
'Good grief, not in here! This is an enclosed building!'
'Only until I pull dis trigger, sir.'
'How very civilized,' said the Baroness. 'How very Ankh-Morpork. You think you merely have to threaten and the lesser races back down, eh?'
'Have you seen your gates lately?' said Vimes.
'We're werewolves!' snapped the Baroness — and it was a snap, the words sharp and clipped as though they were barked. 'Stupid toys like that don't frighten us.'
'But it'll slow you down for a while. Now bring out Lady Sybil!'


- 261 -
'Lady Sybil is resting. You are in no position to make demands, Mister Vimes. We are not the criminals here.'
As Vimes's mouth dropped open she went on: 'The game is not against the lore. It has been played for a thousand years. And what else is it that you think we have done? Stolen the dwarfs' pet rock? We—'
'You know it wasn't stolen,' said Vimes. 'And I know—'
'You know nothing! You suspect everything. You have that kind of mind.'
'Your son said—'
'My son unfortunately has honed to perfection every muscle in his body except the ones for thinking with,' said the Baroness. 'In civilized Ankh-Morpork I daresay you can barge into people's houses and stamp around, but here in our barbaric backwater the lore requires something beyond mere assertion.'
'I can smell the fear,' said Angua. 'It's pouring off you, Mother.'
'Sam?'
They looked up. Lady Sybil was standing at the top of some stone stairs leading to a lower floor, looking bewildered and angry. She was holding an iron bar with a bend in it.
' Sybil!'
'She told me you were on the run and they were all trying to save you, but that wasn't right, was it?'
It's a terrible thing to admit to yourself, but when the shoulderblades are pressed firmly against the brickwork then any weapon will do, and right now Vimes saw Sybil loaded and ready to fire.
She got on with people. Practically from the moment she'd been able to talk she'd been taught how to listen. And when Sybil listened to people she made them feel good about themselves. It was probably something to do with being a... a big girl. She tried to make herself seem small, and by default that made those around her feel bigger. She got on with people almost as well as Carrot did. No wonder even the dwarfs liked her.
She had pages to herself in Twurp's Peerage, huge ancestral anchors biting into the past, and dwarfs also respected someone who knew their great-great-great-grandfather's full name. And Sybil couldn't lie, you could see her redden when she tried it. Sybil was a rock. She made Detritus look like a sponge.


- 262 -
'We've been having a lovely run in the woods, dear,' he said. 'Now please come here, because I think we're going to see the King. And I'm going to tell him everything. I've worked it out at last.'
'The dwarfs will kill you,' said the Baroness.
'I can probably outrun a dwarf,' said Vimes. 'And now we're leaving. Angua?'
Angua hadn't moved. Her eyes were still fixed on her mother, and she was still growling.
Vimes recognized the signs. You spotted them in the bars of Ankh-Morpork every Saturday night. Hackles rose, and people climbed up them, and then all that was needed was for someone to break a bottle. Or blink.
'We are leaving, Angua,' he repeated. The other werewolves were standing up and stretching.
Carrot reached out and took her arm. She turned, snarling. It was over in a fraction of a second, and in reality her head had hardly moved before she got a grip on herself.
'Sor thiz iz the boy?' said the Baroness, her voice slurring. 'You betrrray yourrr people for thizz?'
Her ears were lengthening, Vimes was sure. The muscles in her face were moving strangely, too.
'And what else hass Ankh-Morrporrk taught you?'
Angua shuddered. 'Self-control,' she muttered. 'Let's go, Mister Vimes.'
The werewolves closed in as they backed towards the steps.
'Don't turn your back,' said Angua levelly. 'Don't run.'
'Don't need telling,' said Vimes. He was watching Wolfgang, who was moving obliquely across the floor, his eyes fixed on the retreating party.
They'll have to bunch up to follow us through the doorway, he thought. He glanced at Detritus. The giant crossbow was weaving back and forth as the troll tried to keep all the wolves in the field of fire.
'Fire it,' said Angua.
'But they're your family!' said Sybil.
'They'll heal soon enough, believe me!'


- 263 -
'Detritus, don't shoot unless you have to,' Vimes ordered, as they headed towards the drawbridge.
'He has to now,' said Angua. 'Sooner or later Wolfgang will leap, and the others will take—'
'There's something you ought to know, sir,' said Cheery. 'You really ought to know it, sir. It's really important.'
Vimes looked across the drawbridge. Figures massed in the dark: Torchlight glinted off armour and weaponry, blocking the way.
'Well, things couldn't get any worse,' he said.
'Oh, they could if there were snakes on here with us,' said Lady Sybil.
Carrot turned at the sound of Vimes's snort of laughter.
'Sir?'
'Oh, nothing, captain. Keep your eyes on the bastards, will you? We can deal with the soldiers later.'
'Just say the word, sir,' said Detritus.
'You arrre trrapped now,' snarled the Baroness. 'Watchman! Do yourr duty!'
A figure was walking across the bridge, carrying a torch. Captain Tantony reached Vimes and glared at him.
'Stand aside, sir,' he said. 'Stand aside, or by gods, ambassador or not, I'll arrest you!'
Their eyes met. Then Vimes looked away.
'Let's let him through,' he said. 'The man's decided he's got a duty to do.'
Tantony nodded slightly and then marched on across the bridge until he was a few feet from the Baroness. He saluted.
'Take these people away!' she said.
'Lady Serafine von Uberwald?' said Tantony woodenly.
'You know who I am, man!'
'I wish to talk to you concerning certain charges made in my presence.'
Vimes closed his eyes. Oh, you poor dumb idiot... I didn't mean you to actually


- 264 -
'You what?' said the Baroness.
'It has been alleged, my lady, that a member or members of your family have been involved in a conspiracy to—'
'How darrre you!' screamed Serafine.
And Wolfgang leapt, and the future became a series of flickering images.
In mid-air he changed into a wolf.
Vimes grabbed the bottom of Detritus's bow and forced it upwards at the same time as the troll pulled the trigger.
Carrot was running before Wolfgang landed on Captain Tantony's chest.
The sound of the bow echoed around the castle, above the noise of a thousand whirring fragments scything through the sky.
Carrot reached Wolfgang in a flat dive. He hit the wolf with his shoulder, and the two of them were bowled over.
Then, like some moving magic lantern show coming back up to speed, the scene exploded.
Carrot got to his feet and
It must be because we're abroad, thought Vimes. He's trying to do things properly.
He'd squared up to the werewolf, fists balled, a stance taken straight from Fig. l of The Noble Art of Fisticuffs, which looked impressive right up to the point when your opponent broke your nose with a quart mug.
Carrot had a punch like an iron bar, and he landed a couple of heavy blows on Wolfgang as he got up.
The werewolf seemed more puzzled than hurt. Then he changed shape, caught a fist in both hands and gripped it hard. To Vimes's horror he stepped forward, without apparent effort, forcing Carrot back.
'Don't try anything, Angua,' said Wolf, grinning happily. 'Or else I'll break his arm. Oh, perhaps I'll break his arm anyway! Yes!'
Vimes even heard the crack. Carrot went white. Someone holding a broken arm has all the control they need. Another idiot, thought Vimes. When they're down you don't let them get back up! Damn the Marquis of Fantailler! Policing by consent was a good theory, but you had to get your opponent to lie still first.


- 265 -
'Ah! And he has other bones!' said Wolfgang, pushing Carrot away. He glanced towards Angua. 'Get back, get back. Or I'll hurt him some more! No, I shall hurt him some more anyway!'
Then Carrot kicked him in the stomach.
Wolfgang went over backwards, but turned this into a backflip and a mid-air spin. He landed lightly, leapt back at the astonished Carrot and punched him twice in the chest.
The blows sounded like shovels hitting wet concrete.
Wolfgang grabbed the falling man, lifted him over his head with one hand and hurled him down on to the bridge in front of Angua. 'Civilized man!' he shouted. 'Here he is, sister!'
Vimes heard a sound down beside him. Gavin was watching intently, making urgent little noises in his throat. A tiny part of Vimes, the little rock-hard core of cynicism, thought: all right for you, then.
Steam was rising off Wolfgang. He shone in the torchlight. The blond hair across his shoulders gleamed like a slipped halo.
Angua knelt down by the body, face impassive. Vimes had been expecting a scream of rage.
He heard her crying.
Beside Vimes, Gavin whined. Vimes stared down at the wolf. He looked at Angua trying to lift Carrot, and then he looked at Wolfgang. And then back again.
'Anyone else?' said Wolfgang, dancing back and forth on the boards. 'How about you, Civilized?'
'Sam!' hissed Sybil. 'You can't—'
Vimes drew his sword. It wouldn't make any difference now. Wolfgang wasn't playing now, he wasn't punching and running away. Those arms could push a fist through Vimes's ribcage and out the other side
A blur went past at shoulder height. Gavin struck Wolfgang in the throat, knocking him over. They rolled across the bridge, Wolfgang changing back to wolf shape to lock jaw against jaw. They broke, circled, and went for one another again.
Dreamlike, Vimes heard a small voice say: 'He wouldn't last five minutes back home fightin' like that. The silly bugger's gonna get creamed, fightin' like that! Stuff the Marquis of flamin' Fantailler!'


- 266 -
Gaspode was sitting bolt upright, stubby tail vibrating.
'The daftie! This is how you win a dogfight!'
As the wolves rolled over and over, Wolfgang tearing at Gavin's belly, Gaspode arrived growling and yapping and launched himself in the general direction of the werewolf's hindquarters.
There was a yip. Gaspode's growls became somewhat muffled. Wolfgang leapt vertically. Gavin sprang. The three hit the parapet of the bridge together, knocked the crumbling stones aside, hung for a moment in a snarling ball, and then dropped down into the roaring whiteness of the river.
The whole of it, from the moment Tantony had crossed the bridge, had taken much less than a minute.
The Baroness was staring down into the gorge. Keeping his eye on her, Vimes spoke to Detritus.
'Are you sure you're werewolf-proof, sergeant?'
'Pretty much, sir. Anyway, I got the bow wound up again.'
'Go into the castle and fetch the resident Igor, then,' said Vimes calmly. 'If anyone even tries to stop you, shoot them. And shoot anyone standing near them.'
'No problem about dat, sir.'
'We're not at home to Mister Reasonable, sergeant.'
'I do not hear him knockin', sir.'
'Go to it, then. Sergeant Angua?'
She did not look up.
'Sergeant Angua!'
Now she looked up.
'How can you be so... so cool?' she snarled. 'He's hurt.'
'I know. Go and talk to those watchmen hanging around on the other end of the bridge. They look scared. I don't want any accidents. We're going to need them. Cheery, cover Carrot and the lad with something. Keep them warm.'
I wish there was something to keep me warm, he thought. The thoughts came slowly, like drips of freezing water. He felt that ice would crackle off him if he


- 267 -
moved, that frost would sparkle in his footsteps, that his mind was full of crisp snow.
'And now, madam,' he said, turning back to the Baroness, 'you will give me the Scone of Stone.'
'He'll be back!' hissed the Baroness. 'That fall was nothing! And he'll find you.'
'For the last time... the stone of the dwarfs.
The wolves are waiting out there. The dwarfs are waiting down in the city. Give me the stone, and we all might survive. This is diplomacy. Don't let me try anything else.'
'I have only to say the word—'
Angua began to growl.
Sybil strode towards the Baroness and grabbed her. 'You never answered a single letter! All those years I wrote to you!'
The Baroness stared at her in amazement, as people so often did when struck with Sybil's sharp non sequiturs.
'If you know we've got the Scone,' she said to Vimes, 'then you know it's not the real one. And much good may it do the dwarfs!'
'Yes, you had it made in Ankh-Morpork. Made in Ankh-Morpork! They should have stamped it on the bottom. But someone killed the man who did it. That's murder. It's against the law.' Vimes nodded at the Baroness. 'It's a thing we have.'
Gaspode dragged himself out of the water and stood; shivering, on the shingle. Every single part of him felt bruised. There was a nasty ringing noise in his ears. Blood dripped down one leg.
The last few minutes had been a little hazy, but he did recall they'd involved a lot of water that had hit him like hammers.
He shook himself. His coat jangled where the water was already freezing.
Out of habit, he walked over to the nearest tree and, wincing, raised a leg.
EXCUSE ME.
A busy, reflective silence followed.
'That was not a good thing you just did,' said Gaspode.
I'M SORRY. PERHAPS THIS IS NOT THE RIGHT MOMENT.


- 268 -
'Not for me, no. You may have caused some physical damage here.'
IT'S HARD TO KNOW WHAT TO SAY.
'Trees don't normally talk back, is my point.' Gaspode sighed. 'So what happens now?'
I BEG YOUR PARDON?
'I'm dead, right?'
NO. NO ONE IS MORE SURPRISED THAN ME, I MAY SAY, BUT YOUR TIME DOES NOT APPEAR TO BE NOW.
Death pulled out an hourglass, held it up against the cold stars for a moment, and stalked away along the riverbank.
''scuse me, there's no chance of a lift, is there?' said Gaspode, struggling after him.
NONE WHATSOEVER.
'Only, being a short dog in deep snow is not good for the of wossnames, if you get my—'
Death had stopped at a little bay. An indistinct shape lay in a few inches of water.
'Oh,' said Gaspode.
Death leaned down. There was a flash of blue and then he vanished.
Gaspode shivered. He paddled into the water and nudged Gavin's sodden fur with his nose.
'Shouldn't be like this,' he whined. 'If you was a human, they'd put you in a big boat on the tide and set fire to it, an' everyone'd see. Shouldn't just be you an' me down here in the cold.'
There was something that had to be done, too. He knew it in his bones. He crawled back to the bank and pulled himself up on to the trunk of a fallen willow.
He cleared his throat. Then he howled.
It started badly, hesitantly, but it picked up and got stronger, richer... and when he paused for breath the howl went on and on, passing from throat to throat across the forest.
The sound wrapped him as he slid off the log and struggled on towards higher ground. It lifted him over the deeper snow. It wound around the trees, a plaiting


- 269 -
of many voices becoming something with a life of its own. He remembered thinking: maybe it'll even get as far as Ankh-Morpork.
Maybe it'll get much further than that.
Vimes was impressed by the Baroness. She fought back in a corner.
'I know nothing about any deaths—'
A howl came up from the forest. How many wolves were there? You never saw them and then, when they cried out, it sounded as though there was one behind every tree. This one went on and on — it sounded like a cry thrown into a lake of air, the ripples spreading out across the mountains.
Angua threw her head back and screamed. Then, breath hissing between her teeth, she advanced on the Baroness, fingers flexing.
'Give him... the damn stone,' she hissed. 'Will any... of... you... face me? Now? Then give him the stone!'
'What theemth to be the trouble?'
Igor lurched through the stricken gates, trailed by Detritus. He caught sight of the two bodies and hurried over, like a very large spider.
'Fetch the stone,' growled Angua. 'And then... we... will leave. I can smell it. Or do you want me to take it?'
Serafine glared at her, then turned on her heel and ran back into the ruins of the castle. The other werewolves shrank back from Angua as if her stare was a whip.
'If you can't help these men,' said Vimes to the kneeling Igor, 'your future does not look good.'
Igor nodded. 'Thith one,' he said, indicating Tantony, 'fleth woundth, I can thtitch him up a treat, no problem. Thith one,' he tapped Carrot, '... nasty break on the arm.' He glanced up. 'Marthter Wolfgang been playing again?'
'Can you make him well?' snapped Vimes.
'No, it'th hith lucky day,' said Igor. 'I can make him better. I've got thome kidneyth jutht in, a lovely little pair, belonged to young Mithter Crapanthy, hardly touched a drop of thtrong licker, thame about the avalanche...'
'Does he need them?' said Angua.
'No, but you thould never mith an opportunity to improve yourthelf, I alwayth thay.'


- 270 -
Igor- grinned. It was a strange sight. The scars crawled around his face like caterpillars.
'Just see to the arm,' said Vimes firmly.
The Baroness reappeared, flanked by several werewolves. They also backed away as Angua spun around.
'Take it,' said Serafine. 'Take the wretched thing. It's a fake. No crime has been committed!'
'I'm a policeman,' said Vimes. 'I can always find a crime.'
The sleigh slid under its own weight down the track towards Bonk, the town's watchmen running alongside it and giving it the occasional push. With their captain down they were lost and bewildered and in no mood to take orders from Vimes, but they did what Angua commanded because Angua was of the class that traditionally gave them orders.
The two casualties were bedded down on blankets.
'Angua?' said Vimes.
'Yes, sir?'
'There's wolves keeping pace with us. I can see them running between the trees.'
'I know.'
'Are they on our side?'
'Let's just say they're not on anyone else's side yet, shall we? They don't like me much, but they know... Gavin did, and right now that's what's important. Some of them are out looking for my brother.'
'Would he have survived that? It was a long way down.'
'Well, it wasn't fire or silver. There's nothing but white water for miles. It probably hurt a lot, but we heal amazingly well, sir.'
'Look, I'm sorry that—'
'No, Mister Vimes, you're not. You shouldn't be. Carrot just didn't understand what Wolfgang is like. You can't beat something like him in a fair fight. I know he's family, but... personal is not the same as important. Carrot always said that.'
'Says that,' said Lady Sybil sharply.
'Yes.'


- 271 -
Carrot opened his eyes. 'What... happened back there?' he said.
'Wolfgang hit you,' said Angua. She wiped his brow.
'What with?' Carrot tried to push himself upwards, winced and fell back.
'What have I always told you about the Marquis of Fantailler?' said Vimes.
'Sorry, sir.'
Something bright rose from the distant forests. It vanished, and then a green light expanded into existence. A moment later came the pop of the flare.
'The signallers have got to the tower,' said Vimes.
'Can't this damn thing go any faster?' said Angua.
'I mean, we can contact Ankh-Morpork,' said Vimes. After everything, he felt curiously cheered by this. It was as if a special human howl had gone up. He wasn't floundering around loose now. He was floundering on the end of a very long line. That made all the difference.
It was a small public room over a shop in Bonk and, since it belonged to everybody, it looked as though it didn't belong to anyone. There was dust in the corners, and the chairs that were currently arranged in a ragged circle had been chosen for their ability to be stacked neatly rather than sat on comfortably.
Lady Margolotta smiled at the assembled vampires. She liked these meetings.
The rest of the group were a pretty mixed bunch, and she wondered what their motives were. But perhaps they at least shared one conviction — that what you were made as wasn't what you had to be or what you might become...
And the trick was to start small. Suck, but don't impale. Little steps. And then you found that what you really wanted was power, and there were much politer ways of getting it. And then you realized that power was a bauble. Any thug had power. The true prize was control. Lord Vetinari knew that. When heavy weights were balanced on the scales, the trick was to know where to place your thumb.
And all control started with the self.
She stood up. They watched her with slightly worried yet friendly faces.
'My name, in the short form, is Lady Margolotta Amaya Katerina Assumpta Crassina von Uberwald, and I am a vampire...'
They chorused: 'Hello, Lady Margolotta Amaya Katerina Assumpta Crassina von Uberwald!'


- 272 -
'It has been almost four years now,' said Lady Margolotta, 'and I am still taking vun night at a time. Vun neck would always be vun too many. But... there are compensations...'
There were no guards on the gate of Bonk, but there was a cluster of dwarfs outside the embassy as the sleigh slid to a halt. The wolves in the traces jerked nervously and whined at Angua.
'I'll have to let them go,' she said, getting out. 'They've only come this far because they're frightened of me...'
Vimes wasn't surprised. At the moment, anything would be frightened of Angua.
Even so, a squad of dwarfs was hurrying to the sledge.
It'd take them a few seconds to get a grip on things, Vimes realized. There were uptown guards here, and an Igor, and a werewolf. They'd be puzzled as well as suspicious. That should give him a tiny crack to lever open. And, ashamed as he was to say it, an arrogant bastard always had the edge.
He glared at the lead dwarf. 'What is your name?' he demanded.
'You are under—'
'You know the Scone of Stone was stolen?'
'You... what?'
Vimes reached round and pulled a sack out of the sleigh.
'Bring those torches closer!' he shouted, and because he delivered the command in a tone that said there was no doubt that it'd be obeyed, it was obeyed. I've got twenty seconds, he thought, and then the magic goes away.
'Now look at this,' he said, lifting the thing out of the sack.
Several dwarfs fell to their knees. The murmuring spread out. Another howl, another rumour... In his current state he could see, in his mind's bloodshot eye, the towers in the night, clicking and clacking, delivering to Genua exactly the message that had been sent from Ankh-Morpork.
'I want to take this to the King,' he said in the hushed silence.
'We will take it—' the dwarf began, moving forward.
Vimes stepped aside.
'Good evenin', boys,' said Detritus, standing up in the sleigh.


- 273 -
The tortured noises the bow's springs were making under their preternatural stress sounded like some metal animal in extreme pain. The dwarf was a couple of feet away from several dozen arrow points.
'On the other hand,' said Vimes, 'we could continue talking. You look like a dwarf who likes to talk.'
The dwarf nodded.
'First of all, is there any reason why the two wounded men I have here couldn't be taken inside before they die of their wounds?'
The bow twitched in Detritus's hands.
The dwarf nodded.
'They can go inside and be treated?' said Vimes.
The dwarf nodded again, still looking into a bundle of arrows bigger than his head.
'Capital. See how we get on when we simply talk? And now I suggest that you arrest me.'
'You want me to arrest you?'
'Yes. And Lady Sybil. We place ourselves under your personal jurisdiction.'
'That's right,' said Sybil. 'I demand to be arrested.' She drew herself up and out, righteous indignation radiating like a bonfire, causing the dwarfs to back away from what was clearly an unexploded bosom.
'And since the arrest of its ambassador will certainly cause... difficulties with Ankh-Morpork,' Vimes went on, 'I strongly suggest you take us directly to the King.'
By blessed chance, the distant tower sent up another flare. Green light illuminated the snows for a moment.
'What's that mean?' said the dwarf captain.
'It means that Ankh-Morpork knows what's going on,' said Vimes, praying that it did. 'And I don't reckon you want to be the dwarf who started the war.'
The dwarf spoke to the dwarf beside him. A third dwarf joined them. Vimes couldn't follow the hurried conversation, but right behind him Cheery whispered: 'It's a bit beyond him. He doesn't want anything to happen to the Scone.'
'Good.'


- 274 -
The dwarf turned back to Vimes. 'What about the troll?'
'Oh, Detritus will stay in the embassy,' said Vimes.
This seemed to lighten the tone of the debate somewhat, but it still appeared to be heavy going.
'What's happening now?' whispered Vimes.
'There's no precedent for anything like this,' muttered Cheery. 'You're supposed to be an assassin, but you've come back to see the King and you've got the Scone—'
'No precedent?' said Sybil. 'Yes there bloody well is, pardon my Klatchian...' She took a deep breath and began to sing.
'Oh,' said Cheery, shocked.
'What?' said Vimes.
The dwarfs were staring at Lady Sybil as she changed up through the gears into full, operatic voice. For an amateur soprano she had an impressive delivery and range, a touch too wobbly for the professional stage but exactly the kind of high coloratura to impress the dwarfs.
Snow slid off roofs. Icicles vibrated. Good grief, thought Vimes, impressed. With a spiky corset and a hat with wings on it she could be ferrying dead warriors off a battlefield...
'It's Ironhammer's "Ransom" song,' said Cheery. 'Every dwarf knows it! Er, it doesn't translate well, but... "I come now to ransom my love, I bring a gift of great wealth, none but the King can have power over me now, standing in my way is against all the laws of the world, the value of truth is greater than gold"... er, there's always been some debate about that last line, sir, but it's generally considered acceptable if it's a really big truth—'
Vimes looked at the dwarfs. They were fascinated, and one or two of them were mouthing along to the words.
'Is it going to work?' he whispered.
'It's hard to think of a bigger precedent than this, sir. I mean, it's the song of songs! The ultimate appeal! It's built into dwarf law, almost! They can't refuse. It'd be... not being a dwarf, sir!'
As Vimes watched, one dwarf pulled a fine chain-mail handkerchief out of his pocket and blew his nose with a wet, jingling noise. Several others were in tears.


- 275 -
When the last note died away there was silence, and then the sudden thunder of axes banging on shields.
'It's all right!' said Cheery. 'They're clapping!'
Sybil, panting with the effort, turned to her husband. She gleamed in the torchlight. 'Do you think that was all right?' she said.
'By the sound of it, you're an honorary dwarf,' said Vimes. He held out his arm. 'Shall we go?'
News was going on ahead. Dwarfs were pouring out of the entrance to Downtown when the Duke and Duchess arrived.
There were dwarfs behind them now. They were being swept along. And all the time, hands reached out to touch the Scone as it passed.
Dwarfs crowded into the elevator with them. Down below, the roar of conversation stopped abruptly as Vimes stepped out and raised the Scone above his head. Then the rock echoed and re-echoed to one enormous cheer.
They can't even see it, thought Vimes. To most of them it's a tiny white dot. And that was what the plotters had known, wasn't it? You don't have to steal something to hold it hostage.
'They are to be arrested!' Dee was hurrying forward, with more guards behind him.
'Again?' said Vimes. He kept the Scone aloft.
'You attempted to kill the King! You escaped from your cell!'
'That's something about which we could hear more evidence,' said Vimes, as calmly as he could. The Scone was heavy. 'You can't keep people in the dark all the time, Dee.'
'You shall certainly not see the King!'
'Then I will drop the Scone!'
'Do so! It won't—'
Vimes heard the gasp of the ,dwarfs behind him.
'It won't what?' he said quietly. 'It won't matter? But this is the Scone!'
One of the dwarfs that had accompanied them from the embassy shouted something, and several others took it up.


- 276 -
'Precedent is on your side,' Cheery translated. 'They say they can always kill you after you've seen the King.'
'Well, not exactly what I was hoping, but it'll have to do.' Vimes looked at Dee again. 'You said you wanted me to find the thing, didn't you? And now, how fitting that I return it to its rightful owner...'
'You... the King is... You may give it to me,' said Dee, pulling himself up to the height of Vimes's chest.
'Absolutely not!' snapped Lady Sybil. 'When Ironhammer returned the Scone to Bloodaxe, would he have given it to Slogram?'
There was a general chorus of dissent.
'Of course not,' said Dee, 'Slogram was a trait—'
He stopped.
'I think,' said Vimes, 'that we had better see the King, don't you?'
'You can't demand that!'
Vimes indicated the press of dwarfs behind them. 'You're going to be amazed at how difficult it's going to be for you, explaining that to them,' he said.
It took half an hour to see the King. He had to be roused. He had to dress. Kings don't hurry.
In the meantime, Vimes and Sybil sat in an anteroom on chairs too small for them, surrounded by dwarfs who weren't themselves sure if they were a prisoner escort or an honour guard. Other dwarfs were peering around the doorway; Vimes could hear the buzz of excited conversation.
They weren't wasting much time looking at him. Their gaze always fell on the Scone that he held in his lap. It was clear that most of them hadn't even seen it before.
You poor little sods, he thought. This is what you all believe in, and before the day's out you're going to be told it's just a bad fake. You'll see it's a forgery. And that about wraps it up for your little world, doesn't it? I set out to solve a crime and I'm going to end up committing a bigger one.
I'm going to be lucky to get out of here alive, aren't I?
A door was rolled open. A couple of what Vimes thought of as the heavy dwarfs stepped through and gave everyone the official, professional look which said that


- 277 -
for your comfort and convenience we have decided not to kill you right at this very moment.
The King entered, rubbing his hands.
'Ah, your excellency,' he said, pronouncing the word as a statement of fact rather than a welcome. 'I see you have something that belongs to us.'
Dee detached himself from the crowd at the door.
'I must make a serious accusation, sire!' he said.
'Really? Bring these people into the law room. Under guard, of course.'
He swept away. Vimes looked at Sybil and shrugged. They followed the King, leaving the hubbub of the main cavern behind.
Once again Vimes was in the room with too many shelves and too few candles. The King sat down.
'Is the Scone heavy, your excellency?'
'Yes!'
'It is weighted with history, see? Put it down on the table with extreme care, please. And... Dee?'
'That... thing,' said Dee, pointing a finger, 'that thing is... a fake, a copy. A forgery! Made in Ankh-Morpork! Part of a plot which, I am sure can be proven, involves milord Vimes! It is not the Scone!'
The King lifted a candle a little closer to the Scone and gave it a critical look from several angles.
'I have seen the Scone many times before,' he said at last, 'and I would say that this appears to be the true thing and the whole of the thing.'
'Sire, I demand- that is, I advise you to demand a closer inspection, sire.'
'Really?' said the King mildly. 'Well, I am not an expert, see? But we are fortunate, are we not, that Albrecht Albrechtson is here for the coronation? All of dwarfdom knows, I think, that he is the authority on the Scone and its history. Have him summoned. I daresay he is close at hand. I should think just about everyone is on the other side of that door now.'
'Indeed, sire.' The look of triumph on Dee's face as he swept past Vimes was almost obscene.


- 278 -
'I think we're going to need another song to get us out of this one, dear,' murmured Vimes.
'I'm afraid I can only remember that one, Sam. The others were mainly about gold.'
Dee returned with Albrecht and a following of other senior and somewhat magisterial dwarfs.
'Ah, Albrecht,' said the King. 'Do you see this on the table? It is claimed that this is not the true thing and the whole of the thing. Your opinion is sought, please.' The King nodded at Vimes. 'My friend understands Morporkian, your excellency. He just chooses not to pollute the air by speaking it. Just his way, see?'
Albrecht glared at Vimes and then stepped up to the table.
He looked at the Scone from several angles. He moved the candles and leaned down so that he could inspect the crust closely.
He took a knife from his belt, tapped the Scone with it and listened with ferocious care to the note produced. He turned the Scone over. He sniffed at it.
He stood back, his face screwed up in a scowl, and then said, 'H gradz?'
The dwarfs muttered among themselves, and then, one by one, nodded.
To Vimes's horror, Albrecht chipped a tiny piece from the Scone and put it in his mouth.
Plaster, thought Vimes. Fresh plaster from Ankh-Morpork. And Dee will talk his way out of it
Albrecht spat the piece out into his hand and looked up at the ceiling for a moment. While he chewed.
Then he and the King exchanged a long, thoughtful stare.
'P'akga,' said Albrecht at last, 'a p'akaga-ad...'
Behind the outbreak of murmuring Vimes heard Cheery translate: "'It is the thing, and the whole of-"'
'Yes, yes,' said Vimes. And he thought: by gods, we're good. Ankh-Morpork, I'm proud of you. When we make a forgery it's better than the real damn thing.
Unless... unless I've missed something...
'Thank you, gentlemen,' said the King. He waved a hand. The dwarfs filed out, reluctantly, with many backward glances at Vimes.


- 279 -
'Dee? Please fetch my axe from my chamber, will you?' the King said. 'Yourself, please. I don't want anyone else to handle it. Your excellency, you and your lady will remain here. Your... dwarf must leave, however. The guards are to be posted on the door. Dee?'
The Ideas Taster hadn't moved.
'Dee?'
'Wh... Yes, sire?'
'You do what I tell you!'
'Sire, this man's ancestor once killed a king!'
'I daresay the family have got it out of their system! Now do as I say!'
The dwarf hurried away, turning to stare at Vimes for a moment as he left the cave.
The King sat back. 'Sit down, your monitorship. And your lady, too.' He put one elbow on the arm of the chair and cupped his chin on his hand. 'And now, Mister Vimes, tell me the truth. Tell me everything. Tell me the truth that is more valuable than small amounts of gold.'
'I'm not sure I know it any more,' said Vimes.
'Ah. A good start,' said the King. 'Tell me what you suspect, then.'
'Sire, I'd swear that thing is as fake as a tin shilling.'
'Oh. Really?'
'The real Scone wasn't stolen, it was destroyed. I reckon it was smashed and ground up and mixed with the sand in its cave. You see, sire, if people see that something's gone, and then you turn up with something that looks like it, they'll think "This must be it, it must be, because it isn't where we thought it was." People are like that. Something disappears and something very much like it turns up somewhere else and they think it must somehow have got from one place to the other...' Vimes pinched his nose. 'I'm sorry, I haven't had much sleep...'
'You are doing very well for a sleepwalking man.'
'The... thief was working with the werewolves, I think. They were behind the "Sons of Agi Hammerthief" business. They were going to blackmail you off the throne. Well, you know that. To keep Uberwald in the dark. If you didn't. step down there'd be a war, and if you did Albrecht would get the fake Scone.'


- 280 -
'What else do you think you know?'
'Well, the fake was made in Ankh-Morpork. We're good at making things. I think someone had the maker killed, but I can't find out more until I get back. I will find out.'
'You make things very well in your city, then, to fool Albrecht. How do you think that was done?'
'You want the truth, sire?'
'By all means.'
'Is it possible that Albrecht was involved? Find out where the money is, my old sergeant used to say.'
'Hah. Who was it said, "Where there are policemen, you find crimes"?'
'Er, me, sir, but—'
'Let us find out. Dee should have had time to think. Ah...'
The door opened. The Ideas Taster stepped through, carrying a dwarfish axe. It was a mining axe, with a pick point on one side, in order to go prospecting, and a real axe blade on the other, in case anyone tried to stop you.
'Call the guards in, Dee,' said the King. 'And his excellency's young dwarf. These things should be seen, see.'
Oh, good grief, thought Vimes, watching Dee's face as the others shuffled in. There must be a manual. Every copper knows how this goes. You let 'em know you know they've done something wrong, but you don't tell 'em what it is and you certainly don't tell 'em how much you know, and you keep 'em off balance, and you just talk quietly and
'Place your hands upon the Scone, Dee.'
Dee spun around. 'Sire?'
'Place your hands upon the Scone. Do as I say. Do it now.'
-you keep the threat in view but you never refer to it, oh no. Because there's nothing you can do to them that their imagination isn't already doing to themselves. And you keep it up until they break, or in the case of my old dame school, until they feel their boots get damp.
And it doesn't even leave a mark.


- 281 -
'Tell me about the death of Lorigfinger, the candle captain,' said the King, after Dee, with a look of hollow apprehension, had touched the Scone.
The words rushed out. 'Oh, as I told you, sire, he—'
'If you do not keep your hands pressed upon the Scone, Dee, I will see to it that they are fixed there. Tell me again.'
'I... he... took his own life, sire. Out of shame.'
The King picked up his axe and turned it so that the long point faced outwards.
'Tell me again.'
Now Vimes could hear Dee's breathing, short and fast.
'He took his own life, sire!'
The King smiled at Vimes. 'There's an old superstition, your excellency, that since the Scone contains a grain of truth it will glow red hot if a lie is told by anyone touching it. Of course, in these more modern times, I shouldn't think anyone believes it.' He turned to Dee.
'Tell me again,' he whispered.
As the axe moved slightly the reflected light of the candles flashed along the blade.
'He took his own life! He did!'
'Oh, yes. You said. Thank you,' said the King. 'And do you recall, Dee, when Slogram sent false word of Bloodaxe's death in battle to Ironhammer, causing Ironhammer to take his own life in grief, where was the guilt?'
'It was Slogram's, sir,' said Dee promptly. Vimes suspected the answer had come straight from some rote-remembered teaching.
'Yes.'
The King let the word hang in the air for a while, and then went on: 'And who gave the order to kill the craftsman in Ankh-Morpork?'
'Sire?' said Dee.
'Who gave the order to kill the craftsman in Ankh-Morpork?' The King's tone did not change. It was the same comfortable, sing-song voice. He sounded as though he would carry on asking the question for ever.
'I know nothing about—'


- 282 -
'Guards, press his hands firmly against the Scone.'
They stepped forward. Each one took an arm.
'Again, Dee. Who gave the order?'
Dee writhed as if his hands were burning. 'I... I...'
Vimes could see the skin whiten on the dwarf's hands as he strained to lift them from the stone.
But it's a fake. I'd swear he destroyed the real one, so he knows it's a fake, surely? It's just a lump of plaster, probably still damp in the middle! Vimes tried to think. The original Scone had been in the cave, hadn't it? Was it? If it wasn't, where had it been? The werewolves thought they had a fake, and it certainly hadn't left his sight since. He tried to think through the fog of fatigue.
He'd half wondered, once, whether the original Scone had been the one in the Dwarf Bread Museum. That would have been the way to keep it safe. No one would try to steal something that everyone knew was a fake. The whole thug was , nothing was what it seemed, it was all a fog.
Which one was real?
'Who gave the order, Dee?' said the King.
'Not me! I said they must take all necessary steps to preserve secrecy!'
'To whom did you say this?'
'I can give you names!'
'Later, you will. I promise you, boyo,' said the King. 'And the werewolves?'
'The Baroness suggested it! That is true!'
'Uberwald for the werewolves. Ah, yes... "joy through strength". I expect they promised you all sorts of things. You may take your hands off the Scone. I do not wish to distress you further. But why? My predecessors spoke highly of you, you are a dwarf of power and influence... and then you let yourself become a paw of the werewolves. Why?'
'Why should they be allowed to get away with it?' Dee snapped, his voice breaking with the strain.
The King looked across at Vimes. 'Oh, I suspect the werewolves will regret that they—' he began.


- 283 -
'Not them! The... ones in Ankh-Morpork! Wearing make-up and dresses and... and abominable things!' Dee pointed a finger at Cheery. 'Ha'ak! How can you even look at it! You let her,' and Vimes had seldom heard a word sprayed with so much venom, 'her flaunt herself, here! And it's happening everywhere because people have not been firm, not obeyed, have let the old ways slide! Everywhere there are reports. They're eating away at everything dwarfish with their... their soft clothes and paint and beastly ways. How can you be King and allow this? Everywhere they are doing it and you do nothing! Why should they be allowed to do this?' Now Dee was sobbing. 'I can't!'
Vimes saw that Cheery, to his amazement, was blinking back tears.
'I see,' said the King. 'Well, I suppose that is an explanation.' He nodded to the guards. 'Take... her away. Some things must wait a day or two.'
Cheery saluted, suddenly. 'Permission to go with her, sire?'
'What on earth for, young... young dwarf?'
'I expect she'd like someone to talk to, sire. I know I would.'
'Indeed? I see your commander has no objection. Off you go, then.'
The King leaned back when the guards had left with their prisoner and the prisoner's new counsellor.
'Well, your excellency?'
'This is the real Scone?'
'You are not certain?'
'Dee was!'
'Dee... is in a difficult state of mind.' The King looked at the ceiling. 'I think I will tell you this because, your excellency, I really do not want you going through the rest of your time here asking silly questions. Yes, this is the true Scone.'
'But how could—'
'Wait! So was the one that is, yes, ground to dust in the cave by Dee in her... madness,' the King went on. 'So were the... let me see... five before that. Still untouched by time after fifteen hundred years? What romantics we dwarfs are! Even the very best dwarf bread crumbles after a few hundred.'
'Fakes?' said Vimes. 'They were all fakes?'


- 284 -
Suddenly the King was holding his mining axe again. 'This, milord, is my family's axe. We have owned it for almost nine hundred years, see. Of course, sometimes it needed a new blade. And sometimes it has required a new handle, new designs on the metalwork, a little refreshing of the ornamentation... but is this not the ninehundred-year-old axe of my family? And because it has changed gently over time, it is still a pretty good axe, y'know. Pretty good. Will you tell me this is a fake too?' He sat back again.
Vimes remembered the look on Albrecht's face. 'He knew.'
'Oh, yes. A number of... more senior dwarfs know. The knowledge runs in families. The first Scone crumbled after three hundred years when the king of the time touched it. My ancestor was a guard who witnessed it, see. He got accelerated promotion, you could say. I'm sure you understand me. After that, we were a little more prepared. We would have been looking for a new one in fifty years or so in any case. I'm glad one was made in the large dwarf city of Ankh-Morpork, and I wouldn't be at all surprised if it turns out to be an excellent keeper. Look, they've even got the currants right, see?'
'But Albrecht could have exposed you!'
'Exposed what? He is not King, but I will be very surprised if one of his family is not King again, in the fullness of time. What goes around comes around, as the Igors say.' The King leaned forward.
'You have been labouring under a misapprehension; I reckon. You think that because Albrecht dislikes Ankh-Morpork and has... oldfashioned ideas, he is a bad dwarf. But I have known him for two hundred years. He is honest and honourable... more so than me, that I'm sure of. Five hundred years ago he would have made a fine king. Today, perhaps not. Perhaps... hah... the axe of my ancestors needs a different handle. But now I am King and he accepts that with all his heart because if he did not, he'd think he wasn't a dwarf, see? Of course he will now oppose me at every turn. Being Low King was never an easy job. But, to use one of your metaphors, we are all floating in the same boat.
We may certainly try to push one another over the side, but only a maniac like Dee would make a hole in the bottom.'
'Corporal Littlebottom thought there'd be a war—' said Vimes weakly.
'Well, there are always hotheads. But while we argue about who steers the boat, we don't deny that it's an important voyage. I see you are tired. Let your good lady take you home. But as a nightcap... What is it, your excellency, that Ankh-Morpork wants?'
'Ankh-Morpork wants the names of the murderers,' mumbled Vimes.


- 285 -
'No, that is what Commander Vimes wants. What is it that Ankh-Morpork wants? Gold? So often it is gold. Or iron, perhaps? You use a lot of iron.'
Vimes blinked. His brain had finally given up. There was nothing left any more. He wasn't certain he could even stand up.
He remembered a word.
'Fat,' he said blankly.
'Aha. . Are you sure? There's some good iron now. Iron makes you strong. Fat only makes you slippery.'
'Fat,' parroted Vimes, feeling the darkness closing in. 'Lots of fat.'
'Well, certainly. The price is ten Ankh-Morpork cents a barrel but, your excellency, since I have come to know you, I feel that perhaps—'
'Five cents a barrel for grade-one highrendered, three cents for grade two, ten cents per barrel for heavy tallow, safe and delivered to Ankh-Morpork,' said Sybil. 'And all from the Schmaltzberg Bend levels and measured on the Ironcrust scale. I have some doubt about the long-term quality of the Big Tusk wells.'
Vimes tried to focus on his wife. She seemed, inexplicably, a long way away. 'Wha'?'
'Er, I caught up with some reading when I was in the embassy, Sam. Those notebooks. Sorry.'
'Would you beggar us, madam?' said the King, throwing up his hands.
'We may be flexible on delivery,' said Lady Sybil. ,
'Klatch would pay at least nine for grade one,' said the King.
'But the Klatchian ambassador isn't sitting here,' said Sybil.
The King smiled. 'Or married to you, my lady, much to his loss. Six, five and fifteen.'
'Six, dropping to five after twenty thousand, three and half across the board for grade two. I can give you thirteen on tallow.'
'Acceptable, but give me fourteen on white tallow and I'll allow seven on the new pale suets we're finding. They're making an acceptable candle, look you.'
'Six, I'm afraid. You haven't plumbed the full extent of those deposits, and I think it may be reasonable to expect high levels of scrattle and BCBs in the lower


- 286 -
layers. Besides, I think your forecasts about the amount of those deposits are erring on the optimistic side.'
'Wha' BCBs?' murmured Vimes.
'Burnt crunchy bits,' said Sybil. 'Mostly unbelievably huge and ancient animals, deep fried.'
'You astonish me, Lady Sybil,' said the King. 'I did not know you were trained in fat extraction.'
'Cooking Sam's breakfasts is an education in itself, your majesty.'
'Oh, well, far be it for a mere king to argue. Six, then. Price to remain stable for two years—' The King saw Sybil's mouth open. 'All right, all right, three years. I'm not an unreasonable king.'
'Prices on the dock?'
'How can I refuse?'
'Agreed, then.'
'The paperwork will be with you in the morning. And now we really must go our separate ways,' said the King. 'I can see his excellency has had a long day. Ankh-Morpork will be swimming in fat. I can't imagine what you'll use it all for.'
'Make light,' said Vimes, and, as darkness fell at last, fell forward gently into the welcoming arms of sleep.
Sam Vimes awoke to the smell of hot fat.
Softness enveloped him. It practically imprisoned him.
For a moment he thought it was snow, except that snow wasn't usually this warm. Finally, he identified it as the cloud-like softness of the mattress on the ambassadorial bed.
He let his attention drift back to the fat smell. It had... overtones. There was a definite burnt component. Since Sam Vimes's spectrum of gastronomic delight mainly ranged from 'well fried' to 'caramelized', it was decidedly promising.
He shifted position and regretted it immediately. Every muscle in his body squealed in protest. He lay still and waited for the fire in his back to die down.
Bits and pieces of the previous two days assembled themselves in his head. Once or twice he winced. Had he really gone through the ice like that? Was it Sam Vimes who'd stepped up to fight the werewolf, despite the fact that the thing was


- 287 -
strong enough to bend a sword in a circle? And had Sybil won a lot of fat off the King? And...
Well, here he was in a nice warm bed and by the smell of it there was breakfast on the way.
Another piece of recollection floated into place.. Vimes groaned and forced his legs out of the bed. No, Wolfgang couldn't have survived that, surely.
Naked, he staggered into the bathroom and spun the huge taps. Hot pungent water gushed out.
A minute later he was lying full length again. It was rather too hot, but he could remember the snows, and maybe from now on he could never be hot enough.
Some of the pain washed away.
Someone rapped on the door. 'It's me, Sam.'
'Sybil?'
She came in, carrying a couple of very large towels and some fresh clothes.
'Good to see you up again. Igor's frying sausages. He doesn't like doing it. He thinks they should be boiled. And he's doing slumpie and fikkun haddock and Distressed Pudding. I didn't want the food to go to waste, you see. I don't think I want to stay for the rest of the celebrations.'
'I know what you mean. How's Carrot?'
'Well, he says he doesn't want sausages.'
'What? He's al- He's up?'
'Sitting up, at least. Igor's a marvel. Angua said it was a bad break but he's just got some sort of device that... well, Carrot's not even got a sling on now!'
'Sounds a useful man to have around,' said Vimes, pulling on his civilized trousers.
'Angua says Igor's got an icehouse in the cellars and there's frozen jars of, of... well, let's just say he suggested that you might like liver and onions for breakfast and I said no.'
'I like liver and onions,' said Vimes. He thought about it. 'Up until now, anyway.'
'I think the King wants us to go as well. In a polite way. A lot of very respectful dwarfs came round here with paperwork first thing this morning.'


- 288 -
Vimes nodded grimly. It made sense. If he was King he'd want Vimes out of here too. Here's some grateful thanks, a nice trading agreement, terribly sorry to see you go, do call again, only not too soon...
Breakfast was everything he'd dreamed of. Then he went to see the invalid.
Carrot was pale, grey under the eyes, but smiling. He was sitting up in bed, drinking fatsup.
'Hello, Mister Vimes! We won, then?'
'Didn't Angua tell you?'
'She went off with the wolves when I was asleep, Lady Sybil said.'
Vimes recounted the events of the night as best he could.
Afterwards, Carrot said, 'Gavin was a very noble creature. I'm sorry he's dead. I'm sure we'd have got on well.'
You mean every word of it, Vimes thought. I know you do. But it works out all right for you, doesn't it? It always does. If it had been the other way about, if it had been Gavin that attacked Wolf first, then -I know it would have been you that went over the falls with the bastard. But it wasn't you, was it? If you were dice, you'd always roll sixes.
And the dice don't roll themselves. If it wasn't against everything he wanted to be true about the world, Vimes might just then have believed in destiny controlling people. And gods help the other people who were around when a big destiny was alive in the world, bending every poor bugger around itself...
Out loud, he said, 'Poor old Gaspode went over too.'
'How? What was he doing?'
'Er, you could say he had our lad's full attention. A real streetfighter.'
'Poor little soul. He was a good dog at heart.'
And once again words that would have sounded trite and wrong on anyone else's lips were redeemed by the way Carrot said them.
'And what about Tantony?' said Vimes.
'Left this morning, Lady Sybil said.'
'Good grief! And Wolfgang played noughts and crosses on his chest!'
'Igor's a dab hand with a needle, sir.'


- 289 -
Afterwards, a thoughtful Sam Vimes stepped out into the coach yard. An Igor was already loading the luggage.
'Er, which one are you?' said Vimes.
'Igor, marthter.'
'Ah. Right. And, er, are you happy here, Igor? We could do with a... man of your talents in the Watch, and no mistake.'
Igor looked down from the top of the coach: 'In Ankh-Morpork, marthter? My word. Everyone wantth to go to Ankh-Morpork, marthter. It'th a very tempting offer. But I know where my duty lieth, your exthellenthy. I mutht get the plathe ready for the next exthellenthy.'
'Oh, surely—'
'However, fortuitouthly my nephew Igor ith looking for a pothition, marthter. He thould do well in Ankh-Morpork. He'th rather too modern for Uberwald, that'th for thure!'
'Good lad, is he?'
'Hith heart'th in the right plathe. I know that for thertain, thur.'
'Er, good. Well, get a message to him, then. We're leaving as soon as we can.'
'He will be tho exthited, thur! I've heard that in Ankh-Morpork bodieth jutht lie around in the thtreetth for anyone to take away!'
'It's not quite as bad as that, Igor.'
'Ithn't it? Oh well, you can't have everything. I'll tell him directly.' Igor lurched off in a sort of high-speed totter.
I wonder why they all walk like that, thought Vimes. They must have one leg shorter than the other. Either that or they're not good at choosing boots.
He sat down on the steps to the house and fished out a cigar. So that was it, then. Bloody politics again. It was always bloody politics, or bloody diplomatics. Bloody lies in smart clothing. Once you got off the streets criminals just flowed through your fingers. The King and Lady Margolotta and Vetinari... they always looked at some sort of big picture. Vimes knew he was, and always would be, a little picture man. Dee was useful, so she'd probably get, oh, a few days breaking bread or whatever it was they gave you here for being naughty. After all, all she'd destroyed was a fake, wasn't it?
Was it?


- 290 -
But she'd thought she was committing a much bigger crime. That ought to mean something, in Sam Vimes's personal gallery of little pictures.
And the Baroness was as guilty as hell. People had died. As for Wolfgang... well, some people were just built guilty. It was as simple as that. Anything they did became a crime, simply because it was them doing it.
He blew out a stream of smoke.
People like that shouldn't be allowed to simply die their way out of things.
But... he hadn't, had he?
The wolves had gone a long way down the river, Sybil had said, on both banks. There wasn't a sniff of him. Further down was a mass of rapids and another fall. What couldn't kill him would certainly make him wish it could.
If he'd gone downstream. But upstream there was nothing but wild water, too, right up to the town.
No, he couldn't... surely no one could swim up a waterfall...
A chilly little feeling began at the back of Vimes's neck. But any sensible person would get right out of the country, wouldn't they? The wolves were looking for him, Tantony wouldn't remember him fondly and if Vimes judged the King correctly then the dwarfs would have some dark little revenge in store, too.
The trouble was that, if you formed a picture in your mind of a sensible person, and tried to superimpose it on a picture of Wolfgang, you couldn't get them to meet anywhere.
There was an old saying, wasn't there: as a dog returneth to his vomit, so a fool returneth to his folly. Well, that got Wolfgang coming and going.
Vimes stood up and turned around carefully. There was no one there. Sounds came in from the street gateway — people laughing, the sound of a harness, the clank of a shovel clearing up last night's snow.
He sidled into the embassy, his back to the wall, and groped his way towards the stairs, peering into every doorway. He ran across the expanse of the hallway, did a tumbling roll, and ended up against the far wall.
'Is there anything wrong, sir?' said Cheery. She was watching him from the top of the stairs.
'Er, have you seen anything odd?' said Vimes, dusting himself off self-consciously. 'And I realize that we're talking about a house with Igor in it.'


- 291 -
'Could you give me a hint, sir?'
'Wolfgang, godsdammit!'
'But he's dead, sir. Isn't he?'
'Not dead enough!'
'Er, what do you want me to do?'
'Where's Detritus?'
'Polishing his helmet, sir!' said Cheery, on the point of panic.
'What the hell is he wasting time with that for?'
'Er, er, because we're supposed to leave for the coronation in ten minutes, sir?'
'Oh, yes...'
'Lady Sybil told me to come and find you. In a very distinct tone of voice, sir.'
At that point Lady Sybil's voice boomed along the corridor. 'Sam Vimes! You come here!'
'That one, sir,' Cheery added helpfully.
Vimes trailed into the bedroom. Sybil was wearing another blue dress, a tiara and a firm expression.
'Is it a posh do?' said Vimes. 'I thought if I put on a clean shirt—'
'Your official dress uniform is in the dressing room,' said Sybil.
'It was rather a long day yesterday—'
'This is a coronation, Samuel Vimes. It is not a come-as-you-are! Go and get dressed, quickly. Including, and I don't want to have to say this twice, the helmet with the feathers.'
'But not the red tights,' said Vimes, hoping against hope. 'Please?'
'The red tights, Sam, go without saying.'
'They go at the knees,' said Vimes, but it was the grumble of the defeated.
'I'll ring for Igor to come and help you.'
'Things will have come to a pretty pass when I can't put my own tights on, dear, thank you.'


- 292 -
Vimes dressed hurriedly, listening for...
anything. Some creak in the wrong place, perhaps.
At least this was a Watch uniform, even if it did have buckled shoes. It included a sword. The duking outfit didn't allow for one, which had always struck Vimes as amazingly stupid. You got made a duke for being a fighter, and then they gave you nothing to fight with.
There was a tinkle of glass back in the bedroom, and Lady Sybil was astonished to see her husband enter at a run with his sword raised.
'I dropped the top of a scent bottle, Sam! What's up with you? Even Angua says he's probably miles away and in no shape to cause trouble! Why're you so nervy?'
Vimes put down the sword and tried to relax.
'Because our Wolfgang's a damn bottle covey, dear. I know the sort. Any normal person, they crawl off if they get a beating. Or they have the sense to stay down, at least. But sometimes you get one who just won't let go. Eight-stone weaklings who'll try to headbutt Detritus. Evil little bantamweight bastards who'll bust a bottle on the bar and try to attack five watchmen all at once. You know what I mean? Idiots who'll go on fighting long after they should stop. The only way to put 'em down is to put 'em out.'
'I think I recognize the type, yes,' said Lady Sybil, with an irony that failed to register with Sam Vimes until some days later. She picked some lint off his cloak.
'He's going to be back. I can feel it in my water,' mumbled Vimes.
'Sam?'
'Yes?'
'Can I have your attention for a couple of minutes? Wolfgang is Angua's problem, not yours. I really need to talk to you very quietly for a little while without you running off after werewolves.' She said it as if this was a minor character flaw, like a tendency to leave his boots where people could trip over them.
'Er, they run after me,' he pointed out.
'But there's always people being found dead or trying to kill you—'
'I don't ask them to, dear.'
'Sam, I'm going to have a baby.'


- 293 -
Vimes's head was full of werewolves and his automatic husbandly circuitry cut in ready to respond with 'Yes, dear,' or 'Choose any colour you like,' or 'I'll get someone to sort it out.' Fortunately his brain itself had its own sense of self-preservation and, not wishing to be inside a skull that was stowed in by a bedside lamp, rewrote Sybil's words in white-hot fire across his inner eyeball and then went and hid.
That's why the response came out as a weak 'What? How?'
'The normal way, I hope.'
Vimes sat down on the bed. 'And... not right now?'
'I very much doubt it. But Mrs Content says it's definite, and she's been a midwife for fifty years.'
'Oh.' Some more brain functions crept back. 'Good. That's... good.'
'It'll probably take a while to sink in.'
'Yes.' Another neuron lit up. 'Er, everything will be all right, will it?'
'What do you mean?'
'Er, you're rather, you're not as... you...'
'Sam, my family have been bred for breeding. It's an aristocratic tradition. Of course everything will be all right.'
'Oh. Good.'
Vimes sat and stared. His head felt like some vast sea that had just been parted by a prophet. Where there should have been activity there was just bare sand and the occasional floundering fish. But huge steep waves were tottering on either side, and in a minute they would crash down and cause cities to flood a hundred miles away.
More glass tinkled, somewhere downstairs.
'Sam, Igor's probably just dropped something,' said Sybil, seeing his expression. 'That's all. Probably just knocked over a glass.'
There was a snarl and a scream, abruptly cut off.
Vimes leapt off the bed. 'Lock the door after me and push the bed against it!' He paused for a moment in the doorway. 'Without straining yourself!' he added, and ran for the stairs.
Wolfgang was trotting across the hall.


- 294 -
He was different this time. Wolf ears sprouted from a head that was still human. His hair had grown around him like a mane. Patches of fur were tufted on his skin, and were mostly streaked with blood.
The rest of him... was having trouble deciding what it was. One arm was trying to be a paw.
Vimes reached for his sword and remembered that it was back on the bed. He rummaged in his
pockets. He knew the other thing was here, he remembered picking it up off the dressing table...
His fingers closed on his badge. He held it out.
'Stop! In the name of the law!'
Wolfgang looked up at him, one eye glowing yellow. The other was a mess.
'Hello, Civilized,' he growled. 'You wait for me, hey?'
He ducked into the corridor that led to the room where Carrot lay. Vimes tried to catch him up, saw claw-tipped fingers curl around the door and haul it out of its frame.
Carrot was reaching for his sword
And then Wolfgang was flying backwards under the full weight of Angua. They landed back in the hall, a rolling ball of fur, claws and teeth.
When werewolf fights werewolf, there are advantages to either shape. It's an eternal struggle to get a position where hands beat claws. And body shapes have lives of their own, a dangerous attribute if it is allowed to act unchecked. A cat's instinct is to jump on something that moves, but this is not a correct action if what is moving has a fizzing fuse. The mind has to fight its own body for control and the other body for survival. Mix this together, and the noise suggests that there are four creatures in the whirling ball of rage. And each one of them has brought several friends. And none of them like any of the others.
A shadow made Vimes spin around. Detritus, in shining armour, was aiming the Piecemaker over the banister.
'Sergeant! No! You'll hit Angua too!'
'Not a problem, sir,' said Detritus, "cos it won't kill 'em, so all we have to do, see, is sort out der bits dat are Wolfgang an' belt him over der head when he gets himself back together—'


- 295 -
'If you fire that in here his bits will be mixed up with our bits and there won't be big bits! Put the damn thing down!'
Wolfgang couldn't control his shape well, Vimes saw. He couldn't quite manage to be full wolf or full human, and Angua was making the most of that. She was ducking, weaving... biting.
But even if you put him down you couldn't put him out.
'Mister Vimes!' Now it was Cheery, beckoning urgently from the passage that led to the kitchen. 'You ought to come here right now!'
She was white-faced. Vimes nudged Detritus. 'If they separate, just grab him, right? Just try to hold him still!'
Igor was lying in the kitchen surrounded by broken, glass. Wolfgang must have landed on him and taken out his perpetual anger on a soft target. The patchwork man was bleeding heavily and lay like a doll that had been flung hard against a wall. 'Marthter,' he groaned.
'Can you do anything for him, Cheery?'
'I wouldn't know where to start, sir!'
'Marthter, you got to remember thith, right?' Igor groaned.
'Er, yes... what?'
'You got to get me into the ithehouthe downthtairth and let Igor know, underthtand?'
'Which Igor?' said Vimes desperately.
'Any Igor!' Igor clutched at Vimes's sleeve. 'Me heart'th had it, but me liver'th right ath ninepenthe, tell him! Nothing wrong with my brain that a good bolt of lightnin' won't thort out. Igor can have me right hand, he'th got a cuthtomer waiting. There'th yearth of good thervithe left in my lower intethtine. Left eye not up to much, but I darethay thome poor thoul can find a uthe for it. The right knee ith nearly new. Old M'th Prodzky down the road would value my hip jointth, tell him. Got all that?'
'Yes, yes, I think so.'
'Right. Remember... What goeth around, cometh around...'
Igor sank down.
'He's gone, sir,' said Cheery.


- 296 -
But he'll soon be up and on someone else's feet, Vimes thought. He didn't say it aloud. Cheery was soft hearted. Instead he said, 'Can you get him into his icehouse? By the sound of it Angua's winning—'
He ran back into the hall. It was a wreck. As he arrived Angua managed to get a headlock on Wolfgang and ran him into a wooden pillar. He staggered, and she spun and scythed his legs from under him with a kick.
I taught her that, Vimes thought, as her brother landed heavily. Some of that dirty fighting — that's Ankh-Morpork fighting, that is.
But Wolfgang was up again like a rubber ball and somersaulting over her head. That brought him to the front door. He smashed it open with a blow and leapt out into the street.
And... that was it. A room full of debris, snowflakes blowing in, and Angua sobbing on the floor.
He picked her up. She was bleeding in a dozen places. That was as much of a diagnosis as Sam Vimes, not used these days to surveying naked young women at close quarters, thought he could decently attempt.
'It's all right, he's gone,' he said, because he had to say something.
'It's not all right! He'll lie low for a while and then he'll be back! I know him! It won't matter where we go! You've seen him! He'll just track us down and follow us and then he'll kill Carrot!'
'Why?'
'Because Carrot's mine!'
Sybil advanced down the stairs, carrying Vimes's crossbow.
'Oh, you poor thing,' she said. 'Come here, let's find something to cover you up. Sam, isn't there something you can do?'
Vimes stared at her. Built into Sybil's expression was the unquestioning assumption that he could do something.
An hour ago he'd been having breakfast. Ten minutes ago he'd been putting on this stupid uniform. In a real room, with his wife. And it had been a real world, with a real future. And suddenly the dark was back, spattered with red rage.
And if he gave in to it he'd lose. That was the beast screaming, inside, and Wolfgang was a better beast. Vimes knew he didn't have the knack, the mindless, driving nastiness; sooner or later his brain would start operating, and kill him.


- 297 -
Perhaps, said his brain, you start by using me...
'Ye-es,' he said. 'Yes, I think there is something I can do...'
Fire and silver, thought Vimes. Well, silver's in pretty short supply in Uberwald.
'You want I should come?' said Detritus, who could pick up signals.
'No, I think... I think I want to make an arrest. I don't want to start a war. Anyway, you need to wait here in case he doubles back. But you could lend me your penknife.'
Vimes found a sheet in one of the broken boxes and tore off a long strip. Then he took his crossbow from his wife.
'You see, now he's committed a crime in Ankh-Morpork,' he said. 'That makes him mine.'
'Sam, we're not—'
'You know, everyone kept telling me I wasn't in Ankh-Morpork so often that I believed it. But this embassy is Ankh-Morpork and, right now,' he hefted the bow, 'I am the law.'
'Sam?'
'Yes, dear?'
'I know that look. Don't hurt anyone else, will you?'
'Don't worry, dear. I'm going to be civilized about it.'
There was a cluster of dwarfs in the street outside, surrounding one lying on the snow in a pool of blood.
'Which way?' said Vimes, and if they didn't understand his words they understood the question. Several of them pointed along the street.
As he walked Vimes cradled the crossbow and lit a thin cigar.
Now this he understood. He was never at ease with politics, where good and bad were just, apparently, two ways of looking at the same thing or, at least, were described like that by the people who were on the side Vimes thought of as 'bad'.
It was all too complicated and, where it was complicated, it meant that someone was trying to fool you. But on the street, in hot pursuit, it was all so clear. Someone was going to be still standing at the end of the chase, and all you had to concentrate on was making sure it was you.


- 298 -
On a street corner a cart had overturned and its driver was kneeling by a horse that had been ripped open.
'Which way?'
The man pointed.
The new street was wider, busier, and there were a number of elegant coaches moving slowly through the crowds. Of course... the coronation.
But that belonged to the world of the Duke of Ankh and, right now, he wasn't here. There was only Sam Vimes, who didn't much like coronations.
There were screams up ahead, and the flow of people was suddenly against Vimes, so that he appeared to be heading up-stream, like a salmon.
The street opened into a large square. People were running now, which suggested to Vimes that he was still moving in the right direction. It was pretty clear that you'd find Wolfgang somewhere no one else wanted to be.
There was a flurry of movement on one side of him and a squad of the town guard trotted past. They halted. One of them walked back. It was Tantony.
He looked Vimes up and down. 'I have you to thank for last night?' he said. There were fresh scars on his face, but they were already healing. We've got to get an Igor, Vimes reminded himself.
'Yes,' said Vimes. 'The good bits and the bad bits.'
'And you see what happens when you stand up to a werewolf?'
Vimes opened his mouth to say, 'Is that a uniform you're wearing, captain, or is it fancy dress?' but stopped himself in time. 'No, it's what happens when you're fool enough to stand up to a werewolf with no back-up and no firepower,' he said. 'I'm sorry, but we all have to learn that lesson. Integrity makes very poor armour.'
The man reddened. 'What is your business here?' he said.
'Our hairy friend just murdered someone in the embassy, which is—'
'Yes, yes, Ankh-Morpork territory. But this isn't! I am the watchman here!'
'I'm in hot pursuit, captain. Ah. I see you know the term?'
'I... I... that doesn't apply!'
'Really? Every copper knows about the rule of hot pursuit. You can chase the suspect over your legal boundary if you're in hot pursuit. Of course, there may be a bit of legal argy-bargy once he's caught, but we can save that for later.'


- 299 -
'I intend to arrest him myself for crimes committed today!'
'You're too young to die. Besides, I saw him first. Tell you what... After he's killed me you can have a go. Fair enough?' He looked Tantony in the eye. 'Now get out of the way.'
'You know I could have you arrested.'
'Probably, but until now I'd got you down as an intelligent man.'
Tantony nodded, and proved Vimes right. 'All right. How may we be of assistance?'
'By keeping out of the way. Oh, and scraping up my remains if this doesn't work.'
Vimes felt the man's stare on the back of his neck as he set off again.
There was a statue in the middle of the square. It was of . Some ancient craftsman had tried to achieve in bronze and stone the moment when the allegorical animal had thundered down out of the sky and gifted the country its incredible mineral wealth. Around it were idealized and rather heavy-set figures of dwarfs and men, holding hammers and swords, and striking noble attitudes; they probably represented Truth, Industry, Justice and Mother's Home-Made Fat Pancakes for all Vimes knew, but he felt truly far from home in a country where, apparently, no one wrote graffiti on public statues.
A man was sprawled on the cobbles, with a woman kneeling beside him. She looked tearfully at Vimes and said something in Uberwaldean. All he could do was nod.
Wolfgang jumped down from a perch on top of the statue to Bad Sculpting and landed a few yards away, grinning.
'Mister Civilized! You want another game?'
'You see this badge I'm holding up?' said Vimes.
'It's a very small one!'
'But you see it?'
'Yes, I see your little badge!' Wolfgang started to move sideways, arms hanging loosely by his sides.
'And I'm armed. Did you hear me tell you I'm armed?'
'With that silly bow?'


- 300 -
'But you just heard me say I'm armed, yes?' said Vimes, loudly, turning to face the moving werewolf. He puffed on his cigar, letting a glow build up.
'Yes! Is this what you call civilized?'
Vimes grinned. 'Yes, this is how we do it.'
'My way is better!'
'And now you're under arrest,' said Vimes. 'Come along and make no fuss and we'll tie you securely and hand you over to whatever passes for justice around here. I realize this may be difficult.'
'Hah! Your Ankh-Morpork sense of humour!'
'Yes, any minute now I'll drop my trousers. So, you're resisting arrest?'
'Why these stupid questions?' Now Wolfgang was almost dancing.
'Are you resisting arrest?'
'Yes indeed! Oh yes! Good joke!'
'Look at me laughing.'
Vimes tossed the crossbow aside and swung a tube out from under his cloak. It was made of cardboard and a red cone protruded from one end.
'A stupid silly firework!' shouted Wolfgang, and charged.
'Could be,' said Vimes.
He didn't bother to aim. These things were never designed for accuracy or speed. He simply removed his cigar from his mouth and, as Wolfgang ran towards him, pressed it into the fuse hole.
The mortar jerked as the charge went off and its payload came tumbling out slowly and trailing smoke in a lazy spiral. It looked like the stupidest weapon since the toffee spear.
Wolfgang danced back and forth under it, grinning,, and as it passed several feet over his head he leapt up gracefully and caught it in his mouth.
And then it exploded.
The flares were made to be seen twenty miles away. Even with his eyes tightly shut, Vimes saw the glare through his lids.


- 301 -
When the body had stopped rolling, Vimes looked around the square. People were watching from the coaches. The crowds were silent.
There were a lot of things he could say. 'Son of a bitch!' would have been a good one. Or he could say, 'Welcome to civilization!' He could have said, 'Laugh this one off!' He might have said, 'Fetch!'
But he didn't, because if he had said any of those things then he'd have known that what he had just done was murder.
He turned away, tossed the empty mortar over his shoulder and muttered, 'The hell with it.'
At times like this teetotalism bit down hard.
Tantony was watching.
'Don't say a word out -of place,' said Vimes, without altering his stride. 'Just don't.'
'I thought those things shot very fast...'
'I cut down the charge,' said Vimes, tossing Detritus's penknife in the air and catching it again. 'I didn't want to hurt anyone.'
'I heard you warn him that you were armed. I heard him twice resist arrest. I heard everything. I heard everything you wanted me to hear.'
'Yes.'
'Of course, he might not have known that law.'
'Oh, really? Well, I didn't know it was legal in these parts to chase some poor sod across the country and maul him to death and, do you know, that didn't stop anyone.' Vimes shook his head. 'And don't give me that pained look. Oh, yes ... now you can say I did it wrong, you can say I ought to have handled it differently. That sort of thing is easy to say afterwards. I'll say it myself, maybe.' In the middle of every night, he added to himself, after I've woken up seeing those mad eyes. 'But you wanted him stopped as much as I did. Oh yes, you did. But you couldn't, because you didn't have the means, and I did, because I could. And you've got the luxury of judging me because you're still alive. And that's the truth of it, all wrapped up. Lucky one for you, eh?'
The crowds parted ahead of Vimes. He could hear whispers around him.
'On the other hand,' said Tantony, distantly, as if he hadn't heard what Vimes had just said, 'you did only fire that thing to warn him...'


- 302 -
'Huh?'
'Clearly you were not to know that he would automatically try to catch the... explosive,' said Tantony, and it seemed to Vimes that he was rehearsing the line. 'The... dog-like qualities of a werewolf would hardly have occurred to a man from the big city.'
Vimes held his gaze for a moment, and then patted him on the shoulder. 'Hold on to that thought,' he said.
A coach pulled to a halt beside him as he continued on his way. It slid to a stop so silently — not a jingle of harness, not a clop of horseshoe — that Vimes jumped sideways out of shock.
The horses were black, with black plumes on their heads. The coach was a hearse, the traditional long glass windows now filled with smoked black glass. There was no driver; the reins were simply loosely knotted on a brass railing.
A door swung open. A veiled figure leaned out. 'Your excellency? Do let me give you a lift back to the embassy. You look so tired.'
'No, thank you,' said Vimes grimly.
'I apologize for the emphasis on black,' said Lady Margolotta. 'It is rather expected of one on these occasions, I'm afraid—'
Vimes swung himself up and into the carriage with furious speed.
'You tell me,' he growled, waving a finger under her nose, 'how anyone can swim up a vertical waterfall? I was prepared to believe anything about that bastard, but even he. couldn't have managed that.'
'Certainly that is a puzzle,' said the vampire calmly, as the driverless coach moved on. 'Superhuman strength, possibly?'
'And now he's gone and that's one up for the vampires, eh?'
'I vould like to think that it's going to be a blessing for the whole country.' Lady Margolotta leaned back. Her rat with the bow round its neck watched Vimes suspiciously from its pink cushion. 'Wolfgang vas a sadistic murderer, a throwback who frightened even his own family. Delphine... sorry, Angua... vill have some peace of mind. An intelligent young lady, I've alvays thought. Leaving here vas the best thing she ever did. The darkness vill be a little less frightening. The vorld will be a better place.'
'And I've handed you Uberwald?' said Vimes.


- 303 -
'Don't be stupid. Uberwald is huge. This is one small part of it. And now it's going to change. You have been a breath of fresh air.'
Lady Margolotta drew a long holder from her bag and inserted a black cigarette. It lit itself.
'Like you, I have found consolation in a... different vice,' she said. 'Black Scopani. They grow the tobacco in total darkness. Do try some. You could waterproof roofs with it. I believe Igor makes cigars by rolling the leaves between his thighs.' She blew out a stream of smoke. 'Or someone's thighs, anyvay. Of course, I am sorry for the Baroness. It must be so hard for a verevolf, realizing that she's raised a monster. As for the Baron, give him a bone and he's happy for hours.' Another stream of smoke. 'Do look after Angua. Happy Families is not a popular game among the undead.'
'You helped him come back! Just like you did for me!'
'Oh, he'd have come back anyvay, in time. Some time when you weren't expecting him. He'd track Angua like a wolverine. Best that things ended today.' She gave him an appraising look through the smoke. 'You're good at anger, your grace. You save it up for when you need it.'
'You couldn't have known I'd beat him. You left me in the snow. I wasn't even armed!'
'Havelock Vetinari would not have sent a fool to Uberwald.' More smoke, which writhed in the air. 'At least, not a stupid fool.'
Vimes's eyes narrowed. 'You've met him, haven't you?'
'Yes.'
'And taught him all he knows, right?'
She blew smoke down her nostrils and gave him a radiant smile.
'I'm sorry? You think I taught him? My dear sir... As for vhat I've got out of all this... vell, a little breathing space. A little influence. Politics is more interesting than blood, your grace. And much more fun. Beware the reformed vampire, sir — the craving for blood is only a craving, and with care it can be diverted along different channels. Uberwald is going to need politicians. Ah, I believe ve are here,' she added, although Vimes could have sworn that she hadn't so much as glanced out of the window.
The door opened.


- 304 -
'If my Igor's still there, do tell him I vill see him Downtown. So nice to have met you. I'm sure ve shall meet again. And do please present my fondest regards to Lord Vetinari.'
The door shut behind Vimes. The coach moved off.
He swore, under his breath.
The hall of the embassy was full of Igors. Several of them touched their forelocks, or at least the line of stitch marks, when they saw him. They were carrying heavy metal containers of varying sizes, on which frost crystals were forming.
'What's this?' he said. 'Igor's funeral?' Then it sank in. 'Oh, my gods... with party loot bags? Everyone gets something to take home?'
'You could thay that, thur, you could call it that,' said an Igor. 'But we think that putting bodieth in the ground ith rather gruethome. All thothe wormth and thingth.' He tapped the tin box under his arm. 'Thith way, he'll be mothtly up and about again in no time,' he added brightly.
'Reincarnation on the instalment plan, eh?' said Vimes weakly.
'Motht amuthing, thur,' said the Igor gravely. 'But it'th amathing what people need. Heartth, liverth, handth... we keep a litht, thur, of detherving catheth. By tonight there will be thome very lucky people in thethe partly'
'And these parts in some very lucky people?'
'Well done, thur. I can thee you are a wit. And one day thome poor thoul will have a really nathty brain injury, and' — he tapped the chilly
box again —'what goeth around cometh around.'
He nodded at Cheery, and at Vimes. 'I mutht be going now, thur. Tho much to do, you know how it ith.'
'I can imagine,' said Vimes. He thought: the axe of my grandfather. You change the bits around, but there'll always be an Igor.
'They're really rather selfless people, sir,' said Cheery, when the last Igor had lurched off. 'They do a lot of good work. Er, they even took his suit and his boots because they'll be useful to someone.'
'I know, I know. But—'
'I know what you mean, sir. Everyone's in the drawing room. Lady Sybil said you'd be back. She said anyone with that look in their eye comes back.'


- 305 -
'We're all going to the coronation. Might as well see this through. Is that what you'll be wearing, Cheery?'
'Yes, sir.'
'But it's just... ordinary dwarf clothes. Trousers and everything.'
'Yes, sir.'
'But Sybil said you'd got a fetching little green number and a helmet with a feather in it.'
'Yes, sir.'
'You're free to wear whatever you want, you know that.'
'Yes, sir. And then I thought about Dee. And I watched the King when he was talking to you, and... well, I can wear what I like, sir. That's the point. I don't have to wear that dress and I shouldn't wear it just because other people don't want me to. Besides, it made me look like a rather stupid lettuce.'
'That's all a bit complicated for me, Cheery.'
'It's probably a dwarf thing, sir.'
Vimes pushed open the doors to the drawing room. 'It's over,' he said.
'Did you hurt anyone else?' said Sybil.
'Only Wolfgang.'
'He'll be back,' said Angua.
'No.'
'You killed him?'
'No. I put him down. I see you're up, captain.'
Carrot got to his feet, awkwardly, and saluted. 'Sorry I haven't been much use, sir.'
'You just chose the wrong time to fight fair. Are you well enough to come?'
'Er, Angua and I want to stay here, if it's all right with you, sir. We've got things to talk about. And, er... do.'
It was the first coronation Vimes had attended. He'd expected it to be... stranger, touched somehow by glory.


- 306 -
Instead it was dull, but at least it was big dull, dullness distilled and cultivated over thousands of years until it had developed an impressive shine, as even grime will if you polish it long enough. It was dull hammered into the shape and form of ceremony.
It had also been timed to test the capacity of the average bladder.
A number of dwarfs read passages from ancient scrolls. There were what sounded like excerpts from the Koboldean Saga, and Vimes wondered desperately if they were in for another opera, but they were over after a mere hour. There were more readings from different dwarfs. At one point the King, who had been standing alone in the centre of a circle of candlelight, was presented with a leather bag, a small mining axe and a ruby. Vimes didn't catch the meaning of any of this, but by the sounds it was clear that each item was of huge and satisfying significance to the thousands who were standing behind him. Thousands? No, there must be tens of thousands, he thought. The bowl of the cavern was full of tier upon tier of dwarfs. Maybe a hundred thousand...
... and he was in the front row. No one had said anything. The four of them had simply been led there and left, although the murmurings suggested that the presence of Detritus was causing considerable attention. Senior, long-bearded and richly clothed dwarfs were all around them.
Someone was being taught something. Vimes wondered who the lesson was directed at.
Finally, the Scone was brought in, small and dull and yet carried by twenty-four dwarfs on a large bier. It was laid, reverentially, on a stool.
He could sense the change in the air of the huge cavern, and once again he thought: there's no magic, you poor devils, there's no history. I'll bet my wages the damn thing was moulded with rubber from a vat that had last been used in the preparation of Sonky's Eversure Dependables, and there's your holy relic for you...
There were more readings, much shorter this time.
Then the dwarfs who had been participating in the endless and baffling hours withdrew from the centre of the cavern, leaving the King looking as small and alone as the Scone itself.
He stared around him and, although it was surely impossible for him to have seen Vimes among the thousands in the gloom, it did seem that his gaze rested on the Ankh-Morpork party for a fraction of a second.
The King sat down.


- 307 -
A sigh began. It grew louder and louder, a hurricane made up of the breath of a nation. It echoed back and forth among the rocks until it drowned out all other sounds.
Vimes had half expected the Scone to explode, or crumble, or flash red-hot. Which was stupid, said a dwindling part of himself — it was a fake, a nonsense, something made in Ankh-Morpork for money, something that had already cost lives. It was not, it could not be real.
But in the roaring air he knew that it was, for all who needed to believe, and in a belief so strong that truth was not the same as fact... he knew that for now, and yesterday, and tomorrow, both the thing, and the whole of the thing.
Angua noticed that Carrot was walking better even as they reached the forest below the falls, and the shovel over his shoulder hardly burdened him at all.
There were wolf prints all over the snow.
'They won't have stayed,' she said, as they walked between the trees. 'They felt things keenly when he died but... wolves look to the future. They don't try to remember things.'
'They're lucky,' said Carrot.
'They're realistic. It's just that the future contains the next meal and the next danger. Is your arm all right?'
'It feels as good as new.'
They found the freezing mass of fur lying at the water's edge. Carrot pulled it out of the water, scraped off the snow higher up the shingle, and started to dig.
After a while he took off his shirt. The bruises were already fading.
Angua sat and looked over the water, listening to the thud of the spade and the occasional grunt when Carrot hit a tree root. Then she heard the soft slither of something being pulled over snow, a pause, and then the sound of sand and stones being shovelled into a hole.
'Do you want to say a few words?' said Carrot.
'You heard the howl last night. That's how wolves do it,' said Angua, still looking out across the water. 'There aren't any other words.'
'Perhaps just a moment's silence, then—'
She spun round. 'Carrot! Don't you remember last night? Didn't you wonder what I might become? Didn't you worry about the future?'


- 308 -
No.
'Why the hell not?'
'It hasn't happened yet. Shall we get back? It'll be dark soon.'
'And tomorrow?'
'I'd like you to come back to Ankh-Morpork.'
'Why? There's nothing for me there.'
Carrot patted the soil over the grave. 'Is there anything left for you here?' he said. 'Besides, I—'
Don't you dare say the words, Angua thought. Not at a time like this.
And then they both became aware of the wolves. They were creeping through the trees, darker shadows in the evening light.
'They're hunting,' said Angua, grabbing Carrot's arm.
'Oh, don't worry. They don't attack human beings for no reason.'
'Carrot?'
'Yes?' The wolves were closing in.
'I'm not human!'
'But last night—'
'That was different. They remembered Gavin. Now I'm just a werewolf to them...'
She watched him turn to look at the advancing wolves. The hairs were up on their backs. They were growling. They moved with the strange sidle of those whose hatred could just manage to overcome their fear. And at any moment that balance in one of them was going to tip all the way, and then it would be all over.
There was a leap, and it was Carrot who made it. He grabbed the lead wolf by its neck and tail and held on as it struggled and snapped. Its frantic efforts to escape resulted only in it running in a circle with Carrot in the middle, the other wolves backing away from the whirl of grey. Then, as it stumbled, he bit it on the back of the neck. It screamed.
Carrot let go and stood up. He looked at the circle of wolves. They shied away. from his gaze.
'Hmmm?' he said.


- 309 -
The wolf on the ground whined and got to its feet awkwardly.
'Hmmm?'
It tucked its tail between its legs and backed off, but it still seemed to be attached to Carrot by an invisible lead.
'Angua?' said Carrot, still watching it carefully.
'Yes?'
'Can you speak wolf? I mean, in this shape?'
'A bit. Look, how did you know what to do?'
'Oh, I've watched animals,' said Carrot, as if that was an explanation. 'Please tell them-... tell them if they go away now I won't harm them.'
She managed to bark out the words. It had all changed, in such a tiny handful of seconds. Now Carrot wrote the script.
'And now tell them that although I'm going away I may be back. What's the name of this one?' He nodded at the cowering wolf.
'That's Eats Wrong Meat,' Angua whispered. 'He was... he's the leader now Gavin's gone.'
'Then tell them that I'm quite happy that he should go on leading. Tell them all that.'
They watched her intently. She knew what they were thinking. He'd beaten the leader. It was all Sorted Out. Wolves did not have a lot of mental space for uncertainty. Doubt was a luxury for species that did not live one meal away from starvation. They still had a Gavin-shaped hole in their minds and Carrot had stepped into it. Of course, it wouldn't last long. But it didn't need to.
He always, always finds a way in, she thought. He doesn't think about it, he doesn't plot, he simply slides in. I saved him because he couldn't save himself, and Gavin saved him because... because... because he had some reason... and I'm almost, almost certain that Carrot doesn't know how he manages to wrap the world around him. Almost certain. He's good and kind and born to be a king of the ancient sort that wore oak leaves and ruled from a seat under a tree, and though he tries hard he never had a cynical thought.
I'm almost certain.
'Let's go now,' said Carrot. 'The coronation will be over soon, and I don't want Mister Vimes to worry.'


- 310 -
'Carrot! I've got to know something.'
'Yes?'
'That might happen to me. Have you ever thought about that? He was my brother, after all. Being two things at the same time, and never quite being one... we're not the most stable of creatures.'
'Gold and muck come 'out of the same shaft,' said Carrot.
'That's just a dwarf saying!'
'It's true, though. You're not him.'
'Well, if it happened... if it did... would you do what Vimes did? Carrot? Would it be you who picked up a weapon and came after me? I know you won't lie. I've got to know. Would it be you?'
A little snow slid down from the trees. The wolves watched. Carrot looked up for a moment at the grey sky and then nodded.
'Yes.'
She sighed. 'Promise?' she said.
Vimes was surprised at how quickly the coronation became a working day. There was a flourish of echoing horns, a general flow of the crowd and, gradually, a queue in front of the King.
'They haven't even given him time to get comfy!' said Lady Sybil as they headed towards the exit.
'Our kings are... working kings,' said Cheery, and Vimes detected the pride in her voice. 'But now is the time when the King awards favours.'
A dwarf caught up with Vimes and tugged his cloak respectfully.
'The King wishes to see you now, your excellency,' he said.
'There's an almighty queue!'
'Nevertheless,' the dwarf gave a polite cough, 'the King wishes to see you now. All of you.'
They were led to the front of the queue. Vimes felt many eyes boring into the small of his back.


- 311 -
The King dismissed the previous supplicant with a regal nod as the Ankh-Morpork party was deftly inserted at the top of the line, supplanting a dwarf whose beard went down to his knees.
The King looked at them for a moment, and then the internal filing system threw up a card.
'Ah, it's yourselves, good as new,' he said. 'Now, what was it I was going to do? Oh, I remember... Lady Sybil?'
She curtsied.
'Classically, we give rings at this time,' said the King. 'Between ourselves, many dwarfs consider this a bit... well, bath salts, see. But I believe they are still welcome and so this, Lady Sybil, is, perhaps, a token of things to come.'
It was a thin silver ring. Vimes was taken aback at this parsimony, but Sybil could accept a bunch of dead rats graciously.
'Oh, how wond—'
'We normally give gold,' the King went on. 'Very popular, and of course you can sing about it. But this has... rarity value, see. It is the first silver that has been mined in Uberwald in hundreds of years.'
'I thought there was a rule that—' Vimes began.
'I ordered the mines re-opened last night,' said the King pleasantly. 'It seemed an auspicious time. We shall soon have ore for sale, your excellency, but if Lady Sybil doesn't get involved in the negotiations and bankrupt us, I for one shall be very grateful,' the King added. 'Miss Littlebottom, I see, has not graced us with a sartorial extravaganza today?'
Cheery stared.
'You're not wearing a dress,' said the King.
'No, sire.'
'Although I do note a few unobtrusive touches of mascara and lipstick.'
'Yes, sire,' squeaked Cheery, on the point of death through shock.
'There's nice. Do be sure to let me know the name of your dressmaker,' the King went on. 'I may have some custom for her in the fullness of time. I've thought long and hard—'
Vimes blinked. Cheery had gone pale. Had anyone else heard that? Had he?


- 312 -
Sybil nudged him in the ribs. 'Your mouth's open, Sam,' she whispered.
So he had heard it...
He heard the King's voice again. '-and a bag of gold is always acceptable.'
Cheery was still staring.
Vimes shook her gently by the shoulder.
'Th-thank you, sire.'
The King held out his hand. Vimes wobbled Cheery again. Completely hypnotized, she extended her hand. The King took it and shook it.
Shocked whispers were spreading behind Vimes. The King had shaken the hand of a selfdeclared female...
'And that leaves... Detritus,' said the King. 'What a dwarf should give a troll is of course a bit of a puzzle, but it occurs to me that what I should give you is what I would give a dwarf. A bag of gold, then, for whatever purpose you choose to use it, and—'
He stood up. He held out his hand.
Dwarfs and trolls were still fighting in the further regions of Uberwald, Vimes knew. Elsewhere, there was at best the sort of peace you got when both sides were busy re-arming.
The whispering stopped. Silence spread out in a widening circle, all across the floor of the cave.
Detritus blinked. Then he took the hand very carefully, trying not to crush it.
The whispering started again. And this time, Vimes knew, it'd go for miles.
It occurred to him that in two handshakes the white-bearded elderly dwarf had done more than a dozen devious plots could have achieved. By the time those ripples reached the edge of Uberwald they would be tidal waves. Thirty men and a dog would be nothing by comparison.
'Hmm?'
'I said, what can a king give a Vimes?' said the King.
'Er, nothing, I think,' said Vimes absently. Two handshakes! And very quietly, smiling, the King had turned the customs of the dwarfs upside down. And so gently, too, that they'd spend years arguing about it...


- 313 -
'Sam!' snapped Sybil.
'Well, then, I shall give something to your descendants,' said the King, apparently unperturbed. A long flat box was brought to him. He opened it to reveal a dwarf axe, the new metal glinting on its nest of black cloth.
'This will become, in time, the axe of someone's grandfather,' said the King. 'And no doubt over the years it will need a new handle or a new blade and over the centuries the shape will change in line with fashion, but it will always be, in every detail and respect, the axe I give you today. And because it'll change with the times it'll always be sharp. There's a grain of truth in that, see. So nice to have met you. Do enjoy your journey home, your excellency.'
The four were silent in the coach back to the embassy. Then Cheery said, 'The King said—'
'I heard,' said Vimes.
'That was as good as saying that he is a sh—'
'Things are going to change,' said Lady Sybil. 'That's what the King was saying.'
'I never shook hands wid no king before,' said Detritus. 'No dwarf, either, come to dat.'
'You shook hands with me once,' said Cheery.
'Watchmen don't count,' said Detritus firmly. 'Watchmen is watchmen.'
'I wonder if it'll change anything?' said Lady Sybil.
Vimes stared out of the window. It'd probably make people feel good, he thought. But trolls and dwarfs had been fighting for centuries. Ending that sort of thing took more than a handshake. It was just a symbol.
On the other hand... the world wasn't moved by heroes or villains or even by policemen. It might as well be moved by symbols. All he knew was that you couldn't hope to try for the big stuff, like world peace and happiness, but you might just about be able to achieve some tiny deed that'd.make the world, in a small way, a better place.
Like shooting someone.
'I forgot to say that I thought it was very kind of you, Cheery,' said Lady Sybil, 'yesterday, when you comforted Dee.'
'She would have had me killed by the werewolves,' said Vimes. He felt this was a point worth making.


- 314 -
'Yes, of course. But... it was kind, anyway,' said Sybil.
Cheery looked at her feet, avoiding Lady Sybil's gaze. Then she coughed nervously and pulled a small piece of paper out of her sleeve, which she handed wordlessly to Vimes.
He unfolded it.
'She gave you these names?' he said. 'Some of these are very senior dwarfs in Ankh-Morpork...'
'Yes, sir,' said Cheery. She coughed again. 'I knew she wanted someone to talk to, and, er, I suggested a few things she might like to talk about. Sorry, Lady Sybil. It's very hard to stop being a copper.'
'I Worked that one out a long time ago,' said Sybil.
'You know,' said Vimes, to break the silence, 'if we leave at first light tomorrow, we could be through the pass before sundown.'
And it was a comfortable night, somewhere in the depths of the feather mattress. Vimes awoke a couple of times and thought he could hear voices. Then he sank back into the softness and dreamt of warm snow.
He was shaken awake by Detritus. 'It's gettin' light, sir.'
Mm.
'And dere's a Igor an' a... a young man out in der hall,' said Detritus. 'He got a big jar full of noses and a rabbit covered in ears.'
Vimes tried to get back to sleep. Then he sat bolt upright.
'What?'
'It's all covered in ears, sir.'
'You mean one of those rabbits with big floppy ears?'
'You better come and see dis rabbit,' sniffed the troll.
Vimes left Sybil wallowing in sleep, pulled on his dressing gown and pattered barefoot down to the freezing hall.
An Igor was waiting anxiously in the middle of the floor. Vimes was getting the hang of Igorrecognition20, and this was a new one. He was with a much
20 The key was in the pattern of scars.


- 315 -
younger... er... man, probably barely out of his teens, at least in places, but already the scars and stitching indicated that relentless urge towards self-improvement that was the hallmark of a good Igor. They just never seemed to be able to get the eyes level.
'Your exthellenthy?'
'You're... Igor, right?'
'Amathing gueth, thur. We haven't met before, but I work for Doctor Thaumic on the other thide of the mountain, and thith ith my thon, Igor.' He smacked the young man around the back of his head. 'Thay hello to hith grathe, Igor!'
'I don't believe in the peerage,' said young Igor, sulkily. 'Nor shall I call any man marthter.'
'Thee?' said his father. 'Thorry about thith, your grathe, but thith ith the younger generation for you. I hope you can find a job for him in the big thity, 'coth he'th totally unemployable in Uberwald. But he'th a very good thurgeon, even if — he doeth have funny ideath. He'th got hith grandfather'th handth, you know.'
'I can see the scars,' said Vimes.
'Lucky little devil, they thould have been mine by rightth, but he wath old enough to go into the lottery.'
'You want to join the Watch, Igor?' said Vimes.
'Yes, sir. I believe Ankh-Morpork is where the future lies, thur.'
His father leaned closer to Vimes. 'We don't menthion hith thlight thpeech impediment, marthter,' he whispered. 'Of courthe, it countth againtht him here, you know, in the Igor buthineth, but I'm thure people will be kind to him in Ankh-Morpork.'
'Yes, indeed,' said Vimes, removing his handkerchief and absentmindedly dabbing his ear. 'And, er... this rabbit?'
'He's Eerie, thur,' said young Igor.
'Good name. Good name. Is that why he's got human ears all over his back?'
'Early experiment, thur.'
'And, er, the noses?'
There were about a dozen of them in a large screwtop pickle jar. And they were... just noses. Not cut off anyone, as far as Vimes could see. They had little legs and


- 316 -
were jumping hopefully up and down against the glass, like puppies in a pet shop window. He thought he could hear faint 'wheel' noises.
'The wave of the future, thur,' said young Igor. 'I grow them in special vats. I can do eyes and fingers, too!'
'But they've got little legs!'
'Oh, they wither off in a few hours after they're attached, thur. And they want to be useful, my little noses. Bio-artificing for the next century, thur. None of that outmoded cutting up of old bodies—'
His father smacked his head again. 'You thee? You thee? Where'th the point in that? Wathtrel! I hope you can do thomething with him, marthter, becauthe I've jutht about given up! Not worth breaking down for thpareth, ath we thay!'
Vimes sighed. Still, losing small extremities was a daily hazard in the Watch and the lad was, after all, an Igor. It wasn't as if there were any normal people in the Watch. He could afford to put up with a nose-breeder in exchange for surgery that didn't involve screaming and buckets of boiling pitch.
He indicated a box beside the young man. It was growling and rocking from side to side.
'You haven't got a dog too, have you?' he said, trying to make it sound like a joke.
'That's my tomatoes,' said young Igor. 'A triumph of modern igoring. They grow enormously.'
'Only becauthe they vithiouthly attack all other vegetableth!' said his father. 'But I'll thay thith for the lad, marthter, I've never known anyone like him for really tiny thtitching.'
'All right, all right, he sounds the man I'm looking for,' said Vimes. 'Or close, at least. Take a seat, young man. I just hope there's going to be room in the coaches...'
The door to the yard swung open, blowing in a few snowflakes and Carrot, who stamped his feet.
'A bit of snow overnight but the road looks open,' he said. 'They say there's a really big one due tonight, though, so we- Oh, good morning, sir.'
'You're fit enough to travel?'. said Vimes.
'We both are,' said Angua. She crossed the hall and stood next to Carrot.


- 317 -
Once again Vimes was aware of a lot of words that he hadn't heard. A wise man didn't make enquiries at a time like this. Besides, Vimes could feel the cold coming up through his feet.
He reached a decision. 'Give me your notebook, captain,' he said.
They watched him scribble a few lines.
'Stop at the clacks tower and send a message on to the Yard,' he said, handing it back to Carrot. 'Tell them you're on the way. Take young Igor here with you and get him settled in, Okay? And make a report to his lordship.'
'Er, you're not coming?' said Carrot.
'Her ladyship and I will take the other coach,' said Vimes. 'Or buy a sleigh. Very comfy things, sleighs. And we'll, we'll just take it a little easier. We'll see the sights. We'll dawdle along the way. Understand?'
He saw Angua smile and wondered if Sybil had confided in her.
'Absolutely, sir,' said Carrot.
'Oh, and, er, go along to Burleigh Fr Stronginthearm's, order a couple of dozen of everything off the top of their small arms catalogue, and get them on to the next mail coach due to Bonk for the personal attention of Captain Tantony.'
'The mail coach rate will be very expensive, sir...' Carrot began.
'I didn't want you to tell me that, captain. I wanted you to say, "Yes, sir."'
'Yes, sir.'
'And ask at the gate about... three gloomy biddies who live in a big house near here. It's got a cherry orchard. Find out the address and when you get back send them three coach tickets to Ankh-Morpork.'
'Right, sir.'
'Well done. Travel safely. I'll see you in a week. Or two. Three at the outside. All right?'
A few minutes later he stood shivering on the steps, watching the coach disappear into the crisp morning.
He felt a pang of guilt, but it was only a little pang. He gave every day to the Watch and it was time, he thought, for it to give him a week. Or two. Three at the outside.


- 318 -
In fact, he realized, as pangs. went it was barely a ping which was, he recalled, a dialect word for watermeadow. Right now he could see a future, which was more than he'd ever had before.
He locked the door and went back to bed.
On a clear day, from the right vantage point on the Ramtops, a watcher could see a very long way across the plains.
The dwarfs had harnessed mountain streams and built a staircase of locks that rose a mile up from the rolling grasslands, for the use of which they charged not just a pretty penny but a very handsome dollar. Barges were always ascending or descending, making their way down to the river Smarl and the cities of the plain. They carried coal, iron, fireclay, pig treacle21 and fat, the dull ingredients of the pudding of civilization.
In the sharp, thin air they took several days to get out of sight. On a clear day, you could see next Wednesday.
The captain of one of the barges waiting for the top lock went to tip the dregs of his teapot over the side and saw a small dog sitting on the snowy bank. It sat up and begged, hopefully.
He turned to go back into the cabin when he thought: what a nice little doggie.
It was such a clear thought that it almost seemed to him that he had heard it, but he looked around and there was no one else near him. And dogs certainly couldn't talk.
He heard himself think: 'This little doggie would be very useful keepin' down rats that might attack the cargo, sort of frog.'
It must have been his thought, he decided. There was no one else nearby, and everyone knew dogs didn't talk.
He said aloud, 'But rats don't eat coal, do they?'
He thought, clear as day: 'Ah, well, you never know when they might try, right? Anyway, it's such a sweet-looking little doggie that's been strugglin' for days through deep snow, huh, not that anyone cares.'
The bargeman gave up. There's only so long you can argue with yourself.
21 The treacle mines below Ankh-Morpork had long been exhausted, leaving only a street name to remember them by. But the collision with  had buried thousands of acres of prehistoric sugarcane around the borders of Uberwald and the resulting dense crystalline sugar was the foundation of a large mining, confectionery and dentistry industry.


- 319 -
Ten minutes later the barge was on the long drop to the plains, with a small dog sitting at the prow, enjoying the breeze.
On the whole, thought Gaspode, it was always best to look to the future.
Nobby Nobbs had made himself a shelter up against the wall of the Watch House, and was gloomily warming his hands when a shadow loomed over him.
'What are you doing, Nobby?' said Carrot.
'Huh? Captain?'
'There's no one on the gates, there's no one on patrol. Didn't anyone get my message? What's happening?'
Nobby licked his lips. 'We-ell,' he said. 'There isn't.... well, there isn't a Watch at the moment. Not per say.' He flinched. He saw Angua behind Carrot. 'Er, Mister Vimes with you at all?'
'What is happening, Nobby?'
'Well, you see... Fred kind of... and then he got all sort of... then next thing you know he was setting for to... and then we... and then he wouldn't come out... and then we... and he nailed up the door... and Mrs Fred came and shouted at him through the letterbox... and most of the lads have gone off and got other jobs... and now there's just me and Dorfl and Reg and Washpot, and we come here turn and turn about and we shove food through the letterbox for him... and... that's it, reelly...'
'Can we have that again with the gaps filled in?' said Carrot.
This took considerably longer. There were still gaps. Carrot forced them open.
'I see,' he said at last.
'Mister Vimes is going to go spare, isn't he?' said Nobby miserably.
'I wouldn't worry about Mister Vimes,' said Angua. 'Not at the moment.'
Carrot was looking up at the front door. It was thick oak. There were bars at all the windows.
'Go and fetch Constable Dorfl, Nobby,' he said.
Ten minutes later the Watch House had a new doorway. Carrot stepped over the wreckage and led the way upstairs.
Fred Colon was hunched in the chair, staring fixedly at one solitary sugar lump.


- 320 -
'Be careful,' whispered Angua. 'He might be in a rather fragile mental state.'
'That's very likely,' said Carrot. He leaned down and whispered: 'Fred?'
'Mm?' murmured Colon.
'On your feet, sergeant! Am I 'urtin' you? I ought to be, I'm standin' on your beard! You've got five minutes to wash and shave and be back here with shinin' mornin' face! On your feet! To the washroom! Abou-ut turn! At the double! One-two-one-two!'
It seemed to Angua that no part of Fred Colon above the neck, except maybe for his ears, was involved in what happened next. Fred Colon rose at attention, executed a thudding about-turn and doubled out of the door.
Carrot spun around towards Nobby. 'You too, corporal!'
Nobby, trembling with shock, saluted with both hands at once and ran after Colon.
Carrot went over to the fireplace and poked at the ashes. 'Oh dear,' he said.
'All burnt?' said Angua.
'I'm afraid so.'
'Some of those heaps were like old friends.'
'Well, we'll find out if we've missed anything important when it starts to smell,' said Carrot.
Nobby and Colon appeared again, breathless and pink. There were a few bits of tissue stuck on Colon's face where the shaving had been too enthusiastic, but he was nevertheless looking better. He was a sergeant again. Someone was giving him orders. His brain was moving. The world was the right side up once more.
'Fred?' said Carrot.
'Yessir?'
'You've got a bit of bird doings on your shoulder.'
'I'll see to that right now, sir!' said Nobby, leaping sideways. He dragged a handkerchief from his pocket, spat on it, and rubbed hurriedly at Colon's temporary pip. 'All gone now, Fred!' he said.
'Well done,' said Carrot.


- 321 -
He got up and went over to the window. It did not, in fact, offer much in the way of a view. But he looked out of it as if he could see to the end of the world.
Colon and Nobby shifted uneasily. Right now they did not like the sound of silence. When Carrot did speak they blinked as if struck in the face by a cold flannel.
'What I believe there has been here,' he said, 'is a confused situation.'
'That's right, that's right,' said Nobby quickly. 'We was very confused. Fred?'
He jabbed Fred Colon with his elbow, waking him from a reverie of terror.
'Uh? Oh. Right. Oh, yeah. Confusion,' he mumbled.
'And I'm afraid I know where the blame ultimately lies,' Carrot went on, still apparently engrossed in the spectacle of a man sweeping the Opera House steps.
In the silence Nobby's lips moved in prayer. Only the whites of Fred Colon's eyes could be seen.
'It was my fault,' said Carrot. 'I blame myself: Mister Vimes left me in charge, and I rushed off with no thought of my duty and put everyone in an impossible position.'
Fred and Nobby were both wearing the same expression. It was the face of a man who has seen the light at the end of the tunnel and it has turned out to be the twinkle of the Fairy of Hope.
'I feel almost embarrassed to ask you two to get me out of this pit I have dug for myself,' said Carrot. 'I can't imagine what Mister Vimes is going to say.'
The light at the end of the tunnel winked out for Fred and Nobby. They could imagine what Mister Vimes would say.
'However,' said Carrot. He returned to the desk and pulled open the bottom drawer, extracting a few grubby pages that were clipped together.
They waited.
'However, each of these men took the King's Shilling and swore an oath to defend the King's Peace,' said Carrot, tapping the paper. 'An oath, in fact, to the King.'
'Yeah, but that was only- Aargh!' said Fred Colon.
'Sorry, sir,' said Nobby. 'I inadvertently trod heavily on Fred's toe while standing to attention.'


- 322 -
There was a long-drawn-out silken sound. Carrot was drawing his sword from its sheath. He laid it on the desk. Nobby and Colon leaned away from its accusatory point.
'They are all good lads,' said Carrot softly. 'I'm sure if the two of you call on each and every one of them and explain the situation, they will see where their duty lies. Tell them... tell them there is always an easy way, if you know where to look. And then we can get on with our jobs, and when Mister Vimes returns from his well-earned holiday the somewhat confused events of the past will be merely—'
'Confusin'?' suggested Nobby, hopefully.
'Exactly,' said Carrot. 'But I'm glad to see you made so much headway with the paperwork, Fred.'
Colon stood nailed to the spot until Nobby, saluting desperately with the other hand, dragged him out of the office.
Angua could hear them arguing all the way down the stairs.
Carrot stood up, dusted off the chair and placed it carefully under the desk.
'Well, we're home,' he said.
'Yes,' said Angua, and she thought: you do know how to do nasty, don't you? But you use it like a claw; it slides out when you need it, and when you don't there's no sign that it's there. He reached over and took her hand. 'Wolves never look back,' he whispered.
THE END
The Light Fantastic
Discworld Series
by Terry Pratchett, 1948-2015
Published: 1986
J J J J J I I I I I
The sun rose slowly, as if it wasn’t sure it was worth all the effort.
Another Disc day dawned, but very gradually, and this is why.
When light encounters a strong magical field it loses all sense of urgency. It
slows right down. And on the Discworld the magic was embarrassingly strong,
which meant that the soft yellow light of dawn flowed over the sleeping
landscape like the caress of a gentle lover or, as some would have it, like golden
syrup. It paused to fill up valleys. It piled up against mountain ranges. When it
reached Cori Celesti, the ten mile spire of grey stone and green ice that marked
the hub of the Disc and was the home of its gods, it built up in heaps until it
finally crashed in great lazy tsunami as silent as velvet, across the dark
landscape beyond.
It was a sight to be seen on no other world.
Of course, no other world was carried through the starry infinity on the
backs of four giant elephants, who were themselves perched on the shell of a
giant turtle. His name—or Her name, according to another school of thought—
was Great A’Tuin; he—or, as it might be, she—will not take a central role in
what follows but it is vital to an understanding of the Disc that he—or she—is
there, down below the mines and sea ooze and fake fossil bones put there by a
Creator with nothing better to do than upset archeologists and give them silly
ideas.
Great A’Tuin the star turtle, shell frosted with frozen methane, pitted with
meteor craters, and scoured with asteroidal dust. Great A’Tuin, with eyes like
ancient seas and a brain the size of a continent through which thoughts moved
like little glittering glaciers. Great A’Tuin of the great slow sad flippers and starpolished carapace, labouring through the galactic night under the weight of the
Disc. As large as worlds. As old as Time. As patient as a brick.
Actually, the philosophers have got it all wrong. Great A’Tuin is in fact having
a great time.
Great A’Tuin is the only creature in the entire universe that knows exactly
where it is going.
Of course, philosophers have debated for years about where Great A’Tuin
might be going, and have often said how worried they are that they might never
find out.
They’re due to find out in about two months. And then they’re really going to
worry…
Something else that has long worried the more imaginative philosophers on
the Disc is the question of Great A’Tuin’s sex, and quite a lot of time and
trouble has been spent in trying to establish it once and for all.
In fact, as the great dark shape drifts past like an endless tortoiseshell
hairbrush, the results of the latest effort are just coming into view.
Tumbling past, totally out of control, is the bronze shell of the Potent
Voyager, a sort of neolithic spaceship built and pushed over the edge by the
astronomer-priests of Krull, which is conveniently situated on the very rim of
the world and proves, whatever people say, that there is such a thing as a free
launch.
Inside the ship is Twoflower, the Disc’s first tourist. He had recently spent
some months exploring it and is now rapidly leaving it for reasons that are
rather complicated but have to do with an attempt to escape from Krull.
This attempt has been one thousand per cent successful.
But despite all the evidence that he may be the Disc’s last tourist as well, he
is enjoying the view.
Plunging along some two miles above him is Rincewind the wizard, in what
on the Disc passes for a spacesuit. Picture it as a diving suit designed by men
who have never seen the sea. Six months ago he was a perfectly ordinary failed
wizard. Then he met Twoflower, was employed at an outrageous salary as his
guide, and has spent most of the intervening time being shot at, terrorised,
chased and hanging from high places with no hope of salvation or, as is now
the case, dropping from high places.
He isn’t looking at the view because his past life keeps flashing in front of his
eyes and getting in the way. He is learning why it is that when you put on a
spacesuit it is vitally important not to forget the helmet.
A lot more could be included now to explain why these two are dropping out
of the world, and why Twoflower’s Luggage, last seen desperately trying to
follow him on hundreds of little legs, is no ordinary suitcase, but such
questions take time and could be more trouble than they are worth. For
example, it is said that someone at a party once asked the famous philosopher
Ly Tin Weedle „Why are you here?“ and the reply took three years.
What is far more important is an event happening way overhead, far above
A’Tuin, the elephants and the rapidly-expiring wizard. The very fabric of time
and space is about to be put through the wringer.

The air was greasy with the distinctive feel of magic, and acrid with the
smoke of candles made of a black wax whose precise origin a wise man
wouldn’t inquire about.
There was something very strange about this room deep in the cellars of
Unseen University, the Disc’s premier college of magic. For one thing it seemed
to have too many dimensions, not exactly visible, just hovering out of eyeshot.
The walls were covered with occult symbols, and most of the floor was taken up
by the Eightfold Seal of Stasis, generally agreed in magical circles to have all
the stopping power of a well-aimed half brick.
The only furnishing in the room was a lectern dark wood, carved into the
shape of a bird—well, to be frank, into the shape of a winged thing it is
probably best not to examine too closely—and on the lectern, fastened to it by a
heavy chain covered in padlocks, was a book.
A large, but not particularly impressive, book. Other books in the University’s
libraries had covers inlaid with rare jewels and fascinating wood, or bound with
dragon skin. This one was just a rather tatty leather. It looked the sort of book
described in library catalogues as „slightly foxed“, although it would be more
honest to admit that it looked as though it had been badgered, wolved and
possibly beared as well.
Metal clasps held it shut. They weren’t decorated, they were just very heavy—
like the chain, which didn’t so much attach the book to the lectern as tether it.
They looked like the work of someone who had a pretty definite aim in mind,
and who had spent most of his life making training harness for elephants.
The air thickened and swirled. The pages of the book began to crinkle in a
quite horrible, deliberate way, and blue light spilled out from between them.
The silence of the room crowded in like a fist, slowly being clenched.
Half a dozen wizards in their nightshirts were taking turns to peer in through
the little grille in the door. No wizard could sleep with this sort of thing going
on—the build-up of raw magic was rising through the university like a tide.
„Right,“ said a voice. „What’s going on? And why wasn’t I summoned?“
Galder Weatherwax, Supreme Grand Conjuror of the Order of the Silver Star,
Lord Imperial of the Sacred Staff, Eighth Level Ipsissimus and 304th Chancellor
of Unseen University, wasn’t simply an impressive sight even in his red
nightshirt with the hand-embroidered mystic runes, even in his long cap with
the bobble on, even with the Wee Willie Winkie candlestick in his hand. He even
managed to very nearly pull it off in fluffy pompom slippers as well.
Six frightened faces turned towards him.
„Um, you were summoned, lord,“ said one of the under-wizards.
„That’s why you’re here,“ he added helpfully.
„I mean why wasn’t I summoned before?“ snapped Galder, pushing his way
to the grille.
„Um, before who, lord?“ said the wizard.
Galder glared at him, and ventured a quick glance through the grille.
The air in the room was now sparkling with tiny flashes as dust motes
incinerated in the flow of raw magic. The Seal of Stasis was beginning to blister
and curl up at the edges.
The book in question was called the Octavo and, quite obviously, it was no
ordinary book.
There are of course many famous books of magic. Some may talk of the
Necrotelicomnicon, with its pages made of ancient lizard skin; some may point
to the Book of Going Forth Around Elevenish, written by a mysterious and
rather lazy Llamaic sect; some may recall that the Bumper Fun Grimoire
reputedly contains the one original joke left in the universe. But they are all
mere pamphlets when compared with the Octavo, which the Creator of the
Universe reputedly left behind—with characteristic absent-mindedness—shortly
after completing his major work.
The eight spells imprisoned in its pages led a secret and complex life of their
own, and it was generally believed that—
Galder’s brow furrowed as he stared into the troubled room. Of course, there
were only seven spells now. Some young idiot of a student wizard had stolen a
look at the book one day and one of the spells had escaped and lodged in his
mind. No-one had ever managed to get to the bottom of how it had happened.
What was his name, now? Winswand?
Octarine and purple sparks glittered on the spine of the book. A thin curl of
smoke was beginning to rise from the lectern, and the heavy metal clasps that
held the book shut were definitely beginning to look strained.
„Why are the spells so restless?“ said one of the younger wizards.
Galder shrugged. He couldn’t show it, of course, but he was beginning to be
really worried. As a skilled eighth-level wizard he could see the half-imaginary
shapes that appeared momentarily in the vibrating air, wheedling arid
beckoning. In much the same way that gnats appear before a thunderstorm,
really heavy build-ups of magic always attracted things from the chaotic
Dungeon Dimensions—nasty Things, all misplaced organs and spittle, forever
searching for any gap through which they might sidle into the world of men.(1)
This had to be stopped.
„I shall need a volunteer,“ he said firmly.
There was a sudden silence. The only sound came from behind the door. It
was the nasty little noise of metal parting under stress.
„Very well, then,“ he said. „In that case I shall need some silver tweezers,
about two pints of cat’s blood, a small whip and a chair—“
It is said that the opposite of noise is silence. This isn’t true. Silence is only
the absence of noise. Silence would have been a terrible din compared to the
sudden soft implosion of noiselessness that hit the wizards with the force of an
exploding dandelion clock.
A thick column of spitting light sprang up from the book, hit the ceiling in a
splash of flame, and disappeared.
Galder stared up at the hole, ignoring the smouldering patches in his beard.
He pointed dramatically.
„To the upper cellars!“ he cried, and bounded up the stone stairs. Slippers
flapping and nightshirts billowing he other wizards followed him, falling over
one another in their eagerness to be last.
Nevertheless, they were all in time to see the fireball of occult potentiality
disappear into the ceiling of the room above.
„Urgh,“ said the youngest wizard, and pointed to the floor.
The room had been part of the library until the magic had drifted through,
violently reassembling the possibility particles of everything in its path. So it
was reasonable to assume that the small purple newts had been part of the
floor and the pineapple custard may once have been some books. And several of
the wizards later swore that the small sad orang outang sitting in the middle of
it all looked very much like the head librarian.
Galder stared upwards. „To the kitchen!“ he bellowed, wading through the
custard to the next flight of stairs.
No-one ever found out what the great cast-iron cooking range had been
turned into, because it had broken down a wall and made good its escape
before the dishevelled party of wild-eyed mages burst into the room. The
vegetable chef was found much later hiding in the soup cauldron, gibbering
unhelpful things like „The knuckles! The horrible knuckles!“
The last wisps of magic, now somewhat slowed, were disappearing into the
ceiling.
„To the Great Hall!“
The stairs were much wider here, and better lit. Panting and pineappleflavoured, the fitter wizards got to the top by the time the fireball had reached
the middle of the huge draughty chamber that was the University’s main hall. It
hung motionless, except for the occasional small prominence that arched and
spluttered across its surface.
Wizards smoke, as everyone knows. That probably explained the chorus of
coffin coughs and sawtooth wheezes that erupted behind Galder as he stood
appraising the situation and wondering if he dare look for somewhere to hide.
He grabbed a frightened student.
„Get me seers, farseers, scryers and withinlookmen!“ he barked. „I want this
studied!“
Something was taking shape inside the fireball. Galder shielded his eyes and
peered at the shape forming in front of him. There was no mistaking it. It was
the universe.
He was quite sure of this, because he had a model of it in his study and it
was generally agreed to be far more impressive than the real thing. Faced with
the possibilities offered by seed pearls and silver filigree, the Creator had been
at a complete loss.
But the tiny universe inside the fireball was uncannily—well, real. The only
thing missing was colour. It was all in translucent misty white.
There was Great A’Tuin, and the four elephants, and the Disc itself. From
this angle Galder couldn’t see the surface very well, but he knew with cold
certainty that it would be absolutely accurately modelled. He could, though,
just make out a miniature replica of Cori Celesti, upon whose utter peak the
world’s quarrelsome and somewhat bourgeois gods lived in a palace of marble,
alabaster and uncut moquette three-piece suites they had chosen to call
Dunmanifestin. It was always a considerable annoyance to any Disc citizen
with pretensions to culture that they were ruled by gods whose idea of an
uplifting artistic experience was a musical doorbell.
The little embryo universe began to move slowly, tilting…
Galder tried to shout, but his voice refused to come out.
Gently, but with the unstoppable force of an explosion, the shape expanded.
He watched in horror, and then in astonishment, as it passed through him
as lightly as a thought. He held out a hand and watched the pale ghosts of rock
strata stream through his fingers in busy silence.
Great A’Tuin had already sunk peacefully below floor level, larger than a
house.
The wizards behind Galder were waist deep in seas. A boat smaller than a
thimble caught Galder’s eye for a oment before the rush carried it through the
walls and away.
„To the roof!“ he managed, pointing a shaking finger skywards.
Those wizards with enough marbles left to think with and enough breath to
run followed him, running through continents that sleeted smoothly through
the solid stone.
It was a still night, tinted with the promise of dawn. A crescent moon was
just setting. Ankh-Morpork, largest city in the lands around the Circle Sea,
slept.
That statement is not really true.
On the one hand, those parts of the city which normally concerned
themselves with, for example, selling vegetables, shoeing horses, carving
exquisite small jade ornaments, changing money and making tables, on the
whole, slept. Unless they had insomnia. Or had got up in the night, as it might
be, to go to the lavatory. On the other hand, many of the less law-abiding
citizens were wide awake and, for instance, climbing through windows that
didn’t, belong to them, slitting throats, mugging one another, listening to loud
music in smoky cellars and gener,erally having a lot more fun. But most of the
animals were asleep, except for the rats. And the bats, too, of course. As far as
the insects were concerned…
The point is that descriptive writing is very rarely entirely accurate and
during the reign of Olaf Quimby II as Patrician of Ankh some legislation was
passed in a determined attempt to put a stop to this sort of thing and introduce
some honesty into reporting. Thus, if a legend said of a notable hero that „all
men spoke of his prowess“ any bard who valued his life would add hastily
„except for a couple of people in his home village who thought he was a liar,
and quite a lot of other people who had never really heard of him.“ Poetic simile
was strictly limited to statements like „his mighty steed was as fleet as the wind
on a fairly calm day, say about Force Three,“ and any loose talk about a beloved
having a face that launched a thousand ships would have to be backed by
evidence that the object of desire did indeed look like a bottle of champagne.
Quimby was eventually killed by a disgruntled poet during an experiment
conducted in the palace grounds to prove the disputed accuracy of the proverb
„The pen is mightier than the sword,“ and in his memory it was amended to
include the phrase „only if the sword is very small and the pen is very sharp.“
So. Approximately sixty-seven, maybe sixty-eight per cent, of the city slept.
Not that the other citizens creeping about on their generally unlawful occasions
noticed the pale tide streaming through the streets. Only the wizards, used to
seeing the invisible, watched it foam across the distant fields.
The Disc, being flat, has no real horizon. Any adventurous sailors who got
funny ideas from staring at eggs and oranges for too long and set out for the
antipodes soon learned that the reason why distant ships sometimes looked as
though they were disappearing over the edge of the world was that they were
disappearing over the edge of the world.
But there was still a limit even to Galder’s vision in the mist-swirled, dustfilled air. He looked up. Looming high over the University was the grim and
ancient Tower of Art, said to be the oldest building on the Disc, with its famous
spiral staircase of eight thousand, eight hundred and eighty-eight steps. From
its crenelated roof, the haunt of ravens and disconcertingly alert gargoyles, a
wizard might see to the very edge of the Disc. After spending ten minutes or so
coughing horribly, of course.
„Sod that,“ he muttered. „What’s the good of being a wizard, after all?
Avyento, thessalousl I would fly! To me, spirits of air and darkness!“
He spread a gnarled hand and pointed to a piece of crumbling parapet.
Octarine fire sprouted from under his nicotine-stained nails and burst against
the otting stone far above.
It fell. By a finely calculated exchange of velocities Galder rose, nightshirt
flapping around his bony legs. Higher and higher he soared, hurtling through
the pale night like a, like a—all right, like an elderly but powerful wizard being
propelled upwards by an expertly judged thumb on the scales of the universe.
He landed in a litter of old nests, caught his balance, and stared down at the
vertiginous view of a Disc dawn.
At this time of the long year the Circle Sea was almost on the sunset side of
Cori Celesti, and as the daylight sloshed down into the lands around AnkhMorpork the shadow of the mountain scythed across the landscape like the
gnomon of God’s sundial. But nightwards, racing the slow light towards the
edge of the world, a line of white mist surged on. There was a crackling of dry
twigs behind him. He turned to see Ymper Trymon, second in command of the
Order, who had been the only other wizard able to keep up.
Galder ignored him for the moment, taking care only to keep a firm grip on
the stonework and strengthen his personal spells of protection. Promotion was
slow in a profession that traditionally bestowed long life, and it was accepted
that younger wizards would frequently seek advancement via dead men’s curly
shoes, having previosly emptied them of their occupants. Besides, there was
something disquieting about young Trymon. He didn’t smoke, only drank boiled
water, and Galder had the nasty suspicion that he was clever. He didn’t smile
often enough, and he liked figures and the sort of organisation charts that show
lots of squares with arrows pointing to other squares. In short, he was the sort
of man who could use the word „personnel“ and mean it.
The whole of the visible Disc was now covered with a shmmering white skin
that fitted it perfectly.
Galder looked down at his own hands and saw them covered with a pale
network of shining threads that ollowed every movement.
He recognised this kind of spell. He’d used them himself. But his had been
smaller—much smaller.
„It’s a Change spell,“ said Trymon. „The whole world is being changed.“
Some people, thought Galder grimly, would have had the decency to put an
exclamation mark on the end of a statement like that.
There was the faintest of pure sounds, high and sharp, like the breaking of a
mouse’s heart.
„What was that?“ he said.
Trymon cocked his head.
„C sharp, I think,“ he said.
Galder said nothing. The white shimmer had vanished, and the first sounds
of the waking city began to filter up to the two wizards. Everything seemed
exactly the same as it had before. All that, just to make things stay the same?
He patted his nightshirt pockets distractedly and finally found what he was
looking for lodged behind his ear. He put the soggy dogend in his mouth, called
up mystical fire from between his fingers, and dragged hard on the wretched
rollup until little blue lights flashed in front of his eyes. He coughed once or
twice.
He was thinking very hard indeed.
He was trying to remember if any gods owed him any favours.
In fact the Gods were as puzzled by all this as the wizards were, but they
were powerless to do anything and in any case were engaged in an eons-old
battle with the Ice Giants, who had refused to return the lawnmower.

But some clue as to what actually had happened might be found in the fact
that Rincewind, whose past life had just got up to a quite interesting bit when
he was fifteen, suddenly found himself not dying after all but hanging upside
down in a pine tree.
He got down easily by dropping uncontrollably from branch to branch until
he landed on his head in a pile of pine needles, where he lay gasping for breath
and wishing he d been a better person.
Somewhere, he knew, there had to be a perfectly logical connection. One
minute one happens to be dying, having dropped off the rim of the world, and
the next one is upside down in a tree.
As always happened at times like this, the Spell rose up in his mind.
Rincewind had been generally reckoned by his tutors to be a natural wizard
in the same way that fish are natural mountaineers. He probably would have
been thrown out of Unseen University anyway—he couldn’t remember spells
and smoking made him feel ill—but what had really caused trouble was all that
stupid business about sneaking into the room where the Octavo was chained
and opening it.
And what made the trouble even worse was that no-one could figure out why
all the locks had temporarily become unlocked.
The spell wasn’t a demanding lodger. It just sat there like an old toad at the
bottom of a pond. But whenever Rincewind was feeling really tired or very afraid
it tried to get itself said. No-one knew what would happen if one of the Eight
Great Spells was said by itself, but the general Agreement was that the best
place from which to watch the effects would be the next universe.
It was a weird thought to have, lying on a heap of pine needles after just
falling off the edge of the world, but Rincewind had a feeling that the spell
wanted to keep him alive.
„Suits me,“ he thought.
He sat up and looked at the trees. Rincewind was a city wizard and, although
he was aware that there were various differences among types of tree by which
their nearest and dearest could tell them apart, the only thing he knew for
certain was that the end without the leaves on fitted unto the ground. There
were far too many of them, arranged with absolutely no sense of order. The
place hadn’t been swept for ages.
He remembered something about being able to tell where you were by looking
at which side of a tree the moss grew on. These trees had moss everywhere, and
wooden warts, and scrabbly old branches; if trees were people, these trees
would be sitting in rocking chairs.
Rincewind gave the nearest one a kick. With unerring aim it dropped an
acorn on him. He said „Ow.“ The tree, in a voice like a very old door swinging
open, said, „Serves you right.“
There was a long silence.
Then Rincewind said, „Did you say that?“
„Yes.“
„And that too?“
„Yes.“
„Oh.“ He thought for a bit. Then he tried, „I suppose you wouldn’t happen to
know the way out of the forest, possibly, by any chance?“
„No. I don’t get about much,“ said the tree.
„Fairly boring life, I imagine,“ said Rincewind.
„I wouldn’t know. I’ve never been anything else,“ said the tree.
Rincewind looked at it closely. It seemed pretty much like every other tree
he’d seen.
„Are you magical?“ he said.
„No-one’s ever said,“ said the tree, „I suppose so.“
Rincewind thought: I can’t be talking to a tree. If I was talking to a tree I’d be
mad, and I’m not mad, so trees can’t talk.
„Goodbye,“ he said firmly.
„Hey, don’t go,“ the tree began, and then realised the hopelessness of it all. It
watched him stagger off through the bushes, and settled down to feeling the
sun on its leaves, the slurp and gurgle of the water in its roots, and the very
ebb and flow of its sap in response to the natural tug of the sun and moon.
Boring, it thought. What a strange thing to say. Trees can be bored, of course,
beetles do it all the time, but I don’t think that was what he was trying to mean.
And: can you actually be anything else? In fact Rincewind never spoke to this
particular tree again, but from that brief conversation it spun the basis of the
first tree religion which, in time, swept the forests of the world. Its tenet of faith
was this: a tree that was a good tree, and led a clean, decent and upstanding
life, could be assured of a future life after death. If it was very good indeed it
would eventually be reincarnated as five thousand rolls of lavatory paper.
A few miles away Twoflower was also getting over his surprise at finding
himself back on the Disc. He was sitting on the hull of the Potent Voyager as it
gurgled gradually under the dark waters of a large lake, surrounded by trees.
Strangely enough, he was not particularly worried. Twoflower was a tourist,
the first of the species to evolve on the Disc, and fundamental to his very
existence was the rock-hard belief that nothing bad could really happen to him
because he was not involved; he also believed that anyone could understand
anything he said provided he spoke loudly and slowly, that people were
basically trustworthy, and that anything could be sorted out among men of
goodwill if they just acted sensibly.
On the face of it this gave him a survival value marginally less than, say, a
soap herring, but to Rincewind’s amazement it all seemed to work and the little
man’s total obliviousness to all forms of danger somehow made danger so
discouraged that it gave up and went away.
Merely being faced with drowning stood no chance. Twoflower was quite
certain that in a well-organised society people would not be allowed to go
around getting drowned.
He was a little bothered, though, about where his Luggage had got to. But he
comforted himself with the nowledge that it was made of sapient pearwood, and
ought to be intelligent enough to look after itself…
In yet another part of the forest a young shaman was undergoing a very
essential part of his training. He had eaten of the sacred toadstool, he had
smoked the holy rhizome, he had carefully powdered up and inserted into
various orifices the mystic mushroom and now, sitting crosslegged under a pine
tree, he was concentrating firstly on making contact with the strange and
wonderful secrets at the heart of Being but mainly on stopping the top of his
head from unscrewing and floating away.
Blue four-side triangles pinwheeled across his vision. Occasionally he smiled
knowingly at nothing very much and said things like „Wow“ and „Urgh.“
There was a movement in the air and what he later described as „like, a sort
of explosion only backwards, you know?“ and suddenly where there had only
been nothing there was a large, battered, wooden chest.
It landed heavily on the leafmould, extended dozens of little legs, and turned
around ponderously to look at the shaman. That is to say, it had no face, but
even through the mycological haze he was horribly aware that it was looking at
him. And not a nice look, either. It was amazing how baleful a keyhole and a
couple of knotholes could be.
To his intense relief it gave a sort of wooden shrug, and set off through the
trees at a canter.
With superhuman effort the shaman recalled the correct sequence of
movements for standing up and even managed a couple of steps before he
looked down and gave up, having run out of legs.
Rincewind, meanwhile, had found a path. It wound about a good deal, and
he would have been happier if it had been cobbled, but following it gave him
something to do.
Several trees tried to strike up a conversation, but Rincewind was nearly
certain that this was not normal behaviour for trees and ignored them.
The day lengthened. There was no sound but the murmur of nasty little
stinging insects, the occasional crack of a falling branch, and the whispering of
the trees discussing religion and the trouble with squirrels. Rincewind began to
feel very lonely. He imagined himself living in the woods forever, sleeping on
leaves and eating… and eating… whatever there was to eat in woods. Trees, he
supposed, and nuts and berries. He would have to…
„Rincewind!“
There, coming up the path, was Twoflower—dripping wet, but beaming with
delight. The Luggage trotted along behind him (anything made of the wood
would follow its owner anywhere and it was often used to make luggage for the
grave goods of very rich dead kings who wanted to be sure of starting a new life
in the next world with clean underwear).
Rincewind sighed. Up to now, he’d thought the day couldn’t possibly get
worse.
It began to rain a particularly wet and cold rain. Rincewind and Twoflower
sat under a tree and watched it.
„Rincewind?“
„Um?“
„Why are we here?“
„Well, some say that the Creator of the Universe made the Disc and
everything on it, others say that its all a very complicated story involving the
testicles of the Sky God and the milk of the Celestial Cow, and some even hold
that we’re all just due to the total random accretion of probability particles. But
if you mean why are we here as opposed to falling off the Disc, I haven’t the
faintest idea. It’s probably all some ghastly mistake.“
„Oh. Do you think there’s anything to eat in this forest?“
„Yes,“ said the wizard bitterly, „us.“
„I’ve got some acorns, if you like,“ said the tree helpfully.
They sat in damp silence for some moments.
„Rincewind, the tree said—“
„Trees can’t talk,“ snapped Rincewind. „It’s very important to remember
that.“
„But you just heard—“
Rincewind sighed. „Look,“ he said. „It’s all down to simple biology, isn’t it? If
you’re going to talk you need the right equipment, like lungs and lips and,
and—“
„Vocal chords,“ said the tree.
„Yeah, them,“ said Rincewind. He shut up and stared gloomily at the rain.
„I thought wizards knew all about trees and wild food and things,“ said
Twoflower reproachfully. It was very seldom that anything in his voice
suggested that he thought of Rincewind as anything other than a magnificent
enchanter, and the wizard was stung into action.
„I do, I do,“ he snapped.
„Well, what kind of tree is this?“ said the tourist. Rincewind looked up.
„Beech,“ he said firmly.
„Actually—“ began the tree, and shut up quickly. It had caught Rincewind’s
look.
„Those things up there look like acorns,“ said Twoflower.
„Yes, well, this is the sessile or heptocarpic variety,“ said Rincewind. „The
nuts look very much like acorns, in fact. They can fool practically anybody.“
„Gosh,“ said Twoflower, and, „What’s that bush over there, then?“
„Mistletoe.“
„But it’s got thorns and red berries!“
„Well?“ said Rincewind sternly, and stared hard at him. Twoflower broke
first.
„Nothing,“ he said meekly. „I must have been misinformed.“
„Right.“
„But there’s some big mushrooms under it. Can you eat them?“
Rincewind looked at them cautiously. They were, indeed, very big, and had
red and white spotted caps. They were in fact a variety that the local shaman
(who at this point was some miles away, making friends with a rock) would only
eat after first attaching one leg to a large stone with a rope. There was nothing
for it but to go out in the rain and look at them.
He knelt down in the leafmould and peered under the cap. After a while he
said weakly, „No, no good to eat at all.“
„Why?“ called Twoflower. „Are the gills the wrong shade of yellow?“
„No, not really…“
„I expect the stems haven’t got the right kind of fluting, then.“
„They look okay, actually.“
„The cap, then, I expect the cap is the wrong colour,“ said Twoflower.
„Not sure about that.“
„Well then, why can’t you eat them?“
Rincewind coughed. „It’s the little doors and windows,“ he said wretchedly,
„it’s a dead giveaway.“

Thunder rolled across Unseen University. Rain poured over its roofs and
gurgled out of its gargoyles, although one or two of the more cunning ones had
scuttled off to shelter among the maze of tiles.
Far below, in the Great Hall, the eight most powerful wizards on the
Discworld gathered at the angles of a ceremonial octogram. Actually they
probably weren’t the most powerful, if the truth were known, but they certainly
had great powers of survival which, in the highly competitive world of magic,
was pretty much the same thing. Behind every wizard of the eighth rank were
half a dozen seventh rank wizards trying to bump him off, and senior wizards
had to develop an inquiring attitude to, for example, scorpions in their bed. An
ancient proverb summed it up: when a wizard is tired of looking for broken
glass in his dinner, it ran, he is tired of life.
The oldest wizard, Greyhald Spold of the Ancient and Truly Original Sages of
the Unbroken Circle, leaned heavily on his carven staff and spake thusly:
„Get on with it, Weatherwax, my feet are giving me gyp.“
Galder, who had merely paused for effect, glared at him.
„Very well, then, I will be brief—“
„Jolly good.“
„We all sought guidance as to the events of this morning. Can anyone among
us say he received it?“
The wizards looked sidelong at one another. Nowhere outside a trades union
conference fraternal benefit night can so much mutual distrust and suspicion
be found as among a gathering of senior enchanters. But the plain fact was that
the day had gone very badly. Normally informative demons, summoned
abruptly from the Dungeon Dimensions, had looked sheepish and sidled away
when questioned. Magic mirrors had cracked. Tarot cards had mysteriously
become blank. Crystal balls had gone all cloudy. Even tealeaves, normally
scorned by wizards as frivolous and unworthy of contemplation, had clustered
together at the bottom of cups and refused to move.
In short, the assembled wizards were at a loss. There was a general murmur
of agreement.
„And therefore I propose that we perform the Rite of AshkEnte,“ said Galder
dramatically.
He had to admit that he had hoped for a better response, something on the
lines of, well, „No, not the Rite of AshkEnte! Man was not meant to meddle with
such things!“
In fact there was a general mutter of approval.
„Good idea.“
„Seems reasonable.“
„Get on with it, then.“
Slightly put out, he summoned a procession of lesser wizards who carried
various magical implements into the hall.
It has already been hinted that around this time there was some
disagreement among the fraternity of wizards about how to practise magic.
Younger wizards in particular went about saying that it was time that magic
started to update its image and that they should all stop mucking about with
bits of wax and bone and put the whole thing on a properly-organised basis,
with research programmes and three-day conventions in good hotels where they
could read papers with titles like „Whither Geomancy?“ and „The role of SevenLeague Boots in a caring society.“
Trymon, for example, hardly ever did any magic these days but ran the Order
with hourglass efficiency and wrote lots of memos and had a big chart on his
office wall, covered with coloured blobs and flags and lines that no-one else
really understood but which looked very impressive.
The other type of wizard thought all this was so much marsh gas and
wouldn’t have anything to do with an image unless it was made of wax and had
pins stuck in it.
The heads of the eight orders were all of this persuasion, traditionalists to a
mage, and the utensils that were heaped around the octogram had a definite,
no-nonsense occult look about them. Rams horns, skulls, baroque metalwork
and heavy candles were much in evidence, despite the discovery by younger
wizards that the Rite of AshkEnte could perfectly well be performed with three
small bits of wood and 4 cc of mouse blood.
The preparations normally took several hours, but the combined powers of
the senior wizards shortened it considerably and, after a mere forty minutes,
Galder chanted the final words of the spell. They hung in front of him for a
moment before dissolving.
The air in the centre of the octogram shimmered and thickened, and
suddenly contained a tall, dark figure.
Most of it was hidden by a black robe and hood and this was probably just as
well. It held a long scythe in one hand and one couldn’t help noticing that what
should have been fingers were simply white bone.
The other skeletal hand held small cubes of cheese and pineapple on a stick.
WELL? said Death, in a voice with all the warmth and colour of an iceberg.
He caught the wizards’ gaze, and glanced down at the stick.
I WAS AT A PARTY, he added, a shade reproachfully.
„O Creature of Earth and Darkness, we do charge thee to abjure from—“
began Galder in a firm, commanding voice. Death nodded.
YES, YES, I KNOW ALL THAT, he said. WHY HAVE YOU SUMMONED ME?
„It is said that you can see both the past and future,“ said Galder a little
sulkily, because the big speech of binding and conjuration was one he rather
liked and people had said he was very good at it.
THAT IS ABSOLUTELY CORRECT.
„Then perhaps you can tell us what exactly it was that happened this
morning?“ said Galder. He pulled himself together, and added loudly, „I
command this by Azimrothe, by T’chikel, by—“
ALL RIGHT, YOU’VE MADE YOUR POINT, said Death. WHAT PRECISELY
WAS IT YOU WISHED TO KNOW? QUITE A LOT OF THINGS HAPPENED THIS
MORNING, PEOPLE WERE BORN, PEOPLE DIED, ALL THE TREES GREW A
BIT TALLER, RIPPLES MADE INTERESTING PATTERNS ON THE SEA—
„I mean about the Octavo,“ said Galder coldly.
THAT? OH, THAT WAS JUST A READJUSTMENT OF REALITY. I
UNDERSTAND THE OCTAVO WAS ANXIOUS NOT TO LOSE THE EIGHTH
SPELL. IT WAS DROPPING OFF THE DISC, APPARENTLY.
„Hold on, hold on,“ said Galder. He scratched his chin. „Are we talking about
the one inside the head of Rincewind? Tall thin man, bit scraggy? The one—“
—THAT HE HAS BEEN CARRYING AROUND ALL THESE YEARS, YES.
Galder frowned. It seemed a lot of trouble to go to. Everyone knew that when
a wizard died all the spells in his head would go free, so why bother to save
Rincewind? The spell would just float back eventually.
„Any idea why?“ he said without thinking and then, remembering himself in
time, added hastily, „By Yrriph and Kcharla I do abjure thee and—“
I WISH YOU WOULDN’T KEEP DOING THAT, said Death, ALL THAT I KNOW
IS THAT ALL THE SPELLS HAVE TO BE SAID TOGETHER NEXT HOGSWATCHNIGHT OR THE DISC WILL BE DESTROYED.
„Speak up there!“ demanded Greyhald Spold.
„Shut up!“ said Galder.
ME?
„No, him. Daft old—“
„I heard that!“ snapped Spold, „You young people—“ He stopped. Death was
looking at him thoughtfully, as if he was trying to remember his face.
„Look,“ said Galder, „just repeat that bit again, will you? The Disc will be
what?“
DESTROYED, said Death. CAN I GO NOW? I LEFT MY DRINK.
„Hang on,“ said Galder hurriedly. „By Cheliliki and Orizone and so forth,
what do you mean, destroyed?“
IT’S AN ANCIENT PROPHECY WRITTEN ON THE INNER WALLS OF THE
GREAT PYRAMID OF TSORT. THE WORD DESTROYED SEEMS QUITE SELFEXPLANATORY TO ME.
„That’s all you can tell us?“
YES.
„But Hogswatchnight is only two months away!“
YES.
„At least you can tell us where Rincewind is now!“ Death shrugged. It was a
gesture he was particularly well built for.
THE FOREST OF SKUND, RIMWARDS OF THE RAMTOP MOUNTAINS.
„What is he doing there?“
FEELING VERY SORRY FOR HIMSELF.
„Oh.“
NOW MAY I GO?
Galder nodded distractedly. He had been thinking wistfully of the
banishment ritual, which started „Begone, foul shade“ and had some rather
impressive passages which he had been practising, but somehow he couldn’t
work up any enthusiasm.
„Oh, yes,“ he said. „Thank you, yes.“ And then, because it’s as well not to
make enemies even among the creatures of night, he added politely, „I hope it is
a good party.“
Death didn’t answer. He was looking at Spold in the same way that a dog
looks at a bone, only in this case things were more or less the other way
around.
„I said I hope it is a good party,“ said Galder, loudly.
AT THE MOMENT IT IS, said Death levelly. I THINK IT MIGHT GO
DOWNHILL VERY QUICKLY AT MIDNIGHT.
„Why?“
THAT’S WHEN THEY THINK I’LL BE TAKING MY MASK OFF.
He vanished, leaving only a cocktail stick and a short paper streamer behind.

There had been an unseen observer of all this. It was of course entirely
against the rules, but Trymon knew all about rules and had always considered
they were for making, not obeying.
Long before the eight mages had got down to some serious arguing about
what the apparition had meant he was down in the main levels of the University
library.
It was an awe-inspiring place. Many of the books were magical, and the
important thing to remember about grimoires is that they are deadly in the
hands of any librarian who cares about order, because he’s bound to stick them
all on the same shelf. This is not a good idea with books that tend to leak
magic, because more than one or two of them together form a critical Black
Mass. On top of that, many of the lesser spells are quite particular about the
company they keep, and tend to express any objections by hurling their books
viciously across the room. And, of course, there is always the half-felt presence
of the Things from the Dungeon Dimensions, clustering around the magical
leakage and constantly probing the walls of reality.
The job of magical librarian, who has to spend his working days in this sort
of highly charged atmosphere, is a high-risk occupation.
The Head Librarian was sitting on top of his desk, quietly peeling a orange,
and was well aware of that.
He glanced up when Trymon entered.
„I’m looking for anything we’ve got on the Pyramid of Tshut,“ said Trymon. He
had come prepared: he took a banana out of his pocket.
The librarian looked at it mournfully, and then flopped down heavily on the
floor. Trymon found a soft hand poked gently into his and the librarian led the
way, waddling sadly between the bookshelves. It was like holding a little leather
glove.
Around them the books sizzled and sparked, with the occasional discharge of
undirected magic flashing over to the carefully-placed earthing rods nailed to
the shelves. There was a tinny, blue smell and, just at the very limit of hearing,
the horrible chittering of the dungeon creatures.
Like many other parts of Unseen University the library occupied rather more
space than its outside dimensions would suggest, because magic distorts space
in strange ways, and it was probably the only library in the universe with
Mobius shelves. But the librarian’s mental catalogue was ticking over perfectly.
He stopped by a soaring stack of musty books and swung himself up into the
darkness. There was the sound of rustling paper, and a cloud of dust oated
down to Trymon. Then the librarian was back, a slim volume in his hands.
„Oook,“ he said.
Trymon took it gingerly.
The cover was scratched and very dog-eared, the gold of its lettering had long
ago curled off, but he could just make out, in the old magic tongue of the Tsort
Valley, the words: Iyt Gryet Teymple hyte Tsort, Y Hiystory Myistical.
„Oook?“ said the librarian, anxiously.
Trymon turned the pages cautiously. He wasn’t very good at languages, he’d
always found them highly inefficient things which by rights ought to be
replaced by some sort of easily understood numerical system, but this seemed
exactly what he was looking for. There were whole pages covered with
meaningful hieroglyphs.
„Is this the only book you’ve got about the pyramid of Tsort?“ he said slowly.
„Oook.“
„You’re quite sure?“
„Oook.“
Trymon listened. He could hear, a long way off, the sound of approaching feet
and arguing voices. But he had been prepared for that, too.
He reached into a pocket.
„Would you like another banana?“ he said.

The forest of Skund was indeed enchanted, which was nothing unusual on
the Disc, and was also the only forest in the whole universe to be called—in the
local language—Your Finger You Fool, which was the literal meaning of the
word Skund.
The reason for this is regrettably all too common. When the first explorers
from the warm lands around the Circle Sea travelled into the chilly hinterland
they filled in the blank spaces on their maps by grabbing the nearest native,
pointing at some distant landmark, speaking very clearly in a loud voice, and
writing down whatever the bemused man told them. Thus were immortalised in
generations of atlases such geographical oddities as Just A Mountain, I Don’t
Know, What? and, of course, Your Finger You Fool.
Rainclouds clustered around the bald heights of Mt. Oolskunrahod („Who is
this Fool who does Not Know what a Mountain Is“) and the Luggage settled
itself more comfortably under a dripping tree, which tried unsuccessfully to
strike up a conversation.
Twoflower and Rincewind were arguing. The person they were arguing about
sat on his mushroom and watched them with interest. He looked like someone
who smelled like someone who lived in a mushroom, and that bothered
Twoflower.
„Well, why hasn’t he got a red hat?“
Rincewind hesitated, desperately trying to imagine what Twoflower was
getting at.
„What?“ he said, giving in.
„He should have a red hat,“ said Twoflower. „And he certainly ought to be
cleaner and more, more sort of jolly. He doesn’t look like any sort of gnome to
me.“
„What are you going on about?“
„Look at that beard,“ said Twoflower sternly. „I’ve seen better beards on a
piece of cheese.“
„Look, he’s six inches high and lives in a mushroom,“ snarled Rincewind. „Of
course he’s a bloody gnome.“
„We’ve only got his word for it.“
Rincewind looked down at the gnome.
„Excuse me,“ he said. He took Twoflower to the other side of the clearing.
„Listen,“ he said between his teeth. „If he was fifteen feet tall and said he was
a giant we’d only have his word for that too, wouldn’t we?“
„He could be a goblin,“ said Twoflower defiantly.
Rincewind looked back at the tiny figure, which was industriously picking its
nose.
„Well?“ he said. „So what? Gnome, goblin, pixie—so what?“
„Not a pixie,“ said Twoflower firmly. „Pixies, they wear these sort of green
combinations and they have pointy caps and little knobbly antenna thingies
sticking out of their heads. I’ve seen pictures.“
„Where?“
Twoflower hesitated, and looked at his feet. „I think it was called the mutter,
mutter, mutter.“
„The what? Called the what?“
The little man took a sudden interest in the backs of his hands.
„The Little Folks’ Book of Flower Fairies,“ he muttered.
Rincewind looked blank.
„It’s a book on how to avoid them?“ he said.
„Oh no,“ said Twoflower hurriedly. „It tells you where to look for them. I can
remember the pictures now.“ A dreamy look came over his face, and Rincewind
groaned inwardly. „There was even a special fairy that came and took your
teeth away.“
„What, came and pulled out your actual teeth—?“
„No, no, you’re wrong, I mean after they’d fallen out, what you did was, you
put the tooth under your pillow and the fairy came and took it away and left a
rhinu piece.“
„Why?“
„Why what?“
„Why did it collect teeth?“
„It just did.“
Rincewind formed a mental picture of some strange entity living in a castle
made of teeth. It was the kind of mental picture you tried to forget.
Unsuccessfully.
„Urgh,“ he said.
Red hats! He wondered whether to enlighten the tourist about what life was
really like when a frog was a good meal, a rabbit hole a useful place to shelter
out of the rain, and an owl a drifting, silent terror in the night. Moleskin
trousers sounded quaint unless you personally had to remove them from their
original owner when the vicious little sod was cornered in his burrow. As for red
hats, anyone who went around a forest looking bright and conspicuous would
only do so very, very briefly.
He wanted to say: look, the life of gnomes and goblins is nasty, brutish and
short. So are they.
He wanted to say all this, and couldn’t. For a man with an itch to see the
whole of infinity, Twoflower never actually moved outside his own head. Telling
him the truth would be like kicking a spaniel.
„Swee whee weedle wheet,“ said a voice by his foot. He looked down. The
gnome, who had introduced himself as Swires, looked up. Rincewind had a very
good ear for languages. The gnome had just said, „I’ve got some newt sorbet left
over from yesterday.“
„Sounds wonderful,“ said Rincewind.
Swires gave him another prod in the ankle.
„The other bigger, is he all right?“ he said solicitously.
„He’s just suffering from reality shock,“ said Rincewind. „You haven’t got a
red hat, by any chance?“
„Wheet?“
„Just a thought.“
„I know where there’s some food for biggers,“ said the gnome, „and shelter,
too. It’s not far.“
Rincewind looked at the lowering sky. The daylight was draining out of the
landscape and the clouds looked as if they had heard about snow and were
considering the idea. Of course, people who lived in mushrooms couldn’t
necessarily be trusted, but right now a trap baited with a hot meal and clean
sheets would have had the wizard hammering to get in.
They set off. After a few seconds the Luggage got carefully to its feet and
started to follow.
„Psst!“
It turned carefully, little legs moving in a complicated pattern, and appeared
to look up.
„Is it good, being joinery?“ said the tree, anxiously. „Did it hurt?“
The Luggage seemed to think about this. Every brass handle, every knothole,
radiated extreme concentration.
Then it shrugged its lid and waddled away.
The tree sighed, and shook a few dead leaves out of its twigs.
The cottage was small, tumbledown and as ornate as a doily. Some mad
whittler had got to work on it, Rincewind decided, and had created terrible
havoc before he could be dragged away. Every door, every shutter had its
clusters of wooden grapes and half-moon cutouts, and there were massed
outbreaks of fretwork pinecones all over the walls. He half expected a giant
cuckoo to come hurtling out of an upper window.
What he also noticed was the characteristic greasy feel in the air. Tiny green
and purple sparks flashed from his fingernails.
„Strong magical field,“ he muttered. „A hundred milli-thaums(2) at least.“
„There’s magic all over the place,“ said Swires. „An old witch used to live
around here. She went a long time ago but the magic still keeps the house
going.“
„Here, there’s something odd about that door,“ said Twoflower.
„Why should a house need magic to keep it going?“ said Rincewind.
Twoflower touched a wall gingerly.
„It’s all sticky!“
„Nougat,“ said Swires.
„Good grief! A real gingerbread cottage! Rincewind, a real—“
Rincewind nodded glumly. „Yeah, the Confectionary School of Architecture,“
he said. „It never caught on.“
He looked suspiciously at the liquorice doorknocker.
„It sort of regenerates,“ said Swires. „Marvellous, really. You just don’t get
this sort of place nowadays, you just an’t get the gingerbread.“
„Really?“ said Rincewind, gloomily.
„Come on in,“ said the gnome, „but mind the doormat.“
„Why?“
„Candyfloss.“

The great Disc spun slowly under its toiling sun, and daylight pooled in
hollows and finally drained away as night fell.
In his chilly room in Unseen University Trymon pored over the book, his lips
moving as his finger traced the unfamiliar, ancient script. He read that the
Great Pyramid of Tsort, now long vanished, was made of one million, three
thousand and ten limestone blocks. He read that ten thousand slaves had been
worked to death in its building. He learned that it was a maze of secret
passages, their walls reputedly decorated with the distilled wisdom of ancient
Tsort. He read that its height plus its length divided by half its width equalled
exactly 1.67563, or precisely 1,237.98712567 times the difference between the
distance to the sun and the weight of a small orange. He learned that sixty
years had been devoted entirely to its construction.
It all seemed, he thought, to be rather a lot of trouble to go to just to sharpen
a razor blade.
And in the Forest of Skund Twoflower and Rincewind settled down to a meal
of gingerbread mantlepiece and thought longingly of pickled onions.

And far away, but set as it were on a collision course, the greatest hero the
Disc ever produced rolled himself a cigarette, entirely unaware of the role that
lay in store for him.
It was quite an interesting tailormade that he twirled expertly between his
fingers because, like many of the wandering wizards from whom he had picked
up the art, he was in the habit of saving dogends in a leather bag and rolling
them into fresh smokes. The implacable law of verages therefore dictated that
some of that tobacco had been smoked almost continuously for many years
now. The thing he was trying unsuccessfully to light was, well, you could have
coated roads with it.
So great was the reputation of this person that a group of nomadic barbarian
horsemen had respectfully invited him to join them as they sat around a
horseturd fire. The nomads of the Hub regions usually migrated Rimwards for
the winter, and these were part of a tribe who had pitched their felt tents in the
sweltering heatwave of a mere –3 degrees and were going around with peeling
noses and complaining about heatstroke.
The barbarian chieftain said: „What then are the greatest things that a man
may find in life?“ This is the sort of thing you’re supposed to say to maintain
steppe-cred in barbarian circles.
The man on his right thoughtfully drank his cocktail of mare’s milk and
snowcat blood, and spoke thus: „The crisp horizon of the steppe, the wind in
your hair, a fresh horse under you.“
The man on his left said: „The cry of the white eagle in the heights, the fall of
snow in the forest, a true arrow in your bow.“
The chieftain nodded, and said: „Surely it is the sight of your enemy slain,
the humiliation of his tribe and the lamentation of his women.“
There was a general murmur of whiskery approval at this outrageous display.
Then the chieftain turned respectfully to his guest, a small figure carefully
warming his chilblains by the fire, and said: „But our guest, whose name is
legend, must tell us truly: what is it that a man may call the greatest things in
life?“
The guest paused in the middle of another unsuccessful attempt to light up.
„What shay?“ he said, toothlessly.
„I said: what is it that a man may call the greatest things in life?“
The warriors leaned closer. This should be worth hearing.
The guest thought long and hard and then said, with deliberation: „Hot
water, good dentishtry and shoft lavatory paper.“

Brilliant octarine light flared in the forge. Galder Weatherwax, stripped to the
waist, his face hidden by a mask of smoked glass, squinted into the glow and
brought a hammer down with surgical precision. The magic squealed and
writhed in the tongs but still he worked it, drawing it into a line of agonised fire.
A floorboard creaked. Galder had spent many hours tuning them, always a
wise precaution with an ambitious assistant who walked like a cat.
D flat. That meant he was just to the right of the door.
„Ah, Trymon,“ he said, without turning, and noted with some satisfaction the
faint indrawing of breath behind him. „Good of you to come. Shut the door, will
you?“
Trymon pushed the heavy door, his face expressionless. On the high shelf
above him various bottled impossibilities wallowed in their pickle jars and
watched him with interest.
Like all wizards’ workshops, the place looked as though a taxidermist had
dropped his stock in a foundry and then had a fight with a maddened
glassblower, braining a passing crocodile in the process (it hung from the
ceiling and smelt strongly of camphor). There were lamps and rings that
Trymon itched to rub, and mirrors that looked as though they could repay a
second glance. A pair of seven-league boots stirred restlessly in a cage. A whole
library of grimoires, not of course as powerful as the Octavo but still heavy with
spells, creaked and rattled their chains as they sensed the wizard’s covetous
glance on them. The naked power of it all stirred him as nothing else could, but
he deplored the scruffiness and Galder’s sense of theatre.
For example, he happened to know that the green liquid bubbling
mysteriously through a maze of contorted pipework on one of the benches was
just green dye with soap in it, because he’d bribed one of the servants.
One day, he thought, it’s all going to go. Starting with that bloody alligator.
His knuckles whitened…
„Well now,“ said Galder cheerfully, hanging up his apron and sitting back in
his chair with the lion paw arms and duck legs, „You sent me this memmything.“
Trymon shrugged. „Memo. I merely pointed out, lord, that the other Orders
have all sent agents to Skund Forest to recapture the spell, while you do
nothing,“ he said. „No doubt you will reveal your reasons in good time.“
„Your faith shames me,“ said Galder.
„The wizard who captures the spell will bring great honour on himself and his
order,“ said Trymon. „The others have used boots and all manner of elsewhere
spells. What do you propose using, master?“
„Did I detect a hint of sarcasm there?“
„Absolutely not, master.“
„Not even a smidgeon?“
„Not even the merest smidgeon, master.“
„Good. Because I don’t propose to go.“ Galder reached down and picked up
an ancient book. He mumbled a command and it creaked open; a bookmark
suspiciously like a tongue flicked back into the binding.
He fumbled down beside his cushion and produced a little leather bag of
tobacco and a pipe the size of an incinerator. With all the skill of a terminal
nicotine addict he rubbed a nut of tobacco between his hands and tamped it
into the bowl. He snapped his fingers and fire flared. He sucked deep, sighed
with satisfaction…
…looked up.
„Still here, Tryrnon?“
„You summoned me, master,“ said Trymon levelly. At least, that’s what his
voice said. Deep in his grey eyes was the faintest glitter that said he had a list of
every slight, every patronising twinkle, every gentle reproof, every knowing
glance, and for every single one Galder’s living brain was going to spend a year
in acid.
„Oh, yes, so I did. Humour the deficiencies of an old man,“ said Galder
pleasantly. He held up the book he had been reading.
„I don’t hold with all this running about,“ he said. „It’s all very dramatic,
mucking about with magic carpets and the like, but it isn’t true magic to my
mind. Take seven league boots, now. If men were meant to walk twenty-one
miles at a step I am sure God would have given us longer legs… Where was I?“
„I am not sure,“ said Trymon coldly.
„Ah, yes. Strange that we could find nothing about the Pyramid of Tsort in
the Library, you would have thought there’d be something, wouldn’t you?“
„The librarian will be disciplined, of course.“
Galder looked sideways at him. „Nothing drastic,“ he said. „Withold his
bananas, perhaps.“
They looked at each other for a moment.
Galder broke off first—looking hard at Trymon always bothered him. It had
the same disconcerting effect as gazing into a mirror and seeing no-one there.
„Anyway,“ he said, „strangely enough, I found assistance elsewhere. In my
own modest bookshelves, in fact. The journal of Skrelt Changebasket, the
founder of our order. You, my keen young man who would rush off so soon, do
you know what happens when a wizard dies?“
„Any spells he has memorised say themselves,“ said Trymon. „It is one of the
first things we learn.“
„In fact it is not true of the original Eight Great Spells. By dint of close study
Skrelt learned that a Great Spell will simply take refuge in the nearest mind
open and ready to receive it. Just push the big mirror over here, will you?“
Galder got to his feet and shuffled across to the forge, which was now cold.
The strand of magic still writhed, though, at once present and not present, like
a slit cut into another universe full of hot blue light. He picked it up easily, took
a longbow from a rack, said a word of power, and watched with satisfaction as
the magic grasped the ends of the bow and then tightened until the wood
creaked. Then he selected an arrow.
Trymon had tugged a heavy, full-length mirror into the middle of the floor.
When I am head of the Order, he told himself, I certainly won’t shuffle around
in carpet slippers.
Trymon, as mentioned earlier, felt that a lot could be done by fresh blood if
only the dead wood could be removed—but, just for the moment, he was
genuinely interested in seeing what the old fool would do next.
He may have derived some satisfaction if he had known that Galder and
Skrelt Changebasket were both absolutely wrong.
Galder made a few passes in front of the glass, which clouded over and then
cleared to show an aerial view of the Forest of Skund. He looked at it intently
while holding the bow with the arrow pointing vaguely at the ceiling. He
muttered a few words like „allow for wind speed of, say, three knots“ and
„adjust for temperature“ and then, with a rather disappointing movement,
released the arrow.
If the laws of action and reaction had anything to do with it, it should have
flopped to the ground a few feet away. But no-one was listening to them.
With a sound that defies description, but which for the sake of completeness
can be thought of basically as „spang!“ plus three days hard work in any
decently equipped radiophonic workshop, the arrow vanished.
Galder threw the bow aside and grinned.
„Of course, it’ll take about an hour to get there,“ he said. „Then the spell will
simply follow the ionised path back here. To me.“
„Remarkable,“ said Trymon, but any passing telepath would have read in
letters ten yards high: if you, then why not me? He looked down at the cluttered
workbench, when a long and very sharp knife looked tailormade for what he
suddenly had in mind.
Violence was not something he liked to be involved in except at one remove.
But the Pyramid of Tsort had been quite clear about the rewards for whoever
brought all right spells together at the right time, and Trymon was not about to
let years of painstaking work go for nothing because some old fool had a bright
idea.
„Would you like some cocoa while we’re waiting?“ said Galder, hobbling
across the room to the servants’ bell.
„Certainly,“ said Trymon. He picked up the knife, weighing it for balance and
accuracy. „I must congratulate you, master. I can see that we must all get up
very early in the morning to get the better of you.“
Galder laughed. And the knife left Trymon’s hand at such speed that
(because of the somewhat sluggish nature of Disc light) it actually grew a bit
shorter and a little more massive as it plunged, with unerring aim, towards
Galder’s neck.
It didn’t reach it. Instead, it swerved to one side and began a fast orbit—so
fast that Galder appeared suddenly to be wearing a metal collar. He turned
around, and to Trymon it seemed that he had suddenly grown several feet taller
and much more powerful.
The knife broke away and shuddered into the door a mere shadow’s depth
from Trymon’s ear.
„Early in the morning?“ said Galder pleasantly. „My dear lad, you will need to
stay up all night.“

„Have a bit more table,“ said Rincewind.
„No thanks, I don’t like marzipan,“ said Twoflower. „Anyway, I’m sure it’s not
right to eat other people’s furniture.“
„Don’t worry,“ said Swires. „The old witch hasn’t been seen for years. They
say she was done up good and proper by a couple of young tearaways.“
„Kids of today,“ commented Rincewind.
„I blame the parents,“ said Twoflower.
Once you had made the necessary mental adjustments, the gingerbread
cottage was quite a pleasant place. Residual magic kept it standing and it was
shunned by such local wild animals who hadn’t already died of terminal tooth
decay. A bright fire of liquorice logs burned rather messily in the fireplace;
Rincewind had tried gathering wood outside, but had given up. It’s hard to burn
wood that talks to you.
He belched.
„This isn’t very healthy,“ he said. „I mean, why sweets? Why not crispbread
and cheese? Or salami, now—I could just do with a nice salami sofa.“
„Search me,“ said Swires. „Old Granny Whitlow just did sweets. You should
have seen her meringues—“
„I have,“ said Rincewind, „I looked at the mattresses…“
„Gingerbread is more traditional,“ said Twoflower.
„What, for mattresses?“
„Don’t be silly,“ said Twoflower reasonably. „Whoever heard of a gingerbread
mattress?“
Rincewind grunted. He was thinking of food—more accurately, of food in
Ankh-Morpork. Funny how the old place seemed more attractive the further he
got from it. He only had to close his eyes to picture, in dribbling detail, the food
stalls of a hundred different cultures in the market places. You could eat
squishi or shark’s fin soup so fresh that swimmers wouldn’t go near it, and—
„Do you think I could buy this place?“ said Twoflower. Rincewind hesitated.
He’d found it always paid to think very carefully before answering Twoflower’s
more surprising questions.
„What for?“ he said, cautiously.
„Well, it just reeks of ambience.“
„Oh.“
„What’s ambience?“ said Swires, sniffing cautiously and wearing the kind of
expression that said that he hadn’t done it, whatever it was.
„I think it’s a kind of frog,“ said Rincewind. „Anyway, you can’t buy this place
because there isn’t anyone to buy it from—“
„I think I could probably arrange that, on behalf of the forest council of
course,“ interrupted Swires, trying to avoid Rincewind’s glare.
„—and anyway you couldn’t take it with you, I mean, you could hardly pack
it in the Luggage, could you?“ Rincewind indicated the Luggage, which was
lying by the fire and managing in some quite impossible way to look like a
contented but alert tiger, and then looked back at Twoflower. His face fell.
„Could you?“ he repeated.
He had never quite come to terms with the fact that the inside of the Luggage
didn’t seem to inhabit quite the same world as the outside. Of course, this was
simply a byproduct of its essential weirdness, but it was disconcerting to see
Twoflower fill it full of dirty shirts and old socks and then open the lid again on
a pile of nice crisp laundry, smelling faintly of lavender. Twoflower also bought
a lot of quaint native artifacts or, as Rincewind would put it, junk, and even a
seven-foot ceremonial pig tickling pole seemed to fit inside quite easily without
sticking out anywhere.
„I don’t know,“ said Twoflower. „You’re a wizard, you know about these
things.“
„Yes, well, of course, but baggage magic is a highly specialised art,“ said
Rincewind. „Anyway, I’m sure the gnomes wouldn’t really want to sell it, it’s,
it’s—“ he groped through what he knew of Twoflower’s mad vocabulary—„it’s a
tourist attraction.“
„What’s that?“ said Swires, interestedly.
„It means that lots of people like him will come and look at it,“ said
Rincewind.
„Why?“
„Because—“ Rincewind groped for words—„it’s quaint. Urn, oldey worldey.
Folkloresque. Er, a delightful example of a vanished folk art, steeped in the
traditions of an age long gone.“
„It is?“ said Swires, looking at the cottage in bewilderment.
„Yes.“
„All that?“
„Fraid so.“
„I’ll help you pack.“

And the night wears on, under a blanket of lowering clouds which covers
most of the Disc—which is fortuitous, because when it clears and the
astrologers get a good view of the sky they are going to get angry and upset.
And in various parts of the forest parties of wizards are getting lost, and
going around in circles, and hiding from each other, and getting upset because
whenever they bump into a tree it apologises to them. But, unsteadily though it
may be, many of them are getting quite close to the cottage…
Which is a good time to get back to the rambling buildings of Unseen
University and in particular the apartments of Greyhald Spold, currently the
oldest wizard on the Disc and determined to keep it that way.
He has just been extremely surprised and upset.
For the last few hours he has been very busy. He may be deaf and a little
hard of thinking, but elderly wizards have very well-trained survival instincts,
and they know that when a tall figure in a black robe and the latest in
agricultural handtools starts looking thoughtfully at you it is time to act fast.
The servants have been dismissed. The doorways have been sealed with a paste
made from powdered mayflies, and protective octograms have been drawn on
the windows. Rare and rather smelly oils have been poured in complex patterns
on the floor, in designs which hurt the eyes and suggest the designer was
drunk or from some other dimension or, possibly, both; in the very centre of the
room is the eightfold octogram of Witholding, surrounded by red and green
candles. And in the centre of that is a box made from wood of the curly-fern
pine, which grows to a great age, and it is lined with red silk and yet more
protective amulets. Because Greyhald Spold knows that Death is looking for
him, and has spent many years designing an impregnable hiding place.
He has just set the complicated clockwork of the lock and shut the lid, lying
back in the knowledge that here at last is the perfect defence against the most
ultimate of all his enemies, although as yet he has not considered the
important part that airholes must play in an enterprise of this kind.
And right beside him, very close to his ear, a voice has just said: DARK IN
HERE, ISN’T IT?

It began to snow. The barleysugar windows of the cottage showed bright and
cheerful against the blackness.
At one side of the clearing three tiny red points of light-glowed momentarily
and there was the sound of a chesty cough, abruptly silenced.
„Shut up!“ hissed a third rank wizard. „They’ll hear us!“
„Who will? We gave the lads from the Brotherhood of the Hoodwink the slip
in the swamp, and those idiots from the Venerable Council of Seers went off the
wrong way anyway.“
„Yeah,“ said the most junior wizard, „but who keeps talking to us? They say
this is a magic wood, it’s full of goblins and wolves and—“
„Trees,“ said a voice out of the darkness, high above. It possessed what can
only be described as timbre.
„Yeah,“ said the youngest wizard. He sucked on his dogend, and shivered.
The leader of the party peered over the rock and watched the cottage.
„Right then,“ he said, knocking out his pipe on the heel of his seven league
boot, who squeaked in protest. „We rush in, we grab them, we’re away. Okay?“
„You sure it’s just people?“ said the youngest wizard, nervously.
„Of course I’m sure,“ snarled the leader. „What do you expect, three bears?“
„There could be monsters. This is the sort of wood that has monsters.“
„And trees,“ said a friendly voice from the branches. „Yeah,“ said the leader,
cautiously.

Rincewind looked carefully at the bed. It was quite a nice little bed, in a sort
of hard toffee inlaid with caramel, but he’d rather eat it than sleep in it and it
looked as though someone already had.
„Someone’s been eating my bed,“ he said.
„I like toffee,“ said Twoflower defensively.
„If you don’t watch out the fairy will come and take all your teeth away,“ said
Rincewind.
„No, that’s elves,“ said Swires from the dressing table. „Elves do that.
Toenails, too. Very touchy at times, elves can be.“
Twoflower sat down heavily on his bed.
„You’ve got it wrong,“ he said. „Elves are noble and beautiful and wise and
fair; I’m sure I read that somewhere.“
Swires and Rincewind’s kneecap exchanged glances.
„I think you must be thinking about different elves,“ the gnome said slowly.
„We’ve just got the other sort around here. Not that you could call them quicktempered,“ he added hastily. „Not if you didn’t want to take your teeth home in
your hat, anyway.“
There was the tiny, distinctive sound of a nougat door opening. At the same
time, from the other side of the cottage, came the faintest of tinkles, like a rock
smashing a barley sugar window as delicately as possible.
„What was that?“ said Twoflower.
„Which one?“ said Rincewind.
There was the clonk of a heavy branch banging against the window sill. With
a cry of „Elves!“ Swires scuttled across the floor to a mousehole and vanished.
„What shall we do?“ said Twoflower.
„Panic?“ said Rincewind hopefully. He always held that panic was the best
means of survival; back in the olden days, his theory went, people faced with
hungry sabre-toothed tigers could be divided very simply into those who
panicked and those who stood there saying „What a magnificent brute!“ and
„Here, pussy.“
„There’s a cupboard,“ said Twoflower, pointing to a narrow door that was
squeezed between the wall and the chimneybreast. They scrambled into sweet,
musty darkness.
There was the creak of a chocolate floorboard outside. Someone said „I heard
voices.“
Someone else said, „Yeah, downstairs. I think it’s the Hood winkers.“
„I thought you said we’d given them the slip!“
„Hey, you two, you can eat this place! Here, look you can—“
„Shut up!“
There was a lot more creaking, and a muffled scream from downstairs where
a Venerable Seer, creeping carefully through the darkness from the broken
window, had trodden on the fingers of a Hoodwinker who was hiding under the
table. There was the sudden zip and zing of magic.
„Bugger!“ said a voice outside. „They’ve got him! Let’s go!“
There was more creaking, and then silence. After a while Twoflower said,
„Rincewind, I think there’s a broomstick in this cupboard.“
„Well, what’s so unusual about that?“
„This one’s got handlebars.“
There was a piercing shriek from below. In the darkness a wizard had tried to
open the Luggage’s lid. A crash from the scullery indicated the sudden arrival of
a party of Illuminated Mages of the Unbroken Circle.
„What do you think they’re after?“ whispered Twoflower.
„I don’t know, but I think it might be a good idea not to find out,“ said
Rincewind thoughtfully.
„You could be right.“
Rincewind pushed open the door gingerly. The room was empty. He tiptoed
across to the window, and looked own into the upturned faces of three Brothers
of the Order of Midnight.
„That’s him!“
He drew back hurriedly and rushed for the stairs.
The scene below was indescribable but since that statement would earn the
death penalty in the reign of Olaf Quimby II the attempt better be made. Firstly,
most of the struggling wizards were trying to illuminate the scene by various
flames, fireballs and magical glows, so the overall lighting gave the impression
of a disco in a strobelight factory; each man was trying to find a position from
which he could see the rest of the room without being attacked himself, and
absolutely everyone was trying to keep out of the way of the Luggage, which
had two Venerable Seers pinned in a corner and was snapping its lid at anyone
who approached. But one wizard did happen to look up.
„It’s him!“
Rincewind jerked back, and something bumped into him. He looked around
hurriedly, and stared when he saw Twoflower sitting on the broomstick—which
was floating in mid-air.
„The witch must have left it behind!“ said Twoflower. „A genuine magic
broomstick!“
Rincewind hesitated. Octarine sparks were spitting off the broomstick’s
bristles and he hated heights almost more than anything else, but what he
really hated more than anything at all was a dozen very angry and badtempered wizards rushing up the stairs towards him, and this was happening.
„All right,“ he said, „but I’ll drive.“
He lashed out with a boot at a wizard who was halfway through a Spell of
Binding and jumped onto the broomstick, which bobbed down the stairwell and
then turned upside down so that Rincewind was horribly eye to eye with a
Brother of Midnight.
He yelped and gave the handlebars a convulsive twist.
Several things happened at once. The broomstick shot forward and broke
through the wall in a shower of crumbs: the Luggage surged forward and bit the
Brother in the leg: and with a strange whistling sound an arrow appeared from
nowhere, missed Rincewind by inches, and struck the Luggage’s lid with a very
solid thud. The Luggage vanished.

In a little village deep in the forest an ancient shaman threw a few more twigs
on his fire and stared through the smoke at his shamefaced apprentice.
„A box with legs on?“ he said.
„Yes, master. It just appeared out of the sky and looked at me,“ said the
apprentice.
„It had eyes then, this box?“
„N—,“ began the apprentice and stopped, puzzled. The old man frowned.
„Many have seen Topaxci, God of the Red Mushroom, and they earn the
name of shaman,“ he said. „Some have seen Skelde, spirit of the smoke, and
they are called sorcerers. A few have been privileged to see Umcherrel, the soul
of the forest, and they are known as spirit masters. But none have seen a box
with hundreds of legs that looked at them without eyes, and they are known as
idio—“
The interruption was caused by a sudden screaming noise and a flurry of
snow and sparks that blew the fire across the dark hut; there was a brief
blurred vision and then the opposite wall was blasted aside and the apparition
vanished.
There was a long silence. Then a slightly shorter silence. Then the old
shaman said carefully, „You didn’t just see two men go through upside down on
a broomstick, shouting and screaming at each other, did you?“
The boy looked at him levelly. „Certainly not,“ he said.
The old man heaved a sigh of relief. „Thank goodness for that,“ he said.
„Neither did I.“
The cottage was in turmoil, because not only did the wizards want to follow
the broomstick, they also wanted to prevent each other from doing so, and this
led to several regrettable incidents. The most spectacular, and certainly the
most tragic, happened when one Seer attempted to use his seven league boots
without the proper sequence of spells and preparations. Seven league boots, as
has already been intimated, are a tricksy form of magic at best, and he
remembered too late that the utmost caution must be taken in using a means
of transport which, when all is said and done, relies for its effectiveness on
trying to put one foot twenty-one miles in front of the other.

The first snowstorms of winter were raging, and in fact there was a
suspiciously heavy covering of cloud over most of the Disc. And yet, from far
above and by the silver light of the discworld’s tiny moon, it presented one of
the most beautiful sights in the multiverse.
Great streamers of cloud, hundreds of miles along, swirled from the waterfall
at the Rim to the mountains of the Hub. In the cold crystal silence the huge
white spiral glittered frostily under the stars, imperceptibly turning, very much
as though God had stirred His coffee and then poured the cream in.
Nothing disturbed the glowing scene, which—
Something small and distant broke through the cloud layer, trailing shreds of
vapour. In the stratospheric calm the sounds of bickering came sharp and
clear.
„You said you could fly one of these things!“
„No I didn’t; I just said you couldn’t!“
„But I’ve never been on one before!“
„What a coincidence!“
„Anyway, you said—look at the sky!“
„No I didn’t!“
„What’s happened to the stars?“
And so it was that Rincewind and Twoflower became the first two people on
the Disc to see what the future held.
A thousand miles behind them the Hub mountain of Cori Celesti stabbed the
sky and cast a knife-bright shadow across the broiling clouds, so that Gods
ought to have noticed too—but the Gods don’t normally look at the sky and in
any case were engaged in litigation with the Ice Giants, who had refused to turn
their radio down.
Rimwards, in the direction of Great A’Tuin’s travel, the sky had been swept of
stars.
In that circle of blackness there was just one star, a red and baleful star, a
star like the glitter in the eyesocket of a rabid mink. It was small and horrible
and uncompromising. And the Disc was being carried straight towards it.
Rincewind knew precisely what to do in these circumstances. He screamed
and pointed the broomstick straight down.

Galder Weatherwax stood in the centre of the octogram and raised his hands.
„Urshalo, dileptor, c’hula, do my bidding!“
A small mist formed over his head. He glanced sideways at Trymon, who was
sulking at the edge of the magic circle.
„This next bit’s quite impressive,“ he said. „Watch. Kot-b’hai! Kot-sham! To
me, o spirits of small isolated rocks and worried mice not less than three inches
long!“
„What?“ said Trymon.
„That bit took quite a lot of research,“ agreed Galder, „especially the mice.
Anyway, where was I? Oh, yes…“
He raised his arms again. Trymon watched him, and licked his lips
distractedly. The old fool was really concentrating, bending his mind entirely to
the Spell and hardly paying any attention to Trymon.
Words of power rolled around the room, bouncing off the walls and scuttling
out of sight behind shelves and jars. Trymon hesitated.
Galder shut his eyes momentarily, his face a mask of ecstacy as he mouthed
the final word.
Trymon tensed, his fingers curling around the knife again. And Galder
opened one eye, nodded at him and sent a sideways blast of power that picked
the younger man up and sent him sprawling against the wall.
Galder winked at him and raised his arms again.
„To me, o spirits of—“
There was a thunderclap, an implosion of light and a moment of complete
physical uncertainty during which even the walls seemed to turn in on
themselves. Trymon heard a sharp intake of breath and then a dull, solid
thump.
The room was suddenly silent.
After a few minutes Trymon crawled out from behind a chair and dusted
himself off. He whistled a few bars of nothing much and turned towards the
door with exaggerated care, looking at the ceiling as if he had never seen it
before. He moved in a way that suggested he was attempting the world speed
record for the nonchalant walk.
The Luggage squatted in the centre of the circle and opened its lid.
Trymon stopped. He turned very, very carefully, dreading what he might see.
The Luggage seemed to contain some clean laundry, smelling slightly of
lavender. Somehow it was quite the most terrifying thing the wizard had ever
seen.
„Well, er,“ he said. „You, um, wouldn’t have seen another wizard around
here, by any chance?“
The Luggage contrived to look more menacing.
„Oh,“ said Trymon. „Well, fine. It doesn’t matter.“
He pulled vaguely at the hem of his robe and took a brief interest in the detail
of its stitching. When he looked up the horrible box was still there.
„Goodbye,“ he said, and ran. He managed to get through the door just in
time.

„Rincewind?“
Rincewind opened his eyes. Not that it helped much. It just meant that
instead of seeing nothing but blackness he saw nothing but whiteness which,
surprisingly, was worse.
„Are you all right?“
„No.“
„Ah.“
Rincewind sat up. He appeared to be on a rock speckled with snow, but it
didn’t seem to be everything a rock ought to be. For example, it shouldn’t be
moving.
Snow blew around him. Twoflower was a few feet away, a look of genuine
concern on his face.
Rincewind groaned. His bones were very angry at the treatment they had
recently received and were queuing up to complain.
„What now?“ he said.
„You know when we were flying and I was worried we might hit something in
the storm and you said the only thing we could possibly hit at this height was a
cloud stuffed with rocks?“
„Well?“
„How did you know?“
Rincewind looked around, but for all the variety and interest in the scene
around him they might as well have been in the inside of a pingpong ball.
The rock underneath was—well, rocking. He ran his hands over it, and felt
the scoring of chisels. When he put an ear to the cold wet stone he fancied he
could hear a dull, slow thumping, like a heartbeat. He crawled forward until he
came to an edge, and peered very cautiously over it.
At that moment the rock must have been passing over a break in the clouds,
because he caught a dim but horribly distant view of jagged-edged mountain
peaks.
They were a long way down.
He gurgled incoherently and inched his way backwards.
„This is ridiculous,“ he told Twoflower. „Rocks don’t fly. They’re noted for not
doing it.“
„Maybe they would if they could,“ said Twoflower. „Perhaps this one just
found out how.“
„Let’s just hope it doesn’t forget again,“ said Rincewind. He huddled up in his
soaking robe and looked glumly at the cloud around him. He supposed there
were some people somewhere who had some control over their lives; they got up
in the mornings, and went to bed at night in the reasonable certainty of not
falling over the edge of the world or being attacked by lunatics or waking up on
a rock with ideas above its station. He dimly remembered leading a life like that
once.
Rincewind sniffed. This rock smelt of frying. The smell seemed to be coming
from up ahead, and appealed straight to his stomach.
„Can you smell anything?“ he said.
„I think it’s bacon,“ said Twoflower.
„I hope it’s bacon,“ said Rincewind, „because I’m going to eat it.“ He stood up
on the trembling stone and tottered forward into the clouds, peering through
the wet gloom.
At the front or leading edge of the rock a small druid was sitting crosslegged
in front of a small fire. A square of oilskin was tied across his head and knotted
under his chin. He was poking at a pan of bacon with an ornamental sickle.
„Um,“ said Rincewind. The druid looked up, and dropped the pan into the
fire. He leapt to his feet and gripped the sickle aggressively, or at least as
aggressively as anyone can look in a long wet white nightshirt and a dripping
headscarf.
„I warn you, I shall deal harshly with hijackers,“ he said, and sneezed
violently.
„We’ll help,“ said Rincewind, looking longingly at the burning bacon. This
seemed to puzzle the druid who, to Rincewind’s mild surprise, was quite young;
he supposed here had to be such things as young druids, theoretically, it was
just that he had never imagined them.
„You’re not trying to steal the rock?“ said the druid, lowering the sickle a
fraction.
„I didn’t even know you could steal rocks,“ said Rincewind wearily.
„Excuse me,“ said Twoflower politely, „I think your breakfast is on fire.“
The druid glanced down and flailed ineffectually at the flames. Rincewind
hurried forward to help, there was a fair amount of smoke, ash and confusion,
and the shared triumph of actually rescuing a few pieces of rather charred
bacon did more good than a whole book on diplomacy.
„How did you get here, actually?“ said the druid. „We’re five hundred feet up,
unless I’ve got the runes wrong again.“
Rincewind tried not to think about height. „We sort of dropped in as we were
passing,“ he said.
„On our way to the ground,“ Twoflower added.
„Only your rock broke our fall,“ said Rincewind. His back complained.
„Thanks,“ he added.
„I thought we’d run into some turbulence a while back,“ said the druid,
whose name turned out to be Belafon. „That must have been you.“ He shivered.
„It must be morning by now,“ he said. „Sod the rules, I’m taking us up. Hang
on.“
„What to?“ said Rincewind.
„Well, just indicate a general unwillingness to fall off,“ said Belafon. He took a
large iron pendulum out of his robe and swung it in a series of baffling sweeps
over the fire.
Clouds whipped around them, there was a horrible feeling of heaviness, and
suddenly the rock burst into sunlight.
It levelled off a few feet above the clouds, in a cold but bright blue sky. The
clouds that had seemed chillingly distant last night and horribly clammy this
morning were now a fleecy white carpet, stretching away in all directions; a few
mountain peaks stood out like islands. Behind the rock the wind of its passage
sculpted the clouds into transient whirls. The rock—
It was about thirty feet long and ten feet wide, and blueish.
„What an amazing panorama,“ said Twoflower, his eyes shining.
„Um, what’s keeping us up?“ said Rincewind.
„Persuasion,“ said Belafon, wringing out the hem of his robe.
„Ah,“ said Rincewind sagely.
„Keeping them up is easy,“ said the druid, holding up a thumb and squinting
down the length of his arm at a distant mountain. „The hard part is landing.’
„You wouldn’t think so, would you?“ said Twoflower.
„Persuasion is what keeps the whole universe together,“ said Belafon. „It’s no
good saying it’s all done by magic.“
Rincewind happened to glance down through the thinning cloud to a snowy
landscape a considerable distance below. He knew he was in the presence of a
madman, but he was used to that; if listening to this madman meant he stayed
up here, he was all ears.
Belafon sat down with his feet dangling over the edge of the rock.
„Look, don’t worry,“ he said. „If you keep thinking the rock shouldn’t be flying
it might hear you and become persuaded and you will turn out to be right,
okay? It’s obvious you aren’t up to date with modern thinking.“
„So it would seem,“ said Rincewind weakly. He was trying not to think about
rocks on the ground. He was trying to think about rocks swooping like
swallows, bounding across landscapes in the sheer joy of levity, zooming
skywards in a—
He was horribly aware he wasn’t very good at it.
The druids of the Disc prided themselves on their forward-looking approach
to the discovery of the mysteries of the Universe. Of course, like druids
everywhere they believed in the essential unity of all life, the healing ower of
plants, the natural rhythm of the seasons and the burning alive of anyone who
didn’t approach all this in the right frame of mind, but they had also thought
long and hard about the very basis of creation and had formulated the following
theory:
The universe, they said, depended for its operation on the balance of four
forces which they identified as charm, persuasion, uncertainty and bloodymindedness.
Thus it was that the sun and moon orbited the disc because they were
persuaded not to fall down, but didn’t actually fly away because of uncertainty.
Charm allowed trees to grow and bloody-mindedness kept them up, and so on.
Some druids suggested that there were certain flaws in this theory, but
senior druids explained very pointedly that there was indeed room for informed
argument, the cut and thrust of exciting scientific debate, and basically it lay
on top of the next solstice bonfire.
„Ah, so you’re an astronomer?“ said Twoflower.
„Oh no,“ said Belafon, as the rock drifted gently around the curve of a
mountain, „I’m a computer hardware consultant.“
„What’s a computer hardware?“
„Well, this is,“ said the druid, tapping the rock with a sandalled foot. „Part of
one, anyway. It’s a replacement. I’m delivering it. They’re having trouble with
the big circles up on the Vortex Plains. So they say, anyway; I wished I had a
bronze tore for every user who didn’t read the manual.“ He shrugged.
„What use is it, then, exactly?“ asked Rincewind. Anything to keep his mind
off the drop below.
„You can use it to—to tell you what time of year it is,“ said Belafon.
„Ah. You mean if it’s covered in snow then it must be winter?“
„Yes. I mean no. I mean, supposing you wanted to know when a particular
star is going to rise—“
„Why?“ said Twoflower, radiating polite interest.
„Well, maybe you want to know when to plant your crops,“ said Belafon,
sweating a little, „or maybe—“
„I’ll lend you my almanac, if you like,“ said Twoflower.
„Almanac?“
„It’s a book that tells you what day it is,“ said Rincewind wearily. „It’d be
right up your leyline.“
Belafon stiffened. „Book?“ he said. „Like, with paper?“
„Yes.“
„That doesn’t sound very reliable to me,“ said the druid nastily. „How can a
book know what day it is? Paper can’t count.“
He stamped off to the front of the rock, causing it to wallow alarmingly.
Rincewind swallowed hard and beckoned Twoflower closer.
„Have you ever heard of culture shock?“ he hissed.
„What’s that?“
„It’s what happens when people spend five hundred years trying to get a
stone circle to work properly and then someone comes up with a little book with
a page for every day and little chatty bits saying things like Now is a good time
to plant broad beans and Early to rise, early to bed, makes a man healthy,
wealthy and dead, and do you know what the most important thing to
remember about culture shock.“ Rincewind paused for breath, and moved his
lips silently trying to remember where the sentence had got to, „is?“ he
concluded.
„What?“
„Don’t give it to a man flying a thousand ton rock.“

„Has it gone?“
Trymon peered cautiously over the battlements of the Tower of Art, the great
spire of crumbling masonry that loomed over Unseen University. The cluster of
students and instructors of magic, far below, nodded.
„Are you sure?“
The bursar cupped his hands and shouted.
„It broke down the hubward door and escaped an hour ago, sir,“ he yelled.
„Wrong,“ said Trymon. „It left, we escaped. Well, I’ll be getting down, then.
Did it get anyone?“
The bursar swallowed. He was not a wizard, but a kind, good-natured man
who should not have had to see the things he had witnessed in the past hour.
Of course, it wasn’t unknown for small demons, coloured lights and various
half-materialised imaginings to wander around the campus, but there had been
something about the implacable onslaught of the Luggage that had unnerved
him. Trying to stop it would have been like trying to wrestle a glacier.
„It—it swallowed the Dean of Liberal Studies, sir,“ he shouted.
Trymon brightened. „It’s an ill wind,“ he murmured. He started down the long
spiral staircase. After a while he smiled, a thin, tight smile. The day was
definitely improving.
There was a lot of organising to do. And if there was something Trymon really
liked, it was organising.

The rock swooped across the high plains, whipping snow from the drifts a
mere few feet below. Belafon scuttled about urgently, smearing a little mistletoe
ointment here, chalking a rune there, while Rincewind cowered in terror and
exhaustion and Twoflower worried about his Luggage.
„Up ahead!“ screamed the druid above the noise of the slipstream. „Behold,
the great computer of the skies!“
Rincewind peered between his fingers. On the distant skyline was an
immense construction of grey and black slabs, arranged in concentric circles
and mystic avenues, aunt and forbidding against the snow. Surely men couldn’t
have moved those nascent mountains—surely a troop of giants had been turned
to stone by some…
„It looks like a lot of rocks,“ said Twoflower.
Belafon hesitated in mid-gesture.
„What?“ he said.
„It’s very nice,“ added the tourist hurriedly. He sought for a word. „Ethnic,“
he decided.
The druid stiffened. „Nice?“ he said. „A triumph of the silicon chunk, a
miracle of modern masonic technology—nice?“
„Oh, yes,“ said Twoflower, to whom sarcasm was merely a seven letter word
beginning with S.
„What does ethnic mean?“ said the druid.
„It means terribly impressive,“ said Rincewind hurriedly, „and we seem to be
in danger of landing, if you don’t mind—“
Belafon turned around, only slightly mollified. He raised his arms wide and
shouted a series of untranslatable words, ending with „nice!“ in a hurt whisper.
The rock slowed, drifted sideways in a billow of snow, and hovered over the
circle. Down below a druid waved two bunches of mistletoe in complicated
patterns, and Belafon skilfully brought the massive slab to rest across two giant
uprights with the faintest of clicks.
Rincewind let his breath out in a long sigh. It hurried off to hide somewhere.
A ladder banged against the side of the slab and the head of an elderly druid
appeared over the edge. He gave the two passengers a puzzled glance, and then
looked up at Belafon.
„About bloody time,“ he said. „Seven weeks to Hogswatchnight and it’s gone
down on us again.“
„Hallo, Zakriah,“ said Belafon. „What happened this time?“
„It’s all totally fouled up. Today it predicted sunrise three minutes early. Talk
about a klutz, boy, this is it.“
Belafon clambered onto the ladder and disappeared from view. The
passengers looked at each other, and then stared down into the vast open
space between the inner circle of stones.
„What shall we do now?“ said Twoflower.
„We could go to sleep?“ suggested Rincewind.
Twoflower ignored him, and climbed down the ladder.
Around the circle druids were tapping the megaliths with little hammers and
listening intently. Several of the huge stones were lying on their sides, and each
was surrounded by another crowd of druids who were examining it carefully
and arguing amongst themselves. Arcane phrases floated up to where
Rincewind sat:
„It can’t be software incompatibility—the Chant of the Trodden Spiral was
designed for concentric rings, idiot…“
„I say fire it up again and try a simple moon ceremony…“
„…all right, all right, nothing’s wrong with the stones, it’s just that the
universe has gone wrong, right?…“
Through the mists of his exhausted mind Rincewind remembered the
horrible star they’d seen in the sky. Something had gone wrong with the
universe last night.
How had he come to be back on the Disc?
He had a feeling that the answers were somewhere inside his head. And an
even more unpleasant feeling began to dawn on him that something else was
watching the scene below—watching it from behind his eyes.
The Spell had crept from its lair deep in the untrodden dirtroads of his mind,
and was sitting bold as brass in his forebrain, watching the passing scene and
doing the mental equivalent of eating popcorn.
He tried to push it back—and the world vanished…
He was in darkness; a warm, musty darkness, the darkness of the tomb, the
velvet blackness of the mummy case. There was a strong smell of old leather
and the sourness of ancient paper. The paper rustled.
He felt that the darkness was full of unimaginable horrors—and the trouble
with unimaginable horrors was that they were only to easy to imagine…
„Rincewind,“ said a voice. Rincewind had never heard a lizard speak, but if
one did it would have a voice like that.
„Um,“ he said. „Yes?“
The voice chuckled—a strange sound, rather papery.
„You ought to say ‹Where am I?›“ it said.
„Would I like it if I knew?“ said Rincewind. He stared hard at the darkness.
Now that he was accustomed to it, he could see something. Something vague,
hardly bright enough to be anything at all, just the merest tracery in the air.
Something strangely familiar.
„All right,“ he said. „Where am I?“
„You’re dreaming.“
„Can I wake up now, please?“
„No,“ said another voice, as old and dry as the first but still slightly different.
„We have something very important to tell you,“ said a third voice, if anything
more corpse-dry than the others. Rincewind nodded stupidly. In the back of his
mind the Spell lurked and peered cautiously over his mental shoulder.
„You’ve caused us a lot of trouble, young Rincewind,“ the voice went on. „All
this dropping over the edge of the world with no thought for other people. We
had to seriously distort reality, you know.“
„Gosh.“
„And now you have a very important task ahead of you.“
„Oh. Good.“
„Many years ago we arranged for one of our number to hide in your head,
because we could foresee a time coming when you would need to play a very
important role.“
„Me? Why?“
„You run away a lot,“ said one of the voices. „That is good. You are a
survivor.“
„Survivor? I’ve nearly been killed dozens of times!“
„Exactly.“
„Oh.“
„But try not to fall off the Disc again. We really can’t have that.“
„Who are we, exactly?“ said Rincewind.
There was a rustling in the darkness.
„In the beginning was the word,“ said a dry voice right behind him.
„It was the Egg,“ corrected another voice. „I distinctly remember. The Great
Egg of the Universe. Slightly rubbery.“
„You’re both wrong, in fact. I’m sure it was the primordial slime.“
A voice by Rincewind’s knee said: „No, that came afterwards. There was
firmament first. Lots of firmament. Rather sticky, like candyfloss. Very syrupy,
in fact—“
„In case anyone’s interested,“ said a crackly voice on Rincewind’s left, „you’re
all wrong. In the beginning was the Clearing of the Throat—“
„—then the word—“
„Pardon me, the slime—“
„Distinctly rubbery, I thought—“
There was a pause. Then a voice said carefully, „Anyway, whatever it was, we
remember it distinctly.“
„Quite so.“
„Exactly.“
„And our task is to see that nothing dreadful happens to it, Rincewind.“
Rincewind squinted into the blackness. „Would you kindly explain what
you’re talking about?“
There was a papery sigh. „So much for metaphor,“ said one of the voices.
„Look, it is very important you safeguard the Spell in your head and bring it
back to us at the right time, you understand, so that when the moment is
precisely right we can be said. Do you understand?“
Rincewind thought: we can be said!
And it dawned on him what the tracery was, ahead of him. It was writing on
a page, seen from underneath.
„I’m in the Octavo?“ he said.
„In certain metaphysical respects,“ said one of the voices in offhand tones. It
came closer. He could feel the dry rustling right in front of his nose…
He ran away.

The single red dot glowed in its patch of darkness. Trymon, still wearing the
ceremonial robes from his inauguration as head of the Order, couldn’t rid
himself of the feeling that it had grown slightly while he watched. He turned
away from the window with a shudder.
„Well?“ he said.
„It’s a star,“ said the Professor of Astrology, „I think.“
„You think?“
The astrologer winced. They were standing in Unseen University’s
observatory, and the tiny ruby pinpoint on the horizon wasn’t glaring at him
any worse than his new master.
„Well, you see, the point is that we’ve always believed stars to be pretty much
the same as our sun—“
„You mean balls of fire about a mile across?“
„Yes. But this new one is, well—big.“
„Bigger than the sun?“ said Trymon. He’d always considered a mile-wide ball
of fire quite impressive, although he disapproved of stars on principle. They
made the sky look untidy.
„A lot bigger,“ said the astrologer slowly.
„Bigger than Great A’Tuin’s head, perhaps?“
The astrologer looked wretched.
„Bigger than Great A’Tuin and the Disc together,“ he said. „We’ve checked,“
he added hurriedly, „and we’re quite sure.“
„That is big,“ agreed Trymon. „The word huge comes to mind.“
„Massive,“ agreed the astrologer hurriedly.
„Hmm.“
Trymon paced the broad mosaic floor of the observatory, which was inlaid
with the signs of the Disc zodiac. There were sixty-four of them, from Wezen the
Double-headed Kangaroo to Gahoolie, the Vase of Tulips (a constellation of
great religious significance whose meaning, alas, was now lost).
He paused on the blue and gold tilework of Mubbo the Hyaena, and turned
suddenly.
„We’re going to hit it?“ he asked.
„I am afraid so, sir,“ said the astrologer.
„Hmm.“ Trymon walked a few paces forward, stroking his beard thoughtfully.
He paused on the cusp of Okjock the Salesman and The Celestial Parsnip.
„I’m not an expert in these matters,“ he said, „but I imagine this would not be
a good thing?“
„No, sir.“
„Very hot, stars?“
The astrologer swallowed. „Yes, sir.“
„We’d be burned up?“
„Eventually. Of course, before that there would be discquakes, tidal waves,
gravitational disruption and probably the atmosphere would be stripped away.“
„Ah. In a word, lack of decent organisation.“
The astrologer hesitated, and gave in. „You could say so, sir.“
„People would panic?“ „Fairly briefly, I’m afraid.“
„Hmm,“ said Trymon, who was just passing over The Perhaps Gate and
orbiting smoothly towards the Cow of Heaven. He squinted up again at the red
gleam on the horizon. He appeared to reach a decision.
„We can’t find Rincewind,“ he said, „and if we can’t find Rincewind we can’t
find the eighth spell of the Octavo. But we believe that the Octavo must be read
to avert catastrophe—otherwise why did the Creator leave it behind?“
„Perhaps He was just forgetful,“ suggested the astrologer.
Trymon glared at him.
„The other Orders are searching all the lands between here and the Hub,“ he
continued, counting the points on his fingers, „because it seems unreasonable
that a man can fly into a cloud and not come out…“
„Unless it was stuffed with rocks,“ said the astrologer, in a wretched and, as
it turned out, entirely unsuccessful attempt to lighten the mood.
„But come down he must—somewhere. Where? we ask ourselves.“
„Where?“ said the astrologer loyally.
„And immediately a course of action suggests itself to us.“
„Ah,“ said the astrologer, running in an attempt to keep up as the wizard
stalked across The Two Fat Cousins.
„And that course is…?“
The astrologer looked up into two eyes as grey and bland as steel.
„Um. We stop looking?“ he ventured.
„Precisely! We use the gifts the Creator has given us, to whit, we look down
and what is it we see?“
The astrologer groaned inwardly. He looked down.
„Tiles?“ he hazarded.
„Tiles, yes, which together make up the…?“ Trymon looked expectant.
„Zodiac?“ ventured the astrologer, a desperate man.
„Right! And therefore all we need do is cast Rincewind’s precise horoscope
and we will know exactly where he is!“
The astrologer grinned like a man who, having tap-danced on quicksand,
feels the press of solid rock under his feet.
„I shall need to know his precise place and time of birth,“ he said.
„Easily done. I copied them out of the University files before I came up here.“
The astrologer looked at the notes, and his forehead wrinkled. He crossed the
room and pulled out a wide drawer full of charts. He read the notes again. He
picked up a complicated pair of compasses and made some passes across the
charts. He picked up a small brass astrolobe and cranked it carefully. He
whistled between his teeth. He picked up a piece of chalk and scribbled some
numbers on a blackboard.
Trymon, meanwhile, had been staring out at the new star. He thought: the
legend in the Pyramid of Tsort says that whoever says the Eight Spells together
when the Disc is in danger will obtain all that he truly desires. And it will be so
soon!
And he thought: I remember Rincewind, wasn’t he the cruffy boy who always
came bottom of the class when we were training? Not a magical bone in his
body. Let me get him in front of me, and we’ll see if we can’t get all eight—
The astrologer said „Gosh“ under his breath. Trymon spun around.
„Well?“
„Fascinating chart,“ said the astrologer, breathlessly. His forehead wrinkled.
„Bit strange, really,“ he said.
„How strange?“
„He was born under The Small Boring Group of Faint Stars which, as you
know, lies between The Flying Moose and The Knotted String. It is said that
even the ancients couldn’t find anything interesting to say about the sign,
which—“
„Yes, yes, get on with it,“ said Trymon irritably.
„It’s the sign traditionally associated with chess board makers, sellers of
onions, manufacturers of plaster images of small religious significance, and
people allergic to pewter. Not a wizard’s sign at all. And at the time of his birth
the shadow of Cori Celesti—“
„I don’t want to know all the mechanical details,“ growled Trymon. „Just give
me his horoscope.“
The astrologer, who had been rather enjoying himself, sighed and made a few
additional calculations.
„Very well,“ he said. „It reads as follows: ‹Today is a good tine for making new
friends. A good deed may have unforeseen consequences. Don’t upset any
druids. You will soon be going on a very strange journey. Your lucky food is
small cucumbers. People pointing knives at you are probably up to no good. PS,
we really mean it about druids›.“
„Druids?“ said Trymon. „I wonder…“

„Are you all right?“ said Twoflower. Rincewind opened his eyes.
The wizard sat up hurriedly and grabbed Twoflower by the shirt.
„I want to leave here!“ he said urgently. „Right now!“
„But there’s going to be an ancient and traditional ceremony!“
„I don’t care how ancient! I want the feel of honest cobbles under my feet, I
want the old familiar smell of cesspits, I want to go where there’s lots of people
and fires and roofs and walls and friendly things like that! I want to go home!“
He found that he had this sudden desperate longing for the fuming, smoky
streets of Ankh-Morpork, which was always at its best in the spring, when the
gummy sheen on the turbid waters of the Ankh River had a special iridescence
and the eaves were full of birdsong, or at least birds coughing rhythmically.
A tear sprang to his eye as he recalled the subtle play of light on the Temple
of Small Gods, a noted local landmark, and a lump came to his throat when he
remembered the fried fish stall on the junction of Midden Street and The Street
of Cunning Artificers. He thought of the gherkins they sold there, great green
things lurking at the bottom of their jar like drowned whales. They called to
Rincewind across the miles, promising to introduce him to the pickled eggs in
the next jar.
He thought of the cosy livery stable lofts and warm gratings where he spent
his nights. Foolishly, he had sometimes jibed at this way of life. It seemed
incredible now, but he had found it boring.
Now he’d had enough. He was going home. Pickled gherkins, I hear you
calling…
He pushed Twoflower aside, gathered his tattered robe around him with great
dignity, set his face towards that area of horizon he believed to contain the city
of his birth, and with intense determination and considerable
absentmindedness stepped right off the top of a thirty-foot trilithon.
Some ten minutes later, when a worried and rather contrite Twoflower dug
him out of the large snowdrift at the base of the stones, his expression hadn’t
changed.
Twoflower peered at him.
„Are you all right?“ he said. „How many fingers am I holding up?“
„I want to go home!“
„Okay.“
„No, don’t try and talk me out of it, I’ve had enough, I’d like to say it’s been
great fun but I can’t, and—what?“
„I said okay,“ said Twoflower. „I’d quite like to see Ankh-Morpork again. I
expect they’ve rebuilt quite a lot of it by now.“
It should be noted that the last time the two of them had seen the city it was
burning quite fiercely, a fact which had a lot to do with Twoflower introducing
the concept of fire insurance to a venial but ignorant populace. But devastating
fires were a regular feature of Morporkian life and it had always been cheerfully
and meticulously rebuilt, using the traditional local materials of tinder-dry
wood and thatch waterproofed with tar.
„Oh,“ said Rincewind, deflating a bit. „Oh, right. Right then. Good. Perhaps
we’d better be off, then.“
He scrambled up and brushed the snow off himself.
„Only I think we should wait until morning,“ added Twoflower.
„Why?“
„Well, because it’s freezing cold, we don’t really know where we are, the
Luggage has gone missing, it’s getting dark—“
Rincewind paused. In the deep canyons of his mind he thought he heard the
distant rustle of ancient paper. He had a horrible feeling that his dreams were
going to be very repetitive from now on, and he had much better things to do
than be lectured by a bunch of ancient spells who couldn’t even agree on how
the Universe began—
A tiny dry voice at the back of his brain said: What things?
„Oh, shut up,“ he said.
„I only said it’s freezing cold and—“ Twoflower began.
„I didn’t mean you, I meant me.“
„What?“
„Oh, shut up,“ said Rincewind wearily. „I don’t suppose there’s anything to
eat around here?“
The giant stones were black and menacing against the dying green light of
sunset. The inner circle was full of druids, scurrying around by the light of
several bonfires and tuning up all the necessary peripherals of a stone
computer, like rams’ skulls on poles topped with mistletoe, banners
embroidered with twisted snakes and so on. Beyond the circles of firelight a
large number of plains people had gathered; druidic festivals were always
popular, especially when things went wrong. Rincewind stared at them.
„What’s going on?“
„Oh, well,“ said Twoflower enthusiastically, „apparently there’s this ceremony
dating back for thousands of years to celebrate the, um, rebirth of the moon, or
possibly the sun. No, I’m pretty certain it’s the moon. Apparently it’s very
solemn and beautiful and invested with a quiet dignity.“
Rincewind shivered. He always began to worry when Twoflower started to talk
like that. At least he hadn’t said „picturesque“ or „quaint“ yet; Rincewind had
never found a satisfactory translation for those words, but the nearest he had
been able to come was „trouble“.
„I wish the Luggage was here,“ said the tourist regretfully. „I could use my
picture box. It sounds very quaint and picturesque.“
The crowd stirred expectantly. Apparently things were about to start.
„Look,“ said Rincewind urgently. „Druids are priests. You must remember
that. Don’t do anything to upset them.“
„But—“
„Don’t offer to buy the stones.“
„But I—“
„Don’t start talking about quaint native folkways.“
„I thought—“
„Really don’t try to sell them insurance, that always upsets them.“
„But they’re priests!“ wailed Twoflower. Rincewind paused.
„Yes,“ he said. „That’s the whole point, isn’t it?“
At the far side of the outer circle some sort of procession was forming up.
„But priests are good kind men,“ said Twoflower. „At home they go around
with begging bowls. It’s their only possession,“ he added.
„Ah,“ said Rincewind, not certain he understood. „This would be for putting
the blood in, right?“
„Blood?“
„Yes, from sacrifices.“ Rincewind thought about the priests he had known at
home. He was, of course, anxious not to make an enemy of any god and had
attended any number of temple functions and, on the whole, he thought that
the most accurate definition of any priest in the Circle Sea Regions was
someone who spent quite a lot of time gory to the armpits.
Twoflower looked horrified.
„Oh no,“ he said. „Where I come from priests are holy men who have
dedicated themselves to lives of poverty, good works and the study of the nature
of God.“
Rincewind considered this novel proposition.
„No sacrifices?“ he said.
„Absolutely not.“
Rincewind gave up. „Well,“ he said, „they don’t sound very holy to me.“
There was a loud blarting noise from a band of bronze trumpets. Rincewind
looked around. A line of druids marched slowly past, their long sickles hung
with sprays of mistletoe. Various junior druids and apprentices followed them,
playing a variety of percussion instruments that were traditionally supposed to
drive away evil spirits and quite probably succeeded.
Torchlight made excitingly dramatic patterns on the stones, which stood
ominously against the green-lit sky. Hubwards, the shimmering curtains of the
aurora coriolis began to wink and glitter among the stars as a million ice
crystals danced in the Disc’s magical field.
„Belafon explained it all to me,“ whispered Twoflower. „We’re going to see a
time-honoured ceremony that celebrates the Oneness of Man with the Universe,
that was what he said.“
Rincewind looked sourly at the procession. As the druids spread out around
a great flat stone that dominated the centre of the circle he couldn’t help
noticing the attractive if rather pale young lady in their midst. She wore a long
white robe, a gold torc around her neck, and an expression of vague
apprehension.
„Is she a druidess?“ said Twoflower.
„I don’t think so,“ said Rincewind slowly.
The druids began to chant. It was, Rincewind felt, a particularly nasty and
rather dull chant which sounded very much as if it was going to build up to an
abrupt crescendo. The sight of the young woman lying down on the big stone
didn’t do anything to derail his train of thought.
„I want to stay,“ said Twoflower. „I think ceremonies like this hark back to a
primitive simplicity which—“
„Yes, yes,“ said Rincewind, „but they’re going to sacrifice her, if you must
know.“
Twoflower looked at him in astonishment.
„What, kill her?“
„Yes.“
„Why?“
„Don’t ask me. To make the crops grow or the moon rise or something. Or
maybe they’re just keen on killing people. That’s religion for you.“
He became aware of a low humming sound, not so much heard as felt. It
seemed to be coming from the stone next to them. Little points of light flickered
under its surface, like mica specks.
Twoflower was opening and shutting his mouth.
„Can’t they just use flowers and berries and things?“ he said. „Sort of
symbolic?“
„Nope.“
„Has anyone ever tried?“
Rincewind sighed. „Look,“ he said. „No self-respecting High Priest is going to
go through all the business with the trumpets and the processions and the
banners and everything, and then shove his knife into a daffodil and a couple of
plums. You’ve got to face it, all this stuff about golden boughs and the cycles of
nature and stuff just boils down to sex and violence, usually at the same time.“
To his amazement Twoflower’s lip was trembling. Twoflower didn’t just look
at the world through rose-tinted spectacles, Rincewind knew—he looked at it
through a rose-tinted brain, too, and heard it through rose-tinted ears.
The chant was rising inexorably to a crescendo. The head druid was testing
the edge of his sickle and all eyes were turned to the finger of stone on the
snowy hills beyond the circle where the moon was due to make a guest
appearance.
„It’s no use you—“
But Rincewind was talking to himself.
However, the chilly landscape outside the circle was not entirely devoid of
life. For one thing a party of wizards was even now drawing near, alerted by
Trymon.
But a small and solitary figure was also watching from the cover of a handy
fallen stone. One of the Disc’s greatest legends watched the events in the stone
circle with considerable interest.
He saw the druids circle and chant, saw the chief druid I raise his sickle…
Heard the voice.
„I say! Excuse me! Can I have a word?“
Rincewind looked around desperately for a way of escape. There wasn’t one.
Twoflower was standing by the altar stone with one finger in the air and an
attitude of polite determination.
Rincewind remembered one day when Twoflower had thought a passing
drover was beating his cattle too hard, and the case he had made for decency
towards animals had left Rincewind severely trampled and lightly gored. The
druids were looking at Twoflower with the kind of expression normally reserved
for mad sheep or the sudden appearance of a rain of frogs. Rincewind couldn’t
quite hear what Twoflower was saying, but a few phrases like „ethnic folkways“
and „nuts and flowers“ floated across the hushed circle.
Then fingers like a bunch of cheese straws clamped over the wizard’s mouth
and an extremely sharp cutting edge pinked his adams apple and a damp voice
right by his ear said, „Not a shound, or you ish a dead man.“
Rincewind’s eyes swivelled in their sockets as if trying to find a way out.
„If you don’t want me to say anything, how will you know I understand what
you just said?“ he hissed.
„Shut up and tell me what that other idiot ish doing!“
„No, but look, if I’ve got to shut up, how can I—“ The knife at his throat
became a hot streak of pain and Rincewind decided to give logic a miss.
„His name’s Twoflower. He isn’t from these parts.“
„Doeshn’t look like it. Friend of yoursh?“
„We’ve got this sort of hate-hate relationship, yes.“
Rincewind couldn’t see his captor, but by the feel of it he had a body made of
coathangers. He also smelt strongly of peppermints.
„He hash got guts, I’ll give him that. Do exshactly what I shay and it ish just
poshible he won’t end up with them wrapped around a shtone.“
„Urrr.“
„They’re not very ecumenical around here, you shee.“
It was at that moment that the moon, in due obedience to the laws of
persuasion, rose, although in deference to he laws of computing it wasn’t
anywhere near where the stones said it should be.
But what was there, peeking through ragged clouds, was a glaring red star. It
hung exactly over the circle’s holiest stone, glittering away like the sparkle in
the eyesocket of Death. It was sullen and awful and, Rincewind couldn’t help
noticing, just a little bit bigger than it was last night.
A cry of horror went up from the assembled priests. The crowd on the
surrounding banks pressed forward; this looked quite promising.
Rincewind felt a knife handle slip into his hand, and the squelchy voice
behind him said, „You ever done this short of thing before?“
„What sort of thing?“
„Rushed into a temple, killed the prieshts, shtolen the gold and reshcued the
girl.“
„No, not in so many words.“
„You do it like thish.“
Two inches from Rincewind’s left ear a voice broke into a sound like a baboon
with its foot trapped in an echo canyon, and a small but wiry shape rushed
past him.
By the light of the torches he saw that it was a very old man, the skinny
variety that generally gets called „spry“, with a totally bald head, a beard almost
down to his knees, and a pair of matchstick legs on which varicose veins had
traced the street map of quite a large city. Despite the snow he wore nothing
more than a studded leather holdall and a pair of boots that could have easily
accommodated a second pair of feet.
The two druids closest to him exchanged glances and hefted their sickles.
There was a brief blur and they collapsed into tight balls of agony, making
rattling noises. In the excitement that followed Rincewind sidled along towards
the altar stone, holding his knife gingerly so as not to attract any unwelcome
comment. In fact no-one was paying a great deal of attention to him; the druids
that hadn’t fled the circle, generally the younger and more muscular ones, had
congregated around the old man n order to discuss the whole subject of
sacrilege as it pertained to stone circles, but judging by the cackling and
sounds of gristle he was carrying the debate.
Twoflower was watching the fight with interest. Rincewind grabbed him by
the shoulder.
„Let’s go,“ he said.
„Shouldn’t we help?“
„I’m sure we’d only get in the way,“ said Rincewind hurriedly. „You know
what it’s like to have people looking over your shoulder when you’re busy.“
„At least we must rescue the young lady,“ said Twoflower firmly.
„All right, but get a move on!“
Twoflower took the knife and hurried up to the altar stone. After several inept
slashes he managed to cut the ropes that bound the girl, who sat up and burst
into tears.
„It’s all right—“ he began.
„It bloody well isn’t!“ she snapped, glaring at him through two red-rimmed
eyes. „Why do people always go and spoil things?“ She blew her nose resentfully
on the edge of her robe.
Twoflower looked up at Rincewind in embarrassment.
„Um, I don’t think you quite understand,“ he said. „I mean, we just saved you
from absolutely certain death.“
„It’s not easy around here,“ she said. „I mean, keeping yourself—“ she
blushed, and twisted the hem of her robe wretchedly. „I mean, staying… not
letting yourself be… not losing your qualifications…“
„Qualifications?“ said Twoflower, earning the Rincewind Cup for the slowest
person on the uptake in the entire multiverse. The girl’s eyes narrowed.
„I could have been up there with the Moon Goddess by now, drinking mead
out of a silver bowl,“ she said petulantly. „Eight years of staying home on
Saturday nights right down the drain!“
She looked up at Rincewind and scowled.
Then he sensed something. Perhaps it was a barely heard footstep behind
him, perhaps it was movement reflected in her eyes—but he ducked.
Something whistled through the air where his neck had been and glanced off
Twoflower’s bald head. Rincewind spun round to see the archdruid readying his
sickle for another swing and, in the absence of any hope of running away,
lashed out desperately with a foot.
It caught the druid squarely on the kneecap. As the man screamed and
dropped his weapon there was a nasty little fleshy sound and he fell forward.
Behind him the little man with the long beard pulled his sword from the body,
wiped it with a handful of snow, and said, „My lumbago is giving me gyp. You
can carry the treashure.“
„Treasure?“ said Rincewind weakly.
„All the necklashes and shtuff. All the gold collarsh. They’ve got lotsh of
them. Thatsh prieshts for you,“ said the old man wetly. „Nothing but torc, torc,
torc. Who’she the girl?“
„She won’t let us rescue her,“ said Rincewind. The girl looked at the old man
defiantly through her smudged eyeshadow.
„Bugger that,“ he said, and with one movement picked her up, staggered a
little, screamed at his arthritis and fell over.
After a moment he said, from his prone position, „Don’t just shtand there,
you daft bitcsh—help me up.“ Much to Rincewind’s amazement, and almost
certainly to hers as well, she did so.
Rincewind, meanwhile, was trying to rouse Twoflower. There was a graze
across his temple which didn’t look too deep, but the little man was
unconscious with a faintly worried smile plastered across his face. His
breathing was shallow and—strange.
And he felt light. Not simply underweight, but weightless. The wizard might
as well have been holding a shadow. Rincewind remembered that it was said
that druids used strange and terrible poisons. Of course, it was often said,
usually by the same people, that crooks always had close-set eyes, lightning
never struck twice in the same lace and if the gods had wanted men to fly
they’d have given them an airline ticket. But something about Twoflower’s
lightness frightened Rincewind. Frightened him horribly.
He looked up at the girl. She had the old man slung over one shoulder, and
gave Rincewind an apologetic half-smile. From somewhere around the small of
her back a voice said, „Got everything? Letsh get out of here before they come
back.“
Rincewind tucked Twoflower under one arm and jogged along after them. It
seemed the only thing to do.
The old man had a large white horse tethered to a withered tree in a snowfilled gully some way from the circles. It was sleek, glossy and the general effect
of a superb battle charger was only very slightly spoiled by the haemorrhoid
ring tied to the saddle.
„Okay, put me down. There’sh a bottle of shome linament shtuff in the
shaddle bag, if you wouldn’t mind…“ Rincewind propped Twoflower as nicely as
possible against the tree, and by moonlight—and, he realised, by the faint red
light of the menacing new star—took the first real look at his rescuer.
The man had only one eye; the other was covered by a black patch. His thin
body was a network of scars and, currently, twanging white-hot with tendonitis.
His teeth had obviously decided to quit long ago.
„Who are you?“ he said.
„Bethan,“ said the girl, rubbing a handful of nasty-smelling green ointment
into the old man’s back. She wore the air of one who, if asked to consider what
sort of events might occur after being rescued from virgin sacrifice by a hero
with a white charger, would probably not have mentioned linament, but who,
now linament was apparently what did happen to you after all, was determined
to be good at it.
„I meant him,“ said Rincewind.
One star-bright eye looked up at him.
„Cohen ish my name, boy.“ Bethan’s hands stopped moving.
„Cohen?“ she said. „Cohen the Barbarian?“
„The very shame.“
„Hang on, hang on,“ said Rincewind. „Cohen’s a great big chap, neck like a
bull, got chest muscles like a sack of footballs. I mean, he’s the Disc’s greatest
warrior, a legend in his own lifetime. I remember my grandad telling me he saw
him… my grandad telling me he… my grandad…“
He faltered under the gimlet gaze.
„Oh,“ he said. „Oh. Of course. Sorry.“
„Yesh,“ said Cohen, and sighed. „Thatsh right, boy. I’m a lifetime in my own
legend.“
„Gosh,“ said Rincewind. „How old are you, exactly?“
„Eighty-sheven.“
„But you were the greatest!“ said Bethan. „Bards still sing songs about you.“
Cohen shrugged, and gave a little yelp of pain.
„I never get any royaltiesh,“ he said. He looked moodily at the snow. „That’sh
the shaga of my life. Eighty yearsh in the bushiness and what have I got to
show for it? Backache, pilesh, bad digeshtion and a hundred different recipesh
for shoop. Shoop! I hate shoop!“
Bethan’s forehead wrinkled. „Shoop?“
„Soup,“ explained Rincewind.
„Yeah, shoop,“ said Cohen, miserably. „It’sh my teeths, you shee. No-one
takes you sheriously when you’ve got no teeths, they shay ‹Shit down by the
fire, grandad, and have shome shoo—›“ Cohen looked sharply at Rincewind.
„That’sh a nashty cough you have there, boy.“
Rincewind looked away, unable to look Bethan in the face. Then his heart
sank. Twoflower was still leaning against the tree, peacefully unconscious, and
looking as reproachful as was possible in the circumstances.
Cohen appeared to remember him, too. He got unsteadily to his feet and
shuffled over to the tourist. He humbed both eyes open, examined the graze,
felt the pulse.
„He’sh gone,“ he said.
„Dead?“ said Rincewind, In the debating chamber of his mind a dozen
emotions got to their feet and started shouting. Relief was in full spate when
Shock cut in on a point of order and then Bewilderment, Terror and Loss
started a fight which was ended only when Shame slunk in from next door to
see what all the row was about.
„No,“ said Cohen thoughtfully, „not exshactly. Just—gone.“
„Gone where?“
„I don’t know,“ said Cohen, „but I think I know shomeone who might have a
map.“
Far out on the snowfield half a dozen pinpoints of red light glowed in the
shadows.
„He’s not far away,“ said the leading wizard, peering into a small crystal
sphere.
There was general mutter from the ranks behind him which roughly meant
that however far away Rincewind was he couldn’t be further than a nice hot
bath, a good meal and a warm bed.
Then the wizard who was tramping along in the rear stopped and said,
„Listen!“
They listened. There were the subtle sounds of winter beginning to close its
grip on the land, the creak of rocks, the muted scuffling of small creatures in
their tunnels under the blanket of snow. In a distant forest a wolf howled, felt
embarrassed when no-one joined in, and stopped. There was the silver sleeting
sound of moonlight. There was also the wheezing noise of half a dozen wizards
trying to breathe quietly.
„I can’t hear a thing—“ one began.
„Ssshh!“
„All right, all right—“
Then they all heard it; a tiny distant crunching, like something moving very
quickly over the snow crust.
„Wolves?“ said a wizard. They all thought about hundreds of lean, hungry
bodies leaping through the night.
„N-no,“ said the leader. „It’s too regular. Perhaps it’s a messenger?“
It was louder now, a crisp rhythm like someone eating celery very fast.
„I’ll send up a flare,“ said the leader. He picked up a handful of snow, rolled it
into a ball, threw it up into the air and ignited it with a stream of octarine fire
from his fingertips. There was a brief, fierce blue glare.
There was silence. Then another wizard said, „You daft bugger, I can’t see a
thing now.“
That was the last thing they heard before something fast, hard and noisy
cannoned into them out of the darkness and vanished into the night.
When they dug one another out of the snow all they could find was a tight
pressed trail of little footprints. Hundreds of little footprints, all very close
together and heading across the snow as straight as a searchlight.

„A necromancer!“ said Rincewind.
The old woman across the fire shrugged and pulled a pack of greasy cards
from some unseen pocket.
Despite the deep frost outside, the atmosphere inside the yurt was like a
blacksmith’s armpit and the wizard was already sweating heavily. Horse dung
made a good fuel, but the Horse People had a lot to learn about air
conditioning, starting with what it meant.
Bethan leaned sideways.
„What’s neck romance?“ she whispered.
„Necromancy. Talking to the dead,“ he explained.
„Oh,“ she said, vaguely disappointed.
They had dined on horse meat, horse cheese, horse black pudding, horse
d’oeuvres and a thin beer that Rincewind didn’t want to speculate about. Cohen
(who’d had horse soup) explained that the Horse Tribes of the Hubland steppes
were born in the saddle, which Rincewind considered was a gynaecological
impossibility, and they were particularly adept at natural magic, since life on
the open steppe makes you realise how neatly the sky fits the land all around
the edges and this naturally inspires the mind to deep thoughts like „Why?“,
„When?“ and „Why don’t we try beef for a change?“
The chieftain’s grandmother nodded at Rincewind and spread the cards in
front of her.
Rincewind, as it has already been noted, was the worst wizard on the Disc:
no other spells would stay in his mind once the Spell had lodged in there, in
much the same way that fish don’t hang around in a pike pool. But he still had
his pride, and wizards don’t like to see women perform even simple magic.
Unseen University had never admitted women, muttering something about
problems with the plumbing, but the real reason was an unspoken dread that if
women were allowed to mess around with magic they would probably be
embarrassingly good at it…
„Anyway, I don’t believe in Caroc cards,“ he muttered, „All that stuff about it
being the distilled wisdom of the universe is a load of rubbish.“
The first card, smoke-yellowed and age-crinkled, was…
It should have been The Star. But instead of the familiar round disc with
crude little rays, it had become a tiny red dot. The old woman muttered and
scratched at the card with a fingernail, then looked sharply at Rincewind.
„Nothing to do with me,“ he said.
She turned up the Importance of Washing the Hands, the Eight of
Octograms, the Dome of the Sky, the Pool of Night, the Four of Elephants, the
Ace of Turtles, and—Rincewind had been expecting it—Death.
And something was wrong with Death, too. It should have been a fairly
realistic drawing of Death on his white horse, and indeed He was still there. But
the sky was red lit, and coming over a distant hill was a tiny figure, barely
visible by the light of the horsefat lamps.
Rincewind didn’t have to identify it, because behind it was a box on
hundreds of little legs.
The Luggage would follow its owner anywhere.
Rincewind looked across the tent to Twoflower, a pale shape on a pile of
horsehides.
„He’s really dead?“ he said. Cohen translated for the old woman, who shook
her head. She reached down to a small wooden chest beside her and rummaged
around in a collection of bags and bottles until she found a tiny green bottle
which she tipped into Rincewind’s beer. He looked at it suspiciously.
„She shays it’s sort of medicine,“ said Cohen. „I should drink it if I were you,
theshe people get a bit upshet if you don’t accshept hoshpitality.“
„It’s not going to blow my head off?“ said Rincewind.
„She shays it’s esshential you drink it.“
„Well, if you’re sure it’s okay. It can’t make the beer taste any worse.“
He took a swig, aware of all eyes on him.
„Um,“ he said. „Actually, it’s not at all ba—“
Something picked him up and threw him into the air. Except that in
another.sense he was still sitting by the fire—he could see himself there, a
dwindling figure in the circle of firelight that was rapidly getting smaller. The
toy figures around it were looking intently at his body. Except for the old
woman. She was looking right up at, him, and grinning.

The Circle Sea ’s senior wizards were not grinning at all. They were becoming
aware that they were confronted with something entirely new and fearsome: a
young man on the make.
Actually none of them were quite sure how old Trymion really was, but his
sparse hair was still black and his skin had a waxy look to it that could be
taken, in a poor light, to be the bloom of youth.
The six surviving heads of the Eight Orders sat at the long, shiny and new
table in what had been Galder Weatherwax’s study and each one wondered
precisely what it was about Trymon that made them want to kick him.
It wasn’t that he was ambitious and cruel. Cruel men were stupid; they all
knew how to use cruel men, and they certainly knew how to bend other men’s
ambitions. You didn’t stay an Eighth Level magus for long unless you were
adept at a kind of mental judo.
It wasn’t that he was bloodthirsty, power-hungry or especially wicked. These
things were not necessarily drawbacks in a wizard. The wizards were, on the
whole, no more wicked than, say, the committee of the average Rotary Club,
and each had risen to pre-eminence in his chosen profession not so much by
skill at magic but by never neglecting to capitalise on the weaknesses of
opponents.
It wasn’t that he was particularly wise. Every wizard considered himself a
fairly hot property, wisewise; it went with the job.
It wasn’t even that he had charisma. They all knew charisma when they
encountered it, and Trymon had all the charisma of a duck egg.
That was it, in fact…
He wasn’t good or evil or cruel or extreme in any way but one, which was that
he had elevated greyness to the status of a fine art and cultivated a mind that
was as bleak and pitiless and logical as the slopes of Hell.
And what was so strange was that each of the wizards, who had in the course
of their work encountered many a fire-spitting, bat-winged, tiger-taloned entity
in the privacy of a magical octogram, had never before had quite the same
uncomfortable feeling as they had when, ten minutes late, Trymon strode into
the room.
„Sorry I’m late, gentlemen,“ he lied, rubbing his hands briskly. „So many
things to do, so much to organise, I’m sure you know how it is.“
The wizards looked sidelong at one another as Trymon sat down at the head
of the table and shuffled busily through some papers.
„What happened to old Galder’s chair, the one with the lion arms and the
chicken feet?“ said Jiglad Wert. It had gone, along with most of the other
familiar furniture, and in its place were a number of low leather chairs that
appeared to be incredibly comfortable until you’d sat in them for five minutes.
„That? Oh, I had it burnt,“ said Trymon, not looking up.
„Burnt? But it was a priceless magical artifact, a genuine—“
„Just a piece of junk, I’m afraid,“ said Trymon, treating him to a fleeting
smile. „I’m sure real wizards don’t really need that sort of thing, now if I may
draw your attention to the business of the day—“
„What’s this paper?2 said Jiglad Wert, of the Hood-winkers, waving the
document that had been left in front of him, and waving it all the more
forcefully because his own chair, back in his cluttered and comfortable tower,
was if anything more ornate than Galder’s had been.
„It’s an agenda, Jiglad,“ said Trymon, patiently.
„And what does a gender do?“
„It’s just a list of the things we’ve got to discuss. It’s very simple, I’m sorry if
you feel that—“
„We’ve never needed one before!“
„I think perhaps you have needed one, you just haven’t used one,“ said
Trymon, his voice resonant with reasonableness.
Wert hesitated. „Well, all right,“ he said sullenly, looking around the table for
support, „but what’s this here where it says—“ he peered closely at the
writing— „Successor to Greyhald Spold. It’s going to be old Rhunlet Yard, isn’t
it? He’s been waiting for years.“
„Yes, but is he sound?“ said Trymon.
„What?“
„I’m sure we all realise the importance of proper leadership,“ said Trymon.
„Now, Vard is—well, worthy, of course, in his way, but —“
„It’s not our business,“ said one of the other wizards.
„No, but it could be,“ said Trymon.
There was silence.
„Interfere with the affairs of another order?“ said Wert.
„Of course not,“ said Trymon. „I merely suggest that we could offer… advice.
But let us discuss this later…“
The wizards had never heard of the words „power base“, otherwise Trymon
would never have been able to get away with all this. But the plain fact was that
helping others to achieve power, even to strengthen your own hand, was quite
alien to them. As far as they were concerned, every wizard stood alone. Never
mind about hostile paranormal entities, an ambitious wizard had quite enough
to do fighting his enemies in his own Order.
„I think we should now consider the matter of Rincewind,“ said Trymon.
„And the star,“ said Wert. „People are noticing, you know.“
„Yes, they say we should be doing something,“ said Lumuel Panter, of the
Order of Midnight. „What, I should like to know?“
„Oh, that’s easy,“ said Wert. „They say we should read the Octavo. That’s
what they always say. Crops bad? Read the Octavo. Cows ill? Read the Octavo.
The Spells will make everything all right.“
„There could be something in that,“ said Trymon. „My, er, late predecessor
made quite a study of the Octavo.“
„We all have,“ said Panter, sharply, „but what’s the use? The Eight Spells
have to work together. Oh, I agree, if all else fails maybe we should risk it, but
the Eight have to be said together or not at all—and one of them is inside this
Rincewind’s head.“
„And we cannot find him,“ said Trymon. „That is the case, isn’t it? I’m sure
we’ve all tried, privately.“
The wizards looked at one another, embarrassed. Eventually Wert said. „Yes.
All right. Cards on the table. I an’t seem to locate him.“
„I’ve tried scrying,“ said another. „Nothing.“
„I’ve sent familiars,“ said a third. The others sat up. If confessing failure was
the order of the day, then they were damn well going to make it clear that they
had failed heroically.
„Is that all? I’ve sent demons.“
„I’ve looked into the Mirror of Oversight.“
„Last night I sought him out in the Runes of M’haw.“
„I’d like to make it clear that I tried both the Runes and the Mirror and the
entrails of a manicreach.“
„I’ve spoken to the beasts of the field and the birds of the Air.“
„Any good?“
„Nah.“
„Well, I’ve questioned the very bones of the country, yea, and the deep stones
and the mountains thereof.“
There was a sudden chilly silence. Everyone looked at the wizard who had
spoken. It was Ganmack Treehallet, of the Venerable Seers, who shifted
uneasily in his seat.
„Yes, with bells on, I expect,“ said someone.
„I never said they answered, did I?“
Trymon looked along the table.
„I’ve sent someone to find him,“ he said.
Wert snorted. „That didn’t work out so well the last two times, did it?“
„That was because we relied on magic, but it is obvious that Rincewind is
somehow hidden from magic. But he can’t hide his footprints.“
„You’ve set a tracker?“
„In a manner of speaking.“
„A hero?“ Wert managed to pack a lot of meaning into the one word. In such
a tone of voice, in another universe, would a Southerner say „damnyankee“.
The wizards looked at Trymon, open-mouthed.
„Yes,“ he said calmly.
„On whose authority?“ demanded Wert. Trymon turned his grey eyes on him.
„Mine. I needed no other.“
„It’s—it’s highly irregular! Since when have wizards needed to hire heroes to
do their work for them?“
„Ever since wizards found their magic wouldn’t work,“ said Trymon.
„A temporary setback, nothing more.“
Trymon shrugged. „Maybe,“ he said, „but we haven’t the time to find out.
Prove me wrong. Find Rincewind by scrying or talking to birds. But as for me, I
know I’m meant to be wise. And wise men do what the times demand.“
It is a well known fact that warriors and wizards do not get along, because
one side considers the other side to be a collection of bloodthirsty idiots who
can’t walk and think at the same time, while the other side is naturally
suspicious of a body of men who mumble a lot and wear long dresses. Oh, say
the wizards, if we’re going to be like that, then, what about all those studded
collars and oiled muscles down at the Young Men’s Pagan Association? To
which the heroes reply, that’s a pretty good allegation coming from a bunch of
wimpsoes who won’t go near a woman on account, can you believe it, of their
mystical power being sort of drained out. Right, say the wizards, that just about
does it, you and your leather posing pouches. Oh yeah, say the heroes, why
don’t you…
And so on. This sort of thing has been going on for centuries, and caused a
number of major battles which have left large tracts of land uninhabitable
because of magical harmonics.
In fact, the hero even at this moment galloping towards the Vortex Plains
didn’t get involved in this kind of argument, because they didn’t take it
seriously. Well, mainly because this particular hero was a heroine. A redheaded
one.
Now, there is a tendency at a point like this to look over one’s shoulder at the
cover artist and start going on at length about leather, thighboots and naked
blades.
Words like „full“, „round“ and even „pert“ creep into the narrative, until the
writer has to go and have a cold shower and a lie down.
Which is all rather silly, because any woman setting out to make a living by
the sword isn’t about to go around looking like something off the cover of the
more advanced kind of lingerie catalogue for the specialised buyer.
Oh well, all right. The point that must be made is that although Herrena the
Henna-Haired Harridan would look quite stunning after a good bath, a heavyduty manicure, and the pick of the leather racks in Woo Hun Ling’s Oriental
Exotica and Martial Aids on Heroes Street, she was currently quite sensibly
dressed in light chain mail, soft boots, and a short sword.
All right, maybe the boots were leather. But not black.
Riding with her were a number of swarthy men that will certainly be killed
before too long anyway, so a description is probably not essential. There was
absolutely nothing pert about any of them.
Look, they can wear leather if you like.
Herrena wasn’t too happy about them, but they were all that was available
for hire in Morpork. Many of the citizens were moving out and heading for the
hills, out of fear of the new star.
But Herrena was heading for the hills for a different reason. Just turnwise
and rimwards of the Plains were the bare Trollbone Mountains. Herrena, who
had for many years availed herself of the uniquely equal opportunities available
to any woman who could make a sword sing, was trusting to her instincts.
This Rincewind, as Trymon had described him, was a rat, and rats like cover.
Anyway, the mountains were a long way from Trymon and, for all that he was
currently her employer, Herrena was very happy about that. There something
about his manner that made her fists itch.

Rincewind knew he ought to be panicking, but that was difficult because,
although he wasn’t aware of it, motions like panic and terror and anger are all
to do with stuff sloshing around in glands and all Rincewind’s glands were still
in his body.
It was difficult to be certain where his real body was, but when he looked
down he could see a fine blue line trailing from what for the sake of sanity he
would still call his ankle into the blackness around him, and it seemed
reasonable to assume that his body was on the other end.
It was not a particularly good body, he’d be the first to admit, but one or two
bits of it had sentimental value and it dawned on him that if the little blue line
snapped he’d have to spend the rest of his li—his existence hanging around
ouija boards pretending to be people’s dead aunties and all the other things lost
souls do to pass the time.
The sheer horror of this so appalled him he hardly felt his feet touch the
ground. Some ground, anyway; he decided that it almost certainly wasn’t the
ground, which as far as he could remember wasn’t black and didn’t swirl in
such a disconcerting way.
He took a look around.
Sheer sharp mountains speared up around him into a frosty sky hung with
cruel stars, stars which appeared on no celestial chart in the multiverse, but
right in there amongst them was a malevolent red disc. Rincewind shivered,
and looked away. The land ahead of him sloped down sharply, and a dry wind
whispered across the frost-cracked rocks.
It really did whisper. As grey eddies caught at his robe and tugged at his hair
Rincewind thought he could hear voices, faint and far off, saying things like
„Are you sure those were mushrooms in the stew? I feel a bit—“ and „There’s a
lovely view if you lean over this—“ and „Don’t fuss, it’s only a scratch—“
and“Watch where you’re pointing that bow, you nearly—“ and so on.
He stumbled down the slope, with his fingers in his ears, until he saw a sight
seen by very few living men.
The ground dipped sharply until it became a vast funnel, fully a mile across,
into which the whispering wind of the souls of the dead blew with a vast,
echoing susurration, as though the Disc itself was breathing. But a narrow
spur of rock arched out and over the hole, ending in an outcrop perhaps a
hundred feet across.
There was a garden up there, with orchards and flowerbeds, and a quite
small black cottage.
A little path led up to it.
Rincewind looked behind him. The shiny blue line was still there.
So was the Luggage.
It squatted on the path, watching him.
Rincewind had never got on with the Luggage, it had always given him the
impression that it thoroughly disapproved of him. But just for once it wasn’t
glaring at him. It had a rather pathetic look, like a dog that’s just come home
after a pleasant roll in the cowpats to find that the family has moved to the next
continent.
„All right,“ said Rincewind. „Come on.“
It extended its legs and followed him up the path.
Somehow Rincewind had expected the garden on the outcrop to be full of
dead flowers, but it was in fact well kept and had obviously been planted by
someone with an eye for colour, always provided the colour was deep purple,
night black or shroud white. Huge lilies perfumed the air. There was a sundial
without a gnomon in the middle of a freshly-scythed lawn.
With the Luggage trailing behind him Rincewind crept along a path of marble
chippings until he was at the rear of the cottage, and pushed open a door.
Four horses looked at him over the top of their nosebags. They were warm
and alive, and some of the best kept beasts Rincewind had ever seen. A big
white one had a stall all to itself, and a silver and black harness hung over the
door. The other three were tethered in front of a hay rack on the opposite wall,
as if visitors had just dropped by. They regarded Rincewind with vague animal
curiosity.
The Luggage bumped into his ankle. He spun around and hissed, „Push off,
you!“
The Luggage backed away. It looked abashed.
Rincewind tiptoed to the far door and cautiously pushed it open. It gave onto
a stone-flagged passageway, which in turn opened onto a wide entrance hall.
He crept forward with his back pressed tightly against a wall. Behind him the
Luggage rose up on tiptoes and skittered along nervously.
The hall itself…
Well, it wasn’t the fact that it was considerably bigger than the whole cottage
had appeared from the outside that worried Rincewind; the way things were
these days, he’d have laughed sarcastically if anyone had said you couldn’t get
a quart into a pint pot. And it wasn’t the decor, which was Early Crypt and ran
heavily to black drapes.
It was the clock. It was very big, and occupied a space between two curving
wooden staircases covered with carvings of things that normal men only see
after a heavy session on something illegal.
It had a very long pendulum, and the pendulum swung with a slow tick-tock
that set his teeth on edge, because it was the kind of deliberate, annoying
ticking that wanted to make it abundantly clear that every tick and every tock
was stripping another second off your life. It was the kind of sound that
suggested very pointedly that in some hypothetical hourglass, somewhere,
another few grains of sand had dropped out from under you.
Needless to say, the weight on the pendulum was knife-edged and razor
sharp.
Something tapped him in the small of the back. He turned angrily.
„Look, you son of a suitcase, I told you—“
It wasn’t the Luggage. It was a young woman—silver haired, silver eyed,
rather taken aback.
„Oh,“ said Rincewind. „Um. Hallo?“
„Are you alive?“ she said. It was the kind of voice associated with beach
umbrellas, suntan oil and long cool drinks.
„Well, I hope so,“ said Rincewind, wondering if his glands were having a good
time wherever they were. „Sometimes I’m not so sure. What is this place?“
„This is the house of Death,“ she said.
„Ah,“ said Rincewind. He ran a tongue over his dry lips. Well, nice to meet
you, I think I ought to be getting along—“
She clapped her hands. „Oh, you mustn’t go!“ she said. „We don’t often have
living people here. Dead people are so boring, don’t you think?“
„Uh, yes,“ Rincewind agreed fervently, eyeing the doorway. „Not much
conversation, I imagine.“
„It’s always ‹When I was alive—› and ‹We really knew how to breathe in my
day—›“ she said, laying a small white hand on his arm and smiling at him.
„They’re always so set in their ways, too. No fun at all. So formal.“
„Stiff?“ suggested Rincewind. She was propelling him towards an archway.
„Absolutely. What’s your name? My name is Ysabell.“
„Um, Rincewind. Excuse me, but if this is the house of Death, what are you
doing here? You don’t look dead to me.“
„Oh, I live here.“ She looked intently at him. „I say, you haven’t come to
rescue your lost love, have you? That always annoys daddy, he says it’s a good
job he never sleeps because if he did he’d be kept awake by the tramp, tramp,
tramp of young heroes coming down here to carry back a lot of silly girls, he
says.“
„Goes on a lot, does it?“ said Rincewind weakly, as they walked along a
black-hung corridor.
„All the time. I think it’s very romantic. Only when you leave, it’s very
important not to look back.“
„Why not?“
She shrugged. „I don’t know. Perhaps the view isn’t very good. Are you a
hero, actually?“
„Um, no. Not as such. Not at all, really. Even less than that, in fact. I just
came to look for a friend of mine,“ he said wretchedly. „I suppose you haven’t
seen him?“
„Little fat man, talks a lot, wears eyeglasses, funny sort of clothes?“
As he spoke he was aware that he may have missed something vital. He shut
his eyes and tried to recall the last few minutes of conversation. Then it hit him
like a sandbag.
„Daddy?“
She looked down demurely. „Adopted, actually,“ she said. „He found me
when I was a little girl, he says. It was all rather sad.“ She brightened. „But
come and meet him—he’s got his friends in tonight, I’m sure hell be interested
to see you. He doesn’t meet many people socially. Nor do I, actually,“ she added.
„Sorry,“ said Rincewind. „Have I got it right? We’re talking about Death, yes?
Tall, thin, empty eye-sockets, handy in the scythe department?“
She sighed. „Yes. His looks are against him, I’m afraid.“
While it was true that, as has already been indicated, Rincewind was to
magic what a bicycle is to a bumblebee, he nevertheless retained one privilege
available to practitioners of the art, which was that at the point of death it
would be Death himself who turned up to claim him (instead of delegating the
job to a lesser mythological anthropomorphic personification, as is usually the
case). Owing largely to inefficiency Rincewind had consistently failed to die at
the right time, and if there is one thing that Death does not like it is
unpunctuality.
„Look, I expect my friend has just wandered off somewhere,“ he said. „He’s
always doing that, story of his life, nice to have met you, must be going—“
But she had already stopped in front of a tall door padded with purple velvet.
There were voices on the other side—eldritch voices, the sort of voices that mere
typography will remain totally unable to convey until someone can make a
linotype machine with echo-reverb and, possibly, a typeface that looks like
something said by a slug.
This is what the voices were saying:
WOULD YOU MIND EXPLAINING THAT AGAIN?
„Well, if you return anything except a trump, South will be able to get in his
two ruffs, losing only one Turtle, one Elephant and one Major Arcana, then—“
„That’s Twoflower!“ hissed Rincewind. „I’d know that voice anywhere!“
JUST A MINUTE—PESTILENCE IS SOUTH?
„Oh, come on, Mort, He explained that. What if Famine had played a—what
was it—a trump return!“ It was a breathy, wet voice, practically contagious all
by itself.
„Ah, then you’d only be able to ruff one Turtle instead of two,“ said Twoflower
enthusiastically.
„But if War had chosen a trump lead originally, then the contract would have
gone two down?“
„Exactly!“
I DIDN’T QUITE FOLLOW THAT. TELL ME ABOUT PSYCHIC BIDS AGAIN, I
THOUGHT I WAS GETTING THE HANG OF THAT. It was a heavy, hollow voice,
like two large lumps of lead smashing together.
„That’s when you make a bid primarily to deceive your opponents, but of
course it might cause problems for your partner—“
Twoflower’s voice rambled on in its enthusiastic way. Rincewind looked
blankly at Ysabell as words like „rebiddable suit“, „double finesse“ and „grand
slam“ floated through the velvet.
„Do you understand any of that?“ she asked.
„Not a word,“ he said.
„It sounds awfully complicated.“
On the other side of the door the heavy voice said: DID YOU SAY HUMANS
PLAY THIS FOR FUN?
„Some of them get to be very good at it, yes. I’m only an amateur, I’m afraid.“
BUT THEY ONLY LIVE EIGHTY OR NINETY YEARS!
„You should know, Mort,“ said a voice that Rincewind hadn’t heard before
and certainly never wanted to hear again, especially after dark.
„It’s certainly very—intriguing.“
DEAL AGAIN AND LET’S SEE IF I’VE GOT THE HANG OF IT.
„Do you think perhaps we should go in?“ said Ysabell. A voice behind the
door said, I BID… THE KNAVE OF TERRAPINS.
„No, sorry, I’m sure you’re wrong, let’s have a look at your—“
Ysabell pushed the door open.
It was, in fact, a rather pleasant study, perhaps a little on the sombre side,
possibly created on a bad day by an interior designer who had a headache and
a craving for putting large hourglasses on every flat surface and also a lot of
large, fat, yellow and extremely runny candles he wanted to get rid of.
The Death of the Disc was a traditionalist who prided himself on his personal
service and spent most of the time being depressed because this was not
appreciated. He would point out that no-one feared death itself, just pain and
separation and oblivion, and that it was quite unreasonable to take against
someone just because he had empty eye-sockets and a quiet pride in his work.
He still used a scythe, he’d point out, while the Deaths of other worlds had long
ago invested in combined harvesters.
Death sat at one side of a black baize table in the centre of the room, arguing
with Famine, War and Pestilence. Twoflower was the only one to look up and
notice Rincewind.
„Hey, how did you get here?“ he said.
„Well, some say the Creator took a handful—oh, I see, well, it’s hard to
explain but I—“
„Have you got the Luggage?“
The wooden box pushed past Rincewind and settled down in front of its
owner, who opened its lid and rummaged around inside until he came up with
a small, leatherbound book which he handed to War, who was hammering the
table with a mailed fist.
„It’s: Nosehinger on the Laws of Contract,“ he said. „It’s quite good, there’s a
lot in it about double finessing and how to—“
Death snatched the book with a bony hand and flipped through the pages,
quite oblivious to the presence of the two men.
RIGHT, he said, PESTILENCE, OPEN ANOTHER PACK OF CARDS. I’M
GOING TO GET TO THE BOTTOM OF THIS IF IT KILLS ME, FIGURATIVELY
SPEAKING OF COURSE.
Rincewind grabbed Twoflower and pulled him out of the room: As they jogged
down the corridor with the Luggage galloping behind them he said:
„What was all that about?“
„Well, they’ve got lots of time and I thought they might enjoy it,“ panted
Twoflower.
„What, playing with cards?“
„It’s a special kind of playing,“ said Twoflower. „It’s called—“ he hesitated.
Language wasn’t his strong point. „In your language it’s called a thing you put
across a river, for example,“ he concluded, „I think.“
„Aqueduct?“ hazarded Rincewind. „Fishing line? Weir? Dam?“
„Yes, possibly.“
They reached the hallway, where the big clock still shaved the seconds off the
lives of the world.
„And how long do you think that’ll keep them occupied?“
Twoflower paused. „I’m not sure,“ he said thoughtfully. „Probably until the
last trump—what an amazing clock…“
„Don’t try to buy it,“ Rincewind advised. „I don’t think they’d appreciate it
around here.“
„Where is here, exactly?“ said Twoflower, beckoning the Luggage and opening
its lid.
Rincewind looked around. The hall was dark and deserted, its tall narrow
windows whorled with ice. He looked down. There was the faint blue line
stretching away from his ankle. Now he could see that Twoflower had one too.
„We’re sort of informally dead,“ he said. It was the best he could manage.
„Oh.“ Twoflower continued to rummage.
„Doesn’t that worry you?“
„Well, things tend to work out in the end, don’t you think? Anyway, I’m a firm
believer in reincarnation. What would you like to come back as?“
„I don’t want to go,“ said Rincewind firmly. „Come on, let’s get out of—oh, no.
Not that.“
Twoflower had produced a box from the depths of the Luggage. It was large
and black and had a handle on one side and a little round window in front and
a strap so that Twoflower could put it around his neck, which he did.
There was a time when Rincewind had quite liked the iconoscope. He
believed, against all experience, that the world was fundamentally
understandable, and that if he could only equip himself with the right mental
toolbox he could take the back off and see how it worked. He was, of course,
dead wrong. The iconoscope didn’t take pictures by letting light fall onto
specially treated paper, as he had surmised, but by the far simpler method of
imprisoning a small demon with a good eye for colour and a speedy hand with a
paintbrush. He had been very upset to find that out.
„You haven’t got time to take pictures!“ he hissed.
„It won’t take long,“ said Twoflower firmly, and rapped on the side of the box.
A tiny door flew open and the imp poked his head out.
„Bloody hell,“ it said. „Where are we?“
„It doesn’t matter,“ said Twoflower. „The clock first, I think.“
The demon squinted.
„Poor light,“ he said. „Three bloody years at f8, if you ask me.“ He slammed
the door shut. A second later there was the tiny scraping noise of his stool
being dragged up to his easel.
Rincewind gritted his teeth.
„You don’t need to take pictures, you can just remember it!“ he shouted.
„t’s not the same,“ said Twoflower calmly.
„It’s better! It’s more real!“
„It isn’t really. In years to come, when I’m sitting by the fire—“
„You’ll be sitting by the fire forever if we don’t get out of here!“
„Oh, I do hope you’re not going.“
They both turned. Ysabell was standing in the archway, smiling faintly. She
held a scythe in one hand, a scythe with a blade of proverbial sharpness.
Rincewind tried not to look down at his blue lifeline; a girl holding a scythe
shouldn’t smile in that unpleasant, knowing and slightly deranged way.
„Daddy seems a little preoccupied at the moment but I’m sure he wouldn’t
dream of letting you go off just like that,“ she added. „Besides, I’d have no-one
to talk to.“
„Who’s this?“ said Twoflower.
„She sort of lives here,“ mumbled Rincewind. „She’s a sort of girl,“ he added.
He grabbed Twoflower’s shoulder and tried to shuffle imperceptibly towards
the door into the dark, cold garden. It didn’t work, largely because Twoflower
wasn’t the sort of person who went in for nuances of expression and somehow
never assumed that anything bad might apply to him.
„Charmed, I’m sure,“ he said. „Very nice place, you have here. Interesting
baroque effect with the bones and skulls.“
Ysabell smiled. Rincewind thought: if Death ever does hand over the family
business, she’ll be better at it than he is—she’s bonkers.
„Yes, but we must be going,“ he said.
„I really won’t hear of it,“ she said. „You must stay and tell me all about
yourselves. There’s plenty of time and it’s so boring here.“
She darted sideways and swung the scythe at the shining threads. It
screamed through the air like a neutered tomcat—and stopped sharply.
There was the creak of wood. The Luggage had snapped its lid shut on the
blade.
Twoflower looked up at Rincewind in astonishment.
And the wizard, with great deliberation and a certain amount of satisfaction,
hit him smartly on the chin. As the little man fell backwards Rincewind caught
him, threw him over a shoulder and ran.
Branches whipped at him in the starlit garden, and small, furry and probably
horrible things scampered away as he pounded desperately along the faint
lifeline that shone eerily on the freezing grass.
From the building behind him came a shrill scream of disappointment and
rage. He cannoned off a tree and sped on.
Somewhere there was a path, he remembered. But in this maze of silver light
and shadows, tinted now with red as the terrible new star made its presence
felt even in the netherworld, nothing looked right. Anyway, the lifeline appeared
to be going in quite the wrong direction.
There was the sound of feet behind him. Rincewind wheezed with effort; it
sounded like the Luggage, and at the moment he didn’t want to meet the
Luggage, because it might have got the wrong idea about him hitting its master,
and generally the Luggage bit people it didn’t like. Rincewind had never had the
nerve to ask where it was they actually went when the heavy lid slammed shut
on them, but they certainly weren’t there when it opened again.
In fact he needn’t have worried. The Luggage overtook him easily, its little
legs a blur of movement. It seemed to Rincewind to be concentrating very
heavily on running, as if it had some inkling of what was coming up behind it
and didn’t like the idea at all.
Don’t look back, he remembered. The view probably isn’t very nice.
The Luggage crashed through a bush and vanished.
A moment later Rincewind saw why. It had careened over the edge of the
outcrop and was dropping towards the great hole underneath, which he could
now see was faintly red lit at the bottom. Stretching from Rincewind, out over
the edge of the rocks and down into the hole, were two shimmering blue lines.
He paused uncertainly, although that isn’t precisely true because he was totally
certain of several things, for example that he didn’t want to jump, and that he
certainly didn’t want to face whatever it was coming up behind him, and that in
the spirit world Twoflower was quite heavy, and that there were worse things
than being dead.
„Name two,“ he muttered, and jumped.
A few seconds later the horsemen arrived and didn’t stop when they reached
the edge of the rock but simply rode into the air and reined their horses over
nothingness.
Death looked down.
THAT ALWAYS ANNOYS ME, he said. I MIGHT AS WELL INSTALL A
REVOLVING DOOR.
„Iwonder what they wanted!“ said Pestilence.
„Search me,“ said War. „Nice game, though.“
„Right,“ agreed Famine. „Compelling, I thought.“
WE’VE GOT TIME FOR ANOTHER FONDLE, said Death.
„Rubber,“ corrected War.
RUBBER WHAT?
„You call them rubbers,“ said War.
RIGHT, RUBBERS, said Death. He looked up at the new star, puzzled as to
what it might mean.
I THINK WE’VE GOT TIME, he repeated, a trifle uncertainly.
Mention has already been made of an attempt to inject a little honesty into
reporting on the Disc, and how poets and bards were banned on pain of—well,
pain—from going on about babbling brooks and rosy-fingered dawn and could
only say, for example, that a face had launched a thousand ships if they were
able to produce certified dockyard accounts.
And therefore, out of a passing respect for this tradition, it will not be said of
Rincewind and Twoflower that they became an ice-blue sinewave arcing
through the dark imensions, or that there was a sound like the twanging of a
monstrous tusk, or that their lives passed in front of their eyes (Rincewind had
in any case seen his past life flash in front of his eyes so many times that he
could sleep through the boring bits) or that the universe dropped on them like a
large jelly.
It will be said, because experiment has proven it to be true, that there was a
noise like a wooden ruler being struck heavily with a C sharp tuning fork,
possibly B flat, and a sudden sensation of absolute stillness.
This was because they were absolutely still, and it was absolutely dark.
It occurred to Rincewind that something had gone wrong.
Then he saw the faint blue tracery in front of him.
He was inside the Octavo again. He wondered what would happen if anyone
opened the book; would he and Twoflower appear like a colour plate?
Probably not, he decided. The Octavo they were in was something a bit
different from the mere book chained to its lectern deep in Unseen University,
which was merely a three-dimensional representation of a multidimensional
reality, and—
Hold on, he thought. I don’t think like this. Who’s thinking for me?
„Rincewind,“ said a voice like the rustle of old pages.
„Who? Me?“
„Of course you, you daft sod.“
A flicker of defiance flared very briefly in Rincewind’s battered heart.
„Have you managed to recall how the Universe started yet?“ he said nastily.
„The Clearing of the Throat, wasn’t it, or the Drawing of the Breath, or the
Scratching of the Head and Trying to Remember It, It was On the Tip of the
Tongue?“
Another voice, dry as tinder, hissed, „You would do well to remember where
you are.“ It should be impossible to hiss a sentence with no sibilants in it, but
the voice made a very good attempt.
„Remember where I am? Remember where I am?“ shouted Rincewind. „Of
course I remember where I am, I’m inside a bloody book talking to a load of
voices I can’t see, why do you think I’m screaming?“
„I expect you’re wondering why we brought you here again,“ said a voice by
his ear.
„No.“
„No?“
„What did he say?“ said another disembodied voice.
„He said no.“
„He really said no?“
„Yes.“
„Oh.“
„Why?“
„This sort of thing happens to me all the time,“ said Rincewind. „One minute
I’m falling off the world, then I’m inside a book, then I’m on a flying rock, then
I’m watching Death learn how to play Weir or Dam or whatever it was, why
should I wonder about anything?“
„Well, we imagine you will be wondering why we don’t want anyone to say
us,“ said the first voice, aware that it was losing the initiative.
Rincewind hesitated. The thought had crossed his mind, only very fast and
looking nervously from side to side in case it got knocked over.
„Why should anyone want to say you?“
„It’s the star,“ said the spell. „The red star. Wizards are already looking for
you; when they find you they want to say all eight Spells together to change the
future. They think the Disc is going to collide with the star.“
Rincewind thought about this. „Is it?“
„Not exactly, but in a—what’s that?“
Rincewind looked down. The Luggage padded out of the darkness. There was
a long sliver of scytheblade in its lid.
„It’s just the Luggage,“ he said.
„But we didn’t summon it here!“
„No-one summons it anywhere,“ said Rincewind. „It just turns up. Don’t
worry about it.“
„Oh. What were we talking about?“
„This red star thing.“
„Right. It’s very important that you—“
„Hallo? Hallo? Anyone out there?“
It was a small and squeaky voice and came from the picture box still slung
around Twoflower’s inert neck.
The picture imp opened his hatch and squinted up at Rincewind.
„Where’s this, squire?“ it said.
„I’m not sure.“
„We still dead?“
„Maybe.“
„Well, let’s hope we go somewhere where we don’t need too much black,
because I’ve run out.“ The hatch slammed shut.
Rincewind had a fleeting vision of Twoflower handing around his pictures
and saying things like „This is me being tormented by a million demons“ and
„This is me with that funny couple we met on the freezing slopes of the
Underworld.“ Rincewind wasn’t certain about what happened to you after you
really died, the authorities were a little unclear on the subject; a swarthy sailor
from the Rimward lands had said that he was confident of going to a paradise
where there was sherbet and houris. Rincewind wasn’t certain what a houri
was, but after some thought he came to the conclusion that it was a little
liquorice tube for sucking up the sherbet. Anyway, sherbet made him sneeze.
„Now that interruption is over,“ said a dry voice firmly, „perhaps we can get
on. It is most important that you don’t let the wizards take the spell from you.
Terrible things will happen if all eight spells are said too soon.“
„I just want to be left in peace,“ said Rincewind.
„Good, good. We knew we could trust you from the day you first opened the
Octavo.“
Rincewind hesitated. „Hang on a minute,“ he said. „You want me to run
around keeping the wizards from getting all the spells together?“
„Exactly.“
„That’s why one of you got into my head?“
„Precisely.“
„You totally ruined my life, you know that?“ said Rincewind hotly. „I could
have really made it as a wizard if you hadn’t decided to use me as a sort of
portable spellbook. I can’t remember any other spells, they’re too frightened to
stay in the same head as you!“
„We’re sorry.“
„I just want to go home! I want to go back to where—“ a trace of moisture
appeared in Rincewind’s eye— „to where there’s cobbles under your feet and
some of the beer isn’t too bad and you can get quite a good piece of fried fish of
an evening, with maybe a couple of big green gherkins, and even an eel pie and
a dish of whelks, and there’s always a warm stable somewhere to sleep in and
in the morning you are always in the same place as you were the night before
and there wasn’t all this weather all over the place. I mean, I don’t mind about
the magic, I’m probably not, you know, the right sort of material for a wizard, I
just want to go home!—“
„But you must—“ one of the spells began.
It was too late. Homesickness, the little elastic band in the subconscious that
can wind up a salmon and propel it three thousand miles through strange seas,
or send a million lemmings running joyfully back to an ancestral homeland
which, owing to a slight kink in the continental drift, isn’t there any more—
homesickness rose up inside Rincewind like a late-night prawn biriani, flowed
along the tenuous thread linking his tortured soul to his body, dug its heels in
and tugged…
The spells were alone inside their Octavo.
Alone, at any rate, apart from the Luggage.
They looked at it, not with eyes, but with consciousness as old as the
Discworld itself.
„And you can bugger off too,“ they said.
„&mdash bad.“
Rincewind knew it was himself speaking, he recognised the voice. For a
moment he was looking out through his eyes not in any normal way, but as a
spy might peer through the cut-out eyes of a picture. Then he was back.
„You okay, Rinshwind?“ said Cohen. „You looked a bit gone there.“
„You did look a bit white,“ agreed Bethan. „Like someone had walked over
your grave.“
„Uh, yes, it was probably me,“ he said. He held up his fingers and counted
them. There appeared to be the normal amount.
„Um, have I moved at all?“ he said.
„You just looked at the fire as if you had seen a ghost,“ said Bethan.
There was a groan behind them. Twoflower was sitting up, holding his head
in his hands.
His eyes focused on them. His lips moved soundlessly.
„That was a really strange… dream,“ he said. „What’s this place? Why am I
here?“
„Well,“ said Cohen, „shome shay the Creator of the Univershe took a handful
of clay and—“
„No, I mean here,“ said Twoflower. „Is that you, Rincewind?“
„Yes,“ said Rincewind, giving it the benefit of the doubt.
„There was this… a clock that… and these people who…“ said Twoflower. He
shook his head. „Why does everything smell of horses?“
„You’ve been ill,“ said Rincewind. „Hallucinating.“
„Yes… I suppose I was.“ Twoflower looked down at his chest. „But in that
case, why have I—“ Rincewind jumped to his feet.
„Sorry, very close in here, got to have a breath of fresh air,“ he said. He
removed the picture box’s strap from Twoflower’s neck, and dashed for the tent
flap.
„I didn’t notice that when he came in,“ said Bethan. Cohen shrugged.
Rincewind managed to get a few yards from the yurt before the ratchet of the
picture box began to click. Very slowly, the box extruded the last picture that
the imp had taken.
Rincewind snatched at it.
What it showed would have been quite horrible even in broad daylight. By
freezing starlight, tinted red with the fires of the evil new star, it was a lot
worse.
„No,“ said Rincewind softly. „No, it wasn’t like that, there was a house, and
this girl, and…“
„You see what you see and I paint what I see,“ said the imp from its hatch.
„What I see is real. I was bred for it. I only see what’s really there.“
A dark shape crunched over the snowcrust towards Rincewind. It was the
Luggage. Rincewind, who normally hated and distrusted it, suddenly felt it was
the most refreshingly normal thing he had ever seen.
„I see you made it, then,“ said Rincewind. The Luggage rattled its lid.
„Okay, but what did you see?“ said Rincewind. „Did you look behind?“
The Luggage said nothing. For a moment they were silent, like two warriors
who have fled the field of carnage and have paused for a return of breath and
sanity.
Then Rincewind said, „Come on, there’s a fire inside.“ He reached out to pat
the Luggage’s lid. It snapped irritably at him, nearly catching his fingers. Life
was back to normal again.
The next day dawned bright and clear and cold. The sky became a blue dome
stuck on the white sheet of the world, and the whole effect would have been as
fresh and clean as a toothpaste advert if it wasn’t for the pink dot on the
horizon.
„You can shee it in daylight now,“ said Cohen. „What is it?“
He looked hard at Rincewind, who reddened.
„Why does everyone look at me?“ he said. „I don’t know what it is, maybe it’s
a comet or something.“
„Will we all be burned up?“ said Bethan.
„How should I know? I’ve never been hit by a comet before.“
They were riding in single file across the brilliant snow-field. The Horse
people, who seemed to hold Cohen in high regard, had given them their mounts
and directions to the River Smarl, a hundred miles rimward, where Cohen
reckoned Rincewind and Twoflower could find a boat to take them to the Circle
Sea. He had announced that he was coming with them, on account of his
chilblains.
Bethan had promptly announced that she was going to come too, in case
Cohen wanted anything rubbed.
Rincewind was vaguely aware of some sort of chemistry bubbling away. For
one thing, Cohen had made an effort to comb his beard.
„I think she’s rather taken with you,“ he said. Cohen sighed.
„If I wash twenty yearsh younger,“ he said wistfully.
„Yes?“
„I’d be shixty-sheven.“
„What’s that got to do with it?“
„Well—how can I put it? When I wash a young man, carving my name in the
world, well, then I liked my women red-haired and fiery.“
„Ah.“
„And then I grew a little older and for preference I looked for a woman with
blonde hair, and the glint of the world in her eye.“
„Oh? Yes?“
„But then I grew a little older again and I came to see the point of dark
women of a sultry nature.“
He paused. Rincewind waited.
„And?“ he said. „Then what? What is it that you look for in a woman now?“
Cohen turned one rheumy blue eye on him.
„Patience,“ he said.
„I can’t believe it!“ said a voice behind them. „Me riding with Cohen the
Barbarian!“
It was Twoflower. Since early morning he had been like a monkey with the
key to the banana plantation after discovering he was breathing the same air as
the greatest hero of all time.
„Is he perhapsh being sharcashtic?“ said Cohen to Rincewind.
„No. He’s always like that.“
Cohen turned in his saddle. Twoflower beamed at him, and waved proudly.
Cohen turned back, and grunted.
„He’s got eyesh, hashn’t he?“
„Yes, but they don’t work like other people’s. Take it from me. I mean—well,
you know the Horse people’s yurt, where we were last night?“
„Yesh.“
„Would you say it was a bit dark and greasy and smelt like a very ill horse?“
„Very accurate deshcription, I’d shay.“
„He wouldn’t agree. He’d say it was a magnificent barbarian tent, hung with
the pelts of the great beasts hunted by the lean-eyed warriors from the edge of
civilisation, and smelt of the rare and curious resins plundered from the
caravans as they crossed the trackless—well, and so on. I mean it,“ he added.
„He’sh mad?“
„Sort of mad. But mad with lots of money.“
„Ah, then he can’t be mad. I’ve been around; if a man hash lotsh of money
he’sh just ecshentric.“
Cohen turned in his saddle again. Twoflower was telling Bethan how Cohen
had single-handed defeated the snake warriors of the witch lord of S’belinde
and stolen the sacred diamond from the giant statue of Offler the Crocodile
God.
A weird smile formed among the wrinkles of Cohen’s face.
„I could tell him to shut up, if you like,“ said Rincewind.
„Would he?“
„No, not really.“
„Let him babble,“ said Cohen. His hand fell to the handle of his sword,
polished smooth by the grip of decades.
„Anyway, I like his eyes,“ he said. „They can see for fifty years.“
A hundred yards behind them, hopping rather awkwardly through the soft
snow, came the Luggage. No-one ever asked its opinion about anything.
By evening they had come to the edge of the high plains, and rode down
through gloomy pine forests that had only been lightly dusted by the
snowstorm. It was a landscape of huge cracked rocks, and valleys so narrow
and deep that the days only lasted about twenty minutes. A wild, windy
country, the sort where you might expect to find —
„Trollsh,“ said Cohen, sniffing the air.
Rincewind stared around him in the red evening light. Suddenly rocks that
had seemed perfectly normal looked suspiciously alive. Shadows that he
wouldn’t have looked at twice now began to look horribly occupied.
„I like trolls,“ said Twoflower.
„No you don’t,“ said Rincewind firmly. „You can’t. They’re big and knobbly
and they eat people.“
„No they don’t,“ said Cohen, sliding awkwardly off his horse and massaging
his knees. „Well-known mishap-prehenshion, that ish. Trolls never ate
anybody.“
„No?“
„No, they alwaysh spit the bitsh out. Can’t digesht people, see? Your average
troll don’t want any more out of life than a nice lump of granite, maybe, with
perhapsh a nice slab of limeshtone for aftersh. I heard someone shay it’s
becosh they’re a shilicashe—a shillycaysheou—“ Cohen paused, and wiped his
beard, „made out of rocks.“
Rincewind nodded. Trolls were not unknown in Ankh-Morpork, of course,
where they often got employment as bodyguards. They tended to be a bit
expensive to keep until they learned about doors and didn’t simply leave the
house by walking aimlessly through the nearest wall.
As they gathered firewood Cohen went on, „Trollsh teeth, that’sh the
thingsh.“
„Why?“ said Bethan.
„Diamonds. Got to be, you shee. Only thing that can shtand the rocksh, and
they shtill have to grow a new shet every year.“
„Talking of teeth—“ said Twoflower.
„Yesh?“
„I can’t help noticing—“
„Yesh?“
„Oh, nothing,“ said Twoflower.
„Yesh? Oh. Let’sh get thish fire going before we loshe the light. And then,“
Cohen’s face fell, „I supposhe we’d better make some shoop.“
„Rincewind’s good at that,“ said Twoflower enthusiastically. „He knows all
about herbs and roots and things.“
Cohen gave Rincewind a look which suggested that he, Cohen, didn’t believe
that.
„Well, the Horshe people gave us shome horse jerky,“ he said. „If you can find
shome wild onionsh and stuff, it might make it tashte better.“
„But I—“ Rincewind began, and gave up. Anyway, he reasoned, I know what
an onion looks like, it’s a sort of saggy white thing with a green bit sticking out
of the top, should be fairly conspicuous.
„I’ll just go and have a look, shall I?“ he said.
„Yesh.“
„Over there in all that thick, shadowy undergrowth?“
„Very good playshe, yesh.“
„Where all the deep gullies and things are, you mean?“
„Ideal shpot, I’d shay.“
„Yes, I thought so,“ said Rincewind bitterly. He set off, wondering how you
attracted onions. After all, he thought, although you see them hanging in ropes
on market stalls they probably don’t grow like that, perhaps peasants or
whatever use onions hounds or something, or sing songs to attract onions.
There were a few early stars out as he started to poke aimlessly among the
leaves and grass. Luminous fungi, unpleasantly organic and looking like
marital aids for gnomes, squished under his feet. Small flying things bit him.
Other things, fortunately invisible, hopped or slithered away under the bushes
and croaked reproachfully at him.
„Onions?“ whispered Rincewind. „Any onions here?“
„There’s a patch of them by that old yew tree,“ said a voice beside him.
„Ah,“ said Rincewind. „Good.“
There was a long silence, except for the buzzing of the mosquitoes around
Rincewind’s ears.
He was standing perfectly still. He hadn’t even moved his eyes.
Eventually he said, „Excuse me.“
„Yes?“
„Which one’s the yew?“
„Small gnarly one with the little dark green needles.“
„Oh, yes. I see it. Thanks again.“
He didn’t move. Eventually the voice said conversationally, „Anything more I
can do for you?“
„You’re not a tree, are you?“ said Rincewind, still staring straight ahead.
„Don’t be silly. Trees can’t talk.“
„Sorry. It’s just that I’ve been having a bit of difficulty with trees lately, you
know how it is.“
„Not really. I’m a rock.“
Rincewind’s voice hardly changed.
„Fine, fine,“ he said slowly. „Well, I’ll just be getting those onions, then.“
„Enjoy them.“
He walked forward in a careful and dignified fashion, spotted a clump of
stringy white things huddling in the undergrowth, uprooted them carefully, and
turned around.
There was a rock a little way away. But there were rocks everywhere, the very
bones of the Disc were near the surface here.
He looked hard at the yew tree, just in case it had been speaking. But the
yew, being a fairly solitary tree, hadn’t heard about Rincewind the arborial
saviour, and in any case was asleep.
„If that was you, Twoflower, I knew it was you all along,“ said Rincewind. His
voice sounded suddenly clear and very alone in the gathering dusk.
Rincewind remembered the only fact he knew for sure about trolls, which
was that they turned to stone when exposed to sunlight, so that anyone who
employed trolls to work during daylight had to spend a fortune in barrier
cream.
But now that he came to think about it, it didn’t say anywhere what
happened to them after the sun had gone down again…
The last of the daylight trickled out of the landscape. And there suddenly
seemed to be a great many rocks about.
„He’s an awful long time with those onions,“ said Two-flower. „Do you think
we’d better go and look for him?“
„Wishards know how to look after themshelves,“ said Cohen. „Don’t worry.“
He winced. Bethan was cutting his toenails.
„He’s not a terribly good wizard, actually,“ said Twoflower, drawing nearer the
fire. „I wouldn’t say this to his face, but“—he leaned towards Cohen—„I’ve never
actually seen him do any magic.“
„Right, let’s have the other one,“ said Bethan.
„Thish is very kind of you.“
„You’d have quite nice feet if only you’d look after them.“
„Can’t sheem to bend down like I used to,“ said Cohen, sheepishly. „Of
courshe, you don’t get to meet many chiropodishts in my line of work. Funny,
really. I’ve met any amount of snake prieshts, mad godsh, warlordsh, never any
chiropodishts. I shupposhe it wouldn’t look right, really—Cohen Against the
Chiropodishts…“
„Or Cohen And The Chiropractors of Doom,“ suggested Bethan. Cohen
cackled.
„Or Cohen And The Mad Dentists!“ laughed Twoflower.
Cohen’s mouth snapped shut.
„What’sh sho funny about that?“ he asked, and his voice had knuckles in it.
„Oh, er, well,“ said Twoflower. „Tour teeth, you see…“
„What about them?“ snapped Cohen.
Twoflower swallowed. „I can’t help noticing that they’re, um, not in the same
geographical location as your mouth.“
Cohen glared at him. Then he sagged, and looked very small and old.
„True, of corsh,“ he muttered. „I don’t blame you. It’sh hard to be a hero with
no teethsh. It don’t matter what elsh you loosh, you can get by with one eye
even, but you show ‘em a mouth full of gumsh and no-one hash any reshpect.“
„I do,“ said Bethan loyally.
„Why don’t you get some more?“ said Twoflower brightly.
„Yesh, well, if I wash a shark or something, yesh, I’d grow shome,“ said
Cohen sarcastically.
„Oh, no, you buy them,“ said Twoflower. „Look, I’ll show you—er, Bethan, do
you mind looking the other way?“ He waited until she had turned around and
then put his hand to his mouth.
„You shee?“ he said.
Bethan heard Cohen gasp.
„You can take yoursh out?“
„Oh yesh. I’ve got sheveral shets. Excushe me—“ there was a swallowing
noise, and then in a more normal voice Twoflower said, „It’s very convenient, of
course.“
Cohen’s very voice radiated awe, or as much awe as is possible without teeth,
which is about the same amount as with teeth but sounds a great deal less
impressive.
„I should think show,“ he said. „When they ache, you jusht take them out
and let them get on with it, yesh?
„Teach the little buggersh a lesshon, shee how they like being left to ache all
by themshelvesh!“
„That’s not quite right,“ said Twoflower carefully. „They’re not mine, they just
belong to me.“
„You put shomeone elshe’s teethsh in your mouth?“
„No, someone made them, lots of people wear them where I come from, it’s
a—“
But Twoflower’s lecture on dental appliances went ungiven, because
somebody hit him.

The Disc’s little moon toiled across the sky. It shone by its own light, owing
to the cramped and rather inefficient astronomical arrangements made by the
Creator, and was quite crowded with assorted lunar goddesses who were not, at
this particular time, paying much attention to what went on in the Disc but
were getting up a petition about the Ice Giants.
Had they looked down, they would have seen Rincewind talking urgently to a
bunch of rocks.
Trolls are one of the oldest lifeforms in the multiverse, dating from an early
attempt to get the whole life thing on the road without all that squashy
protoplasm. Individual trolls live for a long time, hibernating during the
summertime and sleeping during the day, since heat affects them and makes
them slow. They have a fascinating geology. One could talk about tribology, one
could mention the semiconductor effects of impure silicon, one could talk about
the giant trolls of prehistory who make up most of the Disc’s major mountain
ranges and will cause some real problems if they ever awake, but the plain fact
is that without the Disc’s powerful and pervasive magical field trolls would have
died out a long time ago.
Psychiatry hadn’t been invented on the Disc. No-one had ever shoved an
inkblot under Rincewind’s nose to see if he had any loose toys in the attic. So
the only way he’d have been able to describe the rocks turning back into rolls
was by gabbling vaguely about how pictures suddenly form when you look at
the fire, or clouds.
One minute there’d be a perfectly ordinary rock, and suddenly a few cracks
that had been there all along took on the definite appearance of a mouth or a
pointed ear. A moment later, and without anything actually changing at all, a
troll would be sitting there, grinning at him with a mouth full of diamonds.
They wouldn’t be able to digest me, he told himself. I’d make them awfully ill.
It wasn’t much of a comfort.
„So you’re Rincewind the wizard,“ said the nearest one. It sounded like
someone running over gravel. „I dunno. I thought you’d be taller.“
„Perhaps he’s eroded a bit,“ said another one. „The legend is awfully old.“
Rincewind shifted awkwardly. He was pretty certain the rock he was sitting
on was changing shape, and a tiny troll—hardly any more than a pebble—was
sitting companionably on his foot and watching him with extreme interest.
„Legend?“ he said. „What legend?“
„It’s been handed down from mountain to gravel since the sunset(3) of time,“
said the first troll. „When the red star lights the sky Rincewind the wizard will
come looking for onions. Do not bite him. It is very important that you help him
stay alive.“
There was a pause.
„That’s it?“ said Rincewind.
„Yes,“ said the troll. „We’ve always been puzzled about it. Most of our legends
are much more exciting. It was more interesting being a rock in the old days.“
„It was?“ said Rincewind weakly.
„Oh yes. No end of fun. Volcanoes all over the place. It really meant
something, being a rock then.There was none f this sedimentary nonsense, you
were igneous or nothing. Of course, that’s all gone now. People call themselves
trolls today, well, sometimes they’re hardly more than slate. Chalk even. I
wouldn’t give myself airs if you could use me to draw with, would you?“
„No,“ said Rincewind quickly. „Absolutely not, no. This, er, this legend thing.
It said you shouldn’t bite me?“
„That’s right!“ said the little troll on his foot, „and it was me who told you
where the onions were!“
„We’re rather glad you came along,“ said the first troll, which Rincewind
couldn’t help noticing was the biggest one there. „We’re a bit worried about this
new star. What does it mean?“
„I don’t know,“ said Rincewind. „Everyone seems to think I know about it, but
I don’t—“
„It’s not that we would mind being melted down,“ said the big troll. „That’s
how we all started, anyway. But we thought, maybe, it might mean the end of
everything and that doesn’t seem a very good thing.“
„It’s getting bigger,“ said another troll. „Look at it now. Bigger than last
night.“
Rincewind looked. It was definitely bigger than last night.
„So we thought you might have some suggestions?“ said the head troll, as
meekly as it is possible to sound with a voice like a granite gargle.
„You could jump over the Edge,“ said Rincewind. „There must be lots of
places in the universe that could do with some extra rocks.“
„We’ve heard about that,“ said the troll. „We’ve met rocks that tried it. They
say you float about for millions of years and then you get very hot and burn
away and end up at the bottom of a big hole in the scenery. That doesn’t sound
very bright.“
It stood up with a noise like coal rattling down a chute, and stretched its
thick, knobbly arms.
„Well, we’re supposed to help you,“ it said. „Anything you want doing?“
„I was supposed to be making some soup,“ said Rincewind. He waved the
onions vaguely. It was probably not the most heroic or purposeful gesture ever
made.
„Soup?“ said the troll. „Is that all?“
„Well, maybe some biscuits too.“
The trolls looked at one another, exposing enough mouth jewellery to buy a
medium-sized city.
Eventually the biggest troll said, „Soup it is, then.“ It shrugged grittily. „It’s
just that we imagined that the legend would, well, be a little more—I don’t
know, somehow I thought—still, I expect it doesn’t matter.“
It extended a hand like a bunch of fossil bananas.
„I’m Kwartz,“ it said. „That’s Krysoprase over there, and Breccia, and Jasper,
and my wife Beryl—she’s a bit meta-morphic, but who isn’t these days? Jasper,
get off his foot.“
Rincewind took the hand gingerly, bracing himself for the crunch of crushed
bone. It didn’t come. The troll’s hand was rough and a bit lichenous around the
fingernails.
„I’m sorry,“ said Rincewind. „I never really met trolls before.“
„We’re a dying race,“ said Kwartz sadly, as the party set off under the stars.
„Young Jasper’s the only pebble in our tribe. We suffer from philosophy, you
know.“
„Yes?“ said Rincewind, trying to keep up. The troll band moved very quickly,
but also very quietly, big round shapes moving like wraiths through the night.
Only the occasional flat squeak of a night creature who hadn’t heard them
approaching marked their passage.
„Oh, yes. Martyrs to it. It comes to all of us in the end. One evening, they say,
you start to wake up and then you think ‹Why bother?› and you just don’t. See
those boulders over there?“
Rincewind saw some huge shapes lying in the grass.
„The one on the end’s my aunt. I don’t know what’s she’s thinking about, but
she hasn’t moved for two hundred years.“
„Gosh, I’m sorry.“
„Oh, it’s no problem with us around to look after them,“ aid Kwartz. „Not
many humans around here, you see. I know it’s not your fault, but you don’t
seem to be able to spot the difference between a thinking troll and an ordinary
rock. My great-uncle was actually quarried, you know.“
„That’s terrible!“
„Yes, one minute he was a troll, the next he was an ornamental fireplace.“
They paused in front of a familiar-looking cliff. The scuffed remains of a fire
smouldered in the darkness.
„It looks like there’s been a fight,“ said Beryl.
„They’re all gone!“ said Rincewind. He ran to the end of the clearing. „The
horses, too! Even the Luggage!“
„One of them’s leaked,“ said Kwartz, kneeling down. „That red watery stuff
you have in your insides. Look.“
„Blood!“
„Is that what it’s called? I’ve never really seen the point of it.“
Rincewind scuttled about in the manner of one totally at his wits’ end,
peering behind bushes in case anyone was hiding there. That was why he
tripped over a small green bottle.
„Cohen’s linament!“ he moaned. „He never goes anywhere without it!“
„Well,“ said Kwartz, „you humans have something you can do, I mean like
when we slow right down and catch philosophy, only you just fall to bits—“
„Dying, it’s called!“ screamed Rincewind.
„That’s it. They haven’t done that, because they’re not here.“
„Unless they were eaten!“ suggested Jasper excitedly.
„Hmm,“ said Kwartz, and, „Wolves?“ said Rincewind.
„We flattened all the wolves around here years ago,“ said the troll. „Old
Grandad did, anyway.“
„He didn’t like them?“
„No, he just didn’t used to look where he was going. Hmm.“ The trolls looked
at the ground again.
„There’s a trail,“ he said. „Quite a lot of horses.“ He looked up at the nearby
hills, where sheer cliffs and dangerous crags loomed over the moonlit forests.
„Old Grandad lives up there,“ he said quietly.
There was something about the way he said it that made Rincewind decide
that he didn’t ever want to meet Old Grandad.
„Dangerous, is he?“ he ventured.
„He’s very old and big and mean. We haven’t seen him about for years,“ said
Kwartz.
„Centuries,“ corrected Beryl.
„He’ll squash them all flat!“ added Jasper, jumping up and down on
Rincewind’s toes.
„It just happens sometimes that a really old and big troll will go off by himself
into the hills, and—um—the rock takes over, if you follow me.“
„No?“
Kwartz sighed. „People sometimes act like animals, don’t they? And
sometimes a troll will start thinking like a rock, and rocks don’t like people
much.“
Breccia, a skinny troll with a sandstone finish, rapped on Kwartz’s shoulder.
„Are we going to follow them, then?“ he said. „The legend says we should help
this Rincewind squashy.“
Kwartz stood up, thought for a moment, then picked Rincewind up by the
scruff of his neck and with a big gritty movement placed him on his shoulders.
„We go,“ he said firmly. „If we meet Old Grandad I’ll try to explain…“

Two miles away a string of horses trotted through the night. Three of them
carried captives, expertly gagged and bound. A fourth pulled a rough travois on
which the Luggage lay trussed and netted and silent.
Herrena softly called the column to a halt and beckoned one of her men to
her.
„Are you quite sure?“ she said. „I can’t hear anything.“
„I saw troll shapes,“ he said flatly.
She looked around. The trees had thinned out here, there was a lot of scree,
and ahead of them the track led towards a bald, rocky hill that looked
especially unpleasant by red starlight.
She was worried about that track. It was extremely old, but something had
made it, and trolls took a lot of killing.
She sighed. Suddenly it looked as though that secretarial career was not
such a bad option, at that.
Not for the first time she reflected that there were many drawbacks to being a
swordswoman, not least of which was that men didn’t take you seriously until
you’d actually killed them, by which time it didn’t really matter anyway. Then
there was all the leather, which brought her out in a rash but seemed to be
unbreakably traditional. And then there was the ale. It was all right for the likes
of Hrun the Barbarian or Cimbar the Assassin to carouse all night in low bars,
but Herrena drew the line at it unless they sold proper drinks in small glasses,
preferably with a cherry in. As for the toilet facilities…
But she was too big to be a thief, too honest to be an assassin, too intelligent
to be a wife, and too proud to enter the only other female profession generally
available.
So she’d become a swordswoman and had been a good one, amassing a
modest fortune that she was carefully husbanding for a future that she hadn’t
quite worked out yet but which would certainly include a bidet if she had
anything to say about it.
There was a distant sound of splintering timber. Trolls had never seen the
point of walking around trees.
She looked up at the hill again. Two arms of high ground swept away to right
and left, and up ahead was a large outcrop with—she squinted—some caves in
it?
Troll caves. But maybe a better option than blundering around at night. And
come sunup, there’d be no problem.
She leaned across to Gancia, leader of the gang of Morpork mercenaries. She
wasn’t very happy about him. It was true that he had the muscles of an ox and
the tamina of an ox, the trouble was that he seemed to have the brains of an
ox. And the viciousness of a ferret. Like most of the lads in downtown Morpork
he’d have cheerfully sold his granny for glue, and probably had.
„We’ll head for the caves and light a big fire in the entrance,“ she said. „Trolls
don’t like fire.“
He gave her a look which suggested he had his own ideas about who should
be giving the orders, but his lips said, „You’re the boss.“
„Right.“
Herrena looked back at the three captives. That was the box all right—
Trymon’s description had been absolutely accurate. But neither of the men
looked like a wizard. Not even a failed wizard.

„Oh, dear,“ said Kwartz.
The trolls halted. The night closed in like velvet. An owl hooted eerily—at
least Rincewind assumed it was an owl, he was a little hazy on ornithology.
Perhaps a nightingale hooted, unless it was a thrush. A bat flittered overhead.
He was quite confident about that.
He was also very tired and quite bruised.
„Why oh dear?“ he said.
He peered into the gloom. There was a distant speck in the hills that might
have been a fire.
„Oh,2 he said. „You don’t like fires, do you?“
Kwartz nodded. „It destroys the superconductivity of our brains,“ he said,
„but a fire that small wouldn’t have much effect on Old Grandad.“
Rincewind looked around cautiously, listening for the sound of a rogue troll.
He’d seen what normal trolls could do to a forest. They weren’t naturally
destructive, they just treated organic matter as a sort of inconvenient fog.
„Let’s hope he doesn’t find it, then,“ he said fervently.
Kwartz sighed. „Not much chance of that,“ he said. „They’ve lit it in his
mouth.“

„It’sh a judgeshment on me!“ moaned Cohen. He tugged ineffectually at his
bonds.
Twoflower peered at him muzzily. Gancia’s slingshot had raised quite a lump
on the back of his head and he was a little uncertain about things, starting with
his name and working upwards.
„I should have been lisshening out,“ said Cohen. „I should have been paying
attenshion and not being shwayed by all this talk about your wosshnarnes,
your din-chewers. I mussht be getting shoft.“
He levered himself up by his elbows. Herrena and the rest of the gang were
standing around the fire in the cave mouth. The Luggage was still and silent
under its net in a corner.
„There’s something funny about this cave,“ said Bethan.
„What?“ said Cohen.
„Well, look at it. Have you ever seen rocks like those before?“
Cohen had to agree that the semi-circle of stones around the cave entrance
were unusual; each one was higher than a man, and heavily worn, and
surprisingly shiny. There was a matching semi-circle on the ceiling. The whole
effect was that of a stone computer built by a druid with a vague idea of
geometry and no sense of gravity.
„Look at the walls, too.“
Cohen squinted at the wall next to him. There were veins of red crystal in it.
He couldn’t be quite certain, but it was almost as if little points of light kept
flashing on and off deep within the rock itself.
It was also extremely drafty. A steady breeze blew out of the black depths of
the cave.
„I’m sure it was blowing the other way when we came in,“ whispered Bethan.
„What do you think, Twoflower?“
„Well, I’m not a cave expert,“ he said, ‘but I was just thinking, „that’s a very
interesting stalag-thingy hanging from the ceiling up there. Sort of bulbous,
isn’t it?“
They looked at it.
„I can’t quite put my finger on why,“ said Twoflower, „but I think it might be a
rather good idea to get out of here.“
„Oh yesh,“ said Cohen sarcastically, „I shupposhe we’d jusht better ashk
theesh people to untie ush and let us go, eh?“
Cohen hadn’t spent much time in Twoflower’s company, otherwise he would
not have been surprised when the little man nodded brightly and said, in the
loud, slow and careful voice he employed as an alternative to actually speaking
other people’s languages: „Excuse me? Could you please untie us and let us go?
It’s rather damp and drafty here. Sorry.“
Bethan looked sidelong at Cohen.
„Was he supposed to say that?“
„It’sh novel, I’ll grant you.“
And, indeed, three people detached themselves from the group around the
fire and came towards them. They did not look as if they intended to untie
anyone. The two men, in fact, looked the sort of people who, when they see
other people tied up, start playing around with knives and making greasy
suggestions and leering a lot.
Herrena introduced herself by drawing her sword and pointing it at
Twoflower’s heart.
„Which one of you is Rincewind the wizard?“ she said. „There were four
horses. Is he here?“
„Um, I don’t know where he is,“ said Twoflower. „He was looking for some
onions.“
„Then you are his friends and he will come looking for you,“ said Herrena.
She glanced at Cohen and Bethan, then looked closely at the Luggage.
Trymon had been emphatic that they shouldn’t touch the Luggage. Curiosity
may have killed the cat, but Herrena’s curiosity could have massacred a pride
of lions.
She slit the netting and grasped the lid of the box.
Twoflower winced.
„Locked,“ she said eventually. „Where is the key, fat one?“
„It—it hasn’t got a key,“ said Twoflower.
„There is a keyhole,“ she pointed out.
„Well, yes, but if it wants to stay locked, it stays locked,“ said Twoflower
uncomfortably.
Herrena was aware of Gancia’s grin. She snarled.
„I want it open,“ she said. „Gancia, see to it.“ She strode back to the fire.
Gancia drew a long thin knife and leaned down close to Twoflower’s face.
„She wants it open,“ he said. He looked up at the other man and grinned.
„She wants it open, Weems.“
„Yah.“
Gancia waved the knife slowly in front of Twoflower’s face.
„Look,“ said Twoflower patiently, „I don’t think you understand. No-one can
open the Luggage if it’s feeling in a locked mood.“
„Oh yes, I forgot,“ said Gancia thoughtfully. „Of course, it’s a magic box, isn’t
that right? With little legs, they say. I say, Weems, any legs your side? No?“
He held his knife to Twoflower’s throat.
„I’m really upset about that,“ he said. „So’s Weems. He doesn’t say much but
what he does is, he tears bits off people. So open—the—box!“
He turned and planted a kick on the side of the box, leaving a nasty gash in
the wood.
There was a tiny little click.
Gancia grinned. The lid swung up slowly, ponderously. The distant firelight
gleamed off gold—lots of gold, in plate, chain, and coin, heavy and glistening in
the flickering shadows.
„All right,“ said Gancia softly.
He looked back at the unheeding men around the fire, who seemed to be
shouting at someone outside the cave. Then he looked speculatively at Weems.
His lips moved soundlessly with the unaccustomed effort of mental arithmetic.
He looked down at his knife.
Then the floor moved.
„I heard someone,“ said one of the men. „Down there. Among the—uh—
rocks.“
Rincewind’s voice floated up out of the darkness.
„I say,“ he said.
„Well?“ said Herrena.
„You’re in great danger!“ shouted Rincewind. „You must put the fire out!“
„No, no,“ said Herrena. „You’ve got it wrong, you’re in great danger. And the
fire stays.“
„There’s this big old troll—“
„Everyone knows trolls keep away from fire,“ said Herrena. She nodded. A
couple of men drew their swords and slipped out into the darkness.
„Absolutely true!“ shouted Rincewind desperately. „Only this specific troll
can’t, you see.“
„Can’t?“ Herrena hesitated. Something of the terror in Rincewind’s voice hit
her.
„Yes, because, you see, you’ve lit it on his tongue.“
Then the floor moved.
Old Grandad awoke very slowly from his centuries-old slumber. He nearly
didn’t awake at all, in fact a few decades later none of this could have
happened. When a troll gets old and starts to think seriously about the
universe it normally finds a quiet spot and gets down to some hard
philosophising, and after a while starts to forget about its extremities. It begins
to crystallise around the edges until nothing remains except a tiny flicker of life
inside quite a large hill with some unusual rock strata.
Old Grandad hadn’t quite got that far. He awoke from considering quite a
promising line of inquiry about the meaning of truth and found a hot ashy taste
in what, after a certain amount of thought, he remembered as being his mouth.
He began to get angry. Commands skittered along neural pathways of impure
silicon. Deep within his sili-caceous body stone slipped smoothly along special
fracture lines. Trees toppled, turf split, as fingers the size of ships unfolded and
gripped the ground. Two enormous rock-slides high on his cliff face marked the
opening of eyes like great crusted opals.
Rincewind couldn’t see all this, of course, since his own eyes were daylight
issue only, but he did see the whole dark landscape shake itself slowly and
then begin to rise impossibly against the stars.
The sun rose.
However, the sunlight didn’t. What did happen was that the famous
Discworld sunlight, which as has already been indicated travels very slowly
through the Disc’s powerful magical field, sloshed gently over the lands around
the Rim and began its soft, silent battle against the retreating armies of the
night. It poured like molten gold(4) across the sleeping landscape—bright, clean
and, above all, slow.
Herrena didn’t hesitate. With great presence of mind she ran to the edge of
Old Grandad’s bottom lip and jumped, rolling as she hit the earth. The men
followed her, cursing as they landed among the debris.
Like a fat man trying to do press-ups the old troll pushed himself upwards.
This wasn’t apparent from where the prisoners were lying. All they knew was
that the floor kept rolling under them and that there was a lot of noise going on,
most of it unpleasant.
Weems grabbed Gancia’s arm.
„It’s a herthquake,“ he said. „Let’s get out of here!“
„Not without that gold,“ said Gancia.
„What?“
„The gold, the gold. Man, we could be as rich as Creosote!“
Weems might have had a room-temperature IQ, but he knew idiocy when he
saw it. Gancia’s eyes gleamed more than gold, and he appeared to be staring at
Weems’ left ear.
Weems looked desperately at the Luggage. It was still open invitingly, which
was odd—you’d have thought all this shaking would have slammed the lid shut.
„We’d never carry it,“ he suggested. „It’s too heavy,“ he added.
„We’ll damn well carry some of it!“ shouted Gancia, and leapt towards the
chest as the floor shook again.
The lid snapped shut. Gancia vanished.
And just in case Weems thought it was accidental the Luggage’s lid snapped
open again, just for a second, and a large tongue as red as mahogany licked
across broad teeth as white as sycamore. Then it slammed shut again.
To Weem’s further horror hundreds of little legs extruded from the underside
of the box. It rose very deliberately and, carefully arranging its feet, shuffled
around to face him. There was a particularly malevolent look about its keyhole,
the sort of look that says „Go on—make my day…“
He backed away and looked imploringly at Twoflower.
„I think it might be a good idea if you untied us,“ suggested Twoflower. „It’s
really quite friendly once it gets to know you.“
Licking his lips nervously, Weems drew his knife. The Luggage gave a
warning creak.
He slashed through their bonds and stood back quickly.
„Thank you,“ said Twoflower.
„I think my back’sh gone again,“ complained Cohen, as Bethan helped him to
his feet.
„What do we do with this man?“ said Bethan.
„We take hish knife and tell him to bugger off,“ said Cohen. „Right?“
„Yes, sir! Thank you, sir!“ said Weems, and bolted towards the cavemouth.
For a moment he was outlined against the grey pre-dawn sky, and then he
vanished. There was a distant cry of „aaargh“.
The sunlight roared silently across the land like surf. Here and there, where
the magic field was slightly weaker, tongues of morning raced ahead of the day,
leaving isolated islands of night that contracted and vanished as the bright
ocean flowed onwards.
The uplands around the Vortex Plains stood out ahead of the advancing tide
like a great grey ship.
It is possible to stab a troll, but the technique takes practice and no-one ever
gets a chance to practise more than once. Herrena’s men saw the trolls loom
out of the darkness like very solid ghosts. Blades shattered as they hit silica
skins, there were one or two brief, flat screams, and then nothing more but
shouts far away in the forest as they put as much distance as they could
between themselves and the avenging earth.
Rincewind crept out from behind a tree and looked around. He was alone,
but the bushes behind him rustled as the trolls lumbered after the gang.
He looked up.
High above him two great crystalline eyes focussed in atred of everything soft
and squelchy and, above all, warm. Rincewind cowered in horror as a hand the
size of a house rose, curled into a fist, and dropped towards him.
Day came with a silent explosion of light. For a moment the huge terrifying
bulk of Old Grandad was a breakwater of shadow as the daylight streamed
past. There was a brief grinding noise.
There was silence.
Several minutes passed. Nothing happened.
A few birds started singing. A bumblebee buzzed over the boulder that was
Old Grandad’s fist and alighted on a patch of thyme that had grown under a
stone fingernail.
There was a scuffling down below. Rincewind slid awkwardly out of the
narrow gap between the fist and the ground like a snake leaving a burrow.
He lay on his back, staring up at the sky past the frozen shape of the troll. It
hadn’t changed in any way, apart from the stillness, but already the eye started
to play tricks. Last night Rincewind had looked at cracks in stone and seen
them become mouths and eyes; now he looked at the great cliff face and saw
the features become, like magic, mere blemishes in the rock.
„Wow!“ he said.
That didn’t seem to help. He stood up, dusted himself off, and looked around.
Apart from the bumble bee, he was completely alone.
After poking around for a bit he found a rock that, from certain angles,
looked like Beryl.
He was lost and lonely and a long way from home. He—
There was a crunch high above him, and shards of rock spattered into the
earth. High up on the face of Old Grandad a hole appeared; there was a brief
sight of the Luggage’s backside as it struggled to regain its footing, and then
Twoflower’s head poked out of the mouth cave.
„Anyone down there? I say?“
„Hey!“ shouted the wizard. „Am I glad to see you!“
„I don’t know. Are you?“ said Twoflower.
„Am I what?“
„Gosh, there’s a wonderful view from up here!“
It took them half an hour to get down. Fortunately Old Grandad had been
quite craggy with plenty of handholds, but his nose would have presented a
tricky obstacle if it hadn’t been for the luxuriant oak tree that flourished in one
nostril.
The Luggage didn’t bother to climb. It just jumped, and bounced its way
down with no apparent harm.
Cohen sat in the shade, trying to catch his breath and waiting for his sanity
to catch up with him. He eyed the Luggage thoughtfully.
„The horses have all gone,“ said Twoflower.
„We’ll find ‘em,“ said Cohen. His eyes bored into the Luggage, which began to
look embarrassed.
„They were carrying all our food,“ said Rincewind.
„Plenty of food in the foreshts.“
„I have some nourishing biscuits in the Luggage,“ said Twoflower. „Traveller’s
Digestives. Always a comfort in a tight spot.“
„I’ve tried them,“ said Rincewind. „They’ve got a mean edge on them, and—“
Cohen stood up, wincing.
„Excushe me,“ he said flatly. „There’sh shomething I’ve got to know.“
He walked over to the Luggage and gripped its lid. The box backed away
hurriedly, but Cohen stuck out a skinny foot and tripped up half its legs. As it
twisted to snap at him he gritted his teeth and heaved, jerking the Luggage onto
its curved lid where it rocked angrily like a maddened tortoise.
„Hey, that’s my Luggage!“ said Twoflower. „Why’s he attacking my Luggage?“
„I think I know,“ said Bethan quietly. „I think it’s because he’s scared of it.“
Twoflower turned to Rincewind, open-mouthed.
Rincewind shrugged.
„Search me,“ he said. „I run away from things I’m scared of, myself.“
With a snap of its lid the Luggage jerked into the air and came down running,
catching Cohen a crack on the shins with one of its brass corners. As it wheeled
around he got a grip on it just long enough to send it galloping full tilt into a
rock.
„Not bad,“ said Rincewind, admiringly.
The Luggage staggered back, paused for a moment, then came at Cohen
waving its lid menacingly. He jumped and landed on it, with both his hands
and feet caught in the gap between the box and the lid.
This severely puzzled the Luggage. It was even more astonished when Cohen
took a deep breath and heaved, muscles standing out on his skinny arms like a
sock full of coconuts.
They stood locked there for some time, tendon versus hinge. Occasionally one
or other would creak.
Bethan elbowed Twoflower in the ribs.
„Do something,“ she said.
„Um,“ said Twoflower. „Yes. That’s about enough, I think. Put him down,
please.“
The Luggage gave a creak of betrayal at the sound of its master’s voice. Its lid
flew up with such force that Cohen tumbled backwards, but he scrambled to
his feet and flung himself towards the box.
Its contents lay open to the skies.
Cohen reached inside.
The Luggage creaked a bit, but had obviously weighed up the chances of
being sent to the top of that Great Wardrobe in the Sky. When Rincewind dared
to peek through his fingers Cohen was peering into the Luggage and cursing
under his breath.
„Laundry?“ he shouted. „Is that it? Just laundry?“ He was shaking with rage.
„I think there’s some biscuits too,“ said Twoflower in a small voice.
„But there wash gold! And I shaw it eat shomebody!“ Cohen looked
imploringly at Rincewind.
The wizard sighed. „Don’t ask me,“ he said. „I don’t own the bloody thing.“
„I bought it in a shop,“ said Twoflower defensively. „I said I wanted a
travelling trunk.“
„That’s what you got, all right,“ said Rincewind.
„It’s very loyal,“ said Twoflower.
„Oh yes,“ agreed Rincewind. „If loyalty is what you look for in a suitcase.“
„Hold on,“ said Cohen, who had sagged onto a rock. „Wash it one of thoshe
shopsh—I mean, I bet you hadn’t noticed it before and when you went back
again it washn’t there?“
Twoflower brightened. „That’s right!“
„Shopkeeper a little wizened old guy? Shop full of strange shtuff?“
„Exactly! Never could find it again, I thought I must have got the wrong
street, nothing but a brick wall where I thought it was, I remember thinking at
the time it was rather—“
Cohen shrugged. „One of those shops,(5)“ he said. „That explainsh it, then.“
He felt his back, and grimaced. „Bloody horshe ran off with my linament!“
Rincewind remembered something, and fumbled in the depths of his torn
and now very grubby robe. He held up a green bottle.
„That’sh the shtuff!“ said Cohen. „You’re a marvel.“ He looked sideways at
Twoflower.
„I would have beaten it,“ he said quietly, „even if you hadn’t called it off, I
would have beaten it in the end.“
„That’s right,“ said Bethan.
„You two can make yourshelf usheful,“ he added. „That Luggage broke
through a troll tooth to get ush out. That wash diamond. Shee if you can find
the bitsh. I’ve had an idea about them.“
As Bethan rolled up her sleeves and uncorked the bottle Rincewind took
Twoflower to one side. When they were safely hidden behind a shrub he said,
„He’s gone barmy.“
„That’s Cohen the Barbarian you’re talking about!“ said Twoflower, genuinely
shocked. „He is the greatest warrior that—“
„Was,“ said Rincewind urgently. „All that stuff with the warrior priests and
man-eating zombies was years ago. All he’s got now is memories and so many
scars you could play noughts-and-crosses on him.“
„He is rather more elderly than I imagined, yes,“ said Twoflower. He picked
up a fragment of diamond.
„So we ought to leave them and find our horses and move on,“ said
Rincewind.
„That’s a bit of a mean trick, isn’t it?“
„They’ll be all right,“ said Rincewind heartily. „The point is, would you feel
happy in the company of someone who would attack the Luggage with his bare
hands?“
„That is a point,“ said Twoflower.
„They’ll probably be better off without us anyway.“
„Are you sure?“
„Positive,“ said Rincewind.
They found the horses wandering aimlessly in the scrub, breakfasted on
badly-dried horse jerky, and set off in what Rincewind believed was the right
direction. A few minutes later the Luggage emerged from the bushes and
followed them.
The sun rose higher in the sky, but still failed to blot out the light of the star.
„It’s got bigger overnight,“ said Twoflower. „Why isn’t anybody doing
something?“
„Such as what?“
Twoflower thought. „Couldn’t somebody tell Great A’Tuin to avoid it?“ he
said. „Sort of go around it?“
„That sort of thing has been tried before,“ said Rincewind. „Wizards tried to
tune in to Great A’Tuin’s mind.“
„It didn’t work?“
„Oh, it worked all right,“ said Rincewind. „Only…“
Only there had been certain unforeseen risks in reading a mind as great as
the World Turtle’s, he explained. The wizards had trained up on tortoises and
giant sea turtles first, to get the hang of the chelonian frame of mind, but
although they knew that Great A’Tuin’s mind would be big they hadn’t realised
that it would be slow.
„There’s a bunch of wizards that have been reading it in shifts for thirty
years,“ said Rincewind. „All they’ve found out is that Great A’Tuin is looking
forward to something.“
„What?“
„Who knows?“
They rode in silence for a while through a rough country where huge
limestone blocks lined the track. Eventually Twoflower said, „We ought to go
back, you know.“
„Look, we’ll reach the Smarl tomorrow,“ said Rincewind. „Nothing will happen
to them out here, I don’t see why—“
He was talking to himself. Twoflower had wheeled his horse and was trotting
back, demonstrating all the horsemanship of a sack of potatoes.
Rincewind looked down. The Luggage regarded him owlishly.
„What are you looking at?“ said the wizard. „He can go back if he wants, why
should I bother?“
The Luggage said nothing.
„Look, he’s not my responsibility,“ said Rincewind. „let’s be absolutely clear
about that.“
The Luggage said nothing, but louder this time.
„Go on—follow him. You’re nothing to do with me.“
The Luggage retracted its little legs and settled down on the track.
„Well, I’m going,“ said Rincewind. „I mean it,“ he added.
He turned the horse’s head back towards the new horizon, and glanced
down. The Luggage sat there.
„It’s no good trying to appeal to my better nature. You can stay there all day
for all I care. I’m just going to ride off, okay?“
He glared at the Luggage. The Luggage looked back.

„I thought you’d come back,“ said Twoflower.
„I don’t want to talk about it,“ said Rincewind.
„Shall we talk about something else?“
„Yeah, well, discussing how to get these ropes off would be favourite,“ said
Rincewind. He wrenched at the bonds around his wrists.
„I can’t imagine why you’re so important,“ said Herrena. She sat on a rock
opposite them, sword across her knees. Most of the gang laying among the
rocks high above, watching the road. Rincewind and Twoflower had been a
pathetically easy ambush.
„Weems told me what your box did to Gancia,“ she added. „I can’t say that’s a
great loss, but I hope it understands that if it comes within a mile of us I will
personally cut both your throats, yes?“
Rincewind nodded violently.
„Good,“ said Herrena. „You’re wanted dead or alive, I’m not really bothered
which, but some of the lads might want to have a little discussion with you
about those trolls. If the sun hadn’t come up when it did—“
She left the words hanging, and walked away.
„Well, here’s another fine mess,“ said Rincewind. He had another pull at the
ropes that bound him. There was a rock behind him, and if he could bring his
wrists up—yes, as he thought, it lacerated him while at the same time being too
blunt to have any effect on the rope.
„But why us?“ said Twoflower. „It’s to do with that star, isn’t it?“
„I don’t know anything about the star,“ said Rincewind. „I never even
attended astrology lessons at the University!“
„I expect everything will turn out all right in the end,“ said Twoflower.
Rincewind looked at him. Remarks like that always threw him.
„Do you really believe that?“ he said. „I mean, really?“
„Well, things generally do work out satisfactorily, when you come to think
about it.“
„If you think the total disruption of my life for the last year is satisfactory
then you might be right. I’ve lost count of the times I’ve nearly been killed—“
„Twenty-seven,“ said Twoflower.
„What?“
„Twenty-seven times,“ said Twoflower helpfully. „I worked it out. But you
never actually have.“
„What? Worked it out?“ said Rincewind, who was beginning to have the
familiar feeling that the conversation had been mugged.
„No. Been killed. Doesn’t that seem a bit suspicious?“
„I’ve never objected to it, if that’s what you mean,“ said Rincewind. He glared
at his feet. Twoflower was right, of course. The Spell was keeping him alive, it
was obvious. No doubt if he jumped over a cliff a passing cloud would cushion
his fall.
The trouble with that theory, he decided, was that it only worked if he didn’t
believe it was true. The moment he thought he was invulnerable he’d be dead.
So, on the whole it was wisest not to think about it at all.
Anyway, he might be wrong.
The only thing he could be certain of was that he was getting a headache. He
hoped that the Spell was somewhere in the area of the headache and really
suffering.
When they rode out of the hollow both Rincewind and Twoflower were
sharing a horse with one of their captors.
Rincewind perched uncomfortably in front of Weems. who had sprained an
ankle and was not in a good mood. Twoflower sat in front of Herrena which,
since he was fairly short, meant that at least he kept his ears warm. She rode
with a drawn knife and a sharp eye out for any-walking boxes; Herrena hadn’t
quite worked out what the Luggage was, but she was bright enough to know
that it wouldn’t let Twoflower be killed.
After about ten minutes they saw it in the middle of the road. It’s lid lay open
invitingly. It was full of gold.
„Go round it,“ said Herrena.
„But—“
„It’s a trap.“
„That’s right,“ said Weems, white-faced. „You take it from me.“
Reluctantly they reined their horses around the glittering temptation and
trotted on along the track. Weems glanced back fearfully, dreading to see the
chest coming after him.
What he saw was almost worse. It had gone.
Far off to one side of the path the long grass moved mysteriously and was
still.
Rincewind wasn’t much of a wizard and even less of a fighter, but he was an
expert at cowardice and he knew fear when he smelt it. He said, quietly, „It’ll
follow you, you know.“
„What?“ said Weems, distractedly. He was still peering at the grass.
„It’s very patient and it never gives up. That’s sapient pearwood you’re
dealing with. It’ll let you think it’s forgotten you, then one day you’ll be walking
along a dark street and you’ll hear these little footsteps behind you—shlup,
shlup, they’ll go, then you’ll start running and they’ll speed up,
shlupshlupSHLUP—“
„Shut up!“ shouted Weems.
„It’s probably already recognised you, so—“
„I said shut up!“
Herrena turned around in her saddle and glared at them. Weems scowled
and pulled Rincewind’s ear until it was right in front his mouth, and said
hoarsely, „I’m afraid of nothing, understand? This wizard stuff, I spit on it.“
„They all say that until they hear the footsteps,“ said Rincewind. He stopped.
A knifepoint was pricking his ribs.
Nothing happened for the rest of the day but, to Rincewind’s satisfaction and
Weems’ mounting paranoia, the Luggage showed itself several times. Here it
would be perched incongruously on a crag, there it would be half-hidden in a
ditch with moss growing over it.
By late afternoon they came to the crest of a hill and looked down on the
broad valley of the upper Smarl, the longest river on the Disc. It was already
half a mile across, and heavy with the silt that made the lower valley the most
fertile area on the continent. A few wisps of early mist wreathed its banks.
„Shlup,“ said Rincewind. He felt Weems jerk upright in the saddle.
„Eh?“
„Just clearing my throat,“ said Rincewind, and grinned. He had put a lot of
thought into that grin. It was the sort of grin people use when they stare at
your left ear and tell you in an urgent tone of voice that they are being spied on
by secret agents from the next galaxy. It was not a grin to inspire confidence.
More horrible grins had probably been seen, but only on the sort of grinner that
is orange with black stripes, has a long tail and hangs around in jungles
looking for victims to grin at.
„Wipe that off,“ said Herrena, trotting up.
Where the track led down to the river bank there was a crude jetty and a big
bronze gong.
„It’ll summon the ferryman,“ said Herrena. „If we cross here we can cut off a
big bend in the river. Might even make it to a town tonight.“
Weems looked doubtful. The sun was getting fat and red, and the mists were
beginning to thicken.
„Or maybe you want to spend the night this side of the water?“
Weems picked up the hammer and hit the gong so hard that it spun right
around on its hanger and fell off.
They waited in silence. Then with a wet clinking sound a chain sprang out of
the water and pulled taut against an iron peg set into the bank. Eventually the
slow flat shape of the ferry emerged from the mist, its hooded ferryman heaving
on a big wheel set in its centre as he winched his way towards the shore.
The ferry’s flat bottom grated on the gravel, and the hooded figure leaned
against the wheel panting.
„Two at a time,“ it muttered. „That’sh all. Jusht two, with horshesh.“
Rincewind swallowed, and tried not to look at Twoflower. The man would
probably be grinning and mugging like an idiot. He risked a sideways glance.
Twoflower was sitting with his mouth open.
„You’re not the usual ferryman,“ said Herrena. „I’ve been here before, the
usual man is a big fellow, sort of—“
„It’sh hish day off.“
„Well, okay,“ she said doubtfully. „In that case—what’s he laughing at?“
Twoflower’s shoulders were shaking, his face had gone red, and he was
emitting muffled snorts. Herrena glared at him, then looked hard at the
ferryman.
„Two of you—grab him!“
There was a pause. Then one of the men said, „What, the ferryman?“
„Yes!“
„Why?“
Herrena looked blank. This sort of thing wasn’t supposed to happen. It was
accepted that when someone yelled something like „Get him!“ or „Guards!“
people jumped to it, they weren’t supposed to sit around discussing things.
„Because I said so!“ was the best she could manage. The two men nearest to
the bowed figure looked at each ther, shrugged, dismounted, and each took a
shoulder. The ferryman was about half their size.
„Like this?“ said one of them. Twoflower was choking for breath.
„Now I want to see what he’s got under that robe.“ The two men exchanged
glances. „I’m not sure that—“ said one.
He got no further because a knobbly elbow jerked into his stomach like a
piston. His companion looked down incredulously and got the other elbow in
the kidneys.
Cohen cursed as he struggled to untangle his sword from his robe while
hopping crabwise towards Herrena. Rincewind groaned, gritted his teeth, and
jerked his head backwards hard. There was a scream from Weems and
Rincewind rolled sideways, landed heavily in the mud, scrambled up madly and
looked around for somewhere to hide.
With a cry of triumph Cohen managed to free his sword and waved it
triumphantly, severely wounding a man who had been creeping up behind him.
Herrena pushed Twoflower off her horse and fumbled for her own blade.
Twoflower tried to stand up and caused the horse of another man to rear,
throwing him off and bringing his head down to the right level for Rincewind to
kick it as hard as possible. Rincewind would be the first to call himself a rat,
but even rats fight in a corner.
Weems’ hands dropped onto his shoulder and a fist like a medium-sized rock
slammed into his head.
As he went down he heard Herrena say, quite quietly, „Kill them both. I’ll
deal with this old fool.“
„Roight!“ said Weems, and turned towards Twoflower with his sword drawn.
Rincewind saw him hesitate. There was a moment of silence, and then even
Herrena could hear the splashing as the Luggage surged ashore, water pouring
from it.
Weems stared at it in horror. His sword fell from his hand. He turned and
ran into the mists. A moment later the Luggage bounded over Rincewind and
followed him.
Herrena lunged at Cohen, who parried the thrust and grunted as his arm
twinged. The blades clanged wetly, and then Herrena was forced to back away
as a cunning upward sweep from Cohen nearly disarmed her.
Rincewind staggered towards Twoflower and tugged at him ineffectually.
„Time to be going,“ he muttered.
„This is great!“ said Twoflower. „Did you see the way he—“
„Yes, yes, come on.“
„But I want—I say, well done!“
Herrena’s sword spun out of her hand and stood quivering in the dirt. With a
snort of satisfaction Cohen brought his own sword back, went momentarily
crosseyed, gave a little yelp of pain, and stood absolutely motionless.
Herrena looked at him, puzzled. She made an experimental move in the
direction of her own sword and when nothing happened she grasped it, tested
its balance, and stared at Cohen. Only his agonised eyes moved to follow her as
she circled him cautiously.
„His back’s gone again!“ whispered Twoflower. „What can we do?“
„We can see if we can catch the horses?“
„Well,“ said Herrena, „I don’t know who you are or why you’re here, and
there’s nothing personal about this, you understand.“
She raised her sword in both hands.
There was a sudden movement in the mists and the dull thud of a heavy
piece of wood hitting a head. Herrena looked bewildered for a moment, and
then fell forward.
Bethan dropped the branch she had been holding and looked at Cohen. Then
she grabbed him by the shoulders, stuck her knee in the small of his back, gave
a businesslike twist and let him go.
An expression of bliss passed across his face. He gave an experimental bend.
„It’s gone!“ he said. „The back! Gone!“
Twoflower turned to Rincewind.
„My father used to recommend hanging from the top of a door,“ he said
conversationally.
Weems crept very cautiously through the scrubby, mist-laden trees. The pale
damp air muffled all sounds, but he was certain that there had been nothing to
hear for the past ten minutes. He turned around very slowly, and then allowed
himself the luxury of a long, heartfelt sigh. He stepped back into the cover of
the bushes.
Something nudged the back of his knees, very gently. Something angular.
He looked down. There seemed to be more feet down there than there ought
to be.
There was a short, sharp snap.
The fire was a tiny dot of light in a dark landscape. The moon wasn’t up yet,
but the star was a lurking glow on the horizon.
„It’s circular now,“ said Bethan. „It looks like a tiny sun. I’m sure it’s getting
hotter, too.“
„Don’t,“ said Rincewind. „As if I hadn’t got enough to worry about.“
„What I don’t understand,“ said Cohen, who was having his back massaged,
„ish how they captured you without ush hearing it. We wouldn’t have known at
all if your Luggage hadn’t kept jumping up and down.“
„And whining,“ said Bethan. They all looked at her.
„Well, it looked as if it was whining,“ she said. „I think it’s rather sweet,
really.“
Four pairs of eyes turned towards the Luggage, which was squatting on the
other side of the fire. It got up, and very pointedly moved back into the
shadows.
„Eashy to feed,“ said Cohen.
„Hard to lose,“ agreed Rincewind.
„Loyal,“ suggested Twoflower.
„Roomy,“ said Cohen.
„But I wouldn’t say sweet,“ said Rincewind.
„I shuppose you wouldn’t want to shell it?“ said Cohen.
Twoflower shook his head. „I don’t think it would understand,“ he said.
„No, I shupposhe not,“ said Cohen. He sat up, and bit his lip. „I wash looking
for a preshent for Bethan, you shee. We’re getting married.“
„We thought you ought to be the first to know,“ said Bethan, and blushed.
Rincewind didn’t catch Twoflower’s eye.
„Well, that’s very, er—“
„Just as soon as we find a town where there’s a priest,“ said Bethan. „I want
it done properly.“
„That’s very important,“ said Twoflower seriously. „If there were more morals
about we wouldn’t be crashing into stars.“
They considered this for a moment. Then Twoflower said brightly, „This calls
for a celebration. I’ve got some biscuits and water, if you’ve still got some of that
jerky.“
„Oh, good,“ said Rincewind weakly. He beckoned Cohen to one side. With his
beard trimmed the old man could easily have passed for seventy on a dark
night.
„This is, uh, serious?“ he said. „You’re really going to marry her?“
„Share thing. Any objections?“
„Well, no, of course not, but—I mean, she’s seventeen and you’re, you’re, how
can I put it, you’re of the elderly persuasion.“
„Time I shettled down, you mean?“
Rincewind groped for words. „You’re seventy years older than her, Cohen. Are
you sure that—“
„I have been married before, you know. I’ve got quite a good memory,“ said
Cohen reproachfully.
„No, what I mean is, well, I mean physically, the point is, what about, you
know, the age difference and everything, it’s a matter of health, isn’t it, and—“
„Ah,“ said Cohen slowly, „I shee what you mean. The strain. I hadn’t looked
at it like that.“
„No,“ said Rincewind, straightening up. „No, well, that’s only to be expected.“
„You’ve given me something to think about and no mishtake,“ said Cohen.
„I hope I haven’t upset anything.“
„No, no,“ said Cohen vaguely. „Don’t apologishe. You were right to point it
out.“
He turned and looked at Bethan, who waved at him, and then he looked up
at the star that glared through the mists.
Eventually he said, „Dangerous times, these.“
„That’s a fact.“
„Who knows what tomorrow may bring?“
„Not me.“
Cohen clapped Rincewind on the shoulder. „Shome-timesh we jusht have to
take rishks,“ he said. „Don’t be offended, but I think we’ll go ahead with the
wedding anyway and, well,“ he looked at Bethan and sighed, „we’ll just have to
hope she’s shtrong enough.“
Around noon the following day they rode into a small, mud-walled city
surrounded by fields still lush and green. There seemed to be a lot of traffic
going the other way, though. Huge carts rumbled past them. Herds of livestock
ambled along the crown of the road. Old ladies stomped past carrying entire
households and haystacks on their backs.
„Plague?“ said Rincewind, stopping a man pushing a handcart full of
children.
He shook his head. „It’s the star, friend,“ he said. „Haven’t you seen it in the
sky?“
„We couldn’t help noticing it, yes.“
They say that it’ll hit us on Hogswatchnight and the seas will boil and the
countries of the Disc will be broken and kings will be brought down and the
cities will be as lakes of glass,“ said the man. „I’m off to the mountains.“
„That’ll help, will it?“ said Rincewind doubtfully.
„No, but the view will be better.“
Rincewind rode back to the others.
„Everyone’s worried about the star,“ he said. „Apparently there’s hardly
anyone left in the cities, they’re all frightened of it.“
„I don’t want to worry anyone,“ said Bethan, „but hasn’t it struck you as
unseasonably hot?“
„That’s what I said last night,“ said Twoflower. „Very warm, I thought.“
„I shuspect it’ll get a lot hotter,“ said Cohen. „Let’sh get on into the city.“
They rode through echoing streets that were practically deserted. Cohen kept
peering at merchants’ signs until he reined his horse and said, „Thish ish what
I’ve been looking for. You find a temple and a priesht, I’ll join you shortly.“
„A jeweller?“ said Rincewind.
„It’s a shuprishe.“
„I could do with a new dress, too,“ said Bethan.
„I’ll shteal you one.“
There was something very oppressive about the city, Rincewind decided.
There was also something very odd.
Almost every door was painted with a large red star.
„It’s creepy,“ said Bethan. „As if people wanted to bring the star here.“
„Or keep it away,“ said Twoflower.
„That won’t work. It’s too big,“ said Rincewind. He saw their faces turned
towards him.
„Well, it stands to reason, doesn’t it?“ he said lamely.
„No,“ said Bethan.
„Stars are small lights in the sky,“ said Twoflower. „One fell down near my
home once—big white thing, size of a house, glowed for weeks before it went
out.“
„This star is different,“ said a voice. „Great A’Tuin has climbed the beach of
the universe. This is the great ocean of space.“
„How do you know?“ said Twoflower.
„Know what?“ said Rincewind.
„What you just said. About beaches and oceans.“
„I didn’t say anything!“
„Yes you did, you silly man!“ yelled Bethan. „We saw your lips going up and
down and everything!“
Rincewind shut his eyes. Inside his mind he could feel the Spell scuttling off
to hide behind his conscience, and muttering to itself.
„All right, all right,“ he said. „No need to shout. I—I don’t know how I know, I
just know—.“
„Well, I wish you’d tell us.“
They turned the corner.
All the cities around the Circle Sea had a special area set aside for the gods,
of which the Disc had an elegant sufficiency. Usually they were crowded and
not very attractive from an architectural point of view. The most senior gods, of
course, had large and splendid temples, but the trouble was that later gods
demanded equality and soon the holy areas were sprawling with lean-to’s,
annexes, loft conversions, sub-basements, bijou flatlets, ecclesiastical infilling
and trans-temporal timesharing, since no god would dream of living outside the
holy quarter or, as it had become, three-eighths. There were usually three
hundred different types of incense being burned and the noise was normally at
pain threshold because of all the priests vying with each other to call their
share of the faithful to prayer.
But this street was deathly quiet, that particularly unpleasant quiet that
comes when hundreds of frightened and angry people are standing very still.
A man at the edge of the crowd turned around and scowled at the
newcomers. He had a red star painted on his forehead.
„What’s—“ Rincewind began, and stopped as his voice seemed far too loud,
„what’s this?“
„You’re strangers?“ said the man.
„Actually we know one another quite—“ Twoflower began, and fell silent.
Bethan pointed up the street.
Every temple had a star painted on it. There was a particularly big one
daubed across the stone eye outside the temple of Blind Io, leader of the gods.
„Urgh,“ said Rincewind. „Io is going to be really pissed when he sees that. I
don’t think we ought to hang around here, friends.“
The crowd was facing a crude platform that had been built in the centre of
the wide street. A big banner had been draped across the front of it.
„I always heard that Blind Io can see everything that happens everywhere,“
said Bethan quietly. „Why hasn’t—“
„Quiet!“ said the man beside them. „Dahoney speaks!“
A figure had stepped up on the platform, a tall thin man with hair like a
dandelion. There was no cheer from the crowd, just a collective sigh. He began
to speak.
Rincewind listened in mounting horror. Where were the gods? said the man.
They had gone. Perhaps they had never been. Who, actually, could remember
seeing them? And now the star had been sent—
It went on and on, a quiet, clear voice that used words like „cleanse“ and
„scouring“ and „purify“ and drilled into the brain like a hot sword. Where were
the wizards? Where was magic? Had it ever really worked, or had it all been a
dream?
Rincewind began to be really afraid that the gods might get to hear about this
and be so angry that they’d take it out on anyone who happened to have been
around at the time.
But somehow even the wrath of the gods would have been better than the
sound of that voice. The star was coming, it seemed to say, and its fearful fire
could only be averted by—by—Rincewind couldn’t be certain, but he had
visions of swords and banners and blank-eyed warriors. The voice didn’t believe
in gods, which in Rincewind’s book was fair enough, but it didn’t believe in
people either.
A tall hooded stranger on Rincewind’s left jostled him. He turned—and looked
up into a grinning skull under a black hood.
Wizards, like cats, can see Death.
Compared to the sound of that voice, Death seemed almost pleasant. He
leaned against a wall, his scythe propped up beside him. He nodded at
Rincewind.
„Come to gloat?“ whispered Rincewind. Death shrugged.
I HAVE COME TO SEE THE FUTURE, he said.
„This is the future?“
A FUTURE, said Death.
„It’s horrible,“ said Rincewind.
I’M INCLINED TO AGREE, said Death.
„I would have thought you’d be all for it I“
NOT LIKE THIS. THE DEATH OF THE WARRIOR OR THE OLD MAN OR THE
LITTLE CHILD, THIS I UNDERSTAND, AND I TAKE AWAY THE PAIN AND END
THE SUFFERING. I DO NOT UNDERSTAND THIS DEATH-OF-THE-MIND.
„Who are you talking to?“ said Twoflower. Several members of the
congregation had turned around and were looking suspiciously at Rincewind.
„Nobody,“ said Rincewind. „Can we go away? I’ve got a headache.“
Now a group of people at the edge of the crowd were muttering and pointing
to them. Rincewind grabbed the other two and hurried them around the corner.
„Mount up and let’s go,“ he said. „I’ve got a bad feeling that—“
A hand landed on his shoulder. He turned around. A pair of cloudy grey eyes
set in a round bald head on top of a large muscular body were staring hard at
his left ear. The man had a star painted on his forehead.
„You look like a wizard,“ he said, in a tone of voice that suggested this was
very unwise and quite possibly fatal.
„Who, me? No, I’m—a clerk. Yes. A clerk. That’s right,“ said Rincewind.
He gave a little laugh.
The man paused, his lips moving soundlessly, as though he was listening to
a voice in his head. Several ther star people had joined him. Rincewind’s left ear
began to be widely regarded.
„I think you’re a wizard,“ said the man.
„Look,“ said Rincewind, „if I was a wizard I’d be able to do magic, right? I’d
just turn you into something, and I haven’t, so I’m not.“
„We killed all our wizards,“ said one of the men. „Some ran away, but we
killed quite a lot. They waved their hands and nothing came out.“
Rincewind stared at him.
„And we think you’re a wizard too,“ said the man holding Rincewind in an
ever-tightening grip. „You’ve got the box on legs and you look like a wizard.“
Rincewind became aware that the three of them and the Luggage had
somehow become separated from their horses, and that they were now in a
contracting circle of grey-faced, solemn people.
Bethan had gone pale. Even Twoflower, whose ability to recognise danger was
as good as Rincewind’s ability to fly, was looking worried.
Rincewind took a deep breath.
He raised his hands in the classic pose he’d learned years before, and rasped,
„Stand back! Or I’ll fill you full of magic!“
„The magic has faded,“ said the man. „The star has taken it away. All the
false wizards said their funny words and then nothing happened and they
looked at their hands in horror and very few of them, in fact, had the sense to
run away.“
„I mean it!“ said Rincewind.
He’s going to kill me, he thought. That’s it. I can’t even bluff any more. No
good at magic, no good at bluffing, I’m just a—
The Spell stirred in his mind. He felt it trickle into his brain like iced water
and brace itself. A cold tingle coursed down his arm.
His arm raised of its own volition, and he felt his own mouth opening and
shutting and his own tongue moving as a voice that wasn’t his, a voice that
sounded old and dry, said syllables that puffed into the air like steam clouds.
Octarine fire flashed from under his fingernails. It wrapped itself around the
horrified man until he was lost in a cold, spitting cloud that rose above the
street, hung there for a long moment, and then exploded into nothingness.
There wasn’t even a wisp of greasy smoke.
Rincewind stared at his hand in horror.
Twoflower and Bethan each grabbed him by an arm and hustled him through
the shocked crowd until they reached the open street. There was a painful
moment as they each chose to run down a different alley, but they hurried on
with Rincewind’s feet barely touching the cobbles.
„Magic,“ he mumbled excitedly, drunk with power. „I did magic…“
„That’s right,“ said Twoflower soothingly.
„Would you like me to do a spell?“ said Rincewind. He pointed a finger at a
passing dog and said „Wheeee!“ It gave him a hurt look.
„Making your feet run a lot faster’d be favourite,“ said Bethan grimly.
„Sure!“ slurred Rincewind. „Feet! Run faster! Hey, look, they’re doing it!“
„They’ve got more sense than you,“ said Bethan. „Which way now?“
Twoflower peered at the maze of alleyways around them. There was a lot of
shouting going on, some way off.
Rincewind lurched out of their grasp, and tottered uncertainly down the
nearest alley.
„I can do it!“ he shouted wildly. „Just you all watch out—“
„He’s in shock,“ said Twoflower.
„Why?“
„He’s never done a spell before.“
„But he’s a wiizard!“
„It’s all a bit complicated,“ said Twoflower, running after Rincewind. „Anyway,
I’m not sure that was actually him. it certainly didn’t sound like him. Come
along, old fellow.“
Rincewind looked at him with wild, unseeing eyes.
„I’ll turn you into a rosebush,“ he said.
„Yes, yes, jolly good. Just come along,“ said Twoflower soothingly, pulling
gently at his arm.
There was a pattering of feet from several alleyways and suddenly a dozen
star people were advancing on them.
Bethan grabbed Rincewind’s limp hand and held it up threateningly.
„That’s far enough!“ she screamed.
„Right!“ shouted Twoflower. „We’ve got a wizard and we’re not afraid to use
him!“
„I mean it!“ screamed Bethan, spinning Rincewind around by his arm, like a
capstan.
„Right! We’re heavily armed! What?“ said Twoflower.
„I said, where’s the Luggage?“ hissed Bethan behind Rincewind’s back.
Twoflower looked around. The Luggage was missing.
Rincewind was having the desired effect of the star people, though. As his
hand waved vaguely around they treated it like a rotary scythe and tried to hide
behind one another.
„Well, where’s it gone?“
„How should I know?“ said Twoflower.
„It’s your Luggage!“
„I often don’t know where my Luggage is, that’s what being a tourist is all
about,“ said Twoflower. „Anyway, it often wanders off by itself. It’s probably best
not to ask why.“
It began to dawn on the mob that nothing was actually happening, and that
Rincewind was in no condition to hurl insults, let alone magical fire. They
advanced, watching his hands cautiously.
Twoflower and Bethan backed away. Twoflower looked around.
„Bethan?“
„What?“ said Bethan, not taking her eyes off the advancing figures.
„This is a dead end.“
„Are you sure?“
„I think I know a brick wall when I see one,“ said Twoflower reproachfully.
„That’s about it, then,“ said Bethan.
„Do you think perhaps if I explain—?“
„No.“
„Oh.“
„I don’t think these are the sort of people who listen to explanations,“ Bethan
added.
Twoflower stared at them. He was, as has been mentioned, usually oblivious
to personal danger. Against the whole of human experience Twoflower believed
that if only people would talk to each other, have a few drinks, exchange
pictures of their grandchildren, maybe take in a show or something, then
everything could be sorted out. He also believed that people were basically good
but sometimes had their bad days. What was coming down the street was
having about the same effect on him as a gorilla in a glass factory.
There was the faintest of sounds behind him, not so much a sound in fact as
a change in the texture of the air.
The faces in front of him gaped open, turned, and disappeared rapidly down
the alley.
„Eh?“ said Bethan, still propping up the now unconscious Rincewind.
Twoflower was looking the other way, at a big glass window full of strange
wares, and a beaded doorway, and a large sign above it all which now said,
after its characters had finished writhing into position:
„Skillet, Wang, Yrxle!yt, Bunglestiff, Cwmlad and Patel“
„Estblshd: various“
„PURVEYORS“
The jeweller turned the gold slowly over the tiny anvil, tapping the last
strangely-cut diamond into place.
„From a troll’s tooth, you say?“ he muttered, squinting losely at his work.
„Yesh,“ said Cohen, „and as I shay, you can have all the resht.“ He was
fingering a tray of gold rings.
„Very generous,“ murmured the jeweller, who was dwarvish and knew a good
deal when he saw one. He sighed.
„Not much work lately?“ said Cohen. He looked out through the tiny window
and watched a group of empty-eyed people gathered on the other side of the
narrow street.
„Times are hard, yes.“
„Who are all theshe guysh with the starsh painted on?“ said Cohen.
The dwarf jeweller didn’t look up.
„Madmen,“ he said. „They say I should do no work because the star comes. I
tell them stars have never hurt me, I wish I could say the same about people.“
Cohen nodded thoughtfully as six men detached themselves from the group
and came towards the shop. They were carrying an assortment of weapons, and
had a driven, determined look about them.
„Strange,“ said Cohen.
„I am, as you can see, of the dwarvish persuasion,“ said the jeweller. „One of
the magical races, it is said. The star people believe that the star will not
destroy the Disc if we turn aside from magic. They’re probably going to beat me
up a bit. So it goes.“
He held up his latest work in a pair of tweezers.
„The strangest thing I have ever made,“ he said, „but practical, I can see that.
What did you say they were called again?“
„Din-chewersh,“ said Cohen. He looked at the horseshoe shapes nestling in
the wrinkled palm of his hand, then opened his mouth and made a series of
painful grunting noises.
The door burst open. The men strode in and took up positions around the
walls. They were sweating and uncertain, but their leader pushed Cohen aside
disdainfully and picked up the dwarf by his shirt.
„We tole you yesterday, small stuff,“ he said. „You go out feet down or feet up,
we don’t mind. So now we gonna get really—“
Cohen tapped him on the shoulder. The man looked around irritably.
„What do you want, grandad?“ he snarled.
Cohen paused until he had the man’s full attention, and then he smiled. It
was a slow, lazy smile, unveiling about 300 carats of mouth jewellery that
seemed to light up the room.
„I will count to three,“ he said, in a friendly tone of voice. „One. Two.“ His
bony knee came up and buried itself in the man’s groin with a satisfyingly
meaty noise, and he half-turned to bring the full force of an elbow into the
kidneys as the leader collapsed around his private universe of pain.
„Three,“ he told the ball of agony on the floor. Cohen had heard of fighting
fair, and had long ago decided he wanted no part of it.
He looked up at the other men, and flashed his incredible srnile.
They ought to have rushed him. Instead one of them, secure in the
knowledge that he had a broadsword and Cohen didn’t, sidled crabwise towards
him.
„Oh, no,“ said Cohen, waving his hands. „Oh, come on, lad, not like that.“
The man looked sideways at him.
„Not like what?“ he asked suspiciously.
„You never held a sword before?“
The man half-turned to his colleagues for reassurance.
„Not a lot, no,“ he said. „Not often.“ He waved his sword menacingly.
Cohen shrugged. „I may be going to die, but I should hope I could be killed
by a man who could hold his sword like a warrior,“ he said.
The man looked at his hands. „Looks all right,“ he said, doubtfully.
„Look, lad, I know a little about these things. I mean, come here a minute
and—do you mind?—right, your eft hand goes here, around the pommel, and
your right hand goes—that’s right, just here—and the blade goes right into your
leg.“
As the man screamed and clutched at his foot Cohen kicked his remaining
leg away and turned to the room at large.
„This is getting fiddly,“ he said. „Why don’t you rush me?“
„That’s right,“ said a voice by his waist. The jeweller had produced a very
large and dirty axe, guaranteed to add tetanus to all the other terrors of
warfare.
The four men gave these odds some consideration, and backed towards the
door.
„And wipe those silly stars off,“ said Cohen. „You can tell everyone that
Cohen the Barbarian will be very angry if he sees stars like that again, right?“
The door slammed shut. A moment later the axe thumped into it, bounced
off, and took a sliver of leather off the toe of Cohen’s sandal.
„Sorry,“ said the dwarf. „It belonged to my grandad. I only use it for splitting
firewood.“
Cohen felt his jaw experimentally. The dine chewers seemed to be settling in
quite well.
„If I was you, I’d be getting out of here anyway,“ he said. But the dwarf was
already scuttling around the room, tipping trays of precious metal and gems
into a leather sack. A roll of tools went into one pocket, a packet of finished
jewellery went into another, and with a grunt the dwarf stuck his arms through
handles on either side of his little forge and heaved it bodily onto his back.
„Right,“ he said. „I’m ready.“
„You’re coming with me?“
„As far as the city gates, if you don’t mind,“ he said. „You can’t blame me,
can you?“
„No. But leave the axe behind.“
They stepped out into the afternoon sun and a deserted street. When Cohen
opened his mouth little pinpoints of bright light illuminated all the shadows.
„I’ve got some friends around here to pick up,“ he said, and added, „I hope
they’re all right. What’s your name?“
„Lackjaw.“
„Is there anywhere around here where I can—“ Cohen paused lovingly,
savouring the words—„where I can get a steak?“
„The star people have closed all the inns. They said it’s wrong to be eating
and drinking when—“
„I know, I know,“ said Cohen. „I think I’m beginning to get the hang of it.
Don’t they approve of anything?“
Lackjaw was lost in thought for a moment. „Setting fire to things,“ he said at
last. „They’re quite good at that. Books and stuff. They have these great big
bonfires.“
Cohen was shocked.
„Bonfires of books?“
„Yes. Horrible, isn’t it?“
„Right,“ said Cohen. He thought it was appalling. Someone who spent his life
living rough under the sky knew the value of a good thick book, which ought to
outlast at least a season of cooking fires if you were careful how you tore the
pages out. Many a life had been saved on a snowy night by a handful of sodden
kindling and a really dry book. If you felt like a smoke and couldn’t find a pipe,
a book was your man every time.
Cohen realised people wrote things in books. It had always seemed to him to
be a frivolous waste of paper.
„’m afraid if your friends met them they might be in trouble,“ said Lackjaw
sadly as they walked up the street.
They turned the corner and saw the bonfire. It was in the middle of the
street. A couple of star people were feeding it with books from a nearby house,
which had its door smashed in and had been daubed with stars.
News of Cohen hadn’t spread too far yet. The book burners took no notice as
he wandered up and leaned against the wall. Curly flakes of burnt paper
bounced in the hot air and floated away over the rooftops.
„What are you doing?“ he said.
One of the star people, a woman, pushed her hair out of her eyes with a sootblackened hand, gazed intently to Cohen’s left ear, and said, „Ridding the disc
of wickedness.“
Two men came out of the building and glared at Cohen, or at least at his ear.
Cohen reached out and took the heavy book the woman was carrying. Its
cover was crusted with strange red and black stones that spelled out what
Cohen was sure was a word. He showed it to Lackjaw.
„The Necrotelecomnicon,“ said the dwarf. „Wizards use it. It’s how to contact
the dead, I think.“
„That’s wizards for you,“ said Cohen. He felt a page between finger and
thumb; it was thin, and quite soft. The rather unpleasant organic-looking
writing didn’t worry him at all. Yes, a book like this could be a real friend to a
man—
„Yes? You want something?“ he said to one of the star men, who had gripped
his arm.
„All books of magic must be burned,“ said the man, but a little uncertainly,
because something about Cohen’s teeth was giving him a nasty feeling of
sanity.
„Why?“ said Cohen.
„It has been revealed to us.“ Now Cohen’s smile was as wide as all outdoors,
and rather more dangerous.
„I think we ought to be getting along,“ said Lackjaw nervously. A party of star
people had turned into the street behind them.
„I think I would like to kill someone,“ said Cohen, still smiling.
„The star directs that the Disc must be cleansed,“ said the man, backing
away.
„Stars can’t talk,“ said Cohen, drawing his sword.
„If you kill me a thousand will take my place,“ said the man, who was now
backed against the wall.
„Yes,“ said Cohen, in a reasonable tone of voice, „but that isn’t the point, is
it? The point is, you’ll be dead.“
The man’s adam’s apple began to bob like a yoyo. He squinted down at
Cohen’s sword.
„There is that, yes,“ he conceded. „Tell you what—how bout if we put the fire
out?“ „Good idea,“ said Cohen.
Lackjaw tugged at his belt. The other star people were running towards them.
There were a lot of them, many of them were armed, and it began to look as
though things would become a little more serious.
Cohen waved his sword at them defiantly, and turned and ran. Even Lackjaw
had difficulty in keeping up.
„Funny,“ he gasped, as they plunged down another alley, „I thought—for a
minute—you’d want to stand—and fight them.“
„Blow that—for a—lark.“
As they came out into the light at the other end of the alley Cohen flung
himself against the wall, drew his sword, stood with his head on one side as he
judged the approaching footsteps, and then brought the blade around in a dead
flat sweep at stomach height. There was an unpleasant noise and several
screams, but by then Cohen was well away up the street, moving in the
unusual shambling run that spared his bunions.
With Lackjaw pounding along grimly beside him he turned off into an inn
painted with red stars, jumped onto a table with only a faint whimper of pain,
ran along it—while, with almost perfect choreography, Lackjaw ran straight
underneath without ducking—jumped down at the other end, kicked his way
through the kitchens, and came out into another alley.
They scurried around a few more turnings and piled into a doorway. Cohen
clung to the wall and wheezed until the little blue and purple lights went away.
„Well,“ he panted, „what did you get?“
„Um, the crust,“ said Lackjaw.
„Just that?“
„Well, I had to go under the table, didn’t I? You didn’t do so well yourself.“
Cohen looked disdainfully at the small melon he had managed to skewer in
his flight.
„This must be pretty tough here,“ he said, biting through the rind.
„Want some salt on it?“ said the dwarf.
Cohen said nothing. He just stood holding the melon, with his mouth open.
Lackjaw looked around. The cul de sac they were in was empty, except for an
old box someone had left against a wall.
Cohen was staring at it. He handed the melon to the dwarf without looking at
him and walked out into the sunlight. Lackjaw watched him creep stealthily
around the box, or as stealthily as is possible with joints that creaked like a
ship under full sail, and prod it once or twice with his sword, but very gingerly,
as if he half-expected it to explode.
„It’s just a box,“ the dwarf called out. „What’s so special about a box?“
Cohen said nothing. He squatted down painfully and peered closely at the
lock on the lid.
„What’s in it?“ said Lackjaw.
„You wouldn’t want to know,“ said Cohen. „Help me up, will you?“
„Yes, but this box—“
„This box,“ said Cohen, „this box is—“ he waved his arms vaguely.
„Oblong?“
„Eldritch,“ said Cohen mysteriously.
„Eldritch?“
„Yup.“
„Oh,“ said the dwarf. They stood looking at the box for a moment.
„Cohen?“
„Yes?“
„What does eldritch mean?“
„Well, eldritch is—“ Cohen paused and looked down irritably. „Give it a kick
and you’ll see.“
Lackjaw’s steel-capped dwarfboot whammed into the side of the box. Cohen
flinched. Nothing else happened.
„I see,“ said the dwarf. „Eldritch means wooden?“
„No,“ said Cohen. „It—it oughtn’t to have done that.“
„I see,“ said Lackjaw, who didn’t, and was beginning to wish Cohen hadn’t
gone out into all this hot sunlight. „It ought to have run away, you think?“
„Yes. Or bitten your leg off.“
„Ah,“ said the dwarf. He took Cohen gently by the arm. „It’s nice and shady
over here,“ he said. „Why don’t you just have a little—“
Cohen shook him off.
„It’s watching that wall,“ he said. „Look, that’s why it’s not taking any notice
of us. It’s staring at the wall.“
„Yes, that’s right,“ said Lackjaw soothingly. „Of course it’s watching that wall
with its little eyes—“
„Don’t be an idiot, it hasn’t got any eyes,“ snapped Cohen.
„Sorry, sorry,“ said Lackjaw hurriedly. „It’s watching the wall without eyes,
sorry.“
„I think it’s worried about something,“ said Cohen.
„Well, it would be, wouldn’t it,“ said Lackjaw. „I expect it just wants us to go
off somewhere and leave it alone.“
„I think it’s very puzzled,“ Cohen added.
„Yes, it certainly looks puzzled,“ said the dwarf. Cohen glared at him.
„How can you tell?“ he snapped.
It struck Lackjaw that the roles were unfairly reversing. He looked from
Cohen to the box, his mouth opening and shutting.
„How can you tell?“ he said. But Cohen wasn’t listening anyway. He sat down
in front of the box, assuming that the bit with the keyhole was the front, and
watched it intently. Lackjaw backed away. Funny, said his mind, but the damn
thing is looking at me.
„All right,“ said Cohen, „I know you and me don’t see eye to eye, but we’re all
trying to find someone we care for, okay?“
„I’m—“ said Lackjaw, and realised that Cohen was talking to the box.
„So tell me where they’ve gone.“
As Lackjaw looked on in horror the Luggage extended its little legs, braced
itself, and ran full tilt at the nearest wall. Clay bricks and dusty mortar
exploded around it.
Cohen peered through the hole. There was a small grubby storeroom on the
other side. The Luggage stood in the middle of the floor, radiating extreme
bafflement.

„Shop!“ said Twoflower.
„Anyone here?“ said Bethan.
„Urrgh,“ said Rincewind.
„I think we ought to sit him down somewhere and get him a glass of water,“
said Twoflower. „If there’s one here.“
„There’s everything else,“ said Bethan.
The room was full of shelves, and the shelves were full of everything. Things
that couldn’t be accommodated on them hung in bunches from the dark and
shadowy ceiling; boxes and sacks of everything spilled onto the floor.
There was no sound from outside. Bethan looked around and found out why.
„I’ve never seen so much stuff,“ said Twoflower.
„There’s one thing it’s out of stock of,“ said Bethan, firmly.
„How can you tell?“
„You just have to look. It’s fresh out of exits.“
Twoflower turned around. Where the door and window had been there were
shelves stacked with boxes; they looked as, though they had been there for a
long time.
Twoflower sat Rincewind down on a rickety chair by the counter and poked
doubtfully at the shelves. There were boxes of nails, and hairbrushes. There
were bars of soap, faded with age. There was a stack of jars containing
deliquescent bath salts, to which someone had fixed a rather sad and jaunty
little notice announcing, in the face of all the evidence, that one would make an
Ideal Gift. There was also quite a lot of dust.
Bethan peered at the shelves on the other wall, and laughed.
„Would you look at this!“ she said.
Twoflower looked. She was holding a—well, it was a little mountain chalet,
but with seashells stuck all over it, and then the perpetrator had written ›A
Special Souvenir‹ in pokerwork on the roof (which, of course, opened so that
cigarettes could be kept in it, and played a tinny little tune).
„Have you ever seen anything like it?“ she said.
Twoflower shook his head. His mouth dropped open.
„Are you all right?“ said Bethan.
„I think it’s the most beautiful thing I’ve ever seen,“ he said.
There was a whirring noise overhead. They looked up.
A big black globe had lowered itself from the darkness of the ceiling. Little red
lights flashed on and off on it, and as they stared it spun around and looked at
them with a big glass eye. It was menacing, that eye. It seemed to suggest very
emphatically that it was watching something distasteful.
„Hallo?“ said Twoflower.
A head appeared over the edge of the counter. It looked angry.
„I hope you were intending to pay for that,“ it said nastily. Its expression
suggested that it expected Rincewind to say yes, and that it wouldn’t believe
him.
„This?“ said Bethan. „I wouldn’t buy this if you threw in a hatful of rubies
and—“
„I’ll buy it. How much?“ said Twoflower urgently, reaching into his pockets.
His face fell.
„Actually, I haven’t got any money,“ he said. „It’s in my Luggage, but I—“
There was a snort. The head disappeared from behind the counter, and
reappeared from behind a display of toothbrushes.
It belonged to a very small man almost hidden behind a green apron. He
seemed very upset.
„No money?“ he said. „You come into my shop—“
„We didn’t mean to,“ said Twoflower quickly. „We didn’t notice it was there.“
„It wasn’t,“ said Bethan firmly. „It’s magical, isn’t it?“
The small shopkeeper hesitated.
„Yes,“ he reluctantly agreed. „A bit.“
„A bit?“ said Bethan. „A bit magical?“
„Quite a bit, then,“ he conceded, backing away, and, „All right,“ he agreed, as
Bethan continued to glare at him. „It’s magical. I can’t help it. The bloody door
hasn’t been and gone again, has it?“
„Yes, and we’re not happy about that thing in the ceiling.“
He looked up, and frowned. Then he disappeared through a little beaded
doorway half-hidden among the merchandise. There was a lot of clanking and
whirring, and the black globe disappeared into the shadows. It was replaced by,
in succession, a bunch of herbs, a mobile advertising something Twoflower had
never heard of but which was apparently a bedtime drink, a suit of armour and
a stuffed crocodile with a lifelike expression of extreme pain and surprise.
The shopkeeper reappeared.
„Better?“ he demanded.
„It’s an improvement,“ said Twoflower, doubtfully. „I liked the herbs best.“
At this point Rincewind groaned. He was about to wake up.
There have been three general theories put forward to explain the
phenomenon of the wandering shops or, as they are generically known,
tabernae vagantes.
The first postulates that many thousands of years ago there evolved
somewhere in the multiverse a race whose single talent was to buy cheap and
sell dear. Soon they controlled a vast galactic empire or, as they put it,
Emporium, and the more advanced members of the species found a way to
equip their very shops with unique propulsion units that could break the dark
walls of space itself and open up vast new markets. And long after the orlds of
the Emporium perished in the heat death of their particular universe, after one
last defiant fire sale, the wandering starshops still ply their trade, eating their
way through the pages of spacetime like a worm through a three-volume novel.
The second is that they are the creation of a sympathetic Fate, charged with
the role of supplying exactly the right thing at the right time.
The third is that they are simply a very clever way of getting around the
various Sunday Closing acts.
All these theories, diverse as they are, have two things in common. They
explain the observed facts, and they are completely and utterly wrong.
Rincewind opened his eyes and lay for a moment looking up at the stuffed
reptile. It was not the best thing to see when awakening from troubled
dreams…
Magic! So that’s what it felt like! No wonder wizards didn’t have much truck
with sex!
Rincewind knew what orgasms were, of course, he’d had a few in his time,
sometimes even in company, but nothing in his experience even approximated
to that tight, hot moment when every nerve in his body streamed with bluewhite fire and raw magic had blazed forth from his fingers. It filled you and
lifted you and you surfed down the rising, curling wave of elemental force. No
wonder wizards fought for power…
And so on. The Spell in his head had been doing it, though, not Rincewind.
He was really beginning to hate that Spell. He was sure that if it hadn’t
frightened away all the other spells he’d tried to learn he could have been a
decent wizard in his own right. ‘
Somewhere in Rincewind’s battered soul the worm of rebellion flashed a fang.
Right, he thought. You’re going back into the Octavo, first chance I get.
He sat up.
„Where the hell is this?“ he said, grabbing his head to stop it exploding.
„A shop,“ said Twoflower mournfully.
„I hope it sells knives because I think I’d like to cut my head off,“ said
Rincewind. Something about the expression of the two opposite him sobered
him up.
„That was a joke,“ he said. „Mainly a joke, anyway. Why are we in this shop?“
„We can’t get out,“ said Bethan.
„The door’s disappeared,“ added Twoflower helpfully.
Rincewind stood up, a little shakily.
„Oh,“ he said. „One of those shops?“
„All right,“ said the shopkeeper testily. „It’s magical, yes, it moves around,
yes, no, I’m not telling you why—“
„Can I have a drink of water, please?“ said Rincewind.
The shopkeeper looked affronted.
„First no money, then they want a glass of water,“ he snapped. „That’s just
about—“
Bethan snorted and strode across to the little man, who tried to back away.
He was too late.
She picked him up by his apron straps and glared at him eye to eye. Torn
though her dress was, disarrayed though her hair was, she became for a
moment the symbol of every woman who has caught a man with his thumb on
the scales of life.
„Time is money,“ she hissed. „I’ll give you thirty seconds to get him a glass of
water. I think that’s a bargain, don’t you?“
„I say,“ Twoflower whispered. „She’s a real terror when she’s roused, isn’t
she?“
„Yes,“ said Rincewind, without enthusiasm.
„All right, all right,“ said the shopkeeper, visibly cowed.
„And then you can let us out,“ Bethan added.
„That’s fine by me, I wasn’t open for business anyway, I just stopped for a few
seconds to get my bearings and you barged in!“
He grumbled off through the bead curtains and returned ith a cup of water.
„I washed it out special,“ he said, avoiding Bethan’s gaze.
Rincewind looked at the liquid in the cup. It had probably been clean before
it was poured in, now drinking it would be genocide for thousands of innocent
germs.
He put it down carefully.
„Now I’m going to have a good wash!“ stated Bethan, and stalked off through
the curtain.
The shopkeeper waved a hand vaguely and looked appealingly at Rincewind
and Twoflower.
„She’s not bad,“ said Twoflower. „She’s going to marry a friend of ours.“
„Does he know?“
„Things not so good in the starshop business?“ said Rincewind, as
sympathetically as he could manage.
The little man shuddered. „You wouldn’t believe it,“ he said. „I mean, you
learn not to expect much, you make a sale here and there, it’s a living, you
know what I mean? But these people you’ve got these days, the ones with these
star things painted on their faces, well, I hardly have time to open the store and
they’re threatening to burn it down. Too magical, they say. So I say, of course
magical, what else?“
„Are there a lot of them about, then?“ said Rincewind.
„All over the Disc, friend. Don’t ask me why.“
„They believe a star is going to crash into the Disc,“ said Rincewind.
„Is it?“
„Lots of people think so.“
„That’s a shame. I’ve done good business here. Too magical, they say! What’s
wrong with magic, that’s what I’d like to know?“
„What will you do?“ said Twoflower.
„Oh, go to some other universe, there’s plenty around,“ said the shopkeeper
airily. „Thanks for telling me about the star, though. Can I drop you off
somewhere?“
The Spell gave Rincewind’s mind a kick.
„‘Er, no,“ he said, „I think perhaps we’d better stay. To see it through, you
know.“
„You’re not worried about this star thing, then?“
„The star is life, not death,“ said Rincewind.
„How’s that?“
„How’s what?“
„You did it again!“ said Twoflower, pointing an accusing finger. „You say
things and then don’t know you’ve said them!“
„I just said we’d better stay,“ said Rincewind.
„You said the star was life, not death,“ said Twoflower. „Your voice went all
crackly and far away. Didn’t it?“ He turned to the shopkeeper for confirmation.
„That’s true,“ said the little man. „I thought his eyes crossed a bit, too.“
„It’s the Spell, then,“ said Rincewind. „It’s trying to take me over. It knows
what’s going to happen, and I think it wants to go to Ankh-Morpork. I want to
go too,“ he added defiantly. „Can you get us there?“
„Is that the big city on the Ankh? Sprawling place, smells of cesspits?“
„It has an ancient and honourable history,“ said Rincewind, his voice stiff
with injured civic pride.
„That’s not how you described it to me,“ said Twoflower. „You told me it was
the only city that actually started out decadent.“
Rincewind looked embarrassed. „Yes, but, well, it’s my home, don’t you see?“
„No,“ said the shopkeeper, „not really. I always say home is where you hang
your hat.“
„Um, no,“ said Twoflower, always anxious to enlighten. „Where you hang your
hat is a hatstand. A home is—“
„I’ll just go and see about setting you on your way,“ said the shopkeeper
hurriedly, as Bethan came in. He scooted past her.
Twoflower followed him.
On the other side of the curtain was a room with a small bed, a rather
grubby stove, and a three-legged table. Then the shopkeeper did something to
the table, here was a noise like a cork coming reluctantly out of a bottle, and
the room contained a wall-to-wall universe.
„Don’t be frightened,“ said the shopkeeper, as stars streamed past.
„I’m not frightened,“ said Twoflower, his eyes sparkling.
„Oh,“ said the shopkeeper, slightly annoyed. „Anyway, it’s just imagery
generated by the shop, it’s not real.“
„And you can go anywhere?“
„Oh no,“ said the shopkeeper, deeply shocked. „There’s all kinds of fail-safes
built in, after all, there’d be no point in going somewhere with insufficient per
capita disposable income. And there’s got to be a suitable wall, of course. Ah,
here we are, this is your universe. Very bijou, I always think. A sort of
universette…“
Here is the blackness of space, the myriad stars gleaming like diamond dust
or, as some people would say, like great balls of exploding hydrogen a very long
way off. But then, some people would say anything.
A shadow starts to blot out the distant glitter, and it is blacker than space
itself.
From here it also looks a great deal bigger, because space is not really big, it
is simply somewhere to be big in. Planets are big, but planets are meant to be
big and there is nothing clever about being the right size.
But this shape blotting out the sky like the footfall of God isn’t a planet.
It is a turtle, ten thousand miles long from its crater-pocked head to its
armoured tail.
And Great A’Tuin is huge.
Great flippers rise and fall ponderously, warping space into strange shapes.
The Discworld slides across the sky like a royal barge. But even Great A’Tuin is
struggling now as it leaves the free depths of space and must fight the
tormenting pressures of the solar shallows. Magic is weaker here, on the littoral
of light. Many more days of his and the Discworld will be stripped away by the
pressures of reality.
Great A’Tuin knows this, but Great A’Tuin can recall doing all this before,
many thousands of years ago.
The astrochelonian’s eyes, glowing red in the light of the dwarf star, are not
focussed on it but at a little patch of space nearby…
„Yes, but where are we?“ said Twoflower. The shopkeeper, hunched over his
table, just shrugged.
„I don’t think we’re anywhere,“ he said. „We’re in a cotangent incongruity, I
believe. I could be wrong. The shop generally knows what it’s doing.“
„You mean you don’t?“
„I pick a bit up, here and there.“ The shopkeeper blew his nose. „Sometimes I
land on a world where they understand these things.“ He turned a pair of small,
sad eyes on Twoflower. „You’ve got a kind face, sir. I don’t mind telling you.“
„Telling me what?“
„It’s no life, you know, minding the Shop. Never settling down, always on the
move, never closing.“
„Why don’t you stop, then?“
„Ah, that’s it, you see, sir—I can’t. I’m under a curse, I am. A terrible thing.“
He blew his nose again.
„Cursed to run a shop?“
„Forever, sir, forever. And never closing! For hundreds of years! There was
this sorcerer, you see. I did a terrible thing.“
„In a shop?“ said Twoflower.
„Oh, yes. I can’t remember what it was he wanted, but when he asked for it
I—I gave one of those sucking-in noises, you know, like whistling only
backwards?“ He demonstrated.
Twoflower looked sombre, but he was at heart a kind man and always ready
to forgive.
„I see,“ he said slowly. „Even so—“
„That’s not all!“
„Oh.“
„I told him there was no demand for it!“
„After making the sucking noise?“
„Yes. I probably grinned, too.“
„Oh, dear. You didn’t call him squire, did you?“
„I—I may have done.“
„Um.“
„There’s more.“
„Surely not?“
„Yes, I said I could order it and he could come back next day.“
„That doesn’t sound too bad,“ said Twoflower, who alone of all the people in
the multiverse allowed shops to order things for him and didn’t object at all to
paying quite large sums of money to reimburse the shopkeeper for the
inconvenience of having a bit of stock in his store often for several hours.
„It was early closing day,“ said the shopkeeper.
„Oh.“
„Yes, and I heard him rattling the doorhandle, I had this sign on the door,
you know, it said something like Closed even for the sale of Necromancer
cigarettes, anyway, I heard him banging and I laughed.“
„You laughed?“
„Yes. Like this. Hnufhnufhnufblort.“
„Probably not a wise thing to do,“ said Twoflower, shaking his head.
„I know, I know. My father always said, he said, Do not peddle in the affairs
of wizards… Anyway, I heard him shouting something about never closing
again, and a lot of words I couldn’t understand, and then the shop—the shop—
the shop came alive.“
„And you’ve wandered like this ever since?“
„Yes. I suppose one day I might find the sorcerer and perhaps the thing he
wanted will be in stock. Until then I must go from place to place—“
„That was a terrible thing to do,“ said Twoflower.
The shopkeeper wiped his nose on his apron. „Thank you,“ he said.
„Even so, he shouldn’t have cursed you quite so badly,“ Twoflower added.
„Oh. Yes, well.“ The shopkeeper straightened his apron and made a brave
little attempt to pull himself together. „Anyway, this isn’t getting you to AnkhMorpork, is it?“
„Funny thing is,“ said Twoflower, „that I bought my Luggage in a shop like
this, once. Another shop, I mean.“
„Oh yes, there’s several of us,“ said the shopkeeper, turning back to the
table, „that sorcerer was a very impatient man, I understand.“
„Endlessly roaming through the universe,“ mused Twoflower.
„That’s right. Mind you, there is a saving on the rates.“
„Rates?“
„Yes, they’re—“ the shopkeeper paused, and wrinkled his forehead. „I can’t
quite remember, it was such a long time ago. Rates, rates—“
„Very large mice?“
„That’s probably it.“

„Hold on—it’s thinking about something,“ said Cohen.
Lackjaw looked up wearily. It had been quite nice, sitting here in the shade.
He had just worked out that in trying to escape from a city of crazed madmen
he had appeared to have allowed one mad man to give him his full attention. He
wondered whether he would live to regret this.
He earnestly hoped so.
„Oh yes, it’s definitely thinking,“ he said bitterly. „Anyone can see that.“
„I think it’s found them.“
„Oh, good.“
„Hold onto it.“
„Are you mad?“ said Lackjaw.
„I know this thing, trust me. Anyway, would you rather be left with all these
star people? They might be interested in having a talk with you.“
Cohen sidled over to the Luggage, and then flung himself astride it. It took no
notice.
„Hurry up,“ he said. „I think it’s going to go.“
Lackjaw shrugged, and climbed on gingerly behind Cohen.
„Oh?“ he said, „and how does it g—“

Ankh-Morpork!
Pearl of cities!
This is not a completely accurate description, of course—it was not round
and shiny—but even its worst enemies would agree that if you had to liken
Ankh-Morpork to anything, then it might as well be a piece of rubbish covered
with the diseased secretions of a dying mollusc.
There have been bigger cities. There have been richer cities. There have
certainly been prettier cities. But no city in the multiverse could rival AnkhMorpork for its smell.
The Ancient Ones, who know everything about all the universes and have
smelt the smells of Calcutta and !Xrc—! and dauntocum Marsport, have agreed
that even these fine examples of nasal poetry are mere limericks when set
against the glory of the Ankh-Morpork smell.
You can talk about ramps. You can talk about garlic. You can talk about
France. Go on. But if you haven’t smelled Ankh-Morpork on a hot day you
haven’t smelled anything.
The citizens are proud of it. They carry chairs outside to enjoy it on a really
good day. They puff out their cheeks and slap their chests and comment
cheerfully on its little distinctive nuances. They have even put up a statue to it,
to commemorate the time when the troops of a rival state tried to invade by
stealth one dark night and managed to get to the top of the walls before, to their
horror, their nose plugs gave out. Rich merchants who have spent many years
abroad sent back home for specially-stoppered and sealed bottles of the stuff,
which brings tears to their eyes.
It has that kind of effect.
There is only really one way to describe the effect the smell of Ankh-Morpork
has on the visiting nose, and that is by analogy.
Take a tartan. Sprinkle it with confetti. Light it with strobe lights.
Now take a chameleon.
Put the chameleon on the tartan.
Watch it closely.
See?
Which explains why, when the shop finally materialised in Ankh-Morpork,
Rincewind sat bolt upright and said „We’re here,“ Bethan went pale and
Twoflower, who had no sense of smell, said, „Really? How can you tell?“
It had been a long afternoon. They had broken into realspace in a number of
walls in a variety of cities because, according to the shopkeeper, the Disc’s
magical field was playing up and upsetting everything.
All the cities were empty of most of their citizens and belonged to roaming
gangs of crazed left-ear people.
„Where do they all come from?“ said Twoflower, as they fled yet another mob.
„Inside every sane person there’s a madman struggling to get out,“ said the
shopkeeper. „That’s what I’ve always thought. No one goes mad quicker than a
totally sane person.“
„That doesn’t make sense,“ said Bethan, „or if it makes sense, I don’t like it.“
The star was bigger than the sun. There would be no night tonight. On the
opposite horizon the Disc’s own sunlet was doing its best to set normally, but
the general effect of all that red light was to make the city, never particularly
beautiful, look like something painted by a fanatical artist after a bad time on
the shoe polish.
But it was home. Rincewind peered up and down the empty street and felt
almost happy.
At the back of his mind the Spell was kicking up a ruckus, but he ignored it.
Maybe it was true that magic was getting weaker as the star got nearer, or
perhaps he’d had the Spell in his head for so long he had built up some kind of
psychic immunity, but he found he could resist it.
„We’re in the docks,“ he declared. „Just smell that sea air!“
„Oh,“ said Bethan, leaning against the wall, „yes.“
„That’s ozone, that is,“ said Rincewind. „That’s air with character, is that.“ He
breathed deeply.
Twoflower turned to the shopkeeper.
„Well, I hope you find your sorcerer,“ he said. „Sorry we didn’t buy anything,
but all my money’s in my Luggage, you see.“
The shopkeeper pushed something into his hand.
„A little gift,“ he said. „You’ll need it.“
He darted back into his shop, the bell jangled, the sign saying Call Again
Tomorrow For Spoonfetcher’s Leeches, the Little Suckers banged forlornly
against the door, and the shop faded into the brickwork as though it had never
been. Twoflower reached out gingerly and touched the wall, not quite believing
it.
„What’s in the bag?“ said Rincewind.
It was a thick brown paper bag, with string handles.
„If it sprouts legs I don’t want to know about it,“ said Bethan.
Twoflower peered inside, and pulled out the contents.
„Is that all?“ said Rincewind. „A little house with shells on?“
„It’s very useful,“ said Twoflower defensively. „You can keep cigarettes in it.“
„And they’re what you really need, are they?“ said Rincewind.
„I’d plump for a bottle of really strong sun-tan oil,“ said Bethan.
„Come on,“ said Rincewind, and set off down the street. The others followed.
It occurred to Twoflower that some words of comfort were called for, a little
tactful small talk to take Bethan out of herself, as he would put it, and
generally cheer her up.
„Don’t worry,“ he said. „There’s just a chance that Cohen might still be alive.“
„Oh, I expect he’s alive all right,“ she said, stamping along the cobbles as if
she nursed a personal grievance against each one of them. „You don’t live to be
eighty-seven in his job if you go around dying all the time. But he’s not here.“
„Nor is my Luggage,“ said Twoflower. „Of course, that’s not the same thing.“
„Do you think the star is going to hit the Disc?“
„No,“ said Twoflower confidently.
„Why not?“
„Because Rincewind doesn’t think so.“
She looked at him in amazement.
„You see,“ the tourist went on, „you know that thing you do with seaweed?“
Bethan, brought up on the Vortex Plains, had only heard of the sea in
stories, and had decided she didn’t like it. She looked blank.
„Eat it?“
„No, what you do is, you hang it up outside your door, and it tells you if it’s
going to rain.“
Another thing Bethan had learned was that there was no real point in trying
to understand anything Twoflower said, and that all anyone could do was run
alongside the conversation and hope to jump on as it turned a corner.
„I see,“ she said.
„Rincewind is like that, you see.“
„Like seaweed.“
„Yes. If there was anything at all to be frightened about, he’d be frightened.
But he’s not. The star is just about the only thing I’ve ever seen him not
frightened of. If he’s not worried, then take it from me, there’s nothing to worry
about.“
„It’s not going to rain?“ said Bethan.
„Well, no. Metaphorically speaking.“
„Oh.“ Bethan decided not to ask what „metaphorically“ meant, in case it was
something to do with seaweed.
Rincewind turned around.
„Come on,“ he said. „Not far now.“
„Where to?“ said Twoflower.
„Unseen University, of course.“
„Is that wise?“
„Probably not, but I’m still going—“ Rincewind paused, his face a mask of
pain. He put his hand to his ears and groaned.
„Spell giving you trouble?“
„Yargh.“
„Try humming.“
Rincewind grimaced. „I’m going to get rid of this thing,“ he said thickly. „It’s
going back into the book where it belongs. I want my head back!“
„But then—“ Twoflower began, and stopped. They could all hear it—a distant
chanting and the stamping of many feet.
„Do you think it’s star people?“ said Bethan.
It was. The lead marchers came around a corner a hundred yards away,
behind a ragged white banner with an eight-pointed star on it.
„Not just star people,“ said Twoflower. „All kinds of people!“
The crowd swept them up in its passage. One moment they were standing in
the deserted street, the next they were perforce moving with a tide of humanity
that bore them onwards through the city.

Torchlight flickered easily on the damp tunnels far under the University as
the heads of the eight Orders of wizardry filed onwards.
„At least it’s cool down here,“ said one.
„We shouldn’t be down here.“
Trymon, who was leading the party, said nothing. But he was thinking very
hard. He was thinking about the bottle of oil in his belt, and the eight keys the
wizards carried—eight keys that would fit the eight locks that chained the
Octavo to its lectern. He was thinking that old wizards who sense that magic is
draining away are preoccupied with their own problems and are perhaps less
alert than they should be. He was thinking that within a few minutes the
Octavo, the greatest concentration of magic on the Disc, would be under his
hands.
Despite the coolness of the tunnel he began to sweat.
They came to a lead-lined door set in the sheer stone. Trymon took a heavy
key—a good, honest iron key, not like the twisted and disconcerting keys that
would unlock the Octavo—gave the lock a squirt of oil, inserted the key, turned
it. The lock squeaked open protestingly.
„Are we of one resolve?“ said Trymon. There was a series of vaguely
affirmative grunts.
He pushed at the door.
A warm gale of thick and somehow oily air rolled over them. The air was filled
with a high-pitched and unpleasant chittering. Tiny sparks of octarine fire
flared off every nose, fingernail and beard.
The wizards, their heads bowed against the storm of randomised magic that
blew out of the room, pushed forward. Half-formed shapes giggled and fluttered
around them as the nightmare inhabitants of the Dungeon Dimensions
constantly probed (with things that passed for fingers only because they were at
the ends of their arms) for an unguarded entry into the circle of firelight that
passed for the universe of reason and order.
Even at this bad time for all things magical, even in a room designed to damp
down all magical vibrations, the Octavo was still crackling with power.
There was no real need for the torches. The Octavo filled the room with a
dull, sullen light, which wasn’t strictly light at all but the opposite of light;
darkness isn’t the opposite of light, it is simply its absence, and what was
radiating from the book was the light that lies on the far side of darkness, the
light fantastic.
It was a rather disappointing purple colour.
As has been noted before, the Octavo was chained to a lectern carved into the
shape of something that looked vaguely avian, slightly reptilian and horribly
alive. Two glittering eyes regarded the wizards with hooded hatred.
„I saw it move,“ said one of them.
„We’re safe so long as we don’t touch the book,“ said Trymon. He pulled a
scroll out of his belt and unrolled it.
„Bring that torch here,“ he said, „and put that cigarette out!“
He waited for the explosion of infuriated pride. But none came. Instead, the
offending mage removed the dogend from his lips with trembling fingers and
ground it into the floor.
Trymon exulted. So, he thought, they do what I say. Just for now, maybe—
but just for now is enough.
He peered at the crabby writing of a wizard long dead.
„Right,“ he said, „let’s see: ‹To Appease Yt, The Thynge That Ys The
Guardian…›“

The crowd surged over one of the bridges that linked Morpork with Ankh.
Below it the river, turgid at the best of times, was a mere trickle which steamed.
The bridge shook under their feet rather more than it should. Strange ripples
ran across the muddy remains of the river. A few tiles slid off the roof of a
nearby house.
„What was that?“ said Twoflower.
Bethan looked behind them, and screamed.
The star was rising. As the Disc’s own sun scurried for safety below the
horizon the great bloated ball of the star climbed slowly into the sky until the
whole of it was several degrees above the edge of the world.
They pulled Rincewind into the safety of a doorway. The crowd hardly noticed
them, but ran on, terrified as lemmings.
„The star’s got spots on,“ said Twoflower.
„No,“ said Rincewind. „They’re… things. Things going around the star. Like
the sun goes around the Disc. But they’re close in, because, because…“ he
paused. „I nearly know!“
„Know what?“
„I’ve got to get rid of this Spell!“
„Which way is the University?“ said Bethan.
„This way!“ said Rincewind, pointing along the street.
„It must be very popular. That’s where everyone’s going.“
„I wonder why?“ said Twoflower.
„Somehow,“ said Rincewind, „I don’t think it’s to enroll for evening classes.“
In fact Unseen University was under siege, or at least those parts of it that
extruded into the usual, everyday dimensions were under siege. The crowds
outside its gates were, generally, making one of two demands. They were
demanding that either a) the wizards should stop messing about and get rid of
the star or, and this was the demand favoured by the star people, that b) they
should cease all magic and commit suicide in good order, thus ridding the Disc
of the curse of magic and warding off the terrible threat in the sky.
The wizards on the other side of the walls had no idea how to do a) and no
intention of doing b) and many had in fact plumped for c), which largely
consisted of nipping out of hidden side doors and having it away on their toes
as far as possible, if not faster.
What reliable magic still remained in the University was being channelled
into keeping the great gates secure. The wizards were learning that while it was
all very fine and impressive to have a set of gates that were locked by magic, it
ought to have occurred to the builders to include some sort of emergency backup device such as, for example, a pair of ordinary, unimpressive stout iron
bolts.
In the square outside the gates several large bonfires had been lit, for effect
as much as anything else, because the heat from the star was scorching.
„But you can still see the stars,“ said Twoflower, „the ther stars, I mean. The
little ones. In a black sky.“
Rincewind ignored him. He was looking at the gates. A group of star people
and citizens were trying to batter them down.
„It’s hopeless,“ said Bethan. „We’ll never get in. Where are you going?“
„For a walk,“ said Rincewind. He was setting off determinedly down a side
street.
There were one or two freelance rioters here, mostly engaged in wrecking
shops. Rincewind took no notice, but followed the wall until it ran parallel to a
dark alley that had the usual unfortunate smell of all alleys, everywhere.
Then he started looking very closely at the stonework. The wall here was
twenty feet high, and topped with cruel metal spikes.
„I need a knife,“ he said.
„You’re going to cut your way through?“ said Bethan.
„Just find me a knife,“ said Rincewind. He started to tap stones.
Twoflower and Bethan looked at each other, and shrugged. A few minutes
later they returned with a selection of knives, and Twoflower had even managed
to find a sword.
„We just helped ourselves,“ said Bethan.
„But we left some money,“ said Twoflower. „I mean, we would have left some
money, if we’d had any—“
„So he insisted on writing a note,“ said Bethan wearily.
Twoflower drew himself up to his full height, which was hardly worth it.
„I see no reason—“ he began, stiffly.
„Yes, yes,“ said Bethan, sitting down glumly. „I know you don’t. Rincewind,
all the shops have been smashed open, there was a whole bunch of people
across the street helping themselves to musical instruments, can you believe
that?“
„Yeah,“ said Rincewind, picking up a knife and testing its blade thoughtfully.
„Luters, I expect.“
He thrust the blade into the wall, twisted it, and stepped back as a heavy
stone fell out. He looked up, counting under his breath, and levered another
stone from its socket.
„How did you do that?“ said Twoflower.
„Just give me a leg up, will you?“ said Rincewind. A moment later, his feet
wedged into the holes he had created, he was making further steps halfway up
the wall.
„It’s been like this for centuries,“ his voice floated down. „Some of the stones
haven’t got any mortar. Secret entrance, see? Watch out below.“
Another stone cracked into the cobbles.
„Students made it long ago,“ said Rincewind. „Handy way in and out after
lights out.“
„Ah,“ said Twoflower, „I understand. Over the wall and out to brightly-lit
tavernas to drink and sing and recite poetry, yes?“
„Nearly right except for the singing and the poetry, yes,“ said Rincewind. ‘A
couple of these spikes should be loose—“ There was a clang.
„There’s not much of a drop this side,“ came his voice after a few seconds.
„Come on, then. If you’re coming.“
And so it was that Rincewind, Twoflower and Bethan entered Unseen
University.

Elsewhere on the campus—
The eight wizards inserted their keys and, with many a worried glance at one
another, turned them. There was a faint little snicking sound as the lock slid
open.
The Octavo was unchained. A faint octarine light played across its bindings.
Trymon reached out and picked it up, and none of the others objected. His
arm tingled.
He turned towards the door.
„Now to the Great Hall, brothers,“ he said, „if I may lead the way—“
And there were no objections.
He reached the door with the book tucked under his rm. It felt hot, and
somehow prickly.
At every step he expected a cry, a protest, and none came. He had to use
every ounce of control to stop himself from laughing. It was easier than he
could have imagined.
The others were halfway across the claustrophobic dungeon by the time he
was through the door, and perhaps they had noticed something in the set of his
shoulders, but it was too late because he had crossed the threshold, gripped
the handle, slammed the door, turned the key, smiled the smile.
He walked easily back along the corridor, ignoring the enraged screams of the
wizards who had just discovered how impossible it is to pass spells in a room
built to be impervious to magic.
The Octavo squirmed, but Trymon held it tightly. Now he ran, putting out of
his mind the horrible sensations under his arm as the book shape-changed into
things hairy, skeletal and spiky. His hand went numb. The faint chittering
noises he had been hearing grew in volume, and there were other sounds
behind them—leering sounds, beckoning sounds, sounds made by the voices of
unimaginable horrors that Trymon found it all too easy to imagine. As he ran
across the Great Hall and up the main staircase the shadows began to move
and reform and close in around him, and he also became aware that something
was following, something with skittery legs moving obscenely fast. Ice formed on
the walls. Doorways lunged at him as he barrelled past. Underfoot the stairs
began to feel just like a tongue…
Not for nothing had Trymon spent long hours in the University’s curious
equivalent of a gymnasium, building up mental muscle. Don’t trust the senses,
he knew, because they can be deceived. The stairs are there, somewhere—will
them to be there, summon them into being as you climb and, boy, you better
get good at it. Because this isn’t all imagination.

Great A’Tuin slowed.
With flippers the size of continents the skyturtle fought the pull of the star,
and waited. There would not be long to wait...

Rincewind sidled into the Great Hall. There were a few torches burning, and
it looked as though it had been set up for some sort of magical work. But the
ceremonial candlesticks had been overturned, the complex octograms chalked
on the floor were scuffed as if something had danced on them, and the air was
full of a smell unpleasant even by Ankh-Morpork’s broad standards. There was
a hint of sulphur to it, but that underlay something worse. It smelt like the
bottom of a pond.
There was a distant crash, and a lot of shouting.
„Looks like the gates have gone down,“ said Rincewind.
„Let’s get out of here,“ said Bethan.
„The cellars are this way,“ said Rincewind, and set off through an arch.
„Down there!“
„Yes. Would you rather stay here?“
He took a torch from its bracket on the wall and started down the steps.
After a few flights the walls stopped being panelled and were bare stone. Here
and there heavy doors had been propped open.
„I heard something,“ said Twoflower.
Rincewind listened. There did seem to be a noise coming from the depths
below. It didn’t sound frightening. It sounded like a lot of people hammering on
a door and shouting „Oi!“
„It’s not those Things from the Dungeon Dimensions you were telling us
about, is it?“ said Bethan.
„They don’t swear like that,“ said Rincewind. „Come on.“
They hurried along the dripping passages, following the screamed curses and
deep hacking coughs that were somehow reassuring; anything that wheezed
like that, the listeners decided, couldn’t possibly represent a danger.
At last they came to a door set in an alcove. It looked strong enough to hold
back the sea. There was a tiny grille.
„Hey!“ shouted Rincewind. It wasn’t very useful, but he couldn’t think of
anything better.
There was a sudden silence. Then a voice from the other side of the door
said, very slowly, „Who is out there?“
Rincewind recognised that voice. It had jerked him from daydreams into
terror on many a hot classroom afternoon, years before. It was Lemuel Panter,
who had once made it his personal business to hammer the rudiments of
scrying and summoning into young Rincewind’s head. He remembered the eyes
like gimlets in a piggy face and the voice saying „And now Mister Rincewind will
come out here and draw the relevant symbol on the board“ and the million mile
walk past the waiting class as he tried desperately to remember what the voice
had been droning on about five minutes before. Even now his throat was going
dry with terror and randomised guilt. The Dungeon Dimensions just weren’t in
it.
„Please sir, it’s me, sir, Rincewind, sir,“ he squeaked. He saw Twoflower and
Bethan staring at him, and coughed, „Yes,“ he added, in as deep a voice as he
could manage. „That’s who it is. Rincewind. Right.“
There was a susurration of whispers on the other side of the door.
„Rincewind?“
„Prince who?“
„I remember a boy who wasn’t any—“
„The spell, remember?“
„Rincewind?“
There was a pause. Then the voice said, „I suppose the key isn’t in the lock,
is it?“
„No,“ said Rincewind.
„What did he say?“
„He said no.“
„Typical of the boy.“
„Um, who is in there?“ said Rincewind.
„The Masters of Wizardry,“ said the voice, haughtily.
„Why?“
There was another pause, and then a conference of embarrassed whispers.
„We, uh, got locked in,“ said the voice, reluctantly.
„What, with the Octavo?“
Whisper, whisper.
„The Octavo, in fact, isn’t in here, in fact,“ said the voice slowly.
„Oh. But you are?“ said Rincewind, as politely as possible while grinning like
a necrophiliac in a morgue.
„That would appear to be the case.“
„Is there anything we can get you?“ said Twoflower anxiously.
„You could try getting us out.“
„Could we pick the lock?“ said Bethan.
„No use,“ said Rincewind. „Totally thief-proof.“
„I expect Cohen would have been able to,“ said Bethan loyally. „Wherever he’s
got to.“
„The Luggage would soon smash it down,“ agreed Twoflower.
„Well, that’s it then,“ said Bethan. „Let’s get out into the fresh air. Fresher
air, anyway.“ She turned to walk away.
„Hang on, hang on,“ said Rincewind. „That’s just typical, isn’t it? Old
Rincewind won’t have any ideas, will he? Oh, no, he’s just a makeweight, he is.
Kick him as you pass. Don’t rely on him, he’s—“
„All right,“ said Bethan. „Let’s hear it, then.“
„—a nonentity, a failure, just a—what?“
„How are you going to get the door open?“ said Bethan.
Rincewind looked at her with his mouth open. Then he looked at the door. It
really was very solid, and the lock had a smug air.
But he had got in, once, long ago. Rincewind the student had pushed at the
door and it had swung open, and then a moment later the Spell had jumped
into his mind and ruined his life.
„Look,“ said a voice from behind the grille, as kindly as it could manage.
„Just go and find us a wizard, there’s a good fellow.“
Rincewind took a deep breath.
„Stand back,“ he rasped.
„What?“
„Find something to hide behind,“ he barked, with his voice shaking only
slightly. „You too,“ he said to Bethan and Twoflower.
„But you can’t—“
„I mean it!“
„He means it,“ said Twoflower. „That little vein on the side of his forehead,
you know, when it throbs like that, well—“
„Shut up!“
Rincewind raised one arm uncertainly and pointed it at the door.
There was total silence.
Oh gods, he thought, what happens now?
In the blackness at the back of his mind the Spell shifted uneasily.
Rincewind tried to get in tune or whatever with the metal of the lock. If he
could sow discord amongst its atoms so that they flew apart —
Nothing happened.
He swallowed hard, and turned his attention to the wood. It was old and
nearly fossilised, and probably wouldn’t burn even if soaked in oil and dropped
into a furnace. He tried anyway, explaining to the ancient molecules that they
should try to jump up and down to keep warm—
In the strained silence of his own mind he glared at the Spell, which looked
very sheepish.
He considered the air around the door itself, how it might best be twisted into
weird shapes so that the door existed in another set of dimensions entirely.
The door sat there, defiantly solid.
Sweating, his mind beginning the endless walk up to the blackboard in front
of the grinning class, he turned desperately to the lock again. It must be made
of little bits of metal, not very heavy—
From the grille came the faintest of sounds. It was the noise of wizards
untensing themselves and shaking their heads.
Someone whispered, „I told you—“
There was a tiny grinding noise, and a click.
Rincewind’s face was a mask. Perspiration dripped off his chin.
There was another click, and the grinding of reluctant spindles. Trymon had
oiled the lock, but the oil had been soaked up by the rust and dust of years,
and the only way for a wizard to move something by magic, unless he can
harness some external movement, is to use the leverage of his mind itself.
Rincewind was trying very hard to prevent his brain being pushed out of his
ears.
The lock rattled. Metal rods flexed in pitted groves, gave in, pushed levers.
Levers clicked, notches engaged. There was a long drawn-out grinding noise
that left Rincewind on his knees.
The door swung open on pained hinges. The wizards sidled out cautiously.
Twoflower and Bethan helped Rincewind to his feet. He stood grey-faced and
swaying.
„Not bad,“ said one of the wizards, looking closely at the lock. „A little slow,
perhaps.“
„Never mind that!“ snapped Jiglad Wert. „Did you three see anyone on the
way down here?“
„No,“ said Twoflower.
„Someone has stolen the Octavo.“
Rincewind’s head jerked up. His eyes focussed.
„Who?“
„Trymon—“
Rincewind swallowed. „Tall man?“ he said. „Fair hair, looks a bit like a
ferret?“
„Now that you mention it—“
„He was in my class,“ said Rincewind. „They always said he’d go a long way.“
„He’ll go a lot further if he opens the book,“ said one of the wizards, who was
hastily rolling a cigarette in shaking fingers.
„Why?“ said Twoflower. „What will happen?“
The wizards looked at one another.
„It’s an ancient secret, handed down from mage to mage, and we can’t pass it
on to knowlessmen,“ said Wert.
„Oh, go on,“ said Twoflower.
„Oh well, it probably doesn’t matter any more. One mind can’t hold all the
spells. It’ll break down, and leave a hole.“
„What? In his head?“
„Um. No. In the fabric of the Universe,“ said Wert. „He might think he can
control it by himself, but—“
They felt the sound before they heard it. It started off in the stones as a slow
vibration, then rose suddenly to a knife-edge whine that bypassed the
eardrums and bored straight into the brain. It sounded like a human voice
singing, or chanting, or screamfng, but there were deeper and more horrible
harmonics.
The wizards went pale. Then, as one man, they turned and ran up the steps.
There were crowds outside the building. Some people were holding torches,
others had stopped in the act of piling kindling around the walls. But everyone
was staring up at the Tower of Art.
The wizards pushed their way through the unheeding bodies, and turned to
look up.
The sky was full of moons. Each one was three times bigger than the Disc’s
own moon, and each was in shadow except for a pink crescent where it caught
the light of the star.
But in front of everything the top of the Tower of Art was an incandescent
fury. Shapes could be dimly glimpsed within it, but there was nothing
reassuring about them. The sound had changed now to the wasplike buzzing,
magnified a million times.
Some of the wizards sank to their knees.
„He’s done it,“ said Wert, shaking his head. „He’s opened a pathway.“
„Are those things demons?“ said Twoflower.
„Oh, demons,“ said Wert. „Demons would be a picnic compared with what’s
trying to come through up there.“
„They’re worse than anything we can possibly imagine,“ said Panter.
„I can imagine some pretty bad things,“ said Rincewind.
„These are worse.“
„Oh.“
„And what do you propose to do about it?“ said a clear voice.
They turned. Bethan was glaring at them, arms folded.
„Pardon?“ said Wert.
„You’re wizards, aren’t you?“ she said. „Well, get on with it.“
„What, tackle that?“ said Rincewind.
„Know anyone else?“
Wert pushed forward. „Madam, I don’t think you quite understand—“
„The Dungeons Dimensions will empty into our Universe, right?“ said
Bethan.
„Well, yes—“
„We’ll all be eaten by things with tentacles for faces, right?“
„Nothing so pleasant, but—“
„And you’re just going to let it happen?“
„Listen,“ said Rincewind. „It’s all over, do you see? You can’t put the spells
back in the book, you can’t unsay what’s been said, you can’t—“
„You can try!“
Rincewind sighed, and turned to Twoflower.
He wasn’t there. Rincewind’s eyes turned inevitably towards the base of the
Tower of Art, and he was just in time to see the tourist’s plump figure, sword
inexpertly in hand, as it disappeared into a door.
Rincewind’s feet made their own decision and, from the point of view of his
head, got it entirely wrong.
The other wizards watched him go.
„Well?“ said Bethan. „He’s going.“ The wizards tried to avoid one another’s
eyes.
Eventually Wert said, „We could try, I suppose. It doesn’t seem to be
spreading.“
„But we’ve got hardly any magic to speak of,“ said one of the wizards.
„Have you got a better idea, then?“
One by one, their ceremonial robes glittering in the weird light, the wizards
turned and trudged towards the tower.
The tower was hollow inside, with the stone treads of its staircase mortared
spiral-fashion into the walls. Twoflower was already several turns up by the
time Rincewind caught him.
„Hold on,“ he said, as cheerfully as he could manage. „This sort of thing is a
job for the likes of Cohen, not you. No offence.“
„Would he do any good?“
Rincewind looked up at the actinic light that lanced down through the
distant hole at the top of the staircase.
„No,“ he admitted.
„Then I’d be as good as him, wouldn’t I?“ said Twoflower, flourishing his
looted sword.
Rincewind hopped after him, keeping as close to the wall as possible.
„You don’t understand!“ he shouted. „There’s unimaginable horrors up
there!“
„You always said I didn’t have any imagination.“
„It’s a point, yes,“ Rincewind conceded, „but—“
Twoflower sat down.
„Look,“ he said. „I’ve been looking forward to something like this ever since I
came here. I mean, this is an adventure, isn’t it? Alone against the gods, that
sort of thing?“
Rincewind opened and shut his mouth for a few seconds before the right
words managed to come out.
„Can you use a sword?“ he said weakly.
„I don’t know. I’ve never tried.“
„You’re mad!“
Twoflower looked at him with his head on one side. „You’re a fine one to
talk,“ he said. „I’m here because I don’t know any better, but what about you?“
He pointed downwards, to where the other wizards were toiling up the stairs.
„What about them?“
Blue light speared down the inside of the tower. There was a peal of thunder.
The wizards reached them, coughing horribly and fighting for breath.
„What’s the plan?“ said Rincewind.
„There isn’t one,“ said Wert.
„Right. Fine,“ said Rincewind. „I’ll leave you to get on with it, then.“
„You’ll come with us,“ said Panter.
„But I’m not even a proper wizard. You threw me out, remember?“
„I can’t think of any student less able,“ said the old wizard, „but you’re here,
and that’s the only qualification you need. Come on.“
The light flared and went out. The terrible noises died as if strangled.
Silence filled the tower; one of those heavy, pressing silences.
„It’s stopped,“ said Twoflower.
Something moved, high up against the circle of red sky. It fell slowly, turning
over and over and drifting from side to side. It hit the stairs a turn above them.
Rincewind was first to it.
It was the Octavo. But it lay on the stone as limp and lifeless as any other
book, its pages fluttering in the breeze that blew up the tower.
Twoflower panted up behind Rincewind, and looked down.
„They’re blank,“ he whispered. „Every page is completely blank.“
„Then he did it,“ said Wert. „He’s read the spells. Successfully, too. I wouldn’t
have believed it.“
„There was all that noise,“ said Rincewind doubtfully. „The light, too. Those
shapes. That didn’t sound so successful to me.“
„Oh, you always get a certain amount of extradimensional attention in any
great work of magic,“ said Panter dismissively. „It impresses people, nothing
more.“
„It looked like monsters up there,“ said Twoflower, standing closer to
Rincewind.
„Monsters? Show me some monsters!“ said Wert.
Instinctively they looked up. There was no sound. Nothing moved against the
circle of light.
„I think we should go up and, er, congratulate him,“ said Wert.
„Congratulate?“ exploded Rincewind. „He stole the Octavo! He locked you
up!“
The wizards exchanged knowing looks.
„Yes, well,“ said one of them. „When you’ve advanced in the craft, lad, you’ll
know that there are times when the important thing is success.“
„It’s getting there that matters,“ said Wert bluntly. „Not how you travel.“
They set off up the spiral.
Rincewind sat down, scowling at the darkness.
He felt a hand on his shoulder. It was Twoflower, who was holding the
Octavo.
„This is no way to treat a book,“ he said. „Look, he’s bent the spine right
back. People always do that, they’ve got no idea of how to treat them.“
„Yah,“ said Rincewind vaguely.
„Don’t worry,“ said Twoflower.
„I’m not worried, I’m just angry,“ snapped Rincewind. „Give me the bloody
thing!“
He snatched the book and snapped it open viciously.
He rummaged around in the back of his mind, where the Spell hung out.
„All right,“ he snarled. „You’ve had your fun, you’ve ruined my life, now get
back to where you belong!“
„But I—“ protested Twoflower.
„The Spell, I mean the Spell,“ said Rincewind. „Go on, get back on the page!“
He glared at the ancient parchment until his eyes crossed.
„Then I’ll say you!“ he shouted, his voice echoing up the tower. „You can join
the rest of them and much good may it do you!“
He shoved the book back into Twoflower’s arms and staggered off up the
steps.
The wizards had reached the top and disappeared from view. Rincewind
climbed after them.
„Lad, am I?“ he muttered. „When I’m advanced in the craft, eh? I just
managed to go around with one of the Great Spells in my head for years
without going totally insane, didn’t I?“ He considered the last question from all
angles. „Yes, you did,“ he reassured himself. „You didn’t start talking to trees,
even when trees started talking to you.“
His head emerged into the sultry air at the top of the tower.
He had expected to see fire-blackened stones criss-crossed with talon marks,
or perhaps something even worse.
Instead he saw the seven senior wizards standing by Trymon, who seemed
totally unscathed. He turned and smiled pleasantly at Rincewind.
„Ah, Rincewind. Come and join us, won’t you?“
So this is it, Rincewind thought. All that drama for nothing. Maybe I really
am not cut out to be a wizard, maybe —
He looked up and into Trymon’s eyes.
Perhaps it was the Spell, in its years of living in Rincewind’s head, that had
affected his eyes. Perhaps his time with Twoflower, who only saw things as they
ought to be, had taught him to see things as they are.
But what was certain was that by far the most difficult thing Rincewind did
in his whole life was look at Trymon without running in terror or being very
violently sick.
The others didn’t seem to have noticed.
They also seemed to be standing very still.
Trymon had tried to contain the seven Spells in his mind and it had broken,
and the Dungeon Dimensions had found their hole, all right. Silly to have
imagined that the Things would have come marching out of a sort of rip in the
sky, waving mandibles and tentacles. That was old-fashioned stuff, far too
risky. Even nameless terrors learned to move with the times. All they really
needed to enter was one head.
His eyes were empty holes.
Knowledge speared into Rincewind’s mind like a knife of ice. The Dungeon
Dimensions would be a playgroup compared to what the Things could do in a
universe of order. People were craving order, and order they would get—the
order of the turning screw, the immutable law of straight lines and numbers.
They would beg for the harrow…
Trymon was looking at him. Something was looking at him. And still the
others hadn’t noticed. Could he even explain it? Trymon looked the same as he
had always done, except for the eyes, and a slight sheen to his skin.
Rincewind stared, and knew that there were far worse things than Evil. All
the demons in Hell would torture your very soul, but that was precisely because
they valued souls very highly; evil would always try to steal the universe, but at
least it considered the universe worth stealing. But the grey world behind those
empty eyes would trample and destroy without even according its victims the
dignity of hatred. It wouldn’t even notice them.
Trymon held out his hand.
„The eighth spell,“ he said. „Give it to me.“
Rincewind backed away.
„This is disobedience, Rincewind. I am your superior, after all. In fact, I have
been voted the supreme head of all the Orders.“
„Really?“ said Rincewind hoarsely. He looked at the other wizards. They were
immobile, like statues.
„Oh yes,“ said Trymon pleasantly. „Quite without prompting, too. Very
democratic.“
„I preferred tradition,“ said Rincewind. „That way even the dead get the vote.“
„You will give me the spell voluntarily,“ said Trymon. „Do I have to show you
what I will do otherwise? And in the end you will still yield it. You will scream
for the opportunity to give it to me.“
If it stops anywhere, it stops here, thought Rincewind.
„You’ll have to take it,“ he said. „I won’t give it to you.“
„I remember you,“ said Trymon. „Not much good as a student, as I recall. You
never really trusted magic, you kept on saying there should be a better way to
run a universe. Well, you’ll see. I have plans. We can—“
„Not we,“ said Rincewind firmly.
„Give me the Spell!“
„Try and take it,“ said Rincewind, backing away. „I don’t think you can.“
„Oh?“
Rincewind jumped aside as octarine fire flashed from Trymon’s fingers and
left a bubbling rock puddle on the stones.
He could sense the Spell lurking in the back of his mind. He could sense its
fear.
In the silent caverns of his head he reached out for it. It retreated in
astonishment, like a dog faced with a maddened sheep. He followed, stamping
angrily through the disused lots and inner-city disaster areas of his
subconscious, until he found it cowering behind a heap of condemned
memories. It roared silent defiance at him, but Rincewind wasn’t having any.
Is this it? he shouted at it. When it’s time for the showdown, you go and
hide? You’re frightened?
The Spell said, that’s nonsense, you can’t possibly believe that, I’m one of the
Eight Spells. But Rincewind advanced on it angrily, shouting, Maybe, but the
fact is I do believe it and you’d better remember whose head you’re in, right? I
can believe anything I like in here!
Rincewind jumped aside again as another bolt of fire lanced through the hot
night. Trymon grinned, and made another complicated motion with his hands.
Pressure gripped Rincewind. Every inch of his skin felt as though it was
being used as an anvil. He flopped onto his knees.
„There are much worse things,“ said Trymon pleasantly. „I can make your
flesh burn on the bones, or fill your body with ants. I have the power to—“
„I have a sword, you know.“
The voice was squeaky with defiance.
Rincewind raised his head. Through a purple haze of pain he saw Twoflower
standing behind Trymon, holding a sword in exactly the wrong way.
Trymon laughed, and flexed his fingers. For a moment his attention was
diverted.
Rincewind was angry. He was angry at the Spell, at the world, at the
unfairness of everything, at the fact that he hadn’t had much sleep lately, at the
fact that he wasn’t thinking quite straight. But most of all he was angry with
Trymon, standing there full of the magic Rincewind had always wanted but had
never achieved, and doing nothing worthwhile with it.
He sprang, striking Trymon in the stomach with his head and flinging his
arms around him in desperation. Twoflower was knocked aside as they slid
along the stones.
Trymon snarled, and got out the first syllable of a spell before Rincewind’s
wildly flailing elbow caught him in the neck. A blast of randomised magic
singed Rincewind’s hair.
Rincewind fought as he always fought, without skill or fairness or tactics but
with a great deal of whirlwind effort. The strategy was to prevent an opponent
getting enough time to realise that in fact Rincewind wasn’t a very good or
strong fighter, and it often worked.
It was working now, because Trymon had spent rather too much time
reading ancient manuscripts and not getting enough healthy exercise and
vitamins. He managed to get several blows in, which Rincewind was far too high
on rage to notice, but he only used his hands while Rincewind employed knees,
feet and teeth as well.
He was, in fact, winning.
This came as a shock.
It came as more of a shock when, as he knelt on Trymon’s chest hitting him
repeatedly about the head, the other man’s face changed. The skin crawled and
waved like something seen through a heat haze, and Trymon spoke.
„Help me!“
For a moment his eyes looked up at Rincewind in fear, pain and entreaty.
Then they weren’t eyes at all, but multi-faceted things on a head that could be
called a head only by stretching the definition to its limits. Tentacles and sawedged legs and talons unfolded to rip Rincewind’s rather sparse flesh from his
body.
Twoflower, the tower and the red sky all vanished. Time ran slowly, and
stopped.
Rincewind bit hard on a tentacle that was trying to pull his face off. As it
uncoiled in agony he thrust out a hand and felt it break something hot and
squishy.
They were watching. He turned his head, and saw that now he was fighting
on the floor of an enormous amphitheatre. On each side tier upon tier of
creatures stared down at him, creatures with bodies and faces that appeared to
have been made by crossbreeding nightmares. He caught a glimpse of even
worse things behind him, huge shadows that stretched into the overcast sky,
before the Trymon-monster lunged at him with a barbed sting the size of a
spear.
Rincewind dodged sideways, and then swung around with both hands
clasped together into one fist that caught the thing in the stomach, or possibly
the thorax, with a blow that ended in the satisfying crunch of chitin.
He plunged forward, fighting now out of terror of what would happen if he
stopped. The ghostly arena was full of the cluttering of the Dungeon creatures,
a wall of rustling sound that hammered at his ears as he struggled. He
imagined that sound filling the Disc, and he flung blow after blow to save the
world of men, to preserve the little circle of firelight in the dark night of chaos
and to lose the gap through which the nightmare was advancing. But mainly he
hit it to stop it hitting back.
Claws or talons drew white-hotlines across his back, and something bit his
shoulder, but he found a nest of soft tubes among all the hairs and scales and
squeezed it hard.
An arm barbed with spikes swept him away, and he rolled over in the gritty
black dust.
Instinctively he curled into a ball, but nothing happened. Instead of the
onslaught of fury he expected he opened his eyes to see the creature limping
away from him, various liquids leaking from it.
It was the first time anything had ever run away from Rincewind.
He dived after it, caught a scaly leg, and wrenched. The creature chittered at
him and flailed desperately with such appendages as were still working, but
Rincewind’s grip was unshakeable. He pulled himself up and planted one last
satisfying blow into its remaining eye. It screamed, and ran. And there was only
one place for it to run to.
The tower and the red sky came back with the click of restored time.
As soon as he felt the press of the flagstones under his feet Rincewind flung
his weight to one side and rolled on his back with the frantic creature at arms’
length.
„Now!“ he yelled.
„Now what?“ said Twoflower. „Oh. Yes. Right!“
He swung the sword inexpertly but with some force, missing Rincewind by
inches and burying it deeply in the Thing. There was a shrill buzzing, as though
he had smashed a wasp’s nest, and the melee of arms and legs and tentacles
flailed in agony. It rolled again, screaming and thrashing at the flagstones, and
then it was thrashing at nothing at all because it had rolled over the edge of the
stairway, taking Rincewind with it.
There was a squelching noise as it bounced off a few of the stone steps, and
then a distant and disappearing shriek as it tumbled the depth of the tower.
Finally there was a dull explosion and a flash of octarine light.
Then Twoflower was alone on the top of the tower—alone, that is, except for
seven wizards who still seemed to be frozen to the spot.
He sat bewildered as seven fireballs rose out of the blackness and plunged
into the discarded Octavo, which suddenly looked its old self and far more
interesting.
„Oh dear,“ he said. „I suppose they’re the Spells.“
„Twoflower.“ The voice was hollow and echoing, and just recognisable as
Rincewind’s.
Twoflower stopped with his hand halfway to the book.
„Yes?“ he said. „Is that—is that you, Rincewind?“
„Yes,“ said the voice, resonant with the tones of the grave. „And there is
something very important I want you to do for me, Twoflower.“
Twoflower looked around. He pulled himself together. So the fate of the Disc
would depend on him, after all.
„I’m ready,“ he said, his voice vibrating with pride. „What is it you want me to
do?“
„First, I want you to listen very carefully,“ said Rincewind’s disembodied voice
patiently.
„I’m listening.“
„It’s very important that when I tell you what to do you don’t say ‹What do
you mean?› or argue or anything, understand?“
Twoflower stood to attention. At least, his rnind stood to attention, his body
really couldn’t. He stuck out several of his chins.
„I’m ready,“ he said.
„Good. Now, what I want you to do is—“
„Yes?“
Rincewind’s voice rose from the depths of the stairwell.
„I want you to come and help me up before I lose my grip on this stone,“ it
said.
Twoflower opened his mouth, then shut it quickly. He ran to the square hole
and peered down. By the ruddy light of the star he could just make out
Rincewind’s eyes looking up at him.
Twoflower lay down on his stomach and reached out. Rincewind’s hand
gripped his wrist in the sort of grip that told Twoflower that if he, Rincewind,
wasn’t pulled up then there was no possible way in which that grip was going to
be relaxed.
„I’m glad you’re alive,“ he said.
„Good. So am I,“ said Rincewind.
He hung around in the darkness for a bit. After the past few minutes it was
almost enjoyable, but only almost.
„Pull me up, then,“ he hinted.
„I think that might be sort of difficult,“ grunted Twoflower. „I don’t actually
think I can do it, in fact.“
„What are you holding on to, then?“
„You.“
„I mean besides me.“
„What do you mean, besides you?“ said Twoflower.
Rincewind said a word.
„Well, look,“ said Twoflower. „The steps go around in a spiral, right? If I sort
of swing you and then you let go—“
„If you’re going to suggest I try dropping twenty feet down a pitch dark tower
in the hope of hitting a couple of greasy little steps which might not even still be
there, you can forget it,“ said Rincewind sharply.
„There is an alternative, then.“
„Out with it, man.“
„You could drop five hundred feet down a pitch black tower and hit stones
which certainly are there,“ said Twoflower.
Dead silence came from below him. Then Rincewind said, accusingly, „That
was sarcasm.“
„I thought it was just stating the obvious.“
Rincewind grunted.
„I suppose you couldn’t do some magic—“ Twoflower began.
„No.“
„Just a thought.“
There was a flare of light far below, and a confused shouting, and then more
lights, more shouting, and a line of torches starting up the long spiral.
„There’s some people coming up the stairs,“ said Twoflower, always keen to
inform.
„I hope they’re running,“ said Rincewind. „I can’t feel my arm.“
„You’re lucky,“ said Twoflower. „I can feel mine.“
The leading torch stopped its climb and a voice rang out, filling the hollow
tower with indecipherable echoes.
„I think,“ said Twoflower, aware that he was gradually sliding further over the
hole, „that was someone telling us to hold on.“
Rincewind said another word.
Then he said, in a lower and more urgent tone, „Actually, I don’t think I can
hang on any longer.“
„Try.“
„It’s no good, I can feel my hand slipping!“
Twoflower sighed. It was time for harsh measures. „All right, then,“ he said.
„Drop, then. See if I care.“
„What?“ said Rincewind, so astonished he forgot to let go.
„Go on, die. Take the easy way out.“
„Easy?“
„All you have to do is plummet screaming through the air and break every
bone in your body,“ said Twoflower. „Anybody can do it. Go on. I wouldn’t want
you to think that perhaps you ought to stay alive because we need you to say
the Spells and save the Disc. Oh, no. Who cares if we all get burned up? Go on,
just think of yourself. Drop.“
There was a long, embarrassed silence.
„I don’t know why it is,“ said Rincewind eventually, in a voice rather louder
than necessary, „but ever since I met you I seem to have spent a lot of time
hanging by my fingers over certain depth, have you noticed?“
„Death,“ corrected Twoflower.
„Death what?“ said Rincewind.
„Certain death,“ said Twoflower helpfully, trying to ignore the slow but
inexorable slide of his body across the flagstones. „Hanging over certain death.
You don’t like heights.“
„Heights I don’t mind,“ said Rincewind’s voice from the darkness. „Heights I
can live with. It’s depths that are occupying my attention at the moment. Do
you know what I’m going to do when we get out of this?“
„No?“ said Twoflower, wedging his toes into a gap in the flagstones and trying
to make himself immobile by sheer force of will.
„I’m going to build a house in the flattest country I can find and it’s only
going to have a ground floor and I’m not even going to wear sandals with thick
soles—“
The leading torch came around the last turn of the spiral and Twoflower
looked down on the grinning face of Cohen. Behind him, still hopping
awkwardly up the stones, he could make out the reassuring bulk of the
Luggage.
„Everything all right?“ said Cohen. „Can I do anything?“
Rincewind took a deep breath.
Twoflower recognised the signs. Rincewind was about to say something like,
„Yes, I’ve got this itch on the back of my neck, you couldn’t scratch it, could
you, on your way past?“ or „No, I enjoy hanging over bottomless drops“ and he
decided he couldn’t possibly face that. He spoke very quickly.
„Pull Rincewind back onto the stairs,“ he snapped. Rincewind deflated in
mid-snarl.
Cohen caught him around the waist and jerked him unceremoniously onto
the stones.
„Nasty mess down on the floor down there,“ he said conversationally. „Who
was it?“
„Did it—“ Rincewind swallowed, „did it have—you know—tentacles and
things?“
„No,“ said Cohen. „Just the normal bits. Spread out a bit, of course.“
Rincewind looked at Twoflower, who shook his head.
„Just a wizard who let things get on top of him,“ he said.
Unsteadily, with his arms screaming at him, Rincewind let himself be helped
back onto the roof of the tower.
„How did you get here?“ he added.
Cohen pointed to the Luggage, which had trotted over to Twoflower and
opened its lid like a dog that knows it’s been bad and is hoping that a quick
display of affection may avert the rolled-up newspaper of authority.
„Bumpy but fast,“ he said admiringly. „I’ll tell you this, no-one tries to stop
you.“
Rincewind looked up at the sky. It was indeed full of moons, huge cratered
discs now ten times bigger than the Disc’s tiny satellite. He looked at them
without much interest. He felt washed out and stretched well beyond breaking
point, as fragile as ancient elastic.
He noticed that Twoflower was trying to set up his picture box.
Cohen was looking at the seven senior wizards.
„Funny place to put statues,“ he said. „No-one can see them. Mind you, I
can’t say they’re up to much. Very poor work.“
Rincewind staggered across and tapped Wert gingerly on the chest. He was
solid stone.
This is it, he thought. I just want to go home.
Hang on, I am home. More or less. So I just want a good sleep, and perhaps
it will all be better in the morning.
His gaze fell on the Octavo, which was outlined in tiny flashes of octarine fire.
Oh yes, he thought.
He picked it up and thumbed idly through its pages. They were thick with
complex and swirling script that changed and reformed even as he looked at it.
It seemed undecided as to what it should be; one moment it was an orderly,
matter-of-fact printing; the next a series of angular runes. Then it would be
curly Kythian spellscript. Then it would be pictograms in some ancient, evil and
forgotten writing that seemed to consist exclusively of unpleasant reptilian
beings doing complicated and painful things to one another…
The last page was empty. Rincewind sighed, and looked in the back of his
mind. The Spell looked back.
He had dreamed of this moment, how he would finally evict the Spell and
take vacant possession of his own head and learn all those lesser spells which
had, up until hen, been too frightened to stay in his mind. Somehow he had
expected it to be far more exciting.
Instead, in utter exhaustion and in a mood to brook no argument, he stared
coldly at the Spell and jerked a metaphorical thumb over his shoulder. You.
Out.
It looked for a moment as though the Spell was going to argue, but it wisely
thought better of it.
There was a tingling sensation, a blue flash behind his eyes, and a sudden
feeling of emptiness.
When he looked down at the page it was full of words. They were runes
again. He was glad about that, the reptilian pictures were not only unspeakable
but probably unpronounceable too, and reminded him of things he would have
great difficulty in forgetting.
He looked blankly at the book while Twoflower bustled around unheeded and
Cohen tried in vain to lever the rings off the stone wizards.
He had to do something, he reminded himself. What was it, now?
He opened the book at the first page and began to read, his lips moving and
his forefinger tracing the outline of each letter. As he mumbled each word it
appeared soundlessly in the air beside him, in bright colours that streamed
away in the night wind. He turned over the page.
Other people were coming up the steps now—star people, citizens, even some
of the Patrician’s personal guard. A couple of star people made a half-hearted
attempt to approach Rincewind, who was surrounded now by a rainbow swirl of
letters and took absolutely no notice of them, but Cohen drew his sword and
looked nonchalantly at them and they thought better of it.
Silence spread out from Rincewind’s bent form like ripples in a puddle. It
cascaded down the tower and spread out through the milling crowds below,
flowed over the walls, gushed darkly through the city, and engulfed the lands
beyond.
The bulk of the star loomed silently over the Disc. In the sky around it the
new moons turned slowly and noiselessly.
The only sound was Rincewind’s hoarse whispering as he turned page after
page.
„Isn’t this exciting!“ said Twoflower. Cohen, who was rolling a cigarette from
the tarry remnants of its ancestors, looked at him blankly, paper halfway to his
lips.
„Isn’t what exciting?“ he said.
„All this magic!“
„It’s only lights,“ said Cohen critically. „He hasn’t even produced doves out of
his sleeves.“
„Yes, but can’t you sense the occult potentiality?“ said Twoflower.
Cohen produced a big yellow match from somewhere in his tobacco bag,
looked at Wert for a moment, and with great deliberation struck the match on
his fossilised nose.
„Look,“ he said to Twoflower, as kindly as he could manage. „What do you
expect? I’ve been around a long time, I’ve seen the whole magical thing, and I
can tell you that if you go around with your jaw dropping all the time people hit
it. Anyway, wizard’s die just like anyone else when you stick a—“
There was a loud snap as Rincewind shut the book. He stood up, and looked
around.
What happened next was this:
Nothing.
It took a little while for people to realise it. Everyone had ducked
instinctively, waiting for the explosion of white light or scintillating fireball or, in
the case of Cohen, who had fairly low expectations, a few white pigeons,
possibly a slightly crumpled rabbit.
It wasn’t even an interesting nothing. Sometimes things can fail to happen in
quite impressive ways, but as far as non-events went this one just couldn’t
compete.
„Is that it?“ said Cohen. There was a general muttering from the crowd, and
several of the star people were looking angrily at Rincewind.
The wizard stared wearily at Cohen.
„I suppose so,“ he said.
„But nothing’s happened.“
Rincewind looked blankly at the Octavo.
„Maybe it has a subtle effect?“ he said hopefully. „After all, we don’t know
exactly what is supposed to happen.“
„We knew it!“ shouted one of the star people. „Magic doesn’t work! It’s all
illusion!“
A stone looped over the roof and hit Rincewind on the shoulder.
„Yeah,“ said another star person. „Let’s get him!“
„Let’s throw him off the tower!“
„Yeah, let’s get him and throw him off the tower!“
The crowd surged forward. Twoflower held up his hands.
„I’m sure there’s just been a slight mistake—“ he began, before his legs were
kicked from underneath him.
„Oh bugger,“ said Cohen, dropping his dogend and grinding it under a
sandalled foot. He drew his sword and looked around for the Luggage.
It hadn’t rushed to Twoflower’s aid. It was standing in front of Rincewind,
who was clutching the Octavo to his chest like a hot-water bottle and looking
frantic.
A star man lunged at him. The Luggage raised its lid threateningly.
„I know why it hasn’t worked,“ said a voice from the back of the crowd. It was
Bethan.
„Oh yeah?“ said the nearest citizen. „And why should we listen to you?“
A mere fraction of a second later Cohen’s sword was pressed against his
neck.
„On the other hand,“ said the man evenly, „perhaps we should pay attention
to what this young lady has got to say.“
As Cohen swung around slowly with his sword at the ready Bethan stepped
forward and pointed to the swirling shapes of the spells, which still hung in the
air around Rincewind.
„That one can’t be right,“ she said, indicating a smudge of dirty brown amidst
the pulsing, brightly coloured flares.
„You must have mispronounced a word. Let’s have a look.“
Rincewind passed her the Octavo without a word.
She opened it and peered the pages.
„What funny writing,“ she said. „It keeps changing. What’s that crocodile
thing doing to the octopus?“
Rincewind looked over her shoulder and, without thinking, told her. She was
silent for a moment.
„Oh,“ she said levelly. „I didn’t know crocodiles could do that.“
„It’s just ancient picture writing,“ said Rincewind hurriedly. „It’ll change if
you wait. The Spells can appear in every known language.“
„Can you remember what you said when the wrong colour appeared?“
Rincewind ran a finger down the page.
„There, I think. Where the two-headed lizard is doing—whatever it’s doing.“
Twoflower appeared at her other shoulder. The Spell flowed into another
script.
„I can’t even pronounce it,“ said Bethan. „Squiggle, squiggle, dot, dash.“
„That’s Cupumuguk snow runes,“ said Rincewind. „I think it should be
pronounced zph.“
„It didn’t work, though. How about sph?“
They looked at the word. It remained resolutely off-colour.
„Or sff?“ said Bethan.
„It might be tsff,“ said Rincewind doubtfully. If anything the colour became a
dirtier shade of brown.
„How about zsff?“ said Twoflower.
„Don’t be silly,“ said Rincewind. „With snow runes the—“
Bethan elbowed him in the stomach and pointed.
The brown shape in the air was now a brilliant red.
The book trembled in her hands. Rincewind grabbed her around the waist,
snatched Twoflower by the collar, and jumped backwards.
Bethan lost her grip on the Octavo, which tumbled towards the floor. And
didn’t reach it.
The air around the Octavo glowed. It rose slowly, flapping its pages like
wings.
Then there was a plangent, sweet twanging noise and it seemed to explode in
a complicated silent flower of light which rushed outwards, faded, and was
gone.
But something was happening much further up in the sky…
Down in the geological depths of Great A’Tuin’s huge brain new thoughts
surged along neural pathways the size of arterial roads. It was impossible for a
sky turtle to change its expression, but in some indefinable way its scaly,
meteor-pocked face looked quite expectant.
It was staring fixedly at the eight spheres endlessly orbiting around the star,
on the very beaches of space.
The spheres were cracking.
Huge segments of rock broke away and began the long spiral down to the
star. The sky filled with glittering shards.
From the wreakage of one hollow shell a very small sky turtle paddled its way
into the red light. It was barely bigger than an asteroid, its shell still shiny with
molten yolk.
There were four small world-elephant calves on there, too. And on their backs
was a discworld, tiny as yet, covered in smoke and volcanoes.
Great A’Tuin waited until all eight baby turtles had freed themselves from
their shells and were treading space and looking bewildered. Then, carefully, so
as not to dislodge anything, the old turtle turned and with considerable relief
set out on the long swim to the blessedly cool, bottomless depths of space.
The young turtles followed, orbiting their parent.
Twoflower stared raptly at the display overhead. He probably had the best
view of anyone on the Disc.
Then a terrible thought occurred to him.
„Where’s the picture box?“ he asked urgently.
„What?“ said Rincewind, eyes fixed on the sky.
„The picture box,“ said Twoflower. „I must get a picture of this!“
„Can’t you just remember it?“ said Bethan, not looking at him.
„I might forget.“
„I won’t ever forget,“ she said. „It’s the most beautiful thing I’ve ever seen.“
„Much better than pigeons and billiard balls,“ agreed Cohen. „I’ll give you
that, Rincewind. How’s it done?“
„I dunno,“ said Rincewind.
„The star’s getting smaller,“ said Bethan.
Rincewind was vaguely aware of Twoflower’s voice arguing with the demon
who lived in the box and painted the pictures. It was quite a technical
argument, about field depths and whether or not the demon still had enough
red paint.
It should be pointed out that currently Great A’Tuin was very pleased and
contented, and feelings like that in a brain the size of several large cities are
bound to radiate out. In fact most people on the Disc were currently in a state
of mind normally achievable only by a lifetime of dedicated meditation or about
thirty seconds of illegal herbage.
That’s old Twoflower, Rincewind thought. It’s not that he doesn’t appreciate
beauty, he just appreciates it in his own way. I mean, if a poet sees a daffodil he
stares at it and writes a long poem about it, but Twoflower wanders off to find a
book on botany. And treads on it. It’s right what Cohen said. He just looks at
things, but nothing he looks at is ever the same again. Including me, I suspect.
The Disc’s own sun rose. The star was already dwindling, and it wasn’t quite
so much competition. Good reliable Disc light poured across the enraptured
landscape, like a sea of gold.
Or, as the more reliable observers generally held, like golden syrup.
That is a nice dramatic ending, but life doesn’t work like that and there were
other things that had to happen.
There was the Octavo, for example.
As the sunlight hit it the book snapped shut and started to fall back to the
tower. And many of the observers realised that dropping towards them was the
single most magical thing on the Discworld.
The feeling of bliss and brotherhood evaporated along with the morning dew.
Rincewind and Twoflower were elbowed aside as the crowd surged forward,
struggling and trying to climb up one another, hands outstretched.
The Octavo dropped into the centre of the shouting mass. There was a snap.
A decisive snap, the sort of snap made by a lid that doesn’t intend to be
opening in a hurry.
Rincewind peered between someone’s legs at Twoflower.
„Do you know what I think’s going to happen?“ he said, grinning.
„What?“
„I think that when you open the Luggage there’s just going to be your laundry
in there, that’s what I think.“
„Oh dear.“
„I think the Octavo knows how to look after itself. Best place for it, really.“
„I suppose so. You know, sometimes I get the feeling that the Luggage knows
exactly what it’s doing.“
„I know what you mean.“
They crawled to the edge of the milling crowd, stood up, dusted themselves
off and headed for the steps. No-one paid them any attention.
„What are they doing now?“ said Twoflower, trying to see over the heads of
the throng.
„It looks as though they’re trying to lever it open,“ said Rincewind.
There was a snap and a scream.
„I think the Luggage rather enjoys the attention,“ said Twoflower, as they
began their cautious descent.
„Yes, it probably does it good to get out and meet people,“ said Rincewind,
„and now I think it’d do me good to go and order a couple of drinks.“
„Good idea,“ said Twoflower. „I’ll have a couple of drinks too.’

It was nearly noon when Twoflower awoke. He couldn’t remember why he
was in a hayloft, or why he was wearing someone else’s coat, but he did wake
up with one idea right in the forefront of his mind.
He decided it was vitally important to tell Rincewind about it.
He fell out of the hay and landed on the Luggage.
„Oh, you’re here, are you?“ he said. „I hope you’re ashamed of yourself.“
The Luggage looked bewildered.
„Anyway, I want to comb my hair. Open up,“ said Twoflower.
The Luggage obligingly flipped its lid. Twoflower rooted around among the
bags and boxes inside until he found a comb and mirror and repaired some of
the damage of the night. Then he looked hard at the Luggage.
„I suppose you wouldn’t like to tell me what you’ve done with the Octavo?“
The Luggage’s expression could only be described as wooden.
„All right. Come on, then.“
Twoflower stepped out into the sunlight, which was slightly too bright for his
current tastes, and wandered aimlessly along the street. Everything seemed
fresh and new, even the smells, but there didn’t seem to be many people up yet.
It had been a long night.
He found Rincewind at the foot of the Tower of Art, supervising a team of
workmen who had rigged up a gantry of sorts on the roof and were lowering the
stone wizards to the ground. He seemed to be assisted by a monkey, but
Twoflower was in no mood to be surprised at anything.
„Will they be able to be turned back?“ he said.
Rincewind looked around. „What? Oh, it’s you. No, probably not. I’m afraid
they dropped poor old Wert, anyway. Five hundred feet onto cobbles.“
„Will you be able to do anything about that?“
„Make a nice rockery.“ Rincewind turned and waved at the workmen.
„You’re very cheerful,“ said Twoflower, a shade reproachfully. „Didn’t you go
to bed?“
„Funny thing, I couldn’t sleep,“ said Rincewind. „I came out for a breath of
fresh air, and no-one seemed to have any idea what to do, so I just sort of got
people together,“ he indicated the librarian, who tried to hold his hand, „and
started organising things. Nice day, isn’t it? Air like wine.“
„Rincewind, I’ve decided that—“
„You know, I think I might re-enroll,“ said Rincewind cheerfully. „I think I
could really make a go of things this time. I can really see myself getting to
grips with magic and graduating really well. They do say if it’s summa cum
laude, then the living is easy—“
„Good, because—“
„There’s plenty of room at the top, too, now all the big boys will be doing
doorstop duty, and—“
„I’m going home.“
„—a sharp lad with a bit of experience of the world could—what?“
„Oook?“
„I said I’m going home,“ repeated Twoflower, making polite little attempts to
shake off the librarian, who was trying to pick lice off him.
„What home?“ said Rincewind, astonished.
„Home home. My home. Where I live,“ Twoflower explained sheepishly. „Back
across the sea. You know.
„Where I came from. Will you please stop doing that?“
„Oh.“
„Oook?“
There was a pause. Then Twoflower said, „You see, last night it occurred to
me, I thought, well, the thing is, all this travelling and seeing things is fine but
there’s also a lot of fun to be had from having been. You know, sticking all your
pictures in a book and remembering things.“
„There is?“
„Oook?“
„Oh, yes. The important thing about having lots of things to remember is that
you’ve got to go somewhere afterwards where you can remember them, you see?
You’ve got to stop. You haven’t really been anywhere until you’ve got back
home. I think that’s what I mean.“
Rincewind ran the sentence across his mind again. It didn’t seem any better
second time around.
„Oh,“ he said again. „Well, good. If that’s the way you look at it. When are
you going, then?“
„Today, I think. There’s bound to be a ship going part of the way.“
„I expect so,“ said Rincewind awkwardly. He looked at his feet. He looked at
the sky. He cleared his throat.
„We’ve been through some times together, eh?“ said Twoflower, nudging him
in the ribs.
„Yeah,“ said Rincewind, contorting his face into something like a grin.
„You’re not upset, are you?“
„Who, me?“ said Rincewind. „Gosh, no. Hundred and one things to do.“
„That’s all right, then. Listen, let’s go and have breakfast and then we can go
down to the docks.“
Rincewind nodded dismally, turned to his assistant, and took a banana out
of his pocket.
„You’ve got the hang of it now, you take over,“ he muttered.
„Oook.“
In fact there wasn’t any ship going anywhere near the Agatean Empire, but
that was an academic point because Twoflower simply counted gold pieces into
the hand of the first captain with a halfway clean ship until the man suddenly
saw the merits of changing his plans.
Rincewind waited on the quayside until Twoflower had finished paying the
man about forty times more than his ship was worth.
„That’s settled, then,“ said Twoflower. „He’ll drop me at the Brown Islands
and I can easily get a ship from there.“
„Great,“ said Rincewind.
Twoflower looked thoughtful for a moment. Then he opened the Luggage and
pulled out a bag of gold.
„Have you seen Cohen and Bethan?“ he said.
„I think they went off to get married,“ said Rincewind. „I heard Bethan say it
was now or never.“
„Well, when you see them give them this,“ said Twoflower, handing him the
bag. „I know it’s expensive, setting up home for the first time.“
Twoflower had never fully understood the gulf in the exchange rate. The bag
could quite easily set Cohen up with a small kingdom.
„I’ll hand it over first chance I get,“ he said, and to his own surprise realised
that he meant it.
„Good. I’ve thought about something to give you, too.“
„Oh, there’s no—“
Twoflower rummaged in the Luggage and produced a large sack. He began to
fill it with clothes and money and the picture box until finally the Luggage was
completely empty. The last thing he put in was his souvenir musical cigarette
box with the shell-encrusted lid, carefully wrapped in soft paper.
„It’s all yours,“ he said, shutting the Luggage’s lid. „I shan’t really need it any
more, and it won’t fit on my wardrobe anyway.“
„What?“
„Don’t you want it?“
„Well, I—of course, but—it’s yours. It follows you, not me.“
„Luggage,“ said Twoflower, „this is Rincewind. You’re his, right?“
The Luggage slowly extended its legs, turned very deliberately and looked at
Rincewind.
„I don’t think it belongs to anyone but itself, really,“ said Twoflower.
„Yes,“ said Rincewind uncertainly.
„Well, that’s about it, then,“ said Twoflower. He held out his hand.
„Goodbye, Rincewind. I’ll send you a postcard when I get home. Or
something.“
„Yes. Any time you’re passing, there’s bound to be someone here who knows
where I am.“
„Yes. Well. That’s it, then.“
„That’s it, right enough.“
„Right.“
„Yep.“
Twoflower walked up the gangplank, which the impatient crew hauled up
behind him.
The rowing drum started its beat and the ship was propelled slowly out onto
the turbid waters of the Ankh, now back to their old level, where it caught the
tide and turned towards the open sea.
Rincewind watched it until it was a dot. Then he looked down at the Luggage.
It stared back at him.
„Look,“ he said. „Go away. I’m giving you to yourself, do you understand?“
He turned his back on it and stalked away. After a few seconds he was aware
of the little footsteps behind him. He spun around.
„I said I don’t want you!“ he snapped, and gave it a kick.
The Luggage sagged. Rincewind stalked away.
After he had gone a few yards he stopped and listened. There was no sound.
When he turned the Luggage was where he had left it. It looked sort of huddled.
Rincewind hought for a while.
„All right, then,“ he said. „Come on.“
He turned his back and strode off to the University. After a few minutes the
Luggage appeared to make up its mind, extended its legs again and padded
after him. It didn’t see that it had a lot of choice.
They headed along the quay and into the city, two dots on a dwindling
landscape which, as the perspective broadened, included a tiny ship starting
out across a wide green sea that was but a part of a bright circling ocean on a
cloud-swirled Disc on the back of four giant elephants that themselves stood on
the shell of an enormous turtle.
Which soon became a glint among the stars, and disappeared.

(1) They won’t be described, since even the pretty ones looked like the offspring of an octopus
and a bicycle. It is well known that things from undesirable universes are always seeking an
entrance into this one, which is the psychic equivalent of handy for the buses and closer to the
shops.
(2) A Thaum is the basic unit of magical strength. It has been universally established as the
amount of magic needed to create one small white pigeon or three normal sized billiard balls.
(3) An interesting metaphor. To nocturnal trolls, of course, the dawn of time lies in the future.
(4) Not precisely, of course. Trees didn’t burst into flame, people didn’t suddenly become very
rich and extremely dead, and the seas didn’t flash into steam. A better simile, in fact, would be
›not like molten gold‹.
(5) No-one knows why, but all the most truly mysterious and magical items are bought from
shops that appear and, after a trading life even briefer than a double-glazing company, vanish
like smoke. There had been various attempts to explain this, all of which don’t fully account for
the observed facts. These shops turn up anywhere in the universe, and their immediate nonexistence in any particular city can normally be deduced from crowds of people wandering the
streets clutching defunct magical items, ornate guarantee cards, and looking very suspiciously
at brick walls.
  Terry Pratchett
Hogfather
A Novel of Discworld®
To Everyone Who Hoped It Might Be True
Everything starts somewhere, although many physicists disagree.
But people have always been dimly aware of the problem with the start of
things. They wonder aloud how the snowplow driver gets to work, or how
the makers of dictionaries look up the spellings of the words. Yet there
is the constant desire to find some point in the twisting, knotting,
raveling nets of space-time on which a metaphorical finger can be put to
indicate that here, here, is the point where it all began…
Something began when the Guild of Assassins enrolled Mister Teatime, who
saw things differently from other people, and one of the ways that he saw
things differently from other people was in seeing other people as things
(later, Lord Downey of the Guild said, “We took pity on him because he’d
lost both parents at an early age. I think that, on reflection, we should
have wondered a bit more about that”).
But it was much earlier even than that when most people forgot that the
very oldest stories are, sooner or later, about blood. Later on they took
the blood out to make the stories more acceptable to children, or at
least to the people who had to read them to children rather than the
children themselves (who, on the whole, are quite keen on blood provided
it’s being shed by the deserving*), and then wondered where the stories
went.
And earlier still when something in the darkness of the deepest caves and
gloomiest forests thought: what are they, these creatures? I will observe
them…
And much, much earlier than that, when the Discworld was formed, drifting
onward through space atop four elephants on the shell of the giant turtle,
Great A’Tuin.
Possibly, as it moves, it gets tangled like a blind man in a cobwebbed
house in those highly specialized little space-time strands that try to
breed in every history they encounter, stretching them and breaking them
and tugging them into new shapes.
Or possibly not, of course. The philosopher Didactylos has summed up an
alternative hypothesis as “Things just happen. What the hell.”
The senior wizards of Unseen University stood and looked at the door.
There was no doubt that whoever had shut it wanted it to stay shut.
Dozens of nails secured it to the door frame. Planks had been nailed
right across. And finally it had, up until this morning, been hidden by a
bookcase that had been put in front of it.
“And there’s the sign, Ridcully,” said the Dean. “You have read it, I
assume. You know? The sign which says ‘Do not, under any circumstances,
open this door’?”
“Of course I’ve read it,” said Ridcully. “Why d’yer think I want it
opened?”
“Er…why?” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes.
“To see why they wanted it shut, of course.”*
He gestured to Modo, the University’s gardener and odd-job dwarf, who was
standing by with a crowbar.
“Go to it, lad.”
The gardener saluted. “Right you are, sir.”
Against a background of splintering timber, Ridcully went on: “It says on
the plans that this was a bathroom. There’s nothing frightening about a
bathroom, for gods’ sake. I want a bathroom. I’m fed up with sluicing
down with you fellows. It’s unhygienic. You can catch stuff. My father
told me that. Where you get lots of people bathing together, the Verruca
Gnome is running around with his little sack.”
“Is that like the Tooth Fairy?” said the Dean sarcastically.
“I’m in charge here and I want a bathroom of my own,” said Ridcully
firmly. “And that’s all there is to it, all right? I want a bathroom in
time for Hogswatchnight, understand?”
And that’s a problem with beginnings, of course. Sometimes, when you’re
dealing with occult realms that have quite a different attitude to time,
you get the effect a little way before the cause.
From somewhere on the edge of hearing came a glingleglingleglingle noise,
like little silver bells.
At about the same time as the Archchancellor was laying down the law,
Susan Sto-Helit was sitting up in bed, reading by candlelight.
Frost patterns curled across the windows.
She enjoyed these early evenings. Once she had put the children to bed
she was more or less left to herself. Mrs. Gaiter was pathetically scared
of giving her any instructions even though she paid Susan’s wages.
Not that the wages were important, of course. What was important was that
she was being her Own Person and holding down a Real Job. And being a
governess was a real job. The only tricky bit had been the embarrassment
when her employer found out that she was a duchess, because in Mrs.
Gaiter’s book, which was a rather short book with big handwriting, the
upper crust wasn’t supposed to work. It was supposed to loaf around. It
was all Susan could do to stop her curtseying when they met.
A flicker made her turn her head.
The candle flame was streaming out horizontally, as though in a howling
wind.
She looked up. The curtains billowed away from the window, which—
—flung itself open with a clatter.
But there was no wind.
At least, no wind in this world.
Images formed in her mind. A red ball…The sharp smell of snow…And then
they were gone, and instead there were…
“Teeth?” said Susan, aloud. “Teeth, again?”
She blinked. When she opened her eyes the window was, as she knew it
would be, firmly shut. The curtain hung demurely. The candle flame was
innocently upright. Oh, no, not again. Not after all this time.
Everything had been going so well—
“Thusan?”
She looked around. Her door had been pushed open and a small figure stood
there, barefoot in a nightdress.
She sighed. “Yes, Twyla?”
“I’m afwaid of the monster in the cellar, Thusan. It’s going to eat me
up.”
Susan shut her book firmly and raised a warning finger.
“What have I told you about trying to sound ingratiatingly cute, Twyla?”
she said.
The little girl said, “You said I mustn’t. You said that exaggerated
lisping is a hanging offense and I only do it to get attention.”
“Good. Do you know what monster it is this time?”
“It’s the big hairy one wif—”
Susan raised the finger. “Uh?” she warned.
“—with eight arms,” Twyla corrected herself.
“What, again? Oh, all right.”
She got out of bed and put on her dressing gown, trying to stay quite
calm while the child watched her. So they were coming back. Oh, not the
monster in the cellar. That was all in a day’s work. But it looked as if
she was going to start remembering the future again.
She shook her head. However far you ran away, you always caught yourself
up.
But monsters were easy, at least. She’d learned how to deal with monsters.
She picked up the poker from the nursery fender and went down the back
stairs, with Twyla following her.
The Gaiters were having a dinner party. Muffled voices came from the
direction of the dining room.
Then, as she crept past, a door opened and yellow light spilled out and a
voice said, “Ye gawds, there’s a gel in a nightshirt out here with a
poker!”
She saw figures silhouetted in the light and made out the worried face of
Mrs. Gaiter.
“Susan? Er…what are you doing?”
Susan looked at the poker and then back at the woman. “Twyla said she’s
afraid of a monster in the cellar, Mrs. Gaiter.”
“And yer going to attack it with a poker, eh?” said one of the guests.
There was a strong atmosphere of brandy and cigars.
“Yes,” said Susan simply.
“Susan’s our governess,” said Mrs. Gaiter. “Er…I told you about her.”
There was a change in the expression on the faces peering out from the
dining room. It became a sort of amused respect.
“She beats up monsters with a poker?” said someone.
“Actually, that’s a very clever idea,” said someone else. “Little gel
gets it into her head there’s a monster in the cellar, you go in with the
poker and make a few bashing noises while the child listens, and then
everything’s all right. Good thinkin’, that girl. Ver’ sensible. Ver’
modern.”
“Is that what you’re doing, Susan?” said Mrs. Gaiter anxiously.
“Yes, Mrs. Gaiter,” said Susan obediently.
“This I’ve got to watch, by Io! It’s not every day you see monsters
beaten up by a gel,” said the man behind her. There was a swish of silk
and a cloud of cigar smoke as the diners poured out into the hall.
Susan sighed again and went down the cellar stairs, while Twyla sat
demurely at the top, hugging her knees.
A door opened and shut.
There was a short period of silence and then a terrifying scream. One
woman fainted and a man dropped his cigar.
“You don’t have to worry, everything will be all right,” said Twyla
calmly. “She always wins. Everything will be all right.”
There were thuds and clangs, and then a whirring noise, and finally a
sort of bubbling.
Susan pushed open the door. The poker was bent at right angles. There was
nervous applause.
“Ver’ well done,” said a guest. “Ver’ persykological. Clever idea, that,
bendin’ the poker. And I expect you’re not afraid any more, eh, little
girl?”
“No,” said Twyla.
“Ver’ persykological.”
“Susan says don’t get afraid, get angry,” said Twyla.
“Er, thank you, Susan,” said Mrs. Gaiter, now a trembling bouquet of
nerves. “And, er, now, Sir Geoffrey, if you’d all like to come back into
the parlor—I mean, the drawing room—”
The party went back up the hall. The last thing Susan heard before the
door shut was “Dashed convincin’, the way she bent the poker like that—”
She waited.
“Have they all gone, Twyla?”
“Yes, Susan.”
“Good.” Susan went back into the cellar and emerged towing something
large and hairy with eight legs. She managed to haul it up the steps and
down the other passage to the back yard, where she kicked it out. It
would evaporate before dawn.
“That’s what we do to monsters,” she said.
Twyla watched carefully.
“And now it’s bed for you, my girl,” said Susan, picking her up.
“C’n I have the poker in my room for the night?”
“All right.”
“It only kills monsters, doesn’t it…?” the child said sleepily, as Susan
carried her upstairs.
“That’s right,” Susan said. “All kinds.”
She put the girl to bed next to her brother and leaned the poker against
the toy cupboard.
The poker was made of some cheap metal with a brass knob on the end. She
would, Susan reflected, give quite a lot to be able to use it on the
children’s previous governess.
“G’night.”
“Good night.”
She went back to her own small bedroom and got back into bed, watching
the curtains suspiciously.
It would be nice to think she’d imagined it. It would also be stupid to
think that, too. But she’d been nearly normal for two years now, making
her own way in the real world, never remembering the future at all…
Perhaps she had just dreamed things (but even dreams could be real…).
She tried to ignore the long thread of wax that suggested the candle had,
just for a few seconds, streamed in the wind.
As Susan sought sleep, Lord Downey sat in his study catching up on the
paperwork.
Lord Downey was an assassin. Or, rather, an Assassin. The capital letter
was important. It separated those curs who went around murdering people
for money from the gentlemen who were occasionally consulted by other
gentlemen who wished to have removed, for a consideration, any
inconvenient razor blades from the candyfloss of life.
The members of the Guild of Assassins considered themselves cultured men
who enjoyed good music and food and literature. And they knew the value
of human life. To a penny, in many cases.
Lord Downey’s study was oak paneled and well carpeted. The furniture was
very old and quite worn, but the wear was the wear that comes only when
very good furniture is carefully used over several centuries. It was
matured furniture.
A log fire burned in the grate. In front of it a couple of dogs were
sleeping in the tangled way of large hairy dogs everywhere.
Apart from the occasional doggy snore or the crackle of a shifting log,
there were no other sounds but the scratching of Lord Downey’s pen and
the ticking of the grandfather clock by the door…small, private noises
which only served to define the silence.
At least, this was the case until someone cleared their throat.
The sound suggested very clearly that the purpose of the exercise was not
to erase the presence of a troublesome bit of biscuit, but merely to
indicate in the politest possible way the presence of the throat.
Downey stopped writing but did not raise his head.
Then, after what appeared to be some consideration, he said in a
businesslike voice, “The doors are locked. The windows are barred. The
dogs do not appear to have woken up. The squeaky floorboards haven’t.
Other little arrangements which I will not specify seem to have been
bypassed. That severely limits the possibilities. I really doubt that you
are a ghost and gods generally do not announce themselves so politely.
You could, of course, be Death, but I don’t believe he bothers with such
niceties and, besides, I am feeling quite well. Hmm.”
Something hovered in the air in front of his desk.
“My teeth are in fine condition so you are unlikely to be the Tooth Fairy.
I’ve always found that a stiff brandy before bedtime quite does away with
the need for the Sandman. And, since I can carry a tune quite well, I
suspect I’m not likely to attract the attention of Old Man Trouble. Hmm.”
The figure drifted a little nearer.
“I suppose a gnome could get through a mousehole, but I have traps down,”
Downey went on. “Bogeymen can walk through walls but would be very loath
to reveal themselves. Really, you have me at a loss. Hmm?”
And then he looked up.
A gray robe hung in the air. It appeared to be occupied, in that it had a
shape, although the occupant was not visible.
The prickly feeling crept over Downey that the occupant wasn’t invisible,
merely not, in any physical sense, there at all.
“Good evening,” he said.
The robe said, Good evening, Lord Downey.
His brain registered the words. His ears swore they hadn’t heard them.
But you did not become head of the Assassins’ Guild by taking fright
easily. Besides, the thing wasn’t frightening. It was, thought Downey,
astonishingly dull. If monotonous drabness could take on a shape, this
would be the shape it would choose.
“You appear to be a specter,” he said.
Our nature is not a matter for discussion, arrived in his head. We offer
you a commission.
“You wish someone inhumed?” said Downey.
Brought to an end.
Downey considered this. It was not as unusual as it appeared. There were
precedents. Anyone could buy the services of the Guild. Several zombies
had, in the past, employed the Guild to settle scores with their
murderers. In fact the Guild, he liked to think, practiced the ultimate
democracy. You didn’t need intelligence, social position, beauty or charm
to hire it. You just needed money which, unlike the other stuff, was
available to everyone. Except for the poor, of course, but there was no
helping some people.
“Brought to an end…” That was an odd way of putting it.
“We can—” he began.
The payment will reflect the difficulty of the task.
“Our scale of fees—”
The payment will be three million dollars.
Downey sat back. That was four times higher than any fee yet earned by
any member of the Guild, and that had been a special family rate,
including overnight guests.
“No questions asked, I assume?” he said, buying time.
No questions answered.
“But does the suggested fee represent the difficulty involved? The client
is heavily guarded?”
Not guarded at all. But almost certainly impossible to delete with
conventional weapons.
Downey nodded. This was not necessarily a big problem, he said to himself.
The Guild had amassed quite a few unconventional weapons over the years.
Delete? An unusual way of putting it…
“We like to know for whom we are working,” he said.
We are sure you do.
“I mean that we need to know your name. Or names. In strict client
confidentiality, of course. We have to write something down in our files.”
You may think of us as…the Auditors.
“Really? What is it you audit?”
Everything.
“I think we need to know something about you.”
We are the people with three million dollars.
Downey took the point, although he didn’t like it. Three million dollars
could buy a lot of no questions.
“Really?” he said. “In the circumstances, since you are a new client, I
think we would like payment in advance.”
As you wish. The gold is now in your vaults.
“You mean that it will shortly be in our vaults,” said Downey.
No. It has always been in your vaults. We know this because we have just
put it there.
Downey watched the empty hood for a moment, and then without shifting his
gaze he reached out and picked up the speaking tube.
“Mr. Winvoe?” he said, after whistling into it. “Ah. Good. Tell me, how
much do we have in our vaults at the moment? Oh, approximately. To the
nearest million, say.” He held the tube away from his ear for a moment,
and then spoke into it again. “Well, be a good chap and check anyway,
will you?”
He hung up the tube and placed his hands flat on the desk in front of him.
“Can I offer you a drink while we wait?” he said.
Yes. We believe so.
Downey stood up with some relief and walked over to his large drinks
cabinet. His hand hovered over the Guild’s ancient and valuable tantalus,
with its labeled decanters of Mur, Nig, Trop and Yeksihw.*
“And what would you like to drink?” he said, wondering where the Auditor
kept its mouth. His hand hovered for just a moment over the smallest
decanter, marked Nosiop.
We do not drink.
“But you did just say I could offer you a drink…”
Indeed. We judge you fully capable of performing that action.
“Ah.” Downey’s hand hesitated over the whiskey decanter, and then he
thought better of it. At that point, the speaking tube whistled.
“Yes, Mr. Winvoe? Really? Indeed? I myself have frequently found loose
change under sofa cushions, it’s amazing how it mou…No, no, I wasn’t
being…Yes, I did have some reason to…No, no blame attaches to you in
any…No, I could hardly see how it…Yes, go and have a rest, what a good
idea. Thank you.”
He hung up the tube again. The cowl hadn’t moved.
“We will need to know where, when and, of course, who,” he said, after a
moment.
The cowl nodded. The location is not on any map. We would like the task
to be completed within the week. This is essential. As for the who…
A drawing appeared on Downey’s desk and in his head arrived the words:
Let us call him the Fat Man.
“Is this a joke?” said Downey.
We do not joke.
No, you don’t, do you, Downey thought. He drummed his fingers.
“There are many who would say this…person does not exist,” he said.
He must exist. How else could you so readily recognize his picture? And
many are in correspondence with him.
“Well, yes, of course, in a sense he exists…”
In a sense everything exists. It is cessation of existence that concerns
us here.
“Finding him would be a little difficult.”
You will find persons on any street who can tell you his approximate
address.
“Yes, of course,” said Downey, wondering why anyone would call them
“persons.” It was an odd usage. “But, as you say, I doubt that they could
give a map reference. And even then, how could the…the Fat Man be inhumed?
A glass of poisoned sherry, perhaps?”
The cowl had no face to crack a smile.
You misunderstand the nature of employment, it said in Downey’s head.
He bridled at this. Assassins were never employed. They were engaged or
retained or commissioned, but never employed. Only servants were employed.
“What is it that I misunderstand, exactly?” he said.
We pay. You find the ways and means.
The cowl began to fade.
“How can I contact you?” said Downey.
We will contact you. We know where you are. We know where everyone is.
The figure vanished. At the same moment the door was flung open to reveal
the distraught figure of Mr. Winvoe, the Guild Treasurer.
“Excuse me, my lord, but I really had to come up!” He flung some disks on
the desk. “Look at them!”
Downey carefully picked up a golden circle. It looked like a small coin,
but—
“No denomination!” said Winvoe. “No heads, no tails, no milling! It’s
just a blank disk! They’re all just blank disks!”
Downey opened his mouth to say, “Valueless?” He realized that he was half
hoping that this was the case. If they, whoever they were, had paid in
worthless metal then there wasn’t even the glimmering of a contract. But
he could see this wasn’t the case. Assassins learned to recognize money
early in their careers.
“Blank disks,” he said, “of pure gold.”
Winvoe nodded mutely.
“That,” said Downey, “will do nicely.”
“It must be magical!” said Winvoe. “And we never accept magical money!”
Downey bounced the coin on the desk a couple of times. It made a
satisfyingly rich thunking noise. It wasn’t magical. Magical money would
look real, because its whole purpose was to deceive. But this didn’t need
to ape something as human and adulterated as mere currency. This is gold,
it told his fingers. Take it or leave it.
Downey sat and thought, while Winvoe stood and worried.
“We’ll take it,” he said.
“But—”
“Thank you, Mr. Winvoe. That is my decision,” said Downey. He stared into
space for a while, and then smiled. “Is Mister Teatime still in the
building?”
Winvoe stood back. “I thought the council had agreed to dismiss him,” he
said stiffly. “After that business with—”
“Mister Teatime does not see the world in quite the same way as other
people,” said Downey, picking up the picture from his desk and looking at
it thoughtfully.
“Well, indeed, I think that is certainly true.”
“Please send him up.”
The Guild attracted all sorts of people, Downey reflected. He found
himself wondering how it had come to attract Winvoe, for one thing. It
was hard to imagine him stabbing anyone in the heart in case he got blood
on the victim’s wallet. Whereas Mister Teatime…
The problem was that the Guild took young boys and gave them a splendid
education and incidentally taught them how to kill, cleanly and
dispassionately, for money and for the good of society, or at least that
part of society that had money, and what other kind of society was there?
But very occasionally you found you’d got someone like Mister Teatime, to
whom the money was merely a distraction. Mister Teatime had a truly
brilliant mind, but it was brilliant like a fractured mirror, all
marvelous facets and rainbows but, ultimately, also something that was
broken.
Mister Teatime enjoyed himself too much. And other people, also.
Downey had privately decided that some time soon Mister Teatime was going
to meet with an accident. Like many people with no actual morals, Lord
Downey did have standards, and Teatime repelled him. Assassination was a
careful game, usually played against people who knew the rules themselves
or at least could afford the services of those who did. There was
considerable satisfaction in a clean kill. What there wasn’t supposed to
be was pleasure in a messy one. That sort of thing led to talk.
On the other hand, Teatime’s corkscrew of a mind was exactly the tool to
deal with something like this. And if he didn’t…well, that was hardly
Downey’s fault, was it?
He turned his attention to the paperwork for a while. It was amazing how
the stuff mounted up. But you had to deal with it. It wasn’t as though
they were murderers, after all…
There was a knock at the door. He pushed the paperwork aside and sat back.
“Come in, Mister Teatime,” he said. It never hurt to put the other fellow
slightly in awe of you.
In fact the door was opened by one of the Guild’s servants, carefully
balancing a tea tray.
“Ah, Carter,” said Lord Downey, recovering magnificently. “Just put it on
the table over there, will you?”
“Yes, sir,” said Carter. He turned and nodded. “Sorry, sir, I will go and
fetch another cup directly, sir.”
“What?”
“For your visitor, sir.”
“What visitor? Oh, when Mister Teati—”
He stopped. He turned.
There was a young man sitting on the hearth rug, playing with the dogs.
“Mister Teatime!”
“It’s pronounced Teh-ah-tim-eh, sir,” said Teatime, with just a hint of
reproach. “Everyone gets it wrong, sir.”
“How did you do that?”
“Pretty well, sir. I got mildly scorched on the last few feet, of course.”
There were some lumps of soot on the hearth rug. Downey realized he’d
heard them fall, but that hadn’t been particularly extraordinary. No one
could get down the chimney. There was a heavy grid firmly in place near
the top of the flue.
“But there’s a blocked-in fireplace behind the old library,” said Teatime,
apparently reading his thoughts. “The flues connect, under the bars. It
was really a stroll, sir.”
“Really…”
“Oh, yes, sir.”
Downey nodded. The tendency of old buildings to be honeycombed with
sealed chimney flues was a fact you learned early in your career. And
then, he told himself, you forgot. It always paid to put the other fellow
in awe of you, too. He had forgotten they taught that, too.
“The dogs seem to like you,” he said.
“I get on well with animals, sir.”
Teatime’s face was young and open and friendly. Or, at least, it smiled
all the time. But the effect was spoiled for most people by the fact that
it had only one eye. Some unexplained accident had taken the other one,
and the missing orb had been replaced by a ball of glass. The result was
disconcerting. But what bothered Lord Downey far more was the man’s other
eye, the one that might loosely be called normal. He’d never seen such a
small and sharp pupil. Teatime looked at the world through a pinhole.
He found he’d retreated behind his desk again. There was that about
Teatime. You always felt happier if you had something between you and him.
“You like animals, do you?” he said. “I have a report here that says you
nailed Sir George’s dog to the ceiling.”
“Couldn’t have it barking while I was working, sir.”
“Some people would have drugged it.”
“Oh.” Teatime looked despondent for a moment, but then he brightened.
“But I definitely fulfilled the contract, sir. There can be no doubt
about that, sir. I checked Sir George’s breathing with a mirror as
instructed. It’s in my report.”
“Yes, indeed.” Apparently the man’s head had been several feet from his
body at that point. It was a terrible thought that Teatime might see
nothing incongruous about this.
“And…the servants…?” he said.
“Couldn’t have them bursting in, sir.”
Downey nodded, half hypnotized by the glassy stare and the pinhole
eyeball. No, you couldn’t have them bursting in. And an Assassin might
well face serious professional opposition, possibly even by people
trained by the same teachers. But an old man and a maidservant who’d
merely had the misfortune to be in the house at the time…
There was no actual rule, Downey had to admit. It was just that, over the
years, the Guild had developed a certain ethos and members tended to be
very neat about their work, even shutting doors behind them and generally
tidying up as they went. Hurting the harmless was worse than a
transgression against the moral fabric of society, it was a breach of
good manners. It was worse even than that. It was bad taste. But there
was no actual rule…
“That was all right, wasn’t it, sir?” said Teatime, with apparent anxiety.
“It, uh…lacked elegance,” said Downey.
“Ah. Thank you, sir. I am always happy to be corrected. I shall remember
that next time.”
Downey took a deep breath.
“It’s about that I wish to talk,” he said. He held up the picture of…what
had the thing called him?…the Fat Man?
“As a matter of interest,” he said, “how would you go about inhuming
this…gentleman?”
Anyone else, he was sure, would have burst out laughing. They would have
said things like “Is this a joke, sir?” Teatime merely leaned forward,
with a curious intent expression.
“Difficult, sir.”
“Certainly,” Downey agreed.
“I would need some time to prepare a plan, sir,” Teatime went on.
“Of course, and—”
There was a knock at the door and Carter came in with another cup and
saucer. He nodded respectfully to Lord Downey and crept out again.
“Right, sir,” said Teatime.
“I’m sorry?” said Downey, momentarily distracted.
“I have now thought of a plan, sir,” said Teatime, patiently.
“You have?”
“Yes, sir.”
“As quickly as that?”
“Yes, sir.”
“Ye gods!”
“Well, sir, you know we are encouraged to consider hypothetical
problems…?”
“Oh, yes. A very valuable exercise—” Downey stopped, and then looked
shocked.
“You mean you have actually devoted time to considering how to inhume the
Hogfather?” he said weakly. “You’ve actually sat down and thought out how
to do it? You’ve actually devoted your spare time to the problem?”
“Oh, yes, sir. And the Soul Cake Duck. And the Sandman. And Death.”
Downey blinked again. “You’ve actually sat down and considered how to—”
“Yes, sir. I’ve amassed quite an interesting file. In my own time, of
course.”
“I want to be quite certain about this, Mister Teatime.
You…have…applied…yourself to a study of ways of killing Death?”
“Only as a hobby, sir.”
“Well, yes, hobbies, yes, I mean, I used to collect butterflies myself,”
said Downey, recalling those first moments of awakening pleasure at the
use of poison and the pin, “but—”
“Actually, sir, the basic methodology is exactly the same as it would be
for a human. Opportunity, geography, technique…You just have to work with
the known facts about the individual concerned. Of course, with this one
such a lot is known.”
“And you’ve worked it all out, have you?” said Downey, almost fascinated.
“Oh, a long time ago, sir.”
“When, may I ask?”
“I think it was when I was lying in bed one Hogswatchnight, sir.”
My gods, thought Downey, and to think that I just used to listen for
sleigh bells.
“My word,” he said aloud.
“I may have to check some details, sir. I’d appreciate access to some of
the books in the Dark Library. But, yes, I think I can see the basic
shape.”
“And yet…this person…some people might say that he is technically
immortal.”
“Everyone has their weak point, sir.”
“Even Death?”
“Oh, yes. Absolutely. Very much so.”
“Really?”
Downey drummed his fingers on the desk again. The boy couldn’t possibly
have a real plan, he told himself. He certainly had a skewed mind—skewed?
It was a positive helix—but the Fat Man wasn’t just another target in
some mansion somewhere. It was reasonable to assume that people had tried
to trap him before.
He felt happy about this. Teatime would fail, and possibly even fail
fatally if his plan was stupid enough. And maybe the Guild would lose the
gold, but maybe not.
“Very well,” he said. “I don’t need to know what your plan is.”
“That’s just as well, sir.”
“What do you mean?”
“Because I don’t propose to tell you, sir. You’d be obliged to disapprove
of it.”
“I am amazed that you are so confident that it can work, Teatime.”
“I just think logically about the problem, sir,” said the boy. He sounded
reproachful.
“Logically?” said Downey.
“I suppose I just see things differently from other people,” said Teatime.
It was a quiet day for Susan, although on the way to the park Gawain trod
on a crack in the pavement. On purpose.
One of the many terrors conjured up by the previous governess’s happy way
with children had been the bears that waited around in the street to eat
you if you stood on the cracks.
Susan had taken to carrying the poker under her respectable coat. One
wallop generally did the trick. They were amazed that anyone else saw
them.
“Gawain?” she said, eyeing a nervous bear who had suddenly spotted her
and was now trying to edge away nonchalantly.
“Yes?”
“You meant to tread on that crack so that I’d have to thump some poor
creature whose only fault is wanting to tear you limb from limb.”
“I was just skipping—”
“Quite. Real children don’t go hoppity-skip unless they are on drugs.”
He grinned at her.
“If I catch you being twee again I will knot your arms behind your head,”
said Susan levelly.
He nodded, and went to push Twyla off the swings.
Susan relaxed, satisfied. It was her personal discovery. Ridiculous
threats didn’t worry them at all, but they were obeyed. Especially the
ones in graphic detail.
The previous governess had used various monsters and bogeymen as a form
of discipline. There was always something waiting to eat or carry off bad
boys and girls for crimes like stuttering or defiantly and aggravatingly
persisting in writing with their left hand. There was always a Scissor
Man waiting for a little girl who sucked her thumb, always a bogeyman in
the cellar. Of such bricks is the innocence of childhood constructed.
Susan’s attempts at getting them to disbelieve in the things only caused
the problems to get worse.
Twyla had started to wet the bed. This may have been a crude form of
defense against the terrible clawed creature that she was certain lived
under it.
Susan had found out about this one the first night, when the child had
woken up crying because of a bogeyman in the closet.
She’d sighed and gone to have a look. She’d been so angry that she’d
pulled it out, hit it over the head with the nursery poker, dislocated
its shoulder as a means of emphasis and kicked it out of the back door.
The children refused to disbelieve in the monsters because, frankly, they
knew damn well the things were there.
But she’d found that they could, very firmly, also believe in the poker.
Now she sat down on a bench and read a book. She made a point of taking
the children, every day, somewhere where they could meet others of the
same age. If they got the hang of the playground, she thought, adult life
would hold no fears. Besides, it was nice to hear the voices of little
children at play, provided you took care to be far enough away not to
hear what they were actually saying.
There were lessons later on. These were going a lot better now she’d got
rid of the reading books about bouncy balls and dogs called Spot. She’d
got Gawain on to the military campaigns of General Tacticus, which were
suitably bloodthirsty but, more importantly, considered too difficult for
a child. As a result his vocabulary was doubling every week and he could
already use words like “disemboweled” in everyday conversation. After all,
what was the point of teaching children to be children? They were
naturally good at it.
And she was, to her mild horror, naturally good with them. She wondered
suspiciously if this was a family trait. And if, to judge by the way her
hair so readily knotted itself into a prim bun, she was destined for jobs
like this for the rest of her life.
It was her parents’ fault. They hadn’t meant it to turn out like this. At
least, she hoped charitably that they hadn’t.
They’d wanted to protect her, to keep her way from the worlds outside
this one, from what people thought of as the occult, from…well, from her
grandfather, to put it bluntly. This had, she felt, left her a little
twisted up.
Of course, to be fair, that was a parent’s job. The world was so full of
sharp bends that if they didn’t put a few twists in you, you wouldn’t
stand a chance of fitting in. And they’d been conscientious and kind and
given her a good home and even an education.
It had been a good education, too. But it had only been later on that
she’d realized that it had been an education in, well, education. It
meant that if ever anyone needed to calculate the volume of a cone, then
they could confidently call on Susan Sto-Helit. Anyone at a loss to
recall the campaigns of General Tacticus or the square root of 27.4 would
not find her wanting. If you needed someone who could talk about
household items and things to buy in the shops in five languages, then
Susan was at the head of the queue. Education had been easy.
Learning things had been harder.
Getting an education was a bit like a communicable sexual disease. It
made you unsuitable for a lot of jobs and then you had the urge to pass
it on.
She’d become a governess. It was one of the few jobs a known lady could
do. And she’d taken to it well. She’d sworn that if she did indeed ever
find herself dancing on rooftops with chimney sweeps she’d beat herself
to death with her own umbrella.
After tea she read them a story. They liked her stories. The one in the
book was pretty awful, but the Susan version was well received. She
translated as she read.
“…and then Jack chopped down the beanstalk, adding murder and ecological
vandalism to the theft, enticement and trespass charges already mentioned,
but he got away with it and lived happily ever after without so much as a
guilty twinge about what he had done. Which proves that you can be
excused just about anything if you’re a hero, because no one asks
inconvenient questions. And now,” she closed the book with a snap, “it’s
time for bed.”
The previous governess had taught them a prayer which included the hope
that some god or other would take their soul if they died while they were
asleep and, if Susan was any judge, had the underlying message that this
would be a good thing.
One day, Susan averred, she’d hunt that woman down.
“Susan,” said Twyla, from somewhere under the blankets.
“Yes?”
“You know last week we wrote letters to the Hogfather?”
“Yes?”
“Only…in the park Rachel says he doesn’t exist and it’s your father
really. And everyone else said she was right.”
There was a rustle from the other bed. Twyla’s brother had turned over
and was listening surreptitiously.
Oh dear, thought Susan. She had hoped she could avoid this. It was going
to be like that business with the Soul Cake Duck all over again.
“Does it matter if you get the presents anyway?” she said, making a
direct appeal to greed.
“’es.”
Oh dear, oh dear. Susan sat down on the bed, wondering how the hell to
get through this. She patted the one visible hand.
“Look at it this way, then,” she said, and took a deep mental breath.
“Wherever people are obtuse and absurd…and wherever they have, by even
the most generous standards, the attention span of a small chicken in a
hurricane and the investigative ability of a one-legged cockroach…and
wherever people are inanely credulous, pathetically attached to the
certainties of the nursery and, in general, have as much grasp of the
realities of the physical universe as an oyster has of mountaineering…yes,
Twyla: there is a Hogfather.”
There was silence from under the bedclothes, but she sensed that the tone
of voice had worked. The words had meant nothing. That, as her
grandfather might have said, was humanity all over.
“G’night.”
“Good night,” said Susan.
It wasn’t even a bar. It was just a room where people drank while they
waited for other people with whom they had business. The business usually
involved the transfer of ownership of something from one person to
another, but then, what business doesn’t?
Five businessmen sat round a table, lit by a candle stuck in a saucer.
There was an open bottle between them. They were taking some care to keep
it away from the candle flame.
“’s gone six,” said one, a huge man with dreadlocks and a beard you could
keep goats in. “The clocks struck ages ago. He ain’t coming. Let’s go.”
“Sit down, will you? Assassins are always late. ’cos of style, right?”
“This one’s mental.”
“Eccentric.”
“What’s the difference?”
“A bag of cash.”
The three that hadn’t spoken yet looked at one another.
“What’s this? You never said he was an Assassin,” said Chickenwire. “He
never said the guy was an Assassin, did he, Banjo?”
There was a sound like distant thunder. It was Banjo Lilywhite clearing
his throat.
“Dat’s right,” said a voice from the upper slopes. “Youse never said.”
The others waited until the rumble died away. Even Banjo’s voice hulked.
“He’s”—the first speaker waved his hands vaguely, trying to get across
the point that someone was a hamper of food, several folding chairs, a
tablecloth, an assortment of cooking gear and an entire colony of ants
short of a picnic—“mental. And he’s got a funny eye.”
“It’s just glass, all right?” said the one known as Catseye, signaling a
waiter for four beers and a glass of milk. “And he’s paying ten thousand
dollars each. I don’t care what kind of eye he’s got.”
“I heard it was made of the same stuff they make them fortune-telling
crystals out of. You can’t tell me that’s right. And he looks at you with
it,” said the first speaker. He was known as Peachy, although no one had
ever found out why.*
Catseye sighed. Certainly there was something odd about Mister Teatime,
there was no doubt about that. But there was something weird about all
Assassins. And the man paid well. Lots of Assassins used informers and
locksmiths. It was against the rules, technically, but standards were
going down everywhere, weren’t they? Usually they paid you late and
sparsely, as if they were doing the favor. But Teatime was okay. True,
after a few minutes talking to him your eyes began to water and you felt
you needed to scrub your skin even on the inside, but no one was perfect,
were they?
Peachy leaned forward. “You know what?” he said. “I reckon he could be
here already. In disguise! Laughing at us! Well, if he’s in here laughing
at us—” He cracked his knuckles.
Medium Dave Lilywhite, the last of the five, looked around. There were
indeed a number of solitary figures in the low, dark room. Most of them
wore cloaks with big hoods. They sat alone, in corners, hidden by the
hoods. None of them looked very friendly.
“Don’t be daft, Peachy,” Catseye murmured.
“That’s the sort of thing they do,” Peachy insisted. “They’re masters of
disguise!”
“With that eye of his?”
“That guy sitting by the fire has got an eye patch,” said Medium Dave.
Medium Dave didn’t speak much. He watched a lot.
The others turned to stare.
“He’ll wait till we’re off our guard then go ahahaha,” said Peachy.
“They can’t kill you unless it’s for money,” said Catseye. But now there
was a soupçon of doubt in his voice.
They kept their eyes on the hooded man. He kept his eye on them.
If asked to describe what they did for a living, the five men around the
table would have said something like “This and that” or “The best I can,”
although in Banjo’s case he’d have probably said “Dur?” They were, by the
standards of an uncaring society, criminals, although they wouldn’t have
thought of themselves as such and couldn’t even spell words like
“nefarious.” What they generally did was move things around. Sometimes
the things were on the wrong side of a steel door, say, or in the wrong
house. Sometimes the things were in fact people who were far too
unimportant to trouble the Assassins’ Guild with, but who were
nevertheless inconveniently positioned where they were and could much
better be located on, for example, a sea bed somewhere.* None of the five
belonged to any formal guild and they generally found their clients among
those people who, for their own dark reasons, didn’t want to put the
guilds to any trouble, sometimes because they were guild members
themselves. They had plenty of work. There was always something that
needed transferring from A to B or, of course, to the bottom of the C.
“Any minute now,” said Peachy, as the waiter brought their beers.
Banjo cleared his throat. This was a sign that another thought had
arrived.
“What I don’ unnerstan,” he said, “is…”
“Yes?” said his brother.†
“What I don’ unnerstan is, how longaz diz place had waiters?”
“Good evening,” said Teatime, putting down the tray.
They stared at him in silence.
He gave them a friendly smile.
Peachy’s huge hand slapped the table.
“You crept up on us, you little—” he began.
Men in their line of business develop a certain prescience. Medium Dave
and Catseye, who were sitting on either side of Peachy, leaned away
nonchalantly.
“Hi!” said Teatime. There was a blur, and a knife shuddered in the table
between Peachy’s thumb and index finger.
He looked down at it in horror.
“My name’s Teatime,” said Teatime. “Which one are you?”
“’m…Peachy,” said Peachy, still staring at the vibrating knife.
“That’s an interesting name,” said Teatime. “Why are you called Peachy,
Peachy?”
Medium Dave coughed.
Peachy looked up into Teatime’s face. The glass eye was a mere ball of
faintly glowing gray. The other eye was a little dot in a sea of white.
Peachy’s only contact with intelligence had been to beat it up and rob it
whenever possible, but a sudden sense of self-preservation glued him to
his chair.
“’cos I don’t shave,” he said.
“Peachy don’t like blades, mister,” said Catseye.
“And do you have a lot of friends, Peachy?” said Teatime.
“Got a few, yeah…”
With a sudden whirl of movement that made the men start, Teatime spun
away, grabbed a chair, swung it up to the table and sat down on it. Three
of them had already got their hands on their swords.
“I don’t have many,” he said, apologetically. “Don’t seem to have the
knack. On the other hand…I don’t seem to have any enemies at all. Not one.
Isn’t that nice?”
Teatime had been thinking, in the cracking, buzzing fireworks display
that was his head. What he had been thinking about was immortality.
He might have been quite, quite insane, but he was no fool. There were,
in the Assassins’ Guild, a number of paintings and busts of famous
members who had, in the past, put…no, of course, that wasn’t right. There
were paintings and busts of the famous clients of members, with a
noticeably modest brass plaque screwed somewhere nearby, bearing some
unassuming little comment like “Departed this vale of tears on Grune 3,
Year of the Sideways Leech, with the assistance of the Hon. K. W. Dobson
(Viper House).” Many fine old educational establishments had dignified
memorials in some hall listing the Old Boys who had laid down their lives
for monarch and country. The Guild’s was very similar, except for the
question of whose life had been laid.
Every Guild member wanted to be up there somewhere. Because getting up
there represented immortality. And the bigger your client, the more
incredibly discreet and restrained would be the little brass plaque, so
that everyone couldn’t help but notice your name.
In fact, if you were very, very renowned, they wouldn’t even have to
write down your name at all…
The men around the table watched him. It was always hard to know what
Banjo was thinking, or even if he was thinking at all, but the other four
were thinking along the lines of: bumptious little twit, like all
Assassins. Thinks he knows it all. I could take him down one-handed, no
trouble. But…you hear stories. Those eyes give me the creeps…
“So what’s the job?” said Chickenwire.
“We don’t do jobs,” said Teatime. “We perform services. And the service
will earn each of you ten thousand dollars.”
“That’s a lot more’n Thieves’ Guild rate,” said Medium Dave.
“I’ve never liked the Thieves’ Guild,” said Teatime, without turning his
head.
“Why not?”
“They ask too many questions.”
“We don’t ask questions,” said Chickenwire quickly.
“We shall suit one another perfectly,” said Teatime. “Do have another
drink while we wait for the other members of our little troupe.”
Chickenwire saw Medium Dave’s lips start to frame the opening letters
“Who—” These letters he deemed inauspicious at this time. He kicked
Medium Dave’s leg under the table.
The door opened slightly. A figure came in, but only just. It inserted
itself in the gap and sidled along the wall in a manner calculated not to
attract attention. Calculated, that is, by someone not good at this sort
of calculation.
It looked at them over its turned-up collar.
“That’s a wizard,” said Peachy.
The figure hurried over and dragged up a chair.
“No, I’m not!” it hissed. “I’m incognito!”
“Right, Mr. Gnito,” said Medium Dave. “You’re just someone in a pointy
hat. This is my brother Banjo, that’s Peachy, this is Chick—”
The wizard looked desperately at Teatime.
“I didn’t want to come!”
“Mr. Sideney here is indeed a wizard,” said Teatime. “A student, anyway.
But down on his luck at the moment, hence his willingness to join us on
this venture.”
“Exactly how far down on his luck?” said Medium Dave.
The wizard tried not to meet anyone’s gaze.
“I made a misjudgment to do with a wager,” he said.
“Lost a bet, you mean?” said Chickenwire.
“I paid up on time,” said Sideney.
“Yes, but Chrysoprase the troll has this odd little thing about money
that turns into lead the next day,” said Teatime cheerfully. “So our
friend needs to earn a little cash in a hurry and in a climate where arms
and legs stay on.”
“No one said anything about there being magic in all this,” said Peachy.
“Our destination is…probably you should think of it as something like a
wizard’s tower, gentlemen,” said Teatime.
“It isn’t an actual wizard’s tower, is it?” said Medium Dave. “They got a
very odd sense of humor when it comes to booby traps.”
“No.”
“Guards?”
“I believe so. According to legend. But nothing very much.”
Medium Dave narrowed his eyes. “There’s valuable stuff in this…tower?”
“Oh, yes.”
“Why ain’t there many guards, then?”
“The…person who owns the property probably does not realize the value of
what…of what they have.”
“Locks?” said Medium Dave.
“On our way we shall be picking up a locksmith.”
“Who?”
“Mr. Brown.”
They nodded. Everyone—at least, everyone in “the business,” and everyone
in “the business” knew what “the business” was, and if you didn’t know
what “the business” was you weren’t a businessman—knew Mr. Brown. His
presence anywhere around a job gave it a certain kind of respectability.
He was a neat, elderly man who’d invented most of the tools in his big
leather bag. No matter what cunning you’d used to get into a place, or
overcome a small army, or find the secret treasure room, sooner or later
you sent for Mr. Brown, who’d turn up with his leather bag and his little
springy things and his little bottles of strange alchemy and his neat
little boots. And he’d do nothing for ten minutes but look at the lock,
and then he’d select a piece of bent metal from a ring of several hundred
almost identical pieces, and under an hour later he’d be walking away
with a neat ten percent of the takings. Of course, you didn’t have to use
Mr. Brown’s services. You could always opt to spend the rest of your life
looking at a locked door.
“All right. Where is this place?” said Peachy.
Teatime turned and smiled at him. “If I’m paying you, why isn’t it me
who’s asking the questions?”
Peachy didn’t even try to outstare the glass eye a second time.
“Just want to be prepared, that’s all,” he mumbled.
“Good reconnaissance is the essence of a successful operation,” said
Teatime. He turned and looked up at the bulk that was Banjo and added,
“What is this?”
“This is Banjo,” said Medium Dave, rolling himself a cigarette.
“Does it do tricks?”
Time stood still for a moment. The other men looked at Medium Dave. He
was known to Ankh-Morpork’s professional underclass as a thoughtful,
patient man, and considered something of an intellectual because some of
his tattoos were spelled right. He was reliable in a tight spot and,
above all, he was honest, because good criminals have to be honest. If he
had a fault, it was a tendency to deal out terminal and definitive
retribution to anyone who said anything about his brother.
If he had a virtue, it was a tendency to pick his time. Medium Dave’s
fingers tucked the tobacco into the paper and raised it to his lips.
“No,” he said.
Chickenwire tried to defrost the conversation. “He’s not what you’d call
bright, but he’s always useful. He can lift two men in each hand. By
their necks.”
“Yur,” said Banjo.
“He looks like a volcano,” said Teatime.
“Really?” said Medium Dave Lilywhite. Chickenwire reached out hastily and
pushed him back down in his seat.
Teatime turned and smiled at him.
“I do so hope we’re going to be friends, Mr. Medium Dave,” he said. “It
really hurts to think I might not be among friends.” He gave him another
bright smile. Then he turned back to the rest of the table.
“Are we resolved, gentlemen?”
They nodded. There was some reluctance, given the consensus view that
Teatime belonged in a room with soft walls, but ten thousand dollars was
ten thousand dollars, possibly even more.
“Good,” said Teatime. He looked Banjo up and down. “Then I suppose we
might as well make a start.”
And he hit Banjo very hard in the mouth.
Death in person did not turn up upon the cessation of every life. It was
not necessary. Governments govern, but prime ministers and presidents do
not personally turn up in people’s homes to tell them how to run their
lives, because of the mortal danger this would present. There are laws
instead.
But from time to time Death checked up to see that things were
functioning properly or, to put it another and more accurate way,
properly ceasing to function in the less significant areas of his
jurisdiction.
And now he walked through dark seas.
Silt rose in clouds around his feet as he strode along the trench bottom.
His robes floated out around him.
There was silence, pressure and utter, utter darkness. But there was life
down here, even this far below the waves. There were giant squid, and
lobsters with teeth on their eyelids. There were spidery things with
their stomachs on their feet, and fish that made their own light. It was
a quiet, black nightmare world, but life lives everywhere that life can.
Where life can’t, this takes a little longer.
Death’s destination was a slight rise in the trench floor. Already the
water around him was getting warmer and more populated, by creatures that
looked as though they had been put together from the bits left over from
everything else.
Unseen but felt, a vast column of scalding hot water was welling up from
a fissure. Somewhere below were rocks heated to near incandescence by the
Disc’s magical field.
Spires of minerals had been deposited around this vent. And, in this tiny
oasis, a type of life had grown up. It did not need air or light. It did
not even need food in the way that most other species would understand
the term.
It just grew at the edge of the streaming column of water, looking like a
cross between a worm and a flower.
Death kneeled down and peered at it, because it was so small. But for
some reason, in this world without eyes or light, it was also a brilliant
red. The profligacy of life in these matters never ceased to amaze him.
He reached inside his robe and pulled out a small roll of black material,
like a jeweler’s tool kit. With great care he took from one of its
pouches a scythe about an inch long, and held it expectantly between
thumb and forefinger.
Somewhere overhead a shard of rock was dislodged by a stray current and
tumbled down, raising little puffs of silt as it bounced off the tubes.
It landed just beside the living flower and then rolled, wrenching it
from the rock.
Death flicked the tiny scythe just as the bloom faded…
The omnipotent eyesight of various supernatural entities is often
remarked upon. It is said they can see the fall of every sparrow.
And this may be true. But there is only one who is always there when it
hits the ground.
The soul of the tube worm was very small and uncomplicated. It wasn’t
bothered about sin. It had never coveted its neighbor’s polyps. It had
never gambled or drunk strong liquor. It had never bothered itself with
questions like “Why am I here?” because it had no concept at all of “here”
or, for that matter, of “I.”
Nevertheless, something was cut free under the surgical edge of the
scythe and vanished in the roiling waters.
Death carefully put the instrument away and stood up. All was well,
things were functioning satisfactorily, and—
—but they weren’t.
In the same way that the best of engineers can hear the tiny change that
signals a bearing going bad long before the finest of instruments would
detect anything wrong, Death picked up a discord in the symphony of the
world. It was one wrong note among billions but all the more noticeable
for that, like a tiny pebble in a very large shoe.
He waved a finger in the waters. For a moment a blue, door-shaped outline
appeared. He stepped through it and was gone.
The tube creatures didn’t notice him go. They hadn’t noticed him arrive.
They never ever noticed anything. A cart trundled through the freezing
foggy streets, the driver hunched in his seat. He seemed to be all big
thick brown overcoat.
A figure darted out of the swirls and was suddenly on the box next to him.
“Hi!” it said. “My name’s Teatime. What’s yours?”
“’ere, you get down, I ain’t allowed to give li—”
The driver stopped. It was amazing how Teatime had been able to thrust a
knife through four layers of thick clothing and stop it just at the point
where it pricked the flesh.
“Sorry?” said Teatime, smiling brightly.
“Er—there ain’t nothing valuable, y’know, nothing valuable, only a few
bags of—”
“Oh dear,” said Teatime, his face a sudden acre of concern. “Well, we’ll
just have to see, won’t we…What is your name, sir?”
“Ernie. Er. Ernie,” said Ernie. “Yes. Ernie. Er…”
Teatime turned his head slightly.
“Come along, gentlemen. This is my friend Ernie. He’s going to be our
driver for tonight.”
Ernie saw half a dozen figures emerge from the fog and climb into the
cart behind him. He didn’t turn to look at them. By the pricking of his
kidneys he knew this would not be an exemplary career move. But it seemed
that one of the figures, a huge shambling mound of a creature, was
carrying a long bundle over its shoulder. The bundle moved and made
muffled noises.
“Do stop shaking, Ernie. We just need a lift,” said Teatime, as the cart
rumbled over the cobbles.
“Where to, mister?”
“Oh, we don’t mind. But first, I’d like you to stop in Sator Square, near
the second fountain.”
The knife was withdrawn. Ernie stopped trying to breathe through his ears.
“Er…”
“What is it? You do seem tense, Ernie. I always find a neck massage
helps.”
“I ain’t rightly allowed to carry passengers, see. Charlie’ll give me a
right telling-off…”
“Oh, don’t you worry about that,” said Teatime, slapping him on the back.
“We’re all friends here!”
“What’re we bringing the girl for?” said a voice behind them.
“’s not right, hittin’ girls,” said a deep voice. “Our mam said no hittin’
girls. Only bad boys do that, our mam said—”
“You be quiet, Banjo.”
“Our mam said—”
“Shssh! Ernie here doesn’t want to listen to our troubles,” said Teatime,
not taking his gaze off the driver.
“Me? Deaf as a post, me,” burbled Ernie, who in some ways was a very
quick learner. “Can’t hardly see more’n a few feet, neither. Got no
recollection for them faces that I do see, come to that. Bad memory? Hah!
Talk about bad memory. Cor, sometimes I can be like as it were on the
cart, talking to people, hah, just like I’m talking to you now, and then
when they’re gone, hah, try as I might, do you think I can remember
anything about them or how many they were or what they were carrying or
anything about any girl or anything?” By this time his voice was a highpitched
wheeze. “Hah! Sometimes I forget me own name!”
“It’s Ernie, isn’t it?” said Teatime, giving him a happy smile. “Ah, and
here we are. Oh dear. There seems to be some excitement.”
There was the sound of fighting somewhere ahead, and then a couple of
masked trolls ran past with three Watchmen after them. They all ignored
the cart.
“I heard the De Bris gang were going to have a go at Packley’s strong
room tonight,” said a voice behind Ernie.
“Looks like Mr. Brown won’t be joining us, then,” said another voice.
There was a snigger.
“Oh, I don’t know about that, Mr. Lilywhite, I don’t know about that at
all,” said a third voice, and this one was from the direction of the
fountain. “Could you take my bag while I climb up, please? Do be careful,
it’s a little heavy.”
It was a neat little voice. The owner of a voice like that kept his money
in a shovel purse and always counted his change carefully. Ernie thought
all this, and then tried very hard to forget that he had.
“On you go, Ernie,” said Teatime. “Round behind the University, I think.”
As the cart rolled on, the neat little voice said, “You grab all the
money and then you get out very smartly. Am I right?”
There was a murmur of agreement.
“Learned that on my mother’s knee, yeah.”
“You learned a lot of stuff across your ma’s knee, Mr. Lilywhite.”
“Don’t you say nuffin’ about our mam!” The voice was like an earthquake.
“This is Mr. Brown, Banjo. You smarten up.”
“He dint ort to tork about our mam!”
“All right! All right! Hello, Banjo…I think I may have a sweet
somewhere…Yes, there you are. Yes, your ma knew the way all right. You go
in quietly, you take your time, you get what you came for and you leave
smartly and in good order. You don’t hang around at the scene to count it
out and tell one another what brave lads you are, am I right?”
“You seem to have done all right, Mr. Brown.” The cart rattled toward the
other side of the square.
“Just a little for expenses, Mr. Catseye. A little Hogswatch present, you
might say. Never take the lot and run. Take a little and walk. Dress neat.
That’s my motto. Dress neat and walk away slowly. Never run. Never run.
The Watch’ll always chase a running man. They’re like terriers for giving
chase. No, you walk out slow, you walk round the corner, you wait till
there’s a lot of excitement, then you turn around and walk back. They
can’t cope with that, see. Half the time they’ll stand aside to let you
walk past. ‘Good evening, officers,’ you say, and then you go home for
your tea.”
“Wheee! Gets you out of trouble, I can see that. If you’ve got the nerve.”
“Oh, no, Mr. Peachy. Doesn’t get you out of. Keeps you out of.”
It was like a very good schoolroom, Ernie thought (and immediately tried
to forget). Or a back-street gym when a champion prizefighter had just
strolled in.
“What’s up with your mouth, Banjo?”
“He lost a tooth, Mr. Brown,” said another voice, and sniggered.
“Lost a toot’, Mr. Brown,” said the thunder that was Banjo.
“Keep your eyes on the road, Ernie,” said Teatime beside him. “We don’t
want an accident, do we…”
The road here was deserted, despite the bustle of the city behind them
and the bulk of the University nearby. There were a few streets, but the
buildings were abandoned. And something was happening to the sound. The
rest of Ankh-Morpork seemed very far away, the sounds arriving as if
through quite a thick wall. They were entering that scorned little corner
of Ankh-Morpork that had long been the site of the University’s rubbish
pits and was now known as the Unreal Estate.
“Bloody wizards,” muttered Ernie, automatically.
“I beg your pardon?” said Teatime.
“My great-grandpa said we used t’own prop’ty round here. Low levels of
magic, my arse! Hah, it’s all right for them wizards, they got all kindsa
spells to protect ’em. Bit of magic here, bit of magic there…Stands to
reason it’s got to go somewhere, right?”
“There used to be warning signs up,” said the neat voice from behind.
“Yeah, well, warning signs in Ankh-Morpork might as well have ‘Good
firewood’ written on them,” said someone else.
“I mean, stands to reason, they chuck out an old spell for exploding this,
and another one for twiddlin’ that, and another one for making carrots
grow, they finish up interfering with one another, who knows what they’ll
end up doing?” said Ernie. “Great-grandpa said sometimes they’d wake up
in the morning and the cellar’d be higher than the attic. And that
weren’t the worst,” he added darkly.
“Yeah, I heard where it got so bad you could walk down the street and
meet yourself coming the other way,” someone supplied. “It got so’s you
didn’t know it was bum or breakfast time, I heard.”
“The dog used to bring home all kinds of stuff,” said Ernie. “Greatgrandpa
said half the time they used to dive behind the sofa if it came
in with anything in its mouth. Corroded fire spells startin’ to fizz,
broken wands with green smoke coming out of ’em and I don’t know what
else…and if you saw the cat playing with anything, it was best not to try
to find out what it was, I can tell you.”
He twitched the reins, his current predicament almost forgotten in the
tide of hereditary resentment.
“I mean, they say all the old spell books and stuff was buried deep and
they recycle the used spells now, but that don’t seem much comfort when
your potatoes started walkin’ about,” he grumbled. “My great-grandpa went
to see the head wizard about it, and he said”—he put on a strangled nasal
voice which was his idea of how you talked when you’d got an education—
“‘Oh, there might be some temp’ry inconvenience now, my good man, but
just you come back in fifty thousand years.’ Bloody wizards.”
The horse turned a corner.
This was a dead-end street. Half-collapsed houses, windows smashed, doors
stolen, leaned against one another on either side.
“I heard they said they were going to clean up this place,” said someone.
“Oh, yeah,” said Ernie, and spat. When it hit the ground it ran away.
“And you know what? You get loonies coming in all the time now, poking
around, pulling things about—”
“Just at the wall up ahead,” said Teatime conversationally. “I think you
generally go through just where there’s a pile of rubble by the old dead
tree, although you wouldn’t see it unless you looked closely. But I’ve
never seen how you do it…”
“’ere, I can’t take you lot through,” said Ernie. “Lifts is one thing,
but not taking people through—”
Teatime sighed. “And we were getting on so well. Listen, Ernie…Ern…you
will take us through or, and I say this with very considerable regret, I
will have to kill you. You seem a nice man. Conscientious. A very serious
overcoat and sensible boots.”
“But if’n I take you through—”
“What’s the worst that can happen?” said Teatime. “You’ll lose your job.
Whereas if you don’t, you’ll die. So if you look at it like that, we’re
actually doing you a favor. Oh, do say yes.”
“Er…” Ernie’s brain felt all twisted. The lad was definitely what Ernie
thought of as a toff, and he seemed nice and friendly, but it didn’t all
add up. The tone and the content didn’t match.
“Besides,” said Teatime, “if you’ve been coerced, it’s not your fault, is
it? No one can blame you. No one could blame anyone who’d been coerced at
knife point.”
“Oh, well, I s’pose, if we’re talking coerced…” Ernie muttered. Going
along with things seemed to be the only way.
The horse stopped and stood waiting with the patient look of an animal
that probably knows the route better than the driver.
Ernie fumbled in his overcoat pocket and took out a small tin, rather
like a snuffbox. He opened it. There was glowing dust inside.
“What do you do with that?” said Teatime, all interest.
“Oh, you just takes a pinch and throws it in the air and it goes twing
and it opens the soft place,” said Ernie.
“So…you don’t need any special training or anything?”
“Er…you just chucks it at the wall there and it goes twing,” said Ernie.
“Really? May I try?”
Teatime took the tin from his unresisting hand and threw a pinch of dust
into the air in front of the horse. It hovered for a moment and then
produced a narrow, glittering arch in the air. It sparkled and went…
…twing.
“Aw,” said a voice behind them. “Innat nice, eh, our Davey?”
“Yeah.”
“All pretty sparkles…”
“And then you just drive forward?” said Teatime.
“That’s right,” said Ernie. “Quick, mind. It only stays open for a little
while.”
Teatime pocketed the little tin. “Thank you very much, Ernie. Very much
indeed.”
His other hand lashed out. There was a glint of metal. The carter blinked,
and then fell sideways off his seat.
There was silence from behind, tinted with horror and possibly just a
little terrible admiration.
“Wasn’t he dull?” said Teatime, picking up the reins.
Snow began to fall. It fell on the recumbent shape of Ernie, and it also
fell through several hooded gray robes that hung in the air.
There appeared to be nothing inside them. You could believe they were
there merely to mark a certain point in space.
Well, said one, we are frankly impressed.
Indeed, said another. We would never have thought of doing it this way.
He is certainly a resourceful human, said a third.
The beauty of it all, said the first—or it may have been the second,
because absolutely nothing distinguished the robes—is that there is so
much else we will control.
Quite, said another. It is really amazing how they think. A sort
of…illogical logic.
Children, said another. Who would have thought it? But today the children,
tomorrow the world.
Give me a child until he is seven and he’s mine for life, said another.
There was a dreadful pause.
The consensus beings that called themselves the Auditors did not believe
in anything, except possibly immortality. And the way to be immortal,
they knew, was to avoid living. Most of all they did not believe in
personality. To be a personality was to be a creature with a beginning
and an end. And since they reasoned that in an infinite universe any life
was by comparison unimaginably short, they died instantly. There was a
flaw in their logic, of course, but by the time they found this out it
was always too late. In the meantime, they scrupulously avoided any
comment, action or experience that set them apart…
You said “me,” said one.
Ah. Yes. But, you see, we were quoting, said the other one hurriedly.
Some religious person said that. About educating children. And so would
logically say “me.” But I wouldn’t use that term of myself, of—damn!
The robe vanished in a little puff of smoke.
Let that be a lesson to us, said one of the survivors, as another and
totally indistinguishable robe popped into existence where the stricken
colleague had been.
Yes, said the newcomer. Well, it certainly appears—
It stopped. A dark shape was approaching through the snow.
It’s him, it said.
They faded hurriedly—not simply vanishing, but spreading out and thinning
until they were just lost in the background.
The dark figure stopped by the dead carter and reached down.
COULD I GIVE YOU A HAND?
Ernie looked up gratefully.
“Cor, yeah,” he said. He got to his feet, swaying a little. “Here, your
fingers’re cold, mister!”
SORRY.
“What’d he go and do that for? I did what he said. He could’ve killed me.”
Ernie felt inside his overcoat and pulled out a small and, at this point,
strangely transparent silver flask.
“I always keep a nip on me these cold nights,” he said. “Keeps me spirits
up.”
YES INDEED. Death looked around briefly and sniffed the air.
“How’m I going to explain all this, then, eh?” said Ernie, taking a pull.
SORRY? THAT WAS VERY RUDE OF ME. I WASN’T PAYING ATTENTION.
“I said what’m I going to tell people? Letting some blokes ride off with
my cart neat as you like…That’s gonna be the sack for sure, I’m gonna be
in big trouble…”
AH. WELL. THERE AT LEAST I HAVE SOME GOOD NEWS, ERNEST. AND, THEN AGAIN,
I HAVE SOME BAD NEWS.
Ernie listened. Once or twice he looked at the corpse at his feet. He
looked smaller from the outside. He was bright enough not to argue. Some
things are fairly obvious when it’s a seven-foot skeleton with a scythe
telling you them.
“So I’m dead, then,” he concluded.
CORRECT.
“Er…The priest said that…you know…after you’re dead…it’s like going
through a door and on one side of it there’s…He…well, a terrible place…?”
Death looked at his worried, fading face.
THROUGH A DOOR…
“That’s what he said…”
I EXPECT IT DEPENDS ON THE DIRECTION YOU’RE WALKING IN.
When the street was empty again, except for the fleshy abode of the late
Ernie, the gray shapes came back into focus.
Honestly, he gets worse and worse, said one.
He was looking for us, said another. Did you notice? He suspects
something. He gets so…concerned about things.
Yes…but the beauty of this plan, said a third, is that he can’t interfere.
He can go everywhere, said one.
No, said another. Not quite everywhere.
And, with ineffable smugness, they faded into the foreground.
It started to snow quite heavily.
It was the night before Hogswatch. All through the house…
…one creature stirred. It was a mouse.
And someone, in the face of all appropriateness, had baited a trap.
Although, because it was the festive season, they’d used a piece of pork
crackling. The smell of it had been driving the mouse mad all day but now,
with no one about, it was prepared to risk it.
The mouse didn’t know it was a trap. Mice aren’t good at passing on
information. Young mice aren’t taken up to famous trap sites and told,
“This is where your Uncle Arthur passed away.” All it knew was that, what
the hey, here was something to eat. On a wooden board with some wire
round it.
A brief scurry later and its jaw had closed on the rind.
Or, rather, passed through it.
The mouse looked around at what was now lying under the big spring, and
thought, “Oops…”
Then its gaze went up to the black-clad figure that had faded into view
by the wainscoting.
“Squeak?” it asked.
SQUEAK, said the Death of Rats.
And that was it, more or less.
Afterward, the Death of Rats looked around with interest. In the nature
of things his very important job tended to take him to rickyards and dark
cellars and the inside of cats and all the little dank holes where rats
and mice finally found out if there was a Promised Cheese. This place was
different.
It was brightly decorated, for one thing. Ivy and mistletoe hung in
bunches from the bookshelves. Brightly colored streamers festooned the
walls, a feature seldom found in most holes or even quite civilized cats.
The Déath of Rats took a leap onto a chair and from there on to the table
and in fact right into a glass of amber liquid, which tipped over and
broke. A puddle spread around four turnips and began to soak into a note
which had been written rather awkwardly on pink writing paper.
It read:
Dere HogFather,
For Hogswatch I Would like a drum an a dolly an a teddybear an a
Gharstley omnian Inquisision Torchure chamber with wind-up Rock and
Nearly Real Blud you can Use Agian. You can get it From the toy Shoppe in
Short Strete. it is $5.99p. I have been good an here is a glars of Sherre
an a pork pie For you and turnips For Gouger an Tusker an Rooter an Snot
Snouter. I hop the chimney is big enough but my Friend willaim Says you
are your Father really.
Yrs. Virginia Prood.
The Death of Rats nibbled a bit of the pork pie because when you are the
personification of the death of small rodents you have to behave in
certain ways. He also piddled on one of the turnips for the same reason,
although only metaphorically, because when you are a small skeleton in a
black robe there are also some things you technically cannot do.
Then he leapt down from the table and left sherry-flavored footprints all
the way to the tree that stood in a pot in the corner. It was really only
a bare branch of oak, but so much shiny holly and mistletoe had been
wired onto it that it gleamed in the light of the candles.
There was tinsel on it, and glittering ornaments, and small bags of
chocolate money.
The Death of Rats peered at his hugely distorted reflection in a glass
ball, and then looked up at the mantelpiece.
He reached it in one jump, and ambled curiously through the cards that
had been ranged along it. His gray whiskers twitched at messages like
“Wishing you Joye and all Goode Cheer at Hogswatchtime & All Through The
Yeare.” A couple of them had pictures of a big jolly fat man carrying a
sack. In one of them he was riding in a sleigh drawn by four enormous
pigs.
The Death of Rats sniffed at a couple of long stockings that had been
hung from the mantelpiece, over the fireplace in which a fire had died
down to a few sullen ashes.
He was aware of a subtle tension in the air, a feeling that here was a
scene that was also a stage, a round hole, as it were, waiting for a
round peg—
There was a scraping noise. A few lumps of soot thumped into the ashes.
The Grim Squeaker nodded to himself.
The scraping became louder, and was followed by a moment of silence and
then a clang as something landed in the ashes and knocked over a set of
ornamental fire irons.
The rat watched carefully as a red-robed figure pulled itself upright and
staggered across the hearth rug, rubbing its shin where it had been
caught by the toasting fork.
It reached the table and read the note. The Death of Rats thought he
heard a groan.
The turnips were pocketed and so, to the Death of Rats’ annoyance, was
the pork pie. He was pretty sure it was meant to be eaten here, not taken
away.
The figure scanned the dripping note for a moment, and then turned around
and approached the mantelpiece. The Death of Rats pulled back slightly
behind “Season’s Greetings!”
A red-gloved hand took down a stocking. There was some creaking and
rustling and it was replaced, looking a lot fatter—the larger box
sticking out of the top had, just visible, the words “Victim Figures Not
Included. 3—10 yrs.”
The Death of Rats couldn’t see much of the donor of this munificence. The
big red hood hid all the face, apart from a long white beard.
Finally, when the figure finished, it stood back and pulled a list out of
its pocket. It held it up to the hood and appeared to be consulting it.
It waved its other hand vaguely at the fireplace, the sooty footprints,
the empty sherry glass and the stocking. Then it bent forward, as if
reading some tiny print.
AH, YES, it said. ER…HO. HO. HO.
With that, it ducked down and entered the chimney. There was some
scrabbling before its boots gained a purchase, and then it was gone.
The Death of Rats realized he’d begun to gnaw his little scythe’s handle
in sheer shock.
SQUEAK?
He landed in the ashes and swarmed up the sooty cave of the chimney. He
emerged so fast that he shot out with his legs still scrabbling and
landed in the snow on the roof.
There was a sleigh hovering in the air by the gutter.
The red-hooded figure had just climbed in and appeared to be talking to
someone invisible behind a pile of sacks.
HERE’S ANOTHER PORK PIE.
“Any mustard?” said the sacks. “They’re a treat with mustard.”
IT DOES NOT APPEAR SO.
“Oh, well. Pass it over anyway.”
IT LOOKS VERY BAD.
“Nah, ’s just where something’s nibbled it—”
I MEAN THE SITUATION. MOST OF THE LETTERS…THEY DON’T REALLY BELIEVE. THEY
PRETEND TO BELIEVE, JUST IN CASE.* I FEAR IT MAY BE TOO LATE. IT HAS
SPREAD SO FAST AND BACK IN TIME, TOO.
“Never say die, master. That’s our motto, eh?” said the sacks, apparently
with their mouth full.
I CAN’T SAY IT’S EVER REALLY BEEN MINE.
“I meant we’re not going to be intimidated by the certain prospect of
complete and utter failure, master.”
AREN’T WE? OH, GOOD. WELL, I SUPPOSE WE’D BETTER BE GOING. The figure
picked up the reins. UP, GOUGER! UP, ROOTER! UP, TUSKER! UP, SNOUTER!
GIDDYUP!
The four large boars harnessed to the sleigh did not move.
WHY DOESN’T THAT WORK? said the figure in a puzzled, heavy voice.
“Beats me, master,” said the sacks.
IT WORKS ON HORSES.
“You could try ‘Pig-hooey!’”
PIG-HOOEY. They waited. NO…DOESN’T SEEM TO REACH THEM.
There was some whispering.
REALLY? YOU THINK THAT WOULD WORK?
“It’d bloody well work on me if I was a pig, master.”
VERY WELL, THEN.
The figure gathered up the reins again.
APPLE! SAUCE!
The pigs’ legs blurred. Silver light flicked across them, and exploded
outward. They dwindled to a dot, and vanished.
SQUEAK?
The Death of Rats skipped across the snow, slid down a drain pipe and
landed on the roof of a shed.
There was a raven perched there. It was staring disconsolately at
something.
SQUEAK!
“Look at that, willya?” said the raven rhetorically. It waved a claw at a
bird feeder in the garden below. “They hangs up half a bloody coconut, a
lump of bacon rind, a handful of peanuts in a bit of wire and they think
they’re the gods’ gift to the nat’ral world. Huh. Do I see eyeballs? Do I
see entrails? I think not. Most intelligent bird in the temperate
latitudes an’ I gets the cold shoulder just because I can’t hang upside
down and go twit, twit. Look at robins, now. Stroppy little evil buggers,
fight like demons, but all they got to do is go bob-bob-bobbing along and
they can’t move for bread crumbs. Whereas me myself can recite poems and
repeat many hum’rous phrases—”
SQUEAK!
“Yes? What?”
The Death of Rats pointed at the roof and then the sky and jumped up and
down excitedly. The raven swiveled one eye upward.
“Oh, yes. Him,” he said. “Turns up at this time of year. Tends to be
associated distantly with robins, which—”
SQUEAK! SQUEE IK IK IK! The Death of Rats pantomimed a figure landing in
a grate and walking around a room. SQUEAK EEK IK IK, SQUEAK “HEEK HEEK
HEEK!” IK IK SQUEAK!
“Been overdoing the Hogswatch cheer, have you? Been rooting around in the
brandy butter?”
SQUEAK?
The raven’s eyes revolved.
“Look, Death’s Death. It’s a full-time job right? It’s not as though you
can run, like, a window cleaning round on the side or nip round after
work cutting people’s lawns.”
SQUEAK!
“Oh, please yourself.”
The raven crouched a little to allow the tiny figure to hop on to its
back, and then lumbered into the air.
“Of course, they can go mental, your occult types,” it said, as it
swooped over the moonlit garden. “Look at Old Man Trouble, for one—”
SQUEAK.
“Oh, I’m not suggesting—”
Susan didn’t like Biers but she went there anyway, when the pressure of
being normal got too much. Biers, despite the smell and the drink and the
company, had one important virtue. In Biers no one took any notice. Of
anything. Hogswatch was traditionally supposed to be a time for families
but the people who drank in Biers probably didn’t have families; some of
them looked as though they might have had litters, or clutches. Some of
them looked as though they’d probably eaten their relatives, or at least
someone’s relatives.
Biers was where the undead drank. And when Igor the barman was asked for
a Bloody Mary, he didn’t mix a metaphor.
The regular customers didn’t ask questions, and not only because some of
them found anything above a growl hard to articulate. None of them was in
the answers business. Everyone in Biers drank alone, even when they were
in groups. Or packs.
Despite the decorations put up inexpertly by Igor the barman to show
willing,* Biers was not a family place.
Family was a subject Susan liked to avoid.
Currently she was being aided in this by a gin and tonic. In Biers,
unless you weren’t choosy, it paid to order a drink that was transparent
because Igor also had undirected ideas about what you could stick on the
end of a cocktail stick. If you saw something spherical and green, you
just had to hope that it was an olive.
She felt hot breath on her ear. A bogeyman had sat down on the stool
beside her.
“Woss a normo doin’ in a place like this, then?” it rumbled, causing a
cloud of vaporized alcohol and halitosis to engulf her. “Hah, you fink
it’s cool comin’ down here an’ swannin’ around in a black dress wid all
the lost boys, eh? Dabblin’ in a bit of designer darkness, eh?”
Susan moved her stool away a little. The bogeyman grinned.
“Want a bogeyman under yer bed, eh?”
“Now then, Shlimazel,” said Igor, without looking up from polishing a
glass.
“Well, woss she down here for, eh?” said the bogeyman. A huge hairy hand
grabbed Susan’s arm. “O’course, maybe what she wants is—”
“I ain’t telling you again, Shlimazel,” said Igor.
He saw the girl turn to face Shlimazel.
Igor wasn’t in a position to see her face fully, but the bogeyman was. He
shot back so quickly that he fell off his stool.
And when the girl spoke, what she said was only partly words but also a
statement, written in stone, of how the future was going to be.
“GO AWAY AND STOP BOTHERING ME.”
She turned back and gave Igor a polite and slightly apologetic smile. The
bogeyman struggled frantically out of the wreckage of his stool and loped
toward the door.
Susan felt the drinkers turn back to their private preoccupations. It was
amazing what you could get away with in Biers.
Igor put down the glass and looked up at the window. For a drinking den
that relied on darkness it had rather a large one but, of course, some
customers did arrive by air.
Something was tapping on it now.
Igor lurched over and opened it.
Susan looked up.
“Oh, no…”
The Death of Rats leapt down onto the counter, with the raven fluttering
after it.
SQUEAK SQUEAK EEK! EEK! SQUEAK IK IK “HEEK HEEK HEEK!” SQ—
“Go away,” said Susan coldly. “I’m not interested. You’re just a figment
of my imagination.”
The raven perched on a bowl behind the bar and said, “Ah, great.”
SQUEAK!
“What’re these?” said the raven, flicking something off the end of its
beak. “Onions? Pfah!”
“Go on, go away, the pair of you,” said Susan.
“The rat says your granddad’s gone mad,” said the raven. “Says he’s
pretending to be the Hogfather.”
“Listen, I just don’t—What?”
“Red cloak, long beard—”
HEEK! HEEK! HEEK!
“—going ‘ho, ho, ho,’ driving around in the big sleigh drawn by the four
piggies, the whole thing…”
“Pigs? What happened to Binky?”
“Search me. O’ course, it can happen, as I was telling the rat only just
now—”
Susan put her hands over her ears, more for desperate theatrical effect
than for the muffling they gave.
“I don’t want to know! I don’t have a grandfather!”
She had to hold onto that.
The Death of Rats squeaked at length.
“The rat says you must remember, he’s tall, not what you’d call fleshy,
he carries a scythe—”
“Go away! And take the…the rat with you!”
She waved her hand wildly and, to her horror and shame, knocked the
little hooded skeleton over an ashtray.
EEK?
The raven took the rat’s cowl in its beak and tried to drag him away, but
a tiny skeletal fist shook its scythe.
EEK IK EEK SQUEAK!
“He says, you don’t mess with the rat,” said the raven.
In a flurry of wings they were gone.
Igor closed the window. He didn’t pass any comment.
“They weren’t real,” said Susan, hurriedly. “Well, that is…the raven’s
probably real, but he hangs around with the rat—”
“Which isn’t real,” said Igor.
“That’s right!” said Susan, gratefully. “You probably didn’t see a thing.”
“That’s right,” said Igor. “Not a thing.”
“Now…how much do I owe you?” said Susan.
Igor counted on his fingers.
“That’ll be a dollar for the drinks,” he said, “and five pence because
the raven that wasn’t here messed in the pickles.”
It was the night before Hogswatch.
In the Archchancellor’s new bathroom Modo wiped his hands on a piece of
rag and looked proudly at his handiwork. Shining porcelain gleamed back
at him. Copper and brass shone in the lamplight.
He was a little worried that he hadn’t been able to test everything, but
Mr. Ridcully had said, “I’ll test it when I use it,” and Modo never
argued with the Gentlemen, as he thought of them. He knew that they all
knew a lot more than he knew, and was quite happy knowing this. He didn’t
meddle with the fabric of time and space, and they kept out of his
greenhouses. The way he saw it, it was a partnership.
He’d been particularly careful to scrub the floors. Mr. Ridcully had been
very specific about that.
“Verruca Gnome,” he said to himself, giving a tap a last polish. “What an
imagination the Gentlemen do have…”
Far off, unheard by anyone, was a faint little noise, like the ringing of
tiny silver bells.
Glingleglingleglingle…
And someone landed abruptly in a snow drift and said, “Bugger!” which is
a terrible thing to say as your first word ever.
Overhead, heedless of the new and somewhat angry life that was even now
dusting itself off, the sleigh soared onward through time and space.
I’M FINDING THE BEARD A BIT OF A TRIAL, said Death.
“Why’ve you got to have the beard?” said the voice from among the sacks.
“I thought you said people see what they expect to see.”
CHILDREN DON’T. TOO OFTEN THEY SEE WHAT’S THERE.
“Well, at least it’s keeping you in the right frame of mind, master. In
character, sort of thing.”
BUT GOING DOWN THE CHIMNEY? WHERE’S THE SENSE IN THAT? I CAN JUST WALK
THROUGH THE WALLS.
“Walking through the walls is not right, neither,” said the voice from
the sacks.
IT WORKS FOR ME.
“It’s got to be chimneys. Same as the beard, really.”
A head thrust itself out from the pile. It appeared to belong to the
oldest, most unpleasant pixie in the universe. The fact that it was
underneath a jolly little green hat with a bell on it did not do anything
to improve matters.
It waved a crabbed hand containing a thick wad of letters, many of them
on pastel-colored paper, often with bunnies and teddy bears on them, and
written mostly in crayon.
“You reckon these little buggers’d be writing to someone who walked
through walls?” it said. “And the ‘Ho, ho, ho’ could use some more work,
if you don’t mind my saying so.”
HO. HO. HO.
“No, no, no!” said Albert. “You got to put a bit of life in it, sir, no
offense intended. It’s got to be a big fat laugh. You got to…you got to
sound like you’re pissing brandy and crapping plum pudding, sir, excuse
my Klatchian.”
REALLY? HOW DO YOU KNOW ALL THIS?
“I was young once, sir. Hung up my stocking like a good boy every year.
For to get it filled with toys, just like you’re doing. Mind you, in
those days basically it was sausages and black puddings if you were lucky.
But you always got a pink sugar piglet in the toe. It wasn’t a good
Hogswatch unless you’d eaten so much you were sick as a pig, master.”
Death looked at the sacks.
It was a strange but demonstrable fact that the sacks of toys carried by
the Hogfather, no matter what they really contained, always appeared to
have sticking out of the top a teddy bear, a toy soldier in the kind of
colorful uniform that would stand out in a disco, a drum and a red-andwhite
candy cane. The actual contents always turned out to be something a
bit garish and costing $5.99.
Death had investigated one or two. There had been a Real Agatean Ninja,
for example, with Fearsome Death Grip, and a Captain Carrot One-Man Night
Watch with a complete wardrobe of toy weapons, each of which cost as much
as the original wooden doll in the first place.
Mind you, the stuff for the girls was just as depressing. It seemed to be
nearly all horses. Most of them were grinning. Horses, Death felt,
shouldn’t grin. Any horse that was grinning was planning something.
He sighed again.
Then there was this business of deciding who’d been naughty or nice. He’d
never had to think about that sort of thing before. Naughty or nice, it
was ultimately all the same.
Still, it had to be done right. Otherwise it wouldn’t work.
The pigs pulled up alongside another chimney.
“Here we are, here we are,” said Albert. “James Riddle, aged eight.”
HAH, YES. HE ACTUALLY SAYS IN HIS LETTER, “I BET YOU DON’T EXIST ’COS
EVERYONE KNOWS ITS YORE PARENTS.” OH, YES, said Death, with what almost
sounded like sarcasm, I’M SURE HIS PARENTS ARE JUST IMPATIENT TO BANG
THEIR ELBOWS IN TWELVE FEET OF NARROW UNSWEPT CHIMNEY, I DON’T THINK. I
SHALL TREAD EXTRA SOOT INTO HIS CARPET.
“Right, sir. Good thinking. Speaking of which—down you go, sir.”
HOW ABOUT IF I DON’T GIVE HIM ANYTHING AS A PUNISHMENT FOR NOT BELIEVING?
“Yeah, but what’s that going to prove?”
Death sighed. I SUPPOSE YOU’RE RIGHT.
“Did you check the list?”
YES. TWICE. ARE YOU SURE THAT’S ENOUGH?
“Definitely.”
COULDN’T REALLY MAKE HEAD OR TAIL OF IT, TO TELL YOU THE TRUTH. HOW CAN I
TELL IF HE’S BEEN NAUGHTY OR NICE, FOR EXAMPLE?
“Oh, well…I don’t know…Has he hung his clothes up, that sort of thing…”
AND IF HE HAS BEEN GOOD I MAY GIVE HIM THIS KLATCHIAN WAR CHARIOT WITH
REAL SPINNING SWORD BLADES?
“That’s right.”
AND IF HE’S BEEN BAD?
Albert scratched his head. “When I was a lad, you got a bag of
bones. ’s’mazing how kids got better behaved toward the end of the year.”
OH DEAR. AND NOW?
Albert held a package up to his ear and rustled it. “Sounds like socks.”
SOCKS.
“Could be a woolly vest.”
SERVE HIM RIGHT, IF I MAY VENTURE TO EXPRESS AN OPINION…
Albert looked across the snowy rooftops and sighed. This wasn’t right. He
was helping because, well, Death was his master and that’s all there was
to it, and if the master had a heart it would be in the right place. But…
“Are you sure we ought to be doing this, master?”
Death stopped, halfway out of the chimney.
CAN YOU THINK OF A BETTER ALTERNATIVE, ALBERT?
And that was it. Albert couldn’t.
Someone had to do it.
There were bears on the street again.
Susan ignored them and didn’t even make a point of not treading on the
cracks.
They just stood around, looking a bit puzzled and slightly transparent,
visible only to children and Susan. News like Susan gets around. The
bears had heard about the poker. Nuts and berries, their expressions
seemed to say. That’s what we’re here for. Big sharp teeth? What big
shar—Oh, these big sharp teeth?…They’re just for, er, cracking nuts. And
some of these berries can be really vicious.
The city’s clocks were striking six when she got back to the house. She
was allowed her own key. It wasn’t as if she was a servant, exactly.
You couldn’t be a duchess and a servant. But it was all right to be a
governess. It was understood that it wasn’t exactly what you were, it was
merely a way of passing the time until you did what every girl, or gel,
was supposed to do in life, i.e., marry some man. It was understood that
you were playing.
The parents were in awe of her. She was the daughter of a duke, whereas
Mr. Gaiter was a man to be reckoned with in the wholesale boots and shoes
business. Mrs. Gaiter was bucking for a transfer into the Upper Classes,
which she currently hoped to achieve by reading books on etiquette. She
treated Susan with the kind of worried deference she thought was due to
anyone who’d known the difference between a serviette and a napkin from
birth.
Susan had never before come across the idea that you could rise in
Society by, as it were, gaining marks, especially since such noblemen as
she’d met in her father’s house had used neither serviette nor napkin but
a state of mind, which was “Drop it on the floor, the dogs’ll eat it.”
When Mrs. Gaiter had tremulously asked her how one addressed the second
cousin of a queen, Susan had replied without thinking, “We called him
Jamie, usually,” and Mrs. Gaiter had had to go and have a headache in her
room.
Mr. Gaiter just nodded when he met her in a passage and never said very
much to her. He was pretty sure he knew where he stood in boots and shoes
and that was that.
Gawain and Twyla, who’d been named by people who apparently loved them,
had been put to bed by the time Susan got in, at their own insistence.
It’s a widely held belief at a certain age that going to bed early makes
tomorrow come faster.
She went to tidy up the schoolroom and get things ready for the morning,
and began to pick up the things the children had left lying around. Then
something tapped at a window pane.
She peered out at the darkness, and then opened the window. A drift of
snow fell down outside.
In the summer the window opened into the branches of a cherry tree. In
the winter dark, they were little gray lines where the snow had settled
on them.
“Who’s that?” said Susan.
Something hopped through the frozen branches.
“Tweet tweet tweet, would you believe?” said the raven.
“Not you again?”
“You wanted maybe some dear little robin? Listen, your grand—”
“Go away!”
Susan slammed the window and pulled the curtains across. She put her back
to them, to make sure, and tried to concentrate on the room. It helped to
think about…normal things.
There was the Hogswatch tree, a rather smaller version of the grand one
in the hall. She’d helped the children to make paper decorations for it.
Yes. Think about that.
There were the paper chains. There were the bits of holly, thrown out
from the main rooms for not having enough berries on them, and now given
fake modeling clay berries and stuck in anyhow on shelves and behind
pictures.
There were two stockings hanging from the mantelpiece of the small
schoolroom grate. There were Twyla’s paintings, all blobby blue skies and
violently green grass and red houses with four square windows. There
were…
Normal things…
She straightened up and stared at them, her fingernails beating a
thoughtful tattoo on a wooden pencil case.
The door was pushed open. It revealed the tousled shape of Twyla, hanging
onto the doorknob with one hand.
“Susan, there’s a monster under my bed again…”
The click of Susan’s fingernails stopped.
“…I can hear it moving about…”
Susan sighed and turned toward the child.
“All right, Twyla. I’ll be along directly.”
The girl nodded and went back to her room, leaping into bed from a
distance as a precaution against claws.
There was a metallic tzing as Susan withdrew the poker from the little
brass stand it shared with the tongs and the coal shovel.
She sighed. Normality was what you made it.
She went into the children’s bedroom and leaned over as if to tuck Twyla
up. Then her hand darted down and under the bed. She grabbed a handful of
hair. She pulled.
The bogeyman came out like a cork but before it could get its balance it
found itself spread-eagled against the wall with one arm behind its back.
But it did manage to turn its head, to see Susan’s face glaring at it
from a few inches away.
Gawain bounced up and down on his bed.
“Do the Voice on it! Do the Voice on it!” he shouted.
“Don’t do the Voice, don’t do the Voice!” pleaded the bogeyman urgently.
“Hit it on the head with the poker!”
“Not the poker! Not the poker!”
“It’s you, isn’t it,” said Susan. “From this afternoon…”
“Aren’t you going to poke it with the poker?” said Gawain.
“Not the poker!” whined the bogeyman.
“New in town?” whispered Susan.
“Yes!” The bogeyman’s forehead wrinkled with puzzlement. “Here, how come
you can see me?”
“Then this is a friendly warning, understand? Because it’s Hogswatch.”
The bogeyman tried to move. “You call this friendly?”
“Ah, you want to try for unfriendly?” said Susan, adjusting her grip.
“No, no, no, I like friendly!”
“This house is out of bounds, right?”
“You a witch or something?” moaned the bogeyman.
“I’m just…something. Now…you won’t be around here again, will you?
Otherwise it’ll be the blanket next time.”
“No!”
“I mean it. We’ll put your head under the blanket.”
“No!”
“It’s got fluffy bunnies on it…”
“No!”
“Off you go, then.”
The bogeyman half fell, half ran toward the door.
“’s not right,” it mumbled. “You’re not s’posed to see us if you ain’t
dead or magic…’s not fair…”
“Try number nineteen,” said Susan, relenting a little. “The governess
there doesn’t believe in bogeymen.”
“Right?” said the monster hopefully.
“She believes in algebra, though.”
“Ah. Nice.” The bogeyman grinned hugely. It was amazing the sort of
mischief that could be caused in a house where no one in authority
thought you existed.
“I’ll be off, then,” it said. “Er. Happy Hogswatch.”
“Possibly,” said Susan, as it slunk away.
“That wasn’t as much fun as the one last month,” said Gawain, getting
between the sheets again. “You know, when you kicked him in the trousers—”
“Just you two get to sleep now,” said Susan.
“Verity said the sooner we got to sleep the sooner the Hogfather would
come,” said Twyla conversationally.
“Yes,” said Susan. “Unfortunately, that might be the case.”
The remark passed right over their heads. She wasn’t sure why it had gone
through hers, but she knew enough to trust her senses.
She hated that kind of sense. It ruined your life. But it was the sense
she had been born with.
The children were tucked in, and she closed the door quietly and went
back to the schoolroom.
Something had changed.
She glared at the stockings, but they were unfulfilled. A paper chain
rustled.
She stared at the tree. Tinsel had been twined around it, badly pastedtogether
decorations had been hung on it. And on top was the fairy made
of—
She crossed her arms, looked up at the ceiling, and sighed theatrically.
“It’s you, isn’t it?” she said.
SQUEAK?
“Yes, it is. You’re sticking out your arms like a scarecrow and you’ve
stuck a little star on your scythe, haven’t you…?”
The Death of Rats hung his head guiltily.
SQUEAK.
“You’re not fooling anyone.”
SQUEAK.
“Get down from there this minute!”
SQUEAK.
“And what did you do with the fairy?”
“It’s shoved under a cushion on the chair,” said a voice from the shelves
on the other side of the room. There was a clicking noise and the raven’s
voice added, “These damn eyeballs are hard, aren’t they?”
Susan raced across the room and snatched the bowl away so fast that the
raven somersaulted and landed on its back.
“They’re walnuts!” she shouted, as they bounced around her. “Not eyeballs!
This is a schoolroom! And the difference between a school and a-a-a raven
deli catessen is that they hardly ever have eyeballs lying around in
bowls in case a raven drops in for a quick snack! Understand? No eyeballs!
The world is full of small round things that aren’t eyeballs! okay?”
The raven’s own eyes revolved.
“’n’ I suppose a bit of warm liver’s out of the question—”
“Shut up! I want both of you out of here right now! I don’t know how you
got in here—”
“There’s a law against coming down the chimney on Hogswatchnight?”
“—but I don’t want you back in my life, understand?”
“The rat said you ought to be warned even if you were crazy,” said the
raven sulkily. “I didn’t want to come, there’s a donkey dropped dead just
outside the city gates, I’ll be lucky now if I get a hoof—”
“Warned?” said Susan.
There it was again. The change in the weather of the mind, a sensation of
tangible time…
The Death of Rats nodded.
There was a scrabbling sound far overhead. A few flakes of soot dropped
down the chimney.
SQUEAK, said the rat, but very quietly.
Susan was aware of a new sensation, as a fish might be aware of a new
tide, a spring of fresh water flowing into the sea. Time was pouring into
the world.
She glanced up at the clock. It was just on half past six.
The raven scratched its beak.
“The rat says…The rat says: you’d better watch out…”
There were others at work on this shining Hogswatch Eve. The Sandman was
out and about, dragging his sack from bed to bed. Jack Frost wandered
from window pane to window pane, making icy patterns.
And one tiny hunched shape slid and slithered along the gutter,
squelching its feet in slush and swearing under its breath.
It wore a stained black suit and, on its head, the type of hat known in
various parts of the multiverse as “bowler,” “derby” or “the one that
makes you look a bit of a twit.” The hat had been pressed down very
firmly and, since the creature had long pointy ears, these had been
forced out sideways and gave it the look of a small malignant wing nut.
The thing was a gnome by shape but a fairy by profession. Fairies aren’t
necessarily little twinkly creatures. It’s purely a job description, and
the commonest ones aren’t even visible.* A fairy is simply any creature
currently employed under supernatural laws to take things away or, as in
the case of the small creature presently climbing up the inside of a
drain pipe and swearing, to bring things.
Oh, yes. He does. Someone has to do it, and he looks the right gnome for
the job.
Oh, yes.
Sideney was worried. He didn’t like violence, and there had been a lot of
it in the last few days, if days passed in this place. The men…well, they
only seemed to find life interesting when they were doing something sharp
to someone else and, while they didn’t bother him much in the same way
that lions don’t trouble themselves with ants, they certainly worried him.
But not as much as Teatime did. Even the brute called Chickenwire treated
Teatime with caution, if not respect, and the monster called Banjo just
followed him around like a puppy.
The enormous man was watching him now.
He reminded Sideney too much of Ronnie Jenks, the bully who’d made his
life miserable at Gammer Wimblestone’s dame school. Ronnie hadn’t been a
pupil. He was the old woman’s grandson or nephew or something, which gave
him a license to hang around the place and beat up any kid smaller or
weaker or brighter than he was, which more or less meant he had the whole
world to choose from. In those circumstances, it was particularly unfair
that he always chose Sideney.
Sideney hadn’t hated Ronnie. He’d been too frightened. He’d wanted to be
his friend. Oh, so much. Because that way, just possibly, he wouldn’t
have his head trodden on such a lot and would actually get to eat his
lunch instead of having it thrown in the privy. And it had been a good
day when it had been his lunch.
And then, despite all Ronnie’s best efforts, Sideney had grown up and
gone to university. Occasionally his mother told him how Ronnie was
getting on (she assumed, in the way of mothers, that because they had
been small boys at school together they had been friends). Apparently he
ran a fruit stall and was married to a girl called Angie.* This was not
enough punishment, Sideney considered.
Banjo even breathed like Ronnie, who had to concentrate on such an
intellectual exercise and always had one blocked nostril. And his mouth
open all the time. He looked as though he was living on invisible
plankton.
He tried to keep his mind on what he was doing and ignore the labored
gurgling behind him. A change in its tone made him look up.
“Fascinating,” said Teatime. “You make it look so easy.”
Sideney sat back, nervously.
“Um…it should be fine now, sir,” he said. “It just got a bit scuffed when
we were piling up the…” He couldn’t bring himself to say it, he even had
to avert his eyes from the heap, it was the sound they’d made. “…the
things,” he finished.
“We don’t need to repeat the spell?” said Teatime.
“Oh, it’ll keep going forever,” said Sideney. “The simple ones do. It’s
just a state change, powered by the…the…it just keeps going…”
He swallowed.
“So,” he said, “I was thinking…since you don’t actually need me, sir,
perhaps…”
“Mr. Brown seems to be having some trouble with the locks on the top
floor,” said Teatime. “That door we couldn’t open, remember? I’m sure
you’ll want to help.”
Sideney’s face fell.
“Um, I’m not a locksmith…”
“They appear to be magical.”
Sideney opened his mouth to say, “But I’m very bad at magical locks,” and
then thought much better of it. He had already fathomed that if Teatime
wanted you to do something, and you weren’t very good at it, then your
best plan, in fact quite possibly your only plan, was to learn to be good
at it very quickly. Sideney was not a fool. He’d seen the way the others
reacted around Teatime, and they were men who did things he’d only
dreamed of.*
At which point he was relieved to see Medium Dave walk down the stairs,
and it said a lot for the effect of Teatime’s stare that anyone could be
relieved to have it punctuated by someone like Medium Dave.
“We’ve found another guard, sir. Up on the sixth floor. He’s been hiding.”
Teatime stood up. “Oh dear,” he said. “Not trying to be heroic, was he?”
“He’s just scared. Shall we let him go?”
“Let him go?” said Teatime. “Far too messy. I’ll go up there. Come along,
Mr. Wizard.”
Sideney followed him reluctantly up the stairs.
The tower—if that’s what it was, he thought; he was used to the odd
architecture at Unseen University and this made UU look normal—was a
hollow tube. No fewer than four spiral staircases climbed the inside,
crisscrossing on landings and occasionally passing through one another in
defiance of generally accepted physics. But that was practically normal
for an alumnus of Unseen University, although technically Sideney had not
alumed. What threw the eye was the absence of shadows. You didn’t notice
shadows, how they delineated things, how they gave texture to the world,
until they weren’t there. The white marble, if that’s what it was, seemed
to glow from the inside. Even when the impossible sun shone through a
window it barely caused faint gray smudges where honest shadows should be.
The tower seemed to avoid darkness.
That was even more frightening than the times when, after a complicated
landing, you found yourself walking up by stepping down the underside of
a stair and the distant floor now hung overhead like a ceiling. He’d
noticed that even the other men shut their eyes when that happened.
Teatime, though, took those stairs three at a time, laughing like a kid
with a new toy.
They reached an upper landing and followed a corridor. The others were
gathered by a closed door.
“He’s barricaded himself in,” said Chickenwire.
Teatime tapped on it. “You in there,” he said. “Come on out. You have my
word you won’t be harmed.”
“No!”
Teatime stood back. “Banjo, knock it down,” he said.
Banjo lumbered forward. The door withstood a couple of massive kicks and
then burst open.
The guard was cowering behind an overturned cabinet. He cringed back as
Teatime stepped over it. “What’re you doing here?” he shouted. “Who are
you?”
“Ah, I’m glad you asked. I’m your worst nightmare!” said Teatime
cheerfully.
The man shuddered.
“You mean…the one with the giant cabbage and the sort of whirring knife
thing?”
“Sorry?” Teatime looked momentarily nonplussed.
“Then you’re the one about where I’m falling, only instead of ground
underneath it’s all—”
“No, in fact I’m—”
The guard sagged. “Awww, not the one where there’s all this kind of, you
know, mud and then everything goes blue—”
“No, I’m—”
“Oh, shit, then you’re the one where there’s this door only there’s no
floor beyond it and then there’s these claws—”
“No,” said Teatime. “Not that one.” He withdrew a dagger from his sleeve.
“I’m the one where this man comes out of nowhere and kills you stone
dead.”
The guard grinned with relief. “Oh, that one,” he said. “But that one’s
not very—”
He crumpled around Teatime’s suddenly out-thrust fist. And then, just
like the others had done, he faded.
“Rather a charitable act there, I feel,” Teatime said as the man vanished.
“But it is nearly Hogswatch, after all.”
Death, pillow slipping gently under his red robe, stood in the middle of
the nursery carpet…
It was an old one. Things ended up in the nursery when they had seen a
complete tour of duty in the rest of the house. Long ago, someone had
made it by carefully knotting long bits of brightly colored rag into a
sacking base, giving it the look of a deflated Rastafarian hedgehog.
Things lived among the rags. There were old rusks, bits of toy, buckets
of dust. It had seen life. It may even have evolved some.
Now the occasional lump of grubby melting snow dropped onto it.
Susan was crimson with anger.
“I mean, why?” she demanded, walking around the figure. “This is
Hogswatch! It’s supposed to be jolly, with mistletoe and holly, and—and
other things ending in olly! It’s a time when people want to feel good
about things and eat until they explode! It’s a time when they want to
see all their relatives—”
She stopped that sentence.
“I mean it’s a time when humans are really human,” she said. “And they
don’t want a…a skeleton at the feast! Especially one, I might add, who’s
wearing a false beard and has got a damn cushion shoved up his robe! I
mean, why?”
Death looked nervous.
ALBERT SAID IT WOULD HELP ME GET INTO THE SPIRIT OF THE THING. ER…IT’S
GOOD TO SEE YOU AGAIN—
There was a small squelchy noise.
Susan spun around, grateful right now for any distraction.
“Don’t think I can’t hear you! They’re grapes, understand? And the other
things are satsumas! Get out of the fruit bowl!”
“Can’t blame a bird for trying,” said the raven sulkily, from the table.
“And you, you leave those nuts alone! They’re for tomorrow!”
SKQUEAF, said the Death of Rats, swallowing hurriedly.
Susan turned back to Death. The Hogfather’s artificial stomach was now at
groin level.
“This is a nice house,” she said. “And this is a good job. And it’s real,
with normal people. And I was looking forward to a real life, where
normal things happen! And suddenly the old circus comes to town. Look at
yourselves. Three Stooges, No Waiting! Well, I don’t know what’s going on,
but you can all leave again, right? This is my life. It doesn’t belong to
any of you. It’s not going to—”
There was a muffled curse, a rush of soot, and a skinny old man landed in
the grate.
“Bum!” he said.
“Good grief!” raged Susan. “And here is Pixie Albert! Well, well, well!
Come along in, do! If the real Hogfather doesn’t come soon there’s not
going to be room.”
HE WON’T BE JOINING US, said Death. The pillow slid softly onto the rug.
“Oh, and why not? Both of the children did letters to him,” said Susan.
“There’re rules, you know.”
YES. THERE ARE RULES. AND THEY’RE ON THE LIST. I CHECKED IT.
Albert pulled the pointy hat off his head and spat out some soot.
“Right. He did. Twice,” he said. “Anything to drink around here?”
“So what have you turned up for?” Susan demanded. “And if it’s for
business reasons, I will add, then that outfit is in extremely poor
taste—”
THE HOGFATHER IS…UNAVAILABLE.
“Unavailable? At Hogswatch?”
YES.
“Why?”
HE IS…LET ME SEE…THERE ISN’T AN ENTIRELY APPROPRIATE HUMAN WORD, SO…LET’S
SETTLE FOR…DEAD. YES. HE IS DEAD.
Susan had never hung up a stocking. She’d never looked for eggs laid by
the Soul Cake Duck. She’d never put a tooth under her pillow in the
serious expectation that a dentally inclined fairy would turn up.
It wasn’t that her parents didn’t believe in such things. They didn’t
need to believe in them. They knew they existed. They just wished they
didn’t.
Oh, there had been presents, at the right time, with a careful label
saying who they were from. And a superb egg on Soul Cake Morning, filled
with sweets. Juvenile teeth earned no less than a dollar each from her
father, without argument.* But it was all straightforward.
She knew now that they’d been trying to protect her. She hadn’t known
then that her father had been Death’s apprentice for a while, and that
her mother was Death’s adopted daughter. She’d had very dim recollections
of being taken a few times to see someone who’d been quite, well, jolly,
in a strange, thin way. And the visits had suddenly stopped. And she’d
met him later and, yes, he had his good side, and for a while she’d
wondered why her parents had been so unfeeling and—
She knew now why they’d tried to keep her away. There was far more to
genetics than little squirmy spirals.
She could walk through walls when she really had to. She could use a tone
of voice that was more like actions than words, that somehow reached
inside people and operated all the right switches. And her hair…
That had only happened recently, though. It used to be unmanageable, but
at around the age of seventeen she had found it more or less managed
itself.
That had lost her several young men. Someone’s hair rearranging itself
into a new style, the tresses curling around themselves like a nest of
kittens, could definitely put the crimp on any relationship.
She’d been making good progress, though. She could go for days now
without feeling anything other than entirely human.
But it was always the case, wasn’t it? You could go out into the world,
succeed on your own terms, and sooner or later some embarrassing old
relative was bound to turn up.
Grunting and swearing, the gnome clambered out of another drain pipe,
jammed its hat firmly on its head, threw its sack onto a snowdrift and
jumped down after it.
“’s a good one,” he said. “Ha, take ’im weeks to get rid of that one!”
He took a crumpled piece of paper out of a pocket and examined it closely.
Then he looked at an elderly figure working away quietly at the next
house.
It was standing by a window, drawing with great concentration on the
glass.
The gnome wandered up, interested, and watched critically.
“Why just fern patterns?” he said, after a while. “Pretty, yeah, but you
wouldn’t catch me puttin’ a penny in your hat for fern patterns.”
The figure turned, brush in hand.
“I happen to like fern patterns,” said Jack Frost coldly.
“It’s just that people expect, you know, sad big-eyed kids, kittens
lookin’ out of boots, little doggies, that sort of thing.”
“I do ferns.”
“Or big pots of sunflowers, happy seaside scenes…”
“And ferns.”
“I mean, s’posing some big high priest wanted you to paint the temple
ceiling with gods ’n’ angels and such like, what’d you do then?”
“He could have as many gods and angels as he liked, provided they—”
“—looked like ferns?”
“I resent the implication that I am solely fern fixated,” said Jack Frost.
“I can also do a very nice paisley pattern.”
“What’s that look like, then?”
“Well…it does, admittedly, have a certain ferny quality to the
uninitiated eye.” Frost leaned forward. “Who’re you?”
The gnome took a step backward.
“You’re not a tooth fairy, are you? I see more and more of them about
these days. Nice girls.”
“Nah. Nah. Not teeth,” said the gnome, clutching his sack.
“What, then?”
The gnome told him.
“Really?” said Jack Frost. “I thought they just turned up.”
“Well, come to that, I thought frost on the windows just happened all by
itself,” said the gnome. “’ere, you don’t half look spiky. I bet you go
through a lot of bed sheets.”
“I don’t sleep,” said Frost icily, turning away. “And now, if you’ll
excuse me, I have a large number of windows to do. Ferns aren’t easy. You
need a steady hand.”
“What do you mean dead?” Susan demanded.
“How can the Hogfather be dead? He’s…isn’t he what you are? An—”
ANTHROPOMORPHIC PERSONIFICATION. YES. HE HAS BECOME SO. THE SPIRIT OF
HOGSWATCH.
“But…how? How can anyone kill the Hogfather? Poisoned sherry? Spikes in
the chimney?”
THERE ARE…MORE SUBTLE WAYS.
“Coff. Coff. Coff. Oh dear, this soot,” said Albert loudly. “Chokes me up
something cruel.”
“And you’ve taken over?” said Susan, ignoring him. “That’s sick!”
Death contrived to look hurt.
“I’ll just go and have a look somewhere,” said Albert, brushing past her
and opening the door.
She pushed it shut quickly.
“And what are you doing here, Albert?” she said, clutching at the straw.
“I thought you’d die if you ever came back to the world!”
AH, BUT WE ARE NOT IN THE WORLD, said Death. WE ARE IN THE SPECIAL
CONGRUENT REALITY CREATED FOR THE HOGFATHER. NORMAL RULES HAVE TO BE
SUSPENDED. HOW ELSE COULD ANYONE GET AROUND THE ENTIRE WORLD IN ONE NIGHT?
“’s right,” said Albert, leering. “One of the Hogfather’s Little Helpers,
me. Official. Got the pointy green hat and everything.” He spotted the
glass of sherry and couple of turnips that the children had left on the
table, and bore down on them.
Susan looked shocked. A couple of days earlier she’d taken the children
to the Hogfather’s Grotto in one of the big shops in The Maul. Of course,
it wasn’t the real one, but it had turned out to be a fairly good actor
in a red suit. There had been people dressed up as pixies, and a picket
outside the shop by the Campaign for Equal Heights.*
None of the pixies had looked anything like Albert. If they had, people
would have only gone into the Grotto armed.
“Been good, ’ave yer?” said Albert, and spat into the fireplace.
Susan stared at him.
Death leaned down. She stared up into the blue glow of his eyes.
YOU ARE KEEPING WELL? he said.
“Yes.”
SELF-RELIANT? MAKING YOUR OWN WAY IN THE WORLD?
“Yes!”
GOOD. WELL, COME, ALBERT. WE WILL LOAD THE STOCKINGS AND GET ON WITH
THINGS.
A couple of letters appeared in Death’s hand.
SOMEONE CHRISTENED THE CHILD TWYLA?
“I’m afraid so, but why—”
AND THE OTHER ONE GAWAIN?
“Yes. But look, how—”
WHY GAWAIN?
“I…suppose it’s a good strong name for a fighter…”
A SELF-FULFILLING PROPHECY, I SUSPECT. I SEE THE GIRL WRITES IN GREEN
CRAYON ON PINK PAPER WITH A MOUSE IN THE CORNER. THE MOUSE IS WEARING A
DRESS.
“I ought to point out that she decided to do that so the Hogfather would
think she was sweet,” said Susan. “Including the deliberate bad spelling.
But look, why are you—”
SHE SAYS SHE IS FIVE YEARS OLD.
“In years, yes. In cynicism, she’s about thirty-five. Why are you doing
the—”
BUT SHE BELIEVES IN THE HOGFATHER?
“She’d believe in anything if there was a dolly in it for her. But you’re
not going to leave without telling me—”
Death hung the stockings back on the mantelpiece.
NOW WE MUST BE GOING. HAPPY HOGSWATCH. ER…OH, YES: HO. HO. HO.
“Nice sherry,” said Albert, wiping his mouth.
Rage overtook Susan’s curiosity. It had to travel quite fast.
“You’ve actually been drinking the actual drinks little children leave
out for the actual Hogfather?” she said.
“Yeah, why not? He ain’t drinking ’em. Not where he’s gone.”
“And how many have you had, may I ask?”
“Dunno, ain’t counted,” said Albert happily.
ONE MILLION, EIGHT HUNDRED THOUSAND, SEVEN HUNDRED AND SIX, said Death.
AND SIXTY-EIGHT THOUSAND, THREE HUNDRED AND NINETEEN PORK PIES. AND ONE
TURNIP.
“It looked pork-pie shaped,” said Albert. “Everything does, after a
while.”
“Then why haven’t you exploded?”
“Dunno. Always had a good digestion.”
TO THE HOGFATHER, ALL PORK PIES ARE AS ONE PORK PIE. EXCEPT THE ONE LIKE
A TURNIP. COME, ALBERT. WE HAVE TRESPASSED ON SUSAN’S TIME.
“Why are you doing this?” Susan screamed.
I AM SORRY. I CANNOT TELL YOU. FORGET YOU SAW ME. IT’S NOT YOUR BUSINESS.
“Not my business? How can—”
AND NOW…WE MUST BE GOING…
“Nighty-night,” said Albert.
The clock struck, twice, for the half-hour. It was still half past six.
And they were gone.
The sleigh hurtled across the sky.
“She’ll try to find out what this is all about, you know,” said Albert.
OH DEAR.
“Especially after you told her not to.”
YOU THINK SO?
“Yeah,” said Albert.
DEAR ME. I STILL HAVE A LOT TO LEARN ABOUT HUMANS, DON’T I?
“Oh…I dunno…” said Albert.
OBVIOUSLY IT WOULD BE QUITE WRONG TO INVOLVE A HUMAN IN ALL THIS. THAT IS
WHY, YOU WILL RECALL, I CLEARLY FORBADE HER TO TAKE AN INTEREST.
“Yeah…you did…”
BESIDES, IT’S AGAINST THE RULES.
“You said them little gray buggers had already broken the rules.”
YES, BUT I CAN’T JUST WAVE A MAGIC WAND AND MAKE IT ALL BETTER. THERE
MUST BE PROCEDURES. Death stared ahead for a moment and then shrugged.
AND WE HAVE SO MUCH TO DO. WE HAVE PROMISES TO KEEP.
“Well, the night is young,” said Albert, sitting back in the sacks.
THE NIGHT IS OLD. THE NIGHT IS ALWAYS OLD.
The pigs galloped on. Then, “No, it ain’t.”
I’M SORRY?
“The night isn’t any older than the day, master. It stands to reason.
There must have been a day before anyone knew what the night was.”
YES, BUT IT’S MORE DRAMATIC.
“Oh. Right, then.”
Susan stood by the fireplace.
It wasn’t as though she disliked Death. Death considered as an individual
rather than life’s final curtain was someone she couldn’t help liking, in
a strange kind of way.
Even so…
The idea of the Grim Reaper filling the Hogswatch stockings of the world
didn’t fit well in her head, no matter which way she twisted it. It was
like trying to imagine Old Man Trouble as the Tooth Fairy. Oh, yes. Old
Man Trouble…now there was a nasty one for you…
But honestly, what kind of sick person went round creeping into little
children’s bedrooms all night?
Well, the Hogfather, of course, but…
There was a little tinkling sound from somewhere near the base of the
Hogswatch tree.
The raven backed away from the shards of one of the glittering balls.
“Sorry,” it mumbled. “Bit of a species reaction there. You know…round,
glittering…sometimes you just gotta peck—”
“That chocolate money belongs to the children!”
SQUEAK? said the Death of Rats, backing away from the shiny coins.
“Why’s he doing this?”
SQUEAK.
“You don’t know either?”
SQUEAK.
“Is there some kind of trouble? Did he do something to the real
Hogfather?”
SQUEAK.
“Why won’t he tell me?”
SQUEAK.
“Thank you. You’ve been very helpful.”
Something ripped, behind her. She turned and saw the raven carefully
removing a strip of red wrapping paper from a package.
“Stop that this minute!”
It looked up guiltily.
“It’s only a little bit,” it said. “No one’s going to miss it.”
“What do you want it for, anyway?”
“We’re attracted to bright colors, right? Automatic reaction.”
“That’s jackdaws!”
“Damn. Is it?”
The Death of Rats nodded. SQUEAK.
“Oh, so suddenly you’re Mr. Ornithologist, are you?” snapped the raven.
Susan sat down and held out her hand.
The Death of Rats leapt onto it. She could feel its claws, like tiny pins.
It was just like those scenes where the sweet and pretty heroine sings a
little duet with Mr. Bluebird.
Similar, anyway.
In general outline, at least. But with more of a PG rating.
“Has he gone funny in the head?”
SQUEAK. The rat shrugged.
“But it could happen, couldn’t it? He’s very old, and I suppose he sees a
lot of terrible things.”
SQUEAK.
“All the trouble in the world,” the raven translated.
“I understood,” said Susan. That was a talent, too. She didn’t understand
what the rat said. She just understood what it meant.
“There’s something wrong and he won’t tell me?” said Susan.
That made her even more angry.
“But Albert is in on it, too,” she added.
She thought: thousands, millions of years in the same job. Not a nice one.
It isn’t always cheerful old men passing away at a great age. Sooner or
later, it was bound to get anyone down.
Someone had to do something. It was like that time when Twyla’s
grandmother had started telling everyone that she was the Empress of
Krull and had stopped wearing clothes.
And Susan was bright enough to know that the phrase “Someone ought to do
something” was not, by itself, a helpful one. People who used it never
added the rider “and that someone is me.” But someone ought to do
something, and right now the whole pool of someones consisted of her, and
no one else.
Twyla’s grandmother had ended up in a nursing home overlooking the sea at
Quirm. That sort of option probably didn’t apply here. Besides, he’d be
unpopular with the other residents.
She concentrated. This was the simplest talent of them all. She was
amazed that other people couldn’t do it. She shut her eyes, placed her
hands palm down in front of her at shoulder height, spread her fingers
and lowered her hands.
When they were halfway down she heard the clock stop ticking. The last
tick was long-drawn-out, like a death rattle.
Time stopped.
But duration continued.
She’d always wondered, when she was small, why visits to her grandfather
could go on for days and yet, when they got back, the calendar was still
plodding along as if they’d never been away.
Now she knew the why, although probably no human being would ever really
understand the how. Sometimes, somewhere, somehow, the numbers on the
clock did not count.
Between every rational moment were a billion irrational ones. Somewhere
behind the hours there was a place where the Hogfather rode, the tooth
fairies climbed their ladders, Jack Frost drew his pictures, the Soul
Cake Duck laid her chocolate eggs. In the endless spaces between the
clumsy seconds Death moved like a witch dancing through raindrops, never
getting wet.
Humans could liv—No, humans couldn’t live here, no, because even when you
diluted a glass of wine with a bathful of water you might have more
liquid but you still had the same amount of wine. A rubber band was still
the same rubber band no matter how far it was stretched.
Humans could exist here, though.
It was never too cold, although the air did prickle like winter air on a
sunny day. But out of human habit Susan got her cloak out of the closet.
SQUEAK.
“Haven’t you got some mice and rats to see to, then?”
“Nah, ’s pretty quiet just before Hogswatch,” said the raven, who was
trying to fold the red paper between his claws. “You get a lot of gerbils
and hamsters and that in a few days, mind. When the kids forget to feed
them or try to find out what makes them go.”
Of course, she’d be leaving the children. But it wasn’t as if anything
could happen to them. There wasn’t any time for it to happen to them in.
She hurried down the stairs and let herself out of the front door.
Snow hung in the air. It was not a poetic description. It hovered like
the stars. When flakes touched Susan they melted with little electric
flashes.
There was a lot of traffic in the street, but it was fossilized in Time.
She walked carefully between it until she reached the entrance to the
park.
The snow had done what even wizards and the Watch couldn’t do, which was
clean up Ankh-Morpork. It hadn’t had time to get dirty. In the morning
it’d probably look as though the city had been covered in coffee meringue,
but for now it mounded the bushes and trees in pure white.
There was no noise. The curtains of snow shut out the city lights. A few
yards into the park and she might as well be in the country.
She stuck her fingers into her mouth and whistled.
“Y’know, that could’ve been done with a bit more ceremony,” said the
raven, who’d perched on a snow-encrusted twig.
“Shut up.”
“’s good, though. Better than most women could do.”
“Shut up.”
They waited.
“Why have you stolen that piece of red paper from a little girl’s
present?” said Susan.
“I’ve got plans,” said the raven darkly.
They waited again.
She wondered what would happen if it didn’t work. She wondered if the rat
would snigger. It had the most annoying snigger in the world.
Then there were hoofbeats and the floating snow burst open and the horse
was there.
Binky trotted round in a circle, and then stood and steamed.
He wasn’t saddled. Death’s horse didn’t let you fall.
If I get on, Susan thought, it’ll all start again. I’ll be out of the
light and into the world beyond this one. I’ll fall off the tightrope.
But a voice inside her said, You want to, though…don’t you…?
Ten seconds later there was only the snow.
The raven turned to the Death of Rats.
“Any idea where I can get some string?”
SQUEAK.
She was watched.
One said, Who is she?
One said, Do we remember that Death adopted a daughter? The young woman
is her daughter.
One said, She is human?
One said, Mostly.
One said, Can she be killed?
One said, Oh, yes.
One said, Well, that’s all right, then.
One said, Er…we don’t think we’re going to get into trouble over this, do
we? All this is not exactly…authorized. We don’t want questions asked.
One said, We have a duty to rid the universe of sloppy thinking.
One said, Everyone will be grateful when they find out.
Binky touched down lightly on Death’s lawn.
Susan didn’t bother with the front door but went around the back, which
was never locked.
There had been changes. One significant change, at least.
There was a cat-flap in the door.
She stared at it.
After a second or two a ginger cat came through the flap, gave her an
I’m-not-hungry-and-you’re-not-interesting look and padded off into the
gardens.
Susan pushed open the door into the kitchen.
Cats of every size and color covered every surface. Hundreds of eyes
swiveled to watch her.
It was Mrs. Gammage all over again, she thought. The old woman was a
regular in Biers for the company and was quite gaga, and one of the
symptoms of those going completely yo-yo was that they broke out in
chronic cats. Usually cats who’d mastered every detail of feline
existence except the whereabouts of the dirt box.
Several of them had their noses in a bowl of cream.
Susan had never been able to see the attraction in cats. They were owned
by the kind of people who liked puddings. There were actual people in the
world whose idea of heaven would be a chocolate cat.
“Push off, the lot of you,” she said. “I’ve never known him to have pets.”
The cats gave her a look to indicate that they were intending to go
somewhere else in any case and strolled off, licking their chops.
The bowl slowly filled up again.
They were obviously living cats. Only life had color here. Everything
else was created by Death. Color, along with plumbing and music, were
arts that escaped the grasp of his genius.
She left them in the kitchen and wandered along to the study.
There were changes here, too. By the look of it, he’d been trying to
learn to play the violin again. He’d never been able to understand why he
couldn’t play music.
The desk was a mess. Books lay open, piled on one another. They were the
ones Susan had never learned to read. Some of the characters hovered
above the pages or moved in complicated little patterns as they read you
while you read them.
Intricate devices had been scattered across the top. They looked vaguely
navigational, but on what oceans and under which stars?
Several pages of parchment had been filled up with Death’s own
handwriting. It was immediately recognizable. No one else Susan had ever
met had handwriting with serifs.
It looked as though he’d been trying to work something out.
NOT KLATCH. NOT HOWONDALAND. NOT THE EMPIRE.
LET US SAY 20 MILLION CHILDREN AT 2 LB OF TOYS PER CHILD.
EQUALS 17,857 TONS. 1,785 TONS PER HOUR.
MEMO: DON’T FORGET THE SOOTY FOOTPRINTS. MORE
PRACTICE ON THE HO HO HO.
CUSHION.
She put the paper back carefully.
Sooner or later it’d get to you. Death was fascinated by humans, and
study was never a one-way thing. A man might spend his life peering at
the private life of elementary particles and then find he either knew who
he was or where he was, but not both. Death had picked up…humanity. Not
the real thing, but something that might pass for it until you examined
it closely.
The house even imitated human houses. Death had created a bedroom for
himself, despite the fact that he never slept. If he really picked things
up from humans, had he tried insanity? It was very popular, after all.
Perhaps, after all these millennia, he wanted to be nice.
She let herself into the Room of Lifetimers. She’d liked the sound of it,
when she was a little girl. But now the hiss of sand from millions of
hourglasses, and the little pings and pops as full ones vanished and new
empty ones appeared, was not so enjoyable. Now she knew what was going on.
Of course, everyone died sooner or later. It just wasn’t right to be
listening to it happening.
She was about to leave when she noticed the open door in a place where
she had never seen a door before.
It was disguised. A whole section of shelving, complete with its
whispering glasses, had swung out.
Susan pushed it back and forth with a finger. When it was shut, you’d
have to look hard to see the crack.
There was a much smaller room on the other side. It was merely the size
of, say, a cathedral. And it was lined floor to ceiling with more
hourglasses that Susan could just see dimly in the light from the big
room. She stepped inside and snapped her fingers.
“Light,” she commanded. A couple of candles sprang into life.
The hourglasses were…wrong.
The ones in the main room, however metaphorical they might be, were
solid-looking things of wood and brass and glass. But these looked as
though they were made of highlights and shadows with no real substance at
all.
She peered at a large one.
The name in it was: OFFLER.
“The crocodile god?” she thought.
Well, gods had a life, presumably. But they never actually died, as far
as she knew. They just dwindled away to a voice on the wind and a
footnote in some textbook on religion.
There were other gods lined up. She recognized a few of them.
But there were smaller lifetimers on the shelf. When she saw the labels
she nearly burst out laughing.
“The Tooth Fairy? The Sandman? John Barleycorn? The Soul Cake Duck? The
God of—what?”
She stepped back, and something crunched under her feet.
There were shards of glass on the floor. She reached down and picked up
the biggest. Only a few letters remained of the name etched into the
glass—
HOGFA…
“Oh, no…it’s true. Granddad, what have you done?”
When she left, the candles winked out. Darkness sprang back.
And in the darkness, among the spilled sand, a faint sizzle and a tiny
spark of light…
Mustrum Ridcully adjusted the towel around his waist.
“How’re we doing, Mr. Modo?”
The University gardener saluted.
“The tanks are full, Mr. Archchancellor, sir!” he said brightly. “And
I’ve been stoking the hot water boilers all day!”
The other senior wizards clustered in the doorway.
“Really, Mustrum, I really think this is most unwise,” said the Lecturer
in Recent Runes. “It was surely sealed up for a purpose.”
“Remember what it said on the door,” said the Dean.
“Oh, they just wrote that on it to keep people out,” said Ridcully,
opening a fresh bar of soap.
“Well, yes,” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies. “That’s right. That’s
what people do.”
“It’s a bathroom,” said Ridcully. “You are all acting as if it’s some
kind of a torture chamber.”
“A bathroom,” said the Dean, “designed by Bloody Stupid Johnson.
Archchancellor Weatherwax only used it once and then had it sealed up!
Mustrum, I beg you to reconsider! It’s a Johnson!”
There was something of a pause, because even Ridcully had to adjust his
mind around this.
The late (or at least severely delayed) Bergholt Stuttley Johnson was
generally recognized as the worst inventor in the world, yet in a very
specialized sense. Merely bad inventors made things that failed to
operate. He wasn’t among these small fry. Any fool could make something
that did absolutely nothing when you pressed the button. He scorned such
fumble-fingered amateurs. Everything he built worked. It just didn’t do
what it said on the box. If you wanted a small ground-to-air missile, you
asked Johnson to design an ornamental fountain. It amounted to pretty
much the same thing. But this never discouraged him, or the morbid
curiosity of his clients. Music, landscape gardening, architecture—there
was no start to his talents.
Nevertheless, it was a little bit surprising to find that Bloody Stupid
had turned to bathroom design. But, as Ridcully said, it was known that
he had designed and built several large musical organs and, when you got
right down to it, it was all just plumbing, wasn’t it?
The other wizards, who’d been there longer than the Archchancellor, took
the view that if Bloody Stupid Johnson had built a fully functional
bathroom he’d actually meant it to be something else.
“Y’know, I’ve always felt that Mr. Johnson was a much maligned man,” said
Ridcully, eventually.
“Well, yes, of course he was,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes, clearly
exasperated. “That’s like saying that jam attracts wasps, you see.”
“Not everything he made worked badly,” said Ridcully stoutly, flourishing
his scrubbing brush. “Look at that thing they use down in the kitchens
for peelin’ the potatoes, for example.”
“Ah, you mean the thing with the brass plate on it saying ‘Improved
Manicure Device,’ Archchancellor?”
“Listen, it’s just water,” snapped Ridcully. “Even Johnson couldn’t do
much harm with water. Modo, open the sluices!”
The rest of the wizards backed away as the gardener turned a couple of
ornate brass wheels.
“I’m fed up with groping around for the soap like you fellows!” shouted
the Archchancellor, as water gushed through hidden channels. “Hygiene.
That’s the ticket!”
“Don’t say we didn’t warn you,” said the Dean, shutting the door.
“Er, I still haven’t worked out where all the pipes lead, sir,” Modo
ventured.
“We’ll find out, never you fear,” said Ridcully happily. He removed his
hat and put on a shower cap of his own design. In deference to his
profession, it was pointy. He picked up a yellow rubber duck.
“Man the pumps, Mr. Modo. Or dwarf them, of course, in your case.”
“Yes, Archchancellor.”
Modo hauled on a lever. The pipes started a hammering noise and steam
leaked out of a few joints.
Ridcully took a last look around the bathroom.
It was a hidden treasure, no doubt about it. Say what you like, old
Johnson must sometimes have got it right, even if it was only by accident.
The entire room, including the floor and ceiling, had been tiled in white,
blue and green. In the center, under its crown of pipes, was Johnson’s
Patent “Typhoon” Superior Indoor Ablutorium with Automatic Soap Dish, a
sanitary poem in mahogany, rosewood and copper.
He’d got Modo to polish every pipe and brass tap until they gleamed. It
had taken ages.
Ridcully shut the frosted door behind him.
The inventor of the ablutionary marvel had decided to make a mere shower
a fully controllable experience, and one wall of the large cubicle held a
marvelous panel covered with brass taps cast in the shape of mermaids and
shells and, for some reason, pomegranates. There were separate feeds for
salt water, hard water and soft water and huge wheels for accurate
control of temperature. Ridcully inspected them with care.
Then he stood back, looked around at the tiles and sang, “Mi, mi, mi!”
His voice reverberated back at him.
“A perfect echo!” said Ridcully, one of nature’s bathroom baritones.
He picked up a speaking tube that had been installed to allow the bather
to communicate with the engineer.
“All cisterns go, Mr. Modo!”
“Aye, aye, sir!”
Ridcully opened the tap marked “Spray” and leapt aside, because part of
him was still well aware that Johnson’s inventiveness didn’t just push
the edge of the envelope but often went across the room and out through
the wall of the sorting office.
A gentle shower of warm water, almost a caressing mist, enveloped him.
“My word!” he exclaimed, and tried another tap.
“Shower” turned out to be a little more invigorating. “Torrent” made him
gasp for breath and “Deluge” sent him groping to the panel because the
top of his head felt that it was being removed. “Wave” sloshed a wall of
warm salt water from one side of the cubicle to the other before it
disappeared into the grating that was set into the middle of the floor.
“Are you all right, sir?” Modo called out.
“Marvelous! And there’s a dozen knobs I haven’t tried yet!”
Modo nodded, and tapped a valve. Ridcully’s voice, raised in what he
considered to be song, boomed out through the thick clouds of steam.
“Oh, IIIIIII knew a…er…an agricultural worker of some description,
possibly a thatcher…
And I knew him well, and he—he was a farmer, now I come to think of it—
and he had a daughter and her name I can’t recall at the moment,
And…Where was I? Ah yes. Chorus:
Something something, a humorously shaped vegetable, a turnip, I believe,
something something and the sweet and the sweet
nightingaleeeeaarggooooooh-ARRGHH oh oh oh—”
The song shut off suddenly. All Modo could hear was a ferocious gushing
noise.
“Archchancellor?”
After a moment a voice answered from near the ceiling. It sounded
somewhat high and hesitant.
“Er…I wonder if you would be so very good as to shut the water off from
out there, my dear chap? Er…quite gently, if you wouldn’t mind…”
Modo carefully spun a wheel. The gushing sound gradually subsided.
“Ah. Well done,” said the voice, but now from somewhere nearer floor
level. “Well. Jolly good job. I think we can definitely call it a success.
Yes, indeed. Er. I wonder if you could help me walk for a moment. I
inexplicably feel a little unsteady on my feet…”
Modo pushed open the door and helped Ridcully out and onto a bench. He
looked rather pale.
“Yes, indeed,” said the Archchancellor, his eyes a little glazed.
“Astoundingly successful. Er. Just a minor point, Modo—”
“Yes, sir?”
“There’s a tap in there we perhaps should leave alone for now,” said
Ridcully. “I’d esteem it a service if you could go and make a little sign
to hang on it.”
“Yes, sir?”
“Saying ‘Do not touch at all,’ or something like that.”
“Right, sir.”
“Hang it on the one marked ‘Old Faithful.’”
“Yes, sir.”
“No need to mention it to the other fellows.”
“Yes, sir.”
“Ye gods, I’ve never felt so clean.”
From a vantage point among some ornamental tile work near the ceiling a
small gnome in a bowler hat watched Ridcully carefully.
When Modo had gone, the Archchancellor slowly began to dry himself on a
big fluffy towel. As he got his composure back, so another song wormed
its way under his breath.
“On the second day of Hogswatch I…sent my true love back
A nasty little letter, hah, yes indeed, and a partridge in a pear tree—”
The gnome slid down onto the tiles and crept up behind the briskly
shaking shape.
Ridcully, after a few more trial runs, settled on a song which evolves
somewhere on every planet where there are winters. It’s often dragooned
into the service of some local religion and a few words are changed, but
it’s really about things that have to do with gods only in the same way
that roots have to do with leaves.
“—the rising of the sun, and the running of the deer—”
Ridcully spun. A corner of wet towel caught the gnome on the ear and
flicked it onto its back.
“I saw you creeping up!” roared the Archchancellor. “What’s the game,
then? Small-time thief, are you?”
The gnome slid backward on the soapy surface.
“’ere, what’s your game, mister, you ain’t supposed to be able to see me!”
“I’m a wizard! We can see things that are really there, you know,” said
Ridcully. “And in the case of the Bursar, things that aren’t there, too.
What’s in this bag?”
“You don’t wanna open the bag, mister! You really don’t wanna open the
bag!”
“Why? What have you got in it?”
The gnome sagged. “It ain’t what’s in it, mister. It’s what’ll come out.
I has to let ’em out one at a time, no knowin’ what’d happen if they all
gets out at once!”
Ridcully looked interested, and started to undo the string.
“You’ll really wish you hadn’t, mister!” the gnome pleaded.
“Will I? What’re you doing here, young man?”
The gnome gave up.
“Well…you know the Tooth Fairy?”
“Yes. Of course,” said Ridcully.
“Well…I ain’t her. But…it’s sort of like the same business…”
“What? You take things away?”
“Er…not take away, as such. More sort of…bring…”
“Ah…like new teeth?”
“Er…like new verrucas,” said the gnome.
Death threw the sack into the back of the sleigh and climbed in after it.
“You’re doing well, master,” said Albert.
THIS CUSHION IS STILL UNCOMFORTABLE, said Death, hitching his belt. I AM
NOT USED TO A BIG FAT STOMACH.
“Just a stomach’s the best I could do, master. You’re starting off with a
handicap, sort of thing.”
Albert unscrewed the top off a bottle of cold tea. All the sherry had
made him thirsty.
“Doing well, master,” he repeated, taking a pull. “All the soot in the
fireplace, the footprints, them swigged sherries, the sleigh tracks all
over the roofs…it’s got to work.”
YOU THINK SO?
“Sure.”
AND I MADE SURE SOME OF THEM SAW ME. I KNOW IF THEY ARE PEEPING, Death
added proudly.
“Well done, sir.”
YES.
“Though here’s a tip, though. Just ‘ho, ho, ho’ will do. Don’t say,
‘Cower, brief mortals’ unless you want them to grow up to be moneylenders
or some such.”
HO. HO. HO.
“Yes, you’re really getting the hang of it.” Albert looked down hurriedly
at his notebook so that Death wouldn’t see his face. “Now, I got to tell
you, master, what’ll really do some good is a public appearance. Really.”
OH. I DON’T NORMALLY DO THEM.
“The Hogfather’s more of a public figure, master. And one good public
appearance’ll do more good than any amount of letting kids see you by
accident. Good for the old belief muscles.”
REALLY? HO. HO. HO.
“Right, right, that’s really good, master. Where was I…yes…the shops’ll
be open late. Lots of kiddies get taken to see the Hogfather, you see.
Not the real one, of course. Just some ole geezer with a pillow up his
jumper, saving yer presence, master.”
NOT REAL? HO. HO. HO.
“Oh, no. And you don’t need—”
THE CHILDREN KNOW THIS? HO. HO. HO.
Albert scratched his nose. “S’pose so, master.”
THIS SHOULD NOT BE. NO WONDER THERE HAS BEEN…THIS DIFFICULTY. BELIEF WAS
COMPROMISED? HO. HO. HO.
“Could be, master. Er, the ‘ho, ho—’”
WHERE DOES THIS TRAVESTY TAKE PLACE? HO. HO. HO.
Albert gave up. “Well, Crumley’s in The Maul, for one. Very popular, the
Hogfather Grotto. They always have a good Hogfather, apparently.”
LET’S GET THERE AND SLEIGH THEM. HO. HO. HO.
“Right you are, master.”
THAT WAS A PUNE OR PLAY ON WORDS, ALBERT. I DON’T KNOW IF YOU NOTICED.
“I’m laughing like hell deep down, sir.”
HO. HO. HO.
Archchancellor Ridcully grinned.
He often grinned. He was one of those men who grinned even when they were
annoyed, but right now he grinned because he was proud. A little sore
still, perhaps, but still proud.
“Amazing bathroom, ain’t it?” he said. “They had it walled up, you know.
Damn silly thing to do. I mean, perhaps there were a few teething
troubles,” he shifted gingerly, “but that’s only to be expected. It’s got
everything, d’you see? Footbaths in the shape of clam shells, look. A
whole wardrobe for dressing gowns. And that tub over there’s got a big
blower thingy so’s you get bubbly water without even havin’ to eat
starchy food. And this thingy here with the mermaids holdin’ it up’s a
special pot for your toenail clippings. It’s got everything, this place.”
“A special pot for nail clippings?” said the Verruca Gnome.
“Oh, can’t be too careful,” said Ridcully, lifting the lid of an ornate
jar marked BATH SALTS and pulling out a bottle of wine. “Get hold of
something like someone’s nail clipping and you’ve got ’em under your
control. That’s real old magic. Dawn-of-time stuff.”
He held the wine bottle up to the light.
“Should be cooled nicely by now,” he said, extracting the cork. “Verrucas,
eh?”
“Wish I knew why,” said the gnome.
“You mean you don’t know?”
“Nope. Suddenly I wake up and I’m the Verruca Gnome.”
“Puzzling, that,” said Ridcully. “My dad used to say the Verruca Gnome
turned up if you walked around in bare feet but I never knew you existed.
I thought he just made it up. I mean, tooth fairies, yes, and them little
buggers that live in flowers, used to collect ’em myself as a lad, but
can’t recall anything about verrucas.” He drank thoughtfully. “Got a
distant cousin called Verruca, as a matter of fact. It’s quite a nice
sound, when you come to think of it.”
He looked at the gnome over the top of his glass.
You didn’t become Archchancellor without a feeling for subtle wrongness
in a situation. Well, that wasn’t quite true. It was more accurate to say
that you didn’t remain Archchancellor for very long.
“Good job, is it?” he said thoughtfully.
“Dandruff’d be better,” said the gnome. “At least I’d be out in the fresh
air.”
“I think we’d better check up on this,” said Ridcully. “Of course, it
might be nothing.”
“Oh, thank you,” said the Verruca Gnome, gloomily.
It was a magnificent Grotto this year, Vernon Crumley told himself. The
staff had worked really hard. The Hogfather’s sleigh was a work of art in
itself, and the pigs looked really real and a wonderful shade of pink.
The Grotto took up nearly all of the first floor. One of the pixies had
been Disciplined for smoking behind the Magic Tinkling Waterfall, and the
clockwork Dolls of All Nations showing how We Could All Get Along were a
bit jerky and giving trouble but all in all, he told himself, it was a
display to Delight the Hearts of Kiddies everywhere.
The Kiddies were queuing up with their parents and watching the display
owlishly.
And the money was coming in. Oh, how the money was coming in.
So that the staff would not be Tempted, Mr. Crumley had set up an
arrangement of overhead wires across the ceilings of the store. In the
middle of each floor was a cashier in a little cage. Staff took money
from customers, put it in a little clockwork cable car, sent it whizzing
overhead to the cashier, who’d make change and start it rattling back
again. Thus there was no possibility of Temptation, and the little
trolleys were shooting back and forth like fireworks.
Mr. Crumley loved Hogswatch. It was for the Kiddies, after all.
He tucked his fingers in the pockets of his waistcoat and beamed.
“Everything going well, Miss Harding?”
“Yes, Mr. Crumley,” said the cashier, meekly.
“Jolly good.” He looked at the pile of coins.
A bright little zigzag crackled off them and earthed itself on the metal
grille.
Mr. Crumley blinked. In front of him sparks flashed off the steel rims of
Miss Harding’s spectacles.
The Grotto display changed. For just a fraction of a second Mr. Crumley
had the sensation of speed, as though what appeared had screeched to a
halt. Which was ridiculous.
The four pink papier-mâché pigs exploded. A cardboard snout bounced off
Mr. Crumley’s head.
There, sweating and grunting in the place where the little piggies had
been, were…well, he assumed they were pigs, because hippopotamuses didn’t
have pointy ears and rings through their noses. But the creatures were
huge and gray and bristly and a cloud of acrid mist hung over each one.
And they didn’t look sweet. There was nothing charming about them. One
turned to look at him with small, red eyes, and didn’t go “oink,” which
was the sound that Mr. Crumley, born and raised in the city, had always
associated with pigs.
It went “Ghnaaarrrwnnkh?”
The sleigh had changed, too. He’d been very pleased with that sleigh. It
had delicate silver curly bits on it. He’d personally supervised the
gluing on of every twinkling star. But the splendor of it was lying in
glittering shards around a sleigh that looked as though it had been built
of crudely sawn tree trunks laid on two massive wooden runners. It looked
ancient and there were faces carved on the wood, nasty crude grinning
faces that looked quite out of place.
Parents were yelling and trying to pull their children away, but they
weren’t having much luck. The children were gravitating toward it like
flies to jam.
Mr. Crumley ran toward the terrible thing, waving his hands.
“Stop that! Stop that!” he screamed. “You’ll frighten the Kiddies!”
He heard a small boy behind him say, “They’ve got tusks! Cool!”
His sister said, “Hey, look, that one’s doing a wee!” A tremendous cloud
of yellow steam arose. “Look, it’s going all the way to the stairs! All
those who can’t swim hold onto the banisters!”
“They eat you if you’re bad, you know,” said a small girl with obvious
approval. “All up. Even the bones. They crunch them.”
Another, older, child opined: “Don’t be childish. They’re not real.
They’ve just got a wizard in to do the magic. Or it’s all done by
clockwork. Everyone knows they’re not really r—”
One of the boars turned to look at him. The boy moved behind his mother.
Mr. Crumley, tears of anger streaming down his face, fought through the
milling crowd until he reached the Hogfather’s Grotto. He grabbed a
frightened pixie.
“It’s the Campaign for Equal Heights that’ve done this, isn’t it!” he
shouted. “They’re out to ruin me! And they’re ruining it for all the
Kiddies! Look at the lovely dolls!”
The pixie hesitated. Children were clustering around the pigs, despite
the continued efforts of their mothers. The small girl was giving one of
them an orange.
But the animated display of Dolls of All Nations was definitely in
trouble. The musical box underneath was still playing “Wouldn’t It Be
Nice If Everyone Was Nice” but the rods that animated the figures had got
twisted out of shape, so that the Klatchian boy was rhythmically hitting
the Omnian girl over the head with his ceremonial spear, while the girl
in Agatean national costume was kicking a small Llamedosian druid
repeatedly in the ear. A chorus of small children was cheering them on
indiscriminately.
“There’s, er, there’s more trouble in the Grotto, Mr. Crum—” the pixie
began.
A red and white figure pushed its way through the crush and rammed a
false beard into Mr. Crumley’s hands.
“That’s it,” said the old man in the Hogfather costume. “I don’t mind the
smell of oranges and the damp trousers but I ain’t putting up with this.”
He stamped off through the queue. Mr. Crumley heard him add, “And he’s
not even doin’ it right!”
Mr. Crumley forced his way onward.
Someone was sitting in the big chair. There was a child on his knee. The
figure was…strange. It was definitely in something like a Hogfather
costume but Mr. Crumley’s eye kept slipping, it wouldn’t focus, it
skittered away and tried to put the figure on the very edge of vision. It
was like trying to look at your own ear.
“What’s going on here? What’s going on here?” Crumley demanded.
A hand took his shoulder firmly. He turned round and looked into the face
of a Grotto pixie. At least, it was wearing the costume of a Grotto pixie,
although somewhat askew, as if it had been put on in a hurry.
“Who are you?”
The pixie took the soggy cigarette end out of its mouth and leered at him.
“Call me Uncle Heavy,” he said.
“You’re not a pixie!”
“Nah, I’m a fairy cobbler, mister.”
Behind Crumley, a voice said:
AND WHAT DO YOU WANT FOR HOGSWATCH, SMALL HUMAN?
Mr. Crumley turned in horror.
In front of—well, he had to think of it as the usurping Hogfather—was a
small child of indeterminate sex who seemed to be mostly woollen bobble
hat.
Mr. Crumley knew how it was supposed to go. It was supposed to go like
this: the child was always struck dumb and the attendant mother would
lean forward and catch the Hogfather’s eye and say very pointedly, in
that voice adults use when they’re conspiring against children: “You want
a Baby Tinkler Doll, don’t you, Doreen? And the Just Like Mummy Cookery
Set you’ve got in the window. And the Cut-Out Kitchen Range Book. And
what do you say?”
And the stunned child would murmur “’nk you” and get given a balloon or
an orange.
This time, though, it didn’t work like that.
Mother got as far as “You want a—”
WHY ARE YOUR HANDS ON BITS OF STRING, CHILD?
The child looked down the length of its arms to the dangling mittens
affixed to its sleeves. It held them up for inspection.
“Glubs,” it said.
I SEE. VERY PRACTICAL.
“Are you weal?” said the bobble hat.
WHAT DO YOU THINK?
The bobble hat sniggered. “I saw your piggy do a wee!” it said, and
implicit in the tone was the suggestion that this was unlikely to be
dethroned as the most enthralling thing the bobble hat had ever seen.
OH. ER…GOOD.
“It had a gwate big—”
WHAT DO YOU WANT FOR HOGSWATCH? said the Hogfather hurriedly.
Mother took her economic cue again, and said briskly: “She wants a—”
The Hogfather snapped his fingers impatiently. The mother’s mouth slammed
shut.
The child seemed to sense that here was a once-in-a-lifetime opportunity
and spoke quickly.
“I wanta narmy. Anna big castle wif pointy bits,” said the child. “Anna
swored.”
WHAT DO YOU SAY? prompted the Hogfather.
“A big swored?” said the child, after a pause for deep cogitation.
THAT’S RIGHT.
Uncle Heavy nudged the Hogfather.
“They’re supposed to thank you,” he said.
ARE YOU SURE? PEOPLE DON’T, NORMALLY.
“I meant they thank the Hogfather,” Albert hissed. “Which is you, right?”
YES, OF COURSE. AHEM. YOU’RE SUPPOSED TO SAY THANK YOU.
“’nk you.”
AND BE GOOD. THIS IS PART OF THE ARRANGEMENT.
“’es.”
THEN WE HAVE A CONTRACT. The Hogfather reached into his sack and
produced—
—a very large model castle with, as correctly interpreted, pointy blue
cone roofs on turrets suitable for princesses to be locked in—
—a box of several hundred assorted knights and warriors—
—and a sword. It was four feet long and glinted along the blade.
The mother took a deep breath.
“You can’t give her that!” she screamed. “It’s not safe!”
IT’S A SWORD, said the Hogfather. THEY’RE NOT MEANT TO BE SAFE.
“She’s a child!” shouted Crumley.
IT’S EDUCATIONAL.
“What if she cuts herself?”
THAT WILL BE AN IMPORTANT LESSON.
Uncle Heavy whispered urgently.
REALLY? OH, WELL. IT’S NOT FOR ME TO ARGUE, I SUPPOSE.
The blade went wooden.
“And she doesn’t want all that other stuff!” said Doreen’s mother, in the
face of previous testimony. “She’s a girl! Anyway, I can’t afford big
posh stuff like that!”
I THOUGHT I GAVE IT AWAY, said the Hogfather, sounding bewildered.
“You do?” said the mother.
“You do?” said Crumley, who’d been listening in horror. “You don’t!
That’s our Merchandise! You can’t give it away! Hogswatch isn’t about
giving it all away! I mean…yes, of course, of course things are given
away,” he corrected himself, aware that people were watching, “but first
they have to be bought, d’you see, I mean…haha.” He laughed nervously,
increasingly aware of the strangeness around him and the rangy look of
Uncle Heavy. “It’s not as though the toys are made by little elves at the
Hub, ahaha…”
“Damn right,” said Uncle Heavy sagely. “You’d have to be a maniac even to
think of giving an elf a chisel, less’n you want their initials carved on
your forehead.”
“You mean this is all free?” said Doreen’s mother sharply, not to be
budged from what she saw as the central point.
Mr. Crumley looked helplessly at the toys. They certainly didn’t look
like any of his stock.
Then he tried to look hard at the new Hogfather. Every cell in his brain
was telling him that here was a fat jolly man in a red and white suit.
Well…nearly every cell. A few of the sparkier ones were saying that his
eyes were reporting something else, but they couldn’t agree on what. A
couple had shut down completely.
The words escaped through his teeth.
“It…seems to be,” he said.
Although it was Hogswatch the University buildings were bustling. Wizards
didn’t go to bed early in any case,* and of course there was the
Hogswatchnight Feast to look forward to at midnight.
It would give some idea of the scale of the Hogswatchnight Feast that a
light snack at UU consisted of a mere three or four courses, not counting
the cheese and nuts.
Some of the wizards had been practicing for weeks. The Dean in particular
could now lift a twenty-pound turkey on one fork. Having to wait until
midnight merely put a healthy edge on appetites already professionally
honed.
There was a general air of pleasant expectancy about the place, a general
sizzling of salivary glands, a general careful assembling of the pills
and powders against the time, many hours ahead, when eighteen courses
would gang up somewhere below the rib cage and mount a counterattack.
Ridcully stepped out into the snow and turned up his collar. The lights
were all on in the High Energy Magic Building.
“I don’t know, I don’t know,” he muttered. “Hogswatchnight and they’re
still working. It’s just not natural. When I was a student I’d have been
sick twice by now—”
In fact Ponder Stibbons and his group of research students had made a
concession to Hogswatchnight. They’d draped holly over Hex and put a
paper hat on the big glass dome containing the main ant heap.
Every time he came in here, it seemed to Ridcully, something more had
been done to the…engine, or thinking machine, or whatever it was.
Sometimes stuff turned up overnight. Occasionally, according to Stibbons,
Hex hims—itself would draw plans for extra bits that he—it needed. It all
gave Ridcully the willies, and an additional willy was engendered right
now when he saw the Bursar sitting in front of the thing. For a moment,
he forgot all about verrucas.
“What’re you doing here, old chap?” he said. “You should be inside,
jumping up and down to make more room for tonight.”
“Hooray for the pink, gray and green,” said the Bursar.
“Er…we thought Hex might be of…you know…help, sir,” said Ponder Stibbons,
who liked to think of himself as the University’s token sane person.
“With the Bursar’s problem. We thought it might be a nice Hogswatch
present for him.”
“Ye gods, Bursar’s got no problems,” said Ridcully, and patted the
aimlessly smiling man on the head while mouthing the words “mad as a
spoon.” “Mind just wanders a bit, that’s all. I said MIND WANDERS A BIT,
eh? Only to be expected, spends far too much time addin’ up numbers.
Doesn’t get out in the fresh air. I said, YOU DON’T GET OUT IN THE FRESH
AIR, OLD CHAP!”
“We thought, er, he might like someone to talk to,” said Ponder.
“What? What? But I talk to him all the time! I’m always trying to take
him out of himself,” said Ridcully. “It’s important to stop him mopin’
around the place.”
“Er…yes…certainly,” said Ponder diplomatically. He recalled the Bursar as
a man whose idea of an exciting time had once been a soft-boiled egg.
“So…er…well, let’s give it another try, shall we? Are you ready, Mr.
Dinwiddie?”
“Yes, thank you, a green one with cinnamon if it’s not too much trouble.”
“Can’t see how he can talk to a machine,” said Ridcully, in a sullen
voice. “The thing’s got no damn ears.”
“Ah, well, in fact we made it one ear,” said Ponder. “Er…”
He pointed to a large drum in a maze of tubes.
“Isn’t that old Windle Poons’s ear trumpet sticking out of the end?” said
Ridcully suspiciously.
“Yes, Archchancellor.” Ponder cleared his throat. “Sound, you see, comes
in waves—”
He stopped. Wizardly premonitions rose in his mind. He just knew Ridcully
was going to assume he was talking about the sea. There was going to be
one of those huge bottomless misunderstandings that always occurred
whenever anyone tried to explain anything to the Archchancellor. Words
like “surf,” and probably “ice cream” and “sand” were just…
“It’s all done by magic, Archchancellor,” he said, giving up.
“Ah. Right,” said Ridcully. He sounded a little disappointed. “None of
that complicated business with springs and cogwheels and tubes and stuff,
then.”
“That’s right, sir,” said Ponder. “Just magic. Sufficiently advanced
magic.”
“Fair enough. What’s it do?”
“Hex can hear what you say.”
“Interesting. Saves all that punching holes in bits of cards and hitting
keys you lads are forever doing, then—”
“Watch this, sir,” said Ponder. “All right, Adrian, initialize the GBL.”
“How do you do that, then?” said Ridcully, behind him.
“It…it means pull the great big lever,” Ponder said, reluctantly.
“Ah. Takes less time to say.”
Ponder sighed. “Yes, that’s right, Archchancellor.”
He nodded to one of the students, who pulled a large red lever marked “Do
Not Pull.” Gears spun, somewhere inside Hex. Little trapdoors opened in
the ant farms and millions of ants began to scurry along the networks of
glass tubing. Ponder tapped at the huge wooden keyboard.
“Beats me how you fellows remember how to do all this stuff,” said
Ridcully, still watching him with what Ponder considered to be amused
interest.
“Oh, it’s largely intuitive, Archchancellor,” said Ponder. “Obviously you
have to spend a lot of time learning it first, though. Now, then, Bursar,”
he added. “If you’d just like to say something…”
“He says, SAY SOMETHING, BURSAAAR!” yelled Ridcully helpfully, into the
Bursar’s ear.
“Corkscrew? It’s a tickler, that’s what Nanny says,” said the Bursar.
Things started to spin inside Hex. At the back of the room a huge
converted waterwheel covered with sheep skulls began to turn, ponderously.
And the quill pen in its network of springs and guiding arms started to
write:
+++ Why Do You Think You Are A Tickler? +++
For a moment the Bursar hesitated. Then he said, “I’ve got a spoon of my
own, you know.”
+++ Tell Me About Your Spoon +++
“Er…it’s a little spoon…”
+++ Does Your Spoon Worry You? +++
The Bursar frowned. Then he seemed to rally. “Whoops, here comes Mr.
Jelly,” he said, but he didn’t sound as though his heart was in it.
+++ How Long Have You Been Mr. Jelly? +++
The Bursar glared. “Are you making fun of me?” he said.
“Amazin’!” said Ridcully. “It’s got him stumped! ’s better than dried
frog pills! How did you work it out?”
“Er…” said Ponder. “It sort of just happened…”
“Amazin’,” said Ridcully. He knocked the ashes out of his pipe on Hex’s
“Anthill Inside” sticker, causing Ponder to wince. “This thing’s a kind
of big artificial brain, then?”
“You could think of it like that,” said Ponder, carefully. “Of course,
Hex doesn’t actually think. Not as such. It just appears to be thinking.”
“Ah. Like the Dean,” said Ridcully. “Any chance of fitting a brain like
this into the Dean’s head?”
“It does weigh ten tons, Archchancellor.”
“Ah. Really? Oh. Quite a large crowbar would be in order, then.” He
paused, and then reached into his pocket. “I knew I’d come here for
something,” he added. “This here chappie is the Verruca Gnome—”
“Hello,” said the Verruca Gnome shyly.
“—who seems to have popped into existence to be with us here tonight. And,
you know, I thought: this is a bit odd. Of course, there’s always
something a bit unreal about Hogswatchnight,” said Ridcully. “Last night
of the year and so on. The Hogfather whizzin’ around and so forth. Time
of the darkest shadows and so on. All the old year’s occult rubbish pilin’
up. Anythin’ could happen. I just thought you fellows might check up on
this. Probably nothing to worry about.”
“A Verruca Gnome?” said Ponder.
The gnome clutched his sack protectively.
“Makes about as much sense as a lot of things, I suppose,” said Ridcully.
“After all, there’s a Tooth Fairy, ain’ there? You might as well wonder
why we have a God of Wine and not a God of Hangovers—”
He stopped.
“Anyone else hear that noise just then?” he said.
“Sorry, Archchancellor?”
“Sort of glingleglingleglingle? Like little tinkly bells?”
“Didn’t hear anything like that, sir.”
“Oh.” Ridcully shrugged. “Anyway…what was I saying…yes…no one’s ever
heard of a Verruca Gnome until tonight.”
“That’s right,” said the gnome. “Even I’ve never heard of me until
tonight, and I’m me.”
“We’ll see what we can find out, Archchancellor,” said Ponder
diplomatically.
“Good man.” Ridcully put the gnome back in his pocket and looked up at
Hex.
“Amazin’,” he said again. “He just looks as though he’s thinking, right?”
“Er…yes.”
“But he’s not actually thinking?”
“Er…no.”
“So…he just gives the impression of thinking but really it’s just a show?”
“Er…yes.”
“Just like everyone else, then, really,” said Ridcully.
The boy gave the Hogfather an appraising stare as he sat down on the
official knee.
“Let’s be absolutely clear. I know you’re just someone dressed up,” he
said. “The Hogfather is a biological and temporal impossibility. I hope
we understand one another.”
AH. SO I DON’T EXIST?
“Correct. This is just a bit of seasonal frippery and, I may say,
rampantly commercial. My mother’s already bought my presents. I
instructed her as to the right ones, of course. She often gets things
wrong.”
The Hogfather glanced briefly at the smiling, worried image of maternal
ineffectiveness hovering nearby.
HOW OLD ARE YOU, BOY?
The child rolled his eyes. “You’re not supposed to say that,” he said. “I
have done this before, you know. You have to start by asking me my name.”
AARON FIDGET, “THE PINES,” EDGEWAY ROAD, ANKH-MORPORK.
“I expect someone told you,” said Aaron. “I expect these people dressed
up as pixies get the information from the mothers.”
AND YOU ARE EIGHT, GOING ON…OH, ABOUT FORTY-FIVE, said the Hogfather.
“There’s forms to fill in when they pay, I expect,” said Aaron.
AND YOU WANT WALNUT’S INOFFENSIVE REPTILES OF THE STO PLAINS, A DISPLAY
CABINET, A COLLECTOR’S ALBUM, A KILLING JAR AND A LIZARD PRESS. WHAT IS A
LIZARD PRESS?
“You can’t glue them in when they’re still fat, or didn’t you know that?
I expect she told you about them when I was momentarily distracted by the
display of pencils. Look, shall we end this charade? Just give me my
orange and we’ll say no more about it.”
I CAN GIVE FAR MORE THAN ORANGES.
“Yes, yes, I saw all that. Probably done in collusion with accomplices to
attract gullible customers. Oh dear, you’ve even got a false beard. By
the way, old chap, did you know that your pig—”
YES.
“All done by mirrors and string and pipes, I expect. It all looked very
artificial to me.”
The Hogfather snapped his fingers.
“That’s probably a signal, I expect,” said the boy, getting down. “Thank
you very much.”
HAPPY HOGSWATCH, said the Hogfather as the boy walked away.
Uncle Heavy patted him on the shoulder.
“Well done, master,” he said. “Very patient. I’d have given him a clonk
athwart the ear hole, myself.”
OH, I’M SURE HE’LL SEE THE ERROR OF HIS WAYS. The red hood turned so that
only Albert could see into its depths. RIGHT AROUND THE TIME HE OPENS
THOSE BOXES HIS MOTHER WAS CARRYING…
HO. HO. HO.
“Don’t tie it so tight! Don’t tie it so tight!”
SQUEAK.
There was a bickering behind Susan as she sought along the shelves in the
canyons of Death’s huge library, which was so big that clouds would form
in it if they dared.
“Right, right,” said the voice she was trying to ignore. “That’s about
right. I’ve got to be able to move my wings, right?”
SQUEAK.
“Ah,” said Susan, under her breath. “The Hogfather…”
He had several shelves, not just one book. The first volume seemed to be
written on a roll of animal skin. The Hogfather was old.
“Okay, okay. How does it look?”
SQUEAK.
“Miss?” said the raven, seeking a second opinion.
Susan looked up. The raven bounced past, its breast bright red.
“Twit, twit,” it said. “Bobbly bobbly bob. Hop hop hopping along…”
“You’re fooling no one but yourself,” said Susan. “I can see the string.”
She unrolled the scroll.
“Maybe I should sit on a snowy log,” mumbled the raven behind her.
“That’s probably the trick, right enough.”
“I can’t read this!” said Susan. “The letters are all…odd…”
“Ethereal runes,” said the raven. “The Hogfather ain’t human, after all.”
Susan ran her hands over the thin leather. The…shapes flowed around her
fingers.
She couldn’t read them but she could feel them. There was the sharp smell
of snow, so vivid that her breath condensed in the air. There were sounds,
hooves, the snap of branches in a freezing forest—
A bright shining ball…
Susan jerked awake and thrust the scroll aside. She unrolled the next one,
which looked as though it was made of strips of bark. Characters hovered
over the surface. Whatever they were, they had never been designed to be
read by the eye; you could believe they were a Braille for the touching
mind. Images ribboned across her senses—wet fur, sweat, pine, soot, iced
air, the tang of damp ash, pig…manure, her governess mind hastily
corrected. There was blood…and the taste of…beans? It was all images
without words. Almost…animal.
“But none of this is right! Everyone knows he’s a jolly old fat man who
hands out presents to kids!” she said aloud.
“Is. Is. Not was. You know how it is,” said the raven.
“Do I?”
“It’s like, you know, industrial retraining,” said the bird. “Even gods
have to move with the times, am I right? He was probably quite different
thousands of years ago. Stands to reason. No one wore stockings, for one
thing.” He scratched at his beak.
“Yersss,” he continued expansively, “he was probably just your basic
winter demi-urge. You know…blood on the snow, making the sun come up.
Starts off with animal sacrifice, y’know, hunt some big hairy animal to
death, that kind of stuff. You know there’s some people up on the Ramtops
who kill a wren at Hogswatch and walk around from house to house singing
about it? With a whack-fol-oh-diddle-dildo. Very folkloric, very myffic.”
“A wren? Why?”
“I dunno. Maybe someone said, hey, how’d you like to hunt this evil
bastard of an eagle with his big sharp beak and great ripping talons,
sort of thing, or how about instead you hunt this wren, which is
basically about the size of a pea and goes “twit”? Go on, you choose.
Anyway, then later on it sinks to the level of religion and then they
start this business where some poor bugger finds a special bean in his
tucker, oho, everyone says, you’re king, mate, and he thinks “This is a
bit of all right” only they don’t say it wouldn’t be a good idea to start
any long books, ’cos next thing he’s legging it over the snow with a
dozen other buggers chasing him with holy sickles so’s the earth’ll come
to life again and all this snow’ll go away. Very, you know…ethnic. Then
some bright spark thought, hey, looks like that damn sun comes up anyway,
so how come we’re giving those druids all this free grub? Next thing you
know, there’s a job vacancy. That’s the thing about gods. They’ll always
find a way to, you know…hang on.”
“The damn sun comes up anyway,” Susan repeated. “How do you know that?”
“Oh, observation. It happens every morning. I seen it.”
“I meant all that stuff about holy sickles and things.”
The raven contrived to look smug.
“Very occult bird, your basic raven,” he said. “Blind Io the Thunder God
used to have these myffic ravens that flew everywhere and told him
everything that was going on.”
“Used to?”
“Weeelll…you know how he’s not got eyes in his face, just these, like,
you know, free-floating eyeballs that go and zoom around…” The raven
coughed in species embarrassment. “Bit of an accident waiting to happen,
really.”
“Do you ever think of anything except eyeballs?”
“Well…there’s entrails.”
SQUEAK.
“He’s right, though,” said Susan. “Gods don’t die. Never completely die…”
There’s always somewhere, she told herself. Inside some stone, perhaps,
or the words of a song, or riding the mind of some animal, or maybe in a
whisper on the wind. They never entirely go, they hang onto the world by
the tip of a fingernail, always fighting to find a way back. Once a god,
always a god. Dead, perhaps, but only like the world in winter—
“All right,” she said. “Let’s see what happened to him…”
She reached out for the last book and tried to open it at random…
The feeling lashed at her out of the book, like a whip…
…hooves, fear, blood, snow, cold, night…
She dropped the scroll. It slammed shut.
SQUEAK?
“I’m…all right.”
She looked down at the book and knew that she’d been given a friendly
warning, such as a pet animal might give when it was crazed with pain but
just still tame enough not to claw and bite the hand that fed it—this
time. Wherever the Hogfather was—dead, alive, somewhere—he wanted to be
left alone…
She eyed the Death of Rats. His little eye sockets flared blue in a
disconcertingly familiar way.
SQUEAK. EEK?
“The rat says, if he wanted to find out about the Hogfather, he’d go to
the Castle of Bones.”
“Oh, that’s just a nursery tale,” said Susan. “That’s where the letters
are supposed to go that are posted up the chimney. That’s just an old
story.”
She turned. The rat and the raven were staring at her. And she realized
that she’d been too normal.
SQUEAK?
“The rat says, ‘What d’you mean, just?’” said the raven.
Chickenwire sidled toward Medium Dave in the garden. If you could call it
a garden. It was the land round the…house. If you could call it a house.
No one said much about it, but every so often you just had to get out. It
didn’t feel right, inside.
He shivered. “Where’s himself?” he said.
“Oh, up at the top,” said Medium Dave. “Still trying to open that room.”
“The one with all the locks?”
“Yeah.”
Medium Dave was rolling a cigarette. Inside the house…or tower, or both,
or whatever…you couldn’t smoke, not properly. When you smoked inside it
tasted horrible and you felt sick.
“What for? We done what we came to do, didn’t we? Stood there like a
bunch of kids and watched that wet wizard do all his chanting, it was all
I could do to keep a straight face. What’s he after now?”
“He just said if it was locked that bad he wanted to see inside.”
“I thought we were supposed to do what we came for and go!”
“Yeah? You tell him. Want a roll-up?”
Chickenwire took the bag of tobacco and relaxed. “I’ve seen some bad
places in my time, but this takes the serious biscuit.”
“Yeah.”
“It’s the cute that wears you down. And there’s got to be something else
to eat than apples.”
“Yeah.”
“And that damn sky. That damn sky is really getting on my nerves.”
“Yeah.”
They kept their eyes averted from that damn sky. For some reason, it made
you feel that it was about to fall on you. And it was worse if you let
your eyes stray to the gap where a gap shouldn’t be. The effect was like
getting a toothache in your eyeballs.
In the distance Banjo was swinging on a swing. Odd, that, Dave thought.
Banjo seemed perfectly happy here.
“He found a tree that grows lollipops yesterday,” he said moodily. “Well,
I say yesterday, but how can you tell? And he follows the man around like
a dog. No one ever laid a punch on Banjo since our mam died. He’s just
like a little boy, you know. Inside. Always has been. Looks to me for
everything. Used to be, if I told him ‘punch someone,’ he’d do it.”
“And they stayed punched.”
“Yeah. Now he follows him around everywhere. It makes me sick.”
“What are you doing here, then?”
“Ten thousand dollars. And he says there’s more, you know. More than we
can imagine.”
He was always Teatime.
“He ain’t just after money.”
“Yeah, well, I didn’t sign up for world domination,” said Medium Dave.
“That sort of thing gets you into trouble.”
“I remember your mam saying that sort of thing,” said Chickenwire. Medium
Dave rolled his eyes. Everyone remembered Ma Lilywhite. “Very straight
lady was your ma. Tough but fair.”
“Yeah…tough.”
“I recall that time she strangled Glossy Ron with his own leg,”
Chickenwire went on. “She had a wicked right arm on her, your mam.”
“Yeah. Wicked.”
“She wouldn’t have stood for someone like Teatime.”
“Yeah,” said Medium Dave.
“That was a lovely funeral you boys gave her. Most of the Shades turned
up. Very respectful. All them flowers. An’ everyone looking so…”
Chickenwire floundered “…happy. In a sad way, o’ course.”
“Yeah.”
“Have you got any idea how to get back home?”
Medium Dave shook his head.
“Me neither. Find the place again, I suppose.” Chickenwire shivered. “I
mean, what he did to that carter…I mean, well, I wouldn’t even act like
that to me own dad—”
“Yeah.”
“Ordinary mental, yes, I can deal with that. But he can be talking quite
normal, and then—”
“Yeah.”
“Maybe the both of us could creep up on him and—”
“Yeah, yeah. And how long’ll we live? In seconds.”
“We could get lucky—” Chickenwire began.
“Yeah? You’ve seen him. This isn’t one of those blokes who threatens you.
This is one of those blokes who’d kill you soon as look at you. Easier,
too. We got to hang on, right? It’s like that saying about riding a
tiger.”
“What saying about riding a tiger?” said Chickenwire suspiciously.
“Well…” Medium Dave hesitated. “You…well, you get branches slapping you
in the face, fleas, that sort of thing. So you got to hang on. Think of
the money. There’s bags of it in there. You saw it.”
“I keep thinking of that glass eye watching me. I keep thinking it can
see right in my head.”
“Don’t worry, he doesn’t suspect you of anything.”
“How d’you know?”
“You’re still alive, yeah?”
In the Grotto of the Hogfather, a round-eyed child.
HAPPY HOGSWATCH. HO. HO. HO. AND YOUR NAME IS…EUPHRASIA GOAT, CORRECT?
“Go on, dear, answer the nice man.”
“’s.”
AND YOU ARE SIX YEARS OLD.
“Go on, dear. They’re all the same at this age, aren’t they…”
“’s.”
AND YOU WANT A PONY—
“’s.” A small hand pulled the Hogfather’s hood down to mouth level. Heavy
Uncle Albert heard a ferocious whispering. Then the Hogfather leaned back.
YES, I KNOW. WHAT A NAUGHTY PIG IT WAS, INDEED.
His shape flickered for a moment, and then a hand went into the sack.
HERE IS A BRIDLE FOR YOUR PONY, AND A SADDLE, AND A RATHER STRANGE HARD
HAT AND A PAIR OF THOSE TROUSERS THAT MAKE YOU LOOK AS THOUGH YOU HAVE A
LARGE RABBIT IN EACH POCKET.
“But we can’t have a pony, can we, Euffie, because we live on the third
floor…”
OH, YES. IT’S IN THE KITCHEN.
“I’m sure you’re making a little joke, Hogfather,” said Mother, sharply.
HO. HO. YES. WHAT A JOLLY FAT MAN I AM. IN THE KITCHEN? WHAT A JOKE.
DOLLIES AND SO ON WILL BE DELIVERED LATER AS PER YOUR LETTER.
“What do you say, Euffie?”
“’nk you.”
“’ere, you didn’t really put a pony in their kitchen, did you?” said
Heavy Uncle Albert as the line moved on.
DON’T BE FOOLISH, ALBERT. I SAID THAT TO BE JOLLY.
“Oh, right. Hah, for a minute—”
IT’S IN THE BEDROOM.
“Ah…”
MORE HYGIENIC.
“Well, it’ll make sure of one thing,” said Albert. “Third floor? They’re
going to believe all right.”
YES. YOU KNOW, I THINK I’M GETTING THE HANG OF THIS. HO. HO. HO.
At the Hub of the Discworld, the snow burned blue and green. The Aurora
Corealis hung in the sky, curtains of pale cold fire that circled the
central mountains and cast their spectral light over the ice.
They billowed, swirled and then trailed a ragged arm on the end of which
was a tiny dot that became, when the eye of imagination drew nearer,
Binky.
He trotted to a halt and stood on the air. Susan looked down.
And then found what she was looking for. At the end of a valley of snowmounded
trees something gleamed brightly, reflecting the sky.
The Castle of Bones.
Her parents had sat her down one day when she was about six or seven and
explained how such things as the Hogfather did not really exist, how they
were pleasant little stories that it was fun to know, how they were not
real. And she had believed it. All the fairies and bogeymen, all those
stories from the blood and bone of humanity, were not really real.
They’d lied. A seven-foot skeleton had turned out to be her grandfather.
Not a flesh and blood grandfather, obviously. But a grandfather, you
could say, in the bone.
Binky touched down and trotted over the snow.
Was the Hogfather a god? Why not? thought Susan. There were sacrifices,
after all. All that sherry and pork pie. And he made commandments and
rewarded the good and he knew what you were doing. If you believed, nice
things happened to you. Sometimes you found him in a grotto, and
sometimes he was up there in the sky…
The Castle of Bones loomed over her now. It certainly deserved the
capital letters, up this close.
She’d seen a picture of it in one of the children’s books. Despite its
name, the woodcut artist had endeavored to make it look…sort of jolly.
It wasn’t jolly. The pillars at the entrance were hundreds of feet high.
Each of the steps leading up was taller than a man. They were the graygreen
of old ice.
Ice. Not bone. There were faintly familiar shapes to the pillars,
possibly a suggestion of femur or skull, but it was made of ice.
Binky was not challenged by the high stairs. It wasn’t that he flew. It
was simply that he walked on a ground level of his own devising.
Snow had blown over the ice. Susan looked down at the drifts. Death left
no tracks, but there were the faint outlines of booted footprints. She’d
be prepared to bet they belonged to Albert. And…yes, half obscured by the
snow…it looked as though a sleigh had stood here. Animals had milled
around. But the snow was covering everything.
She dismounted. This was certainly the place described, but it still
wasn’t right. It was supposed to be a blaze of light and abuzz with
activity, but it looked like a giant mausoleum.
A little way beyond the pillars was a very large slab of ice, cracked
into pieces. Far above, stars were visible through the hole it had left
in the roof. Even as she stared up, a few small lumps of ice thumped into
a snowdrift.
The raven popped into existence and fluttered wearily onto a stump of ice
beside her.
“This place is a morgue,” said Susan.
“’s goin’ to be mine, if I do…any more flyin’ tonight,” panted the raven,
as the Death of Rats got off its back. “I never signed up for all this
long-distance, faster’n time stuff. I should be back in a forest
somewhere, making excitingly decorated constructions to attract females.”
“That’s bower birds,” said Susan. “Ravens don’t do that.”
“Oh, so it’s typecasting now, is it?” said the raven. “I’m missing meals
here, you do know that?”
It swiveled its independently sprung eyes.
“So where’s all the lights?” it said. “Where’s all the noise? Where’s all
the jolly little buggers in pointy hats and red and green suits, hitting
wooden toys unconvincingly yet rhythmically with hammers?”
“This is more like the temple of some old thunder god,” said Susan.
SQUEAK.
“No, I read the map right. Anyway, Albert’s been here, too. There’s
cigarette ash all over the place.”
The rat jumped down and walked around for a moment, bony snout near the
ground. After a few moments of snuffling it gave a squeak and hurried off
into the gloom.
Susan followed. As her eyes grew more accustomed to the faint blue-green
light she made out something rising out of the floor. It was a pyramid of
steps, with a big chair on top.
Behind her, a pillar groaned and twisted slightly.
SQUEAK.
“That rat says this place reminds him of some old mine,” said the raven.
“You know, after it’s been deserted and no one’s been paying attention to
the roof supports and so on? We see a lot of them.”
At least these steps were human sized, Susan thought, ignoring the
chatter. Snow had come in through another gap in the roof. Albert’s
footprints had stamped around quite a lot here.
“Maybe the old Hogfather crashed his sleigh,” the raven suggested.
SQUEAK?
“Well, it could’ve happened. Pigs are not notably aerodynamic, are they?
And with all this snow, you know, poor visibility, big cloud ahead turns
out too late to be a mountain, there’s buggers in saffron robes looking
down at you, poor devil tries to remember whether you’re supposed to
shove someone’s head between your legs, then WHAM, and it’s all over bar
some lucky mountaineers making an awful lot of sausages and finding the
flight recorder.”
SQUEAK!
“Yes, but he’s an old man. Probably shouldn’t be in the sky at his time
of life.”
Susan pulled at something half buried in the snow.
It was a red-and-white-striped candy cane.
She kicked the snow aside elsewhere and found a wooden toy soldier in the
kind of uniform that would only be inconspicuous if you wore it in a
nightclub for chameleons on hard drugs. Some further probing found a
broken trumpet.
There was some more groaning in the darkness.
The raven cleared its throat.
“What the rat meant about this place being like a mine,” he said, “was
that abandoned mines tend to creak and groan in the same way, see? No one
looking after the pit props. Things fall in. Next thing you know you’re a
squiggle in the sandstone. We shouldn’t hang around is what I’m saying.”
Susan walked farther in, lost in thought.
This was all wrong. The place looked as though it had been deserted for
years, which couldn’t be true.
The column nearest her creaked and twisted slightly. A fine haze of ice
crystals dropped from the roof.
Of course, this wasn’t exactly a normal place. You couldn’t build an ice
palace this big. It was a bit like Death’s house. If he abandoned it for
too long all those things that had been suspended, like time and physics,
would roll over it. It would be like a dam bursting.
She turned to leave and heard the groan again. It wasn’t dissimilar to
the tortured sounds being made by the ice, except that ice, afterward,
didn’t moan. “Oh, me…”
There was a figure lying in a snowdrift. She’d almost missed it because
it was wearing a long white robe. It was spread-eagled, as though it had
planned to make snow angels and had then decided against it.
And it wore a little crown, apparently of vine leaves.
And it kept groaning.
She looked up. The roof was open here, too. But no one could have fallen
that far and survived.
No one human, anyway.
He looked human and, in theory, quite young. But it was only in theory
because, even by the secondhand light of the glowing snow, his face
looked like someone had been sick with it.
“Are you all right?” she ventured.
The recumbent figure opened its eyes and stared straight up.
“I wish I was dead…” it moaned. A piece of ice the size of a house fell
down in the far depths of the building and exploded in a shower of sharp
little shards.
“You may have come to the right place,” said Susan. She grabbed the boy
under his arms and hauled him out of the snow. “I think leaving would be
a very good idea around now, don’t you? This place is going to fall
apart.”
“Oh, me…”
She managed to get one of his arms around her neck.
“Can you walk?”
“Oh, me…”
“It might help if you stopped saying that and tried walking.”
“I’m sorry, but I seem to have…too many legs. Ow.”
Susan did her best to prop him up as, swaying and slipping, they made
their way back to the exit.
“My head,” said the boy. “My head. My head. My head. Feels awful. My head.
Feels like someone’s hitting it. My head. With a hammer.”
Someone was. There was a small green and purple imp sitting amid the damp
curls and holding a very large mallet. It gave Susan a friendly nod and
brought the hammer down again.
“Oh, me…”
“That wasn’t necessary!” said Susan.
“You telling me my job?” said the imp. “I suppose you could do it better,
could you?”
“I wouldn’t do it at all!”
“Well, someone’s got to do it,” said the imp.
“He’s part. Of the. Arrangement,” said the boy.
“Yeah, see?” said the imp. “Can you hold the hammer while I go and coat
his tongue with yellow gunk?”
“Get down right now!”
Susan made a grab for the creature. It leapt away, still clutching the
hammer, and grabbed a pillar.
“I’m part of the arrangement, I am!” it yelled.
The boy clutched his head.
“I feel awful,” he said. “Have you got any ice?”
Whereupon, because there are conventions stronger than mere physics, the
building fell in.
The collapse of the Castle of Bones was stately and impressive and seemed
to go on for a long time. Pillars fell in, the slabs of the roof slid
down, the ice crackled and splintered. The air above the tumbling
wreckage filled with a haze of snow and ice crystals.
Susan watched from the trees. The boy, who she’d leaned against a handy
trunk, opened his eyes.
“That was amazing,” he managed.
“Why, you mean the way it’s all turning back into snow?”
“The way you just picked me up and ran. Ouch!”
“Oh, that.”
The grinding of the ice continued. The fallen pillars didn’t stop moving
when they collapsed, but went on tearing themselves apart.
When the fog of ice settled there was nothing but drifted snow.
“As though it was never there,” said Susan, aloud. She turned to the
groaning figure.
“All right, what were you doing there?”
“I don’t know. I just opened my. Eyes and there I was.”
“Who are you?”
“I…think my name is Bilious. I’m the…I’m the oh God of Hangovers.”
“There’s a God of Hangovers?”
“An oh god,” he corrected. “When people witness me, you see, they clutch
their head and say, ‘Oh God…’ How many of you are standing here?”
“What? There’s just me!”
“Ah. Fine. Fine.”
“I’ve never heard of a God of Hangovers…”
“You’ve heard of Bibulous, the God of Wine? Ouch.”
“Oh, yes.”
“Big fat man, wears vine leaves round his head, always pictured with a
glass in his hand…Ow. Well, you know why he’s so cheerful? Him and his
big face? It’s because he knows he’s going to feel good in the morning!
It’s because it’s me that—”
“—gets the hangovers?” said Susan.
“I don’t even drink! Ow! But who is it who ends up head down in the privy
every morning? Arrgh.” He stopped and clutched at his head. “Should your
skull feel like it’s lined with dog hair?”
“I don’t think so.”
“Ah.” Bilious swayed. “You know when people say ‘I had fifteen lagers
last night and when I woke up my head was clear as a bell’?”
“Oh, yes.”
“Bastards! That’s because I was the one who woke up groaning in a pile of
recycled chili. Just once, I mean just once, I’d like to open my eyes in
the morning without my head sticking to something.” He paused. “Are there
any giraffes in this wood?”
“Up here? I shouldn’t think so.”
He looked nervously past Susan’s head.
“Not even indigo-colored ones which are sort of stretched and keep
flashing on and off?”
“Very unlikely.”
“Thank goodness for that.” He swayed back and forth. “Excuse me, I think
I’m about to throw up my breakfast.”
“It’s the middle of the evening!”
“Is it? In that case, I think I’m about to throw up my dinner.”
He folded up gently in the snow behind the tree.
“He’s a long streak of widdle, isn’t he?” said a voice from a branch. It
was the raven. “Got a neck with a knee in it.”
The oh god reappeared after a noisy interlude.
“I know I must eat,” he mumbled. “It’s just that the only time I remember
seeing my food it’s always going the other way…”
“What were you doing in there?” said Susan.
“Ouch! Search me,” said the oh god. “It’s only a mercy I wasn’t holding a
traffic sign and wearing a—” he winced and paused “—having some kind of
women’s underwear about my person.” He sighed. “Someone somewhere has a
lot of fun,” he said wistfully. “I wish it was me.”
“Get a drink inside you, that’s my advice,” said the raven. “Have a hair
of the dog that bit someone else.”
“But why there?” Susan insisted.
The oh god stopped trying to glare at the raven. “I don’t know, where was
there exactly?”
Susan looked back at where the castle had been. It was entirely gone.
“There was a very important building there a moment ago,” she said.
The oh god nodded carefully.
“I often see things that weren’t there a moment ago,” he said. “And they
often aren’t there a moment later. Which is a blessing in most cases, let
me tell you. So I don’t usually take a lot of notice.”
He folded up and landed in the snow again.
There’s just snow now, Susan thought. Nothing but snow and the wind.
There’s not even a ruin.
The certainty stole over her again that the Hogfather’s castle wasn’t
simply not there any more. No…it had never been there. There was no ruin,
no trace.
It had been an odd enough place. It was where the Hogfather lived,
according to the legends. Which was odd, when you thought about it. It
didn’t look like the kind of place a cheery old toy maker would live in.
The wind soughed in the trees behind them. Snow slid off branches.
Somewhere in the dark there was a flurry of hooves.
A spidery little figure leapt off a snowdrift and landed on the oh god’s
head. It turned a beady eye up toward Susan.
“All right by you, is it?” said the imp, producing its huge hammer. “Some
of us have a job to do, you know, even if we are of a metaphorical, nay,
folkloric persuasion.”
“Oh, go away.”
“If you think I’m bad, wait until you see the little pink elephants,”
said the imp.
“I don’t believe you.”
“They come out of his ears and fly around his head making tweeting
noises.”
“Ah,” said the raven, sagely. “That sounds more like robins. I wouldn’t
put anything past them.”
The oh god grunted.
Susan suddenly felt that she didn’t want to leave him. He was human. Well,
human shaped. Well, at least he had two arms and legs. He’d freeze to
death here. Of course, gods, or even oh gods, probably couldn’t, but
humans didn’t think like that. You couldn’t just leave someone. She
prided herself on this bit of normal thinking.
Besides, he might have some answers, if she could make him stay awake
enough to understand the questions.
From the edge of the frozen forest, animal eyes watched them go.
Mr. Crumley sat on the damp stairs and sobbed. He couldn’t get any nearer
to the toy department. Every time he tried he got lifted off his feet by
the mob and dumped at the edge of the crowd by the current of people.
Someone said, “Top of the evenin’, squire,” and he looked up blearily at
the small yet irregularly formed figure that had addressed him thusly.
“Are you one of the pixies?” he said, after mentally exhausting all the
other possibilities.
“No, sir. I am not in fact a pixie, sir, I am in fact Corporal Nobbs of
the Watch. And this is Constable Visit, sir.” The creature looked at a
piece of paper in its paw. “You Mr. Crummy?”
“Crumley!”
“Yeah, right. You sent a runner to the Watch House and we have hereby
responded with commendable speed, sir,” said Corporal Nobbs. “Despite it
being Hogswatchnight and there being a lot of strange things happening
and most importantly it being the occasion of our Hogswatchly piss-up,
sir. But this is all right because Washpot, that’s Constable Visit here,
he doesn’t drink, sir, it being against his religion, and although I do
drink, sir, I volunteered to come because it is my civic duty, sir.”
Nobby tore off a salute, or what he liked to believe was a salute. He did
not add, “And turning out for a rich bugger such as your good self is
bound to put the officer concerned in the way of a seasonal bottle or two
or some other tangible evidence of gratitude,” because his entire stance
said it for him. Even Nobby’s ears could look suggestive.
Unfortunately, Mr. Crumley wasn’t in the right receptive frame of mind.
He stood up and waved a shaking finger toward the top of the stairs.
“I want you to go up there,” he said, “and arrest him!”
“Arrest who, sir?” said Corporal Nobbs.
“The Hogfather!”
“What for, sir?”
“Because he’s sitting up there as bold as brass in his Grotto, giving
away presents!”
Corporal Nobbs thought about this.
“You haven’t been having a festive drink, have you, sir?” he said
hopefully.
“I do not drink!”
“Very wise, sir,” said Constable Visit. “Alcohol is the tarnish of the
soul. Ossory, Book Two, Verse Twenty-four.”
“Not quite up to speed here, sir,” said Corporal Nobbs, looking perplexed.
“I thought the Hogfather is s’posed to give away stuff, isn’t he?”
This time Mr. Crumley had to stop and think. Up until now he hadn’t quite
sorted things out in his head, other than recognizing their essential
wrongness.
“This one is an Impostor!” he declared. “Yes, that’s right! He smashed
his way into here!”
“Y’know, I always thought that,” said Nobby. “I thought, every year, the
Hogfather spends a fortnight sitting in a wooden grotto in a shop in
Ankh-Morpork? At his busy time, too? Hah! Not likely! Probably just some
old man in a beard, I thought.”
“I meant…he’s not the Hogfather we usually have,” said Crumley,
struggling for firmer ground. “He just barged in here!”
“Oh, a different impostor? Not the real impostor at all?”
“Well…yes…no…”
“And started giving stuff away?” said Corporal Nobbs.
“That’s what I said! That’s got to be a Crime, hasn’t it?”
Corporal Nobbs rubbed his nose.
“Well, nearly,” he conceded, not wishing to totally relinquish the chance
of any festive remuneration. Realization dawned. “He’s giving away your
stuff, sir?”
“No! No, he brought it in with him!”
“Ah? Giving away your stuff, now, if he was doing that, yes, I could see
the problem. That’s a sure sign of crime, stuff going missing. Stuff
turning up, weerlll, that’s a tricky one. Unless it’s stuff like arms and
legs, o’ course. We’d be on safer ground if he was nicking stuff, sir, to
tell you the truth.”
“This is a shop,” said Mr. Crumley, finally getting to the root of the
problem. “We do not give Merchandise away. How can we expect people to
buy things if some Person is giving them away? Now please go and get him
out of here.”
“Arrest the Hogfather, style of thing?”
“Yes!”
“On Hogswatchnight?”
“Yes!”
“In your shop?”
“Yes!”
“In front of all those kiddies?”
“Y—” Mr. Crumley hesitated. To his horror, he realized that Corporal
Nobbs, against all expectation, had a point. “You think that will look
bad?” he said.
“Hard to see how it could look good, sir.”
“Could you not do it surreptitiously?” he said.
“Ah, well, surreptition, yes, we could give that a try,” said Corporal
Nobbs. The sentence hung in the air with its hand out.
“You won’t find me ungrateful,” said Mr. Crumley, at last.
“Just you leave it to us,” said Corporal Nobbs, magnanimous in victory.
“You just nip down to your office and treat yourself to a nice cup of tea
and we’ll sort this out in no time. You’ll be ever so grateful.”
Crumley gave him a look of a man in the grip of serious doubt, but
staggered away nonetheless. Corporal Nobbs rubbed his hands together.
“You don’t have Hogswatch back where you come from, do you, Washpot?” he
said, as they climbed the stairs to the first floor. “Look at this carpet,
you’d think a pig’d pissed on it…”
“We call it the Fast of St. Ossory,” said Visit, who was from Omnia. “But
it is not an occasion for superstition and crass commercialism. We simply
get together in family groups for a prayer meeting and a fast.”
“What, turkey and chicken and that?”
“A fast, Corporal Nobbs. We don’t eat anything.”
“Oh, right. Well, each to his own, I s’pose. And at least you don’t have
to get up early in the morning and find that the nothing you’ve got is
too big to fit in the oven. No presents neither?”
They stood aside hurriedly as two children scuttled down the stairs
carrying a large toy boat between them.
“It is sometimes appropriate to exchange new religious pamphlets, and of
course there are usually copies of the Book of Ossory for the children,”
said Constable Visit. “Sometimes with illustrations,” he added, in the
guarded way of a man hinting at licentious pleasures.
A small girl went past carrying a teddy bear larger than herself. It was
pink.
“They always gives me bath salts,” complained Nobby. “And bath soap and
bubble bath and herbal bath lumps and tons of bath stuff and I can’t
think why, ’cos it’s not as if I hardly ever has a bath. You’d think
they’d take the hint, wouldn’t you?”
“Abominable, I call it,” said Constable Visit.
The first floor was a mob.
“Huh, look at them. Mr. Hogfather never brought me anything when I was a
kid,” said Corporal Nobbs, eyeing the children gloomily. “I used to hang
up my stocking every Hogswatch, regular. All that ever happened was my
dad was sick in it once.” He removed his helmet.
Nobby was not by any measure a hero, but there was the sudden gleam in
his eye of someone who’d seen altogether too many empty stockings plus
one rather full and dripping one. A scab had been knocked off some wound
in the corrugated little organ of his soul.
“I’m going in,” he said.
In between the University’s Great Hall and its main door is a rather
smaller circular hall or vestibule known as Archchancellor Bowell’s
Remembrance, although no one now knows why, or why an extant bequest pays
for one small currant bun and one copper penny to be placed on a high
stone shelf on one wall every second Wednesday.* Ridcully stood in the
middle of the floor, looking upward.
“Tell me, Senior Wrangler, we never invited any women to the
Hogswatchnight Feast, did we?”
“Of course not, Archchancellor,” said the Senior Wrangler. He looked up
in the dust-covered rafters, wondering what had caught Ridcully’s eye.
“Good heavens, no. They’d spoil everything. I’ve always said so.”
“And all the maids have got the evening off until midnight?”
“A very generous custom, I’ve always said,” said the Senior Wrangler,
feeling his neck crick.
“So why, every year, do we hang a damn great bunch of mistletoe up there?”
The Senior Wrangler turned in a circle, still staring upward.
“Well, er…it’s…well, it’s…it’s symbolic, Archchancellor.”
“Ah?”
The Senior Wrangler felt that something more was expected. He groped
around in the dusty attics of his education.
“Of…the leaves, d’y’see…they’re symbolic of…of green, d’y’see, whereas
the berries, in fact, yes, the berries symbolize…symbolize white. Yes.
White and green. Very…symbolic.”
He waited. He was not, unfortunately, disappointed.
“What of?”
The Senior Wrangler coughed.
“I’m not sure there has to be an of,” he said.
“Ah? So,” said the Archchancellor, thoughtfully, “it could be said that
the white and green symbolize a small parasitic plant?”
“Yes, indeed,” said the Senior Wrangler.
“So mistletoe, in fact, symbolizes mistletoe?”
“Exactly, Archchancellor,” said the Senior Wrangler, who was now just
hanging on.
“Funny thing, that,” said Ridcully, in the same thoughtful tone of voice.
“That statement is either so deep it would take a lifetime to fully
comprehend every particle of its meaning, or it is a load of absolute
tosh. Which is it, I wonder?”
“It could be both,” said the Senior Wrangler desperately.
“And that comment,” said Ridcully, “is either very perceptive, or very
trite.”
“It might be bo—”
“Don’t push it, Senior Wrangler.”
There was a hammering on the outer door.
“Ah, that’ll be the wassailers,” said the Senior Wrangler, happy for the
distraction. “They call on us first every year. I personally have always
liked ‘The Lilywhite Boys,’ you know.”
The Archchancellor glanced up at the mistletoe, gave the beaming man a
sharp look, and opened the little hatch in the door.
“Well, now, wassailing you fellows—” he began. “Oh. Well, I must say you
might’ve picked a better time…”
A hooded figure stepped through the wood of the door, carrying a limp
bundle over its shoulder.
The Senior Wrangler stepped backward quickly.
“Oh…no, not tonight…”
And then he noticed that what he had taken for a robe had lace around the
bottom, and the hood, while quite definitely a hood, was nevertheless
rather more stylish than the one he had first mistaken it for.
“Putting down or taking away?” said Ridcully.
Susan pushed back her hood.
“I need your help, Mr. Ridcully,” she said.
“You’re…aren’t you Death’s granddaughter?” said Ridcully. “Didn’t I meet
you a few—”
“Yes,” sighed Susan.
“And…are you helping out?” said Ridcully. His waggling eyebrows indicated
the slumbering figure over her shoulder.
“I need you to wake him up,” said Susan.
“Some sort of miracle, you mean?” said the Senior Wrangler, who was a
little behind.
“He’s not dead,” said Susan. “He’s just resting.”
“That’s what they all say,” the Senior Wrangler quavered.
Ridcully, who was somewhat more practical, lifted the oh god’s head.
There was a groan.
“Looks a bit under the weather,” he said.
“He’s the God of Hangovers,” said Susan. “The Oh God of Hangovers.”
“Really?” said Ridcully. “Never had one of those myself. Funny thing, I
can drink all night and feel as fresh as a daisy in the morning.”
The oh god’s eyes opened. Then he soared toward Ridcully and started
beating him on the chest with both fists.
“You utter, utter bastard! I hate you hate you hate you hate you—”
His eyes shut, and he slid down to the floor.
“What was all that about?” said Ridcully.
“I think it was some kind of nervous reaction,” said Susan diplomatically.
“Something nasty’s happening tonight. I’m hoping he can tell me what it
is. But he’s got to be able to think straight first.”
“And you brought him here?” said Ridcully.
HO. HO. HO. YES INDEED, HELLO, SMALL CHILD CALLED VERRUCA LUMPY, WHAT A
LOVELY NAME, AGED SEVEN, I BELIEVE? GOOD. YES, I KNOW IT DID. ALL OVER
THE NICE CLEAN FLOOR, YES. THEY DO, YOU KNOW. THAT’S ONE OF THE THINGS
ABOUT REAL PIGS. HERE WE ARE, DON’T MENTION IT. HAPPY HOGSWATCH AND BE
GOOD. I WILL KNOW IF YOU’RE GOOD OR BAD, YOU KNOW. HO. HO. HO.
“Well, you brought some magic into that little life,” said Albert, as the
next child was hurried away.
IT’S THE EXPRESSION ON THEIR LITTLE FACES I LIKE, said the Hogfather.
“You mean sort of fear and awe and not knowing whether to laugh or cry or
wet their pants?”
YES. NOW THAT IS WHAT I CALL BELIEF.
The oh god was carried into the Great Hall and laid out on a bench. The
senior wizards gathered round, ready to help those less fortunate than
themselves remain that way.
“I know what’s good for a hangover,” said the Dean, who was feeling in a
party mood.
They looked at him expectantly.
“Drinking heavily the previous night!” he said.
He beamed at them.
“That was a good word joke,” he said, to break the silence.
The silence came back.
“Most amusing,” said Ridcully. He turned back and stared thoughtfully at
the oh god.
“Raw eggs are said to be good—” he glared at the Dean “—I mean bad for a
hangover,” he said. “And fresh orange juice.”
“Klatchian coffee,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes, firmly.
“But this fellow hasn’t just got his hangover, he’s got everyone’s
hangover,” said Ridcully.
“I’ve tried it,” mumbled the oh god. “It just makes me feel suicidal and
sick.”
“A mixture of mustard and horseradish?” said the Chair of Indefinite
Studies. “In cream, for preference. With anchovies.”
“Yogurt,” said the Bursar.
Ridcully looked at him, surprised.
“That sounded almost relevant,” he said. “Well done. I should leave it at
that if I were you, Bursar. Hmm. Of course, my uncle always used to swear
at Wow-Wow Sauce,” he added.
“You mean swear by, surely?” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes.
“Possibly both,” said Ridcully. “I know he once drank a whole bottle of
it as a hangover cure and it certainly seemed to cure him. He looked very
peaceful when they came to lay him out.”
“Willow bark,” said the Bursar.
“That’s a good idea,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes. “It’s an
analgesic.”
“Really? Well, possibly, though it’s probably better to give it to him by
mouth,” said Ridcully. “I say, are you feeling yourself, Bursar? You seem
somewhat coherent.”
The oh god opened his crusted eyes.
“Will all that stuff help?” he mumbled.
“It’ll probably kill you,” said Susan.
“Oh. Good.”
“We could add Englebert’s Enhancer,” said the Dean. “Remember when Modo
put some on his peas? We could only manage one each!”
“Can’t you do something more, well, magical?” said Susan. “Magic the
alcohol out of him or something?”
“Yes, but it’s not alcohol by this time, is it?” said Ridcully. “It’ll
have turned into a lot of nasty little poisons all dancin’ round on his
liver.”
“Spold’s Unstirring Divisor would do it,” said the Lecturer in Recent
Runes. “Very simply, too. You’d end up with a large beaker full of all
the nastiness. Not difficult at all, if you don’t mind the side effects.”
“Tell me about the side effects,” said Susan, who had met wizards before.
“The main one is that the rest of him would end up in a somewhat larger
beaker,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes.
“Alive?”
The Lecturer in Recent Runes screwed up his face and waggled his hands.
“Broadly, yes,” he said. “Living tissue, certainly. And definitely sober.”
“I think we had in mind something that would leave him the same shape and
still breathing,” said Susan.
“Well, you might’ve said…”
Then the Dean repeated the mantra that has had such a marked effect on
the progress of knowledge throughout the ages.
“Why don’t we just mix up absolutely everything and see what happens?” he
said.
And Ridcully responded with the traditional response.
“It’s got to be worth a try,” he said.
The big glass beaker for the cure had been placed on a pedestal in the
middle of the floor. The wizards liked to make a ceremony of everything
in any case, but felt instinctively that if they were going to cure the
biggest hangover in the world it needed to be done with style.
Susan and Bilious watched as the ingredients were added. Round about
halfway the mixture, which was an orange-brown color, went gloop.
“Not a lot of improvement, I feel,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes.
Englebert’s Enhancer was the penultimate ingredient. The Dean dropped in
a greenish ball of light that sank under the surface. The only apparent
effect was that it caused purple bubbles to creep over the sides of the
beaker and drip onto the floor.
“That’s it?” said the oh god.
“I think the yogurt probably wasn’t a good idea,” said the Dean.
“I’m not drinking that,” said Bilious firmly, and then clutched at his
head.
“But gods are practically unkillable, aren’t they?” said the Dean.
“Oh, good,” muttered Bilious. “Why not stick my legs in a meat grinder,
then?”
“Well, if you think it might help—”
“I anticipated a certain amount of resistance from the patient,” said the
Archchancellor. He removed his hat and fished out a small crystal ball
from a pocket in the lining. “Let’s see what the God of Wine is up to at
the moment, shall we? Shouldn’t be too difficult to locate a fun-loving
god like him on an evening like this…”
He blew on the glass and polished it. Then he brightened up.
“Why, here he is, the little rascal! On Dunmanifestin, I do believe.
Yes…yes…reclining on his couch, surrounded by naked maenads.”
“What? Maniacs?” said the Dean.
“He means…excitable young women,” said Susan. And it seemed to her that
there was a general ripple of movement among the wizards, a sort of
nonchalant drawing toward the glittering ball.
“Can’t quite see what he’s doing…” said Ridcully.
“Let me see if I can make it out,” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies
hopefully. Ridcully half turned to keep the ball out of his reach.
“Ah, yes,” he said. “It looks like he’s drinking…yes, could very well be
lager and black-currant, if I’m any judge…”
“Oh, me…” moaned the oh god.
“These young women, now—” the Lecturer in Recent Runes began.
“I can see there’s some bottles on the table,” Ridcully continued. “That
one, hmm, yes, could be scumble which, as you know, is made from apples—”
“Mainly apples,” the Dean volunteered. “Now, about these poor mad girls—”
The oh god slumped to his knees.
“…and there’s…that drink, you know, there’s a worm in the bottle…”
“Oh, me…”
“…and…there’s an empty glass, a big one, can’t quite see what it
contained, but there’s a paper umbrella in it. And some cherries on a
stick. Oh, and an amusing little monkey.”
“…ooohhh…”
“…of course, there’s a lot of other bottles, too,” said Ridcully,
cheerfully. “Different colored drinks, mainly. The sort made from melons
and coconuts and chocolate and such like, don’tcherknow. Funny thing is,
all the glasses on the table are pint mugs…”
Bilious fell forward.
“All right,” he murmured. “I’ll drink the wretched stuff.”
“It’s not quite ready yet,” said Ridcully. “Ah, thank you, Modo.”
Modo tiptoed in, pushing a trolley. There was a large metal bowl on it,
in which a small bottle stood in the middle of a heap of crushed ice.
“Only just made this for Hogswatch dinner,” said Ridcully. “Hasn’t had
much time to mature yet.”
He put down the crystal and fished a pair of heavy gloves out of his hat.
The wizards spread like an opening flower. One moment they were gathered
around Ridcully, the next they were standing close to various items of
heavy furniture.
Susan felt she was present at a ceremony and hadn’t been told the rules.
“What’s that?” she said, as Ridcully carefully lifted up the bottle.
“Wow-Wow Sauce,” said Ridcully. “Finest condiment known to man. A happy
accompaniment to meat, fish, fowl, eggs and many types of vegetable
dishes. It’s not safe to drink it when sweat’s still condensing on the
bottle, though.” He peered at the bottle, and then rubbed at it, causing
a glassy, squeaky noise. “On the other hand,” he said brightly, “if it’s
a kill-or-cure remedy then we are, given that the patient is practically
immortal, probably onto a winner.”
He placed a thumb over the cork and shook the bottle vigorously. There
was a crash as the Chair of Indefinite Studies and the Senior Wrangler
tried to get under the same table.
“And these fellows seem to have taken against it for some reason,” he
said, approaching the beaker.
“I prefer a sauce that doesn’t mean you mustn’t make any jolting
movements for half an hour after using it,” muttered the Dean.
“And that can’t be used for breaking up small rocks,” said the Senior
Wrangler.
“Or getting rid of tree roots,” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies.
“And which isn’t actually outlawed in three cities,” said the Lecturer in
Recent Runes.
Ridcully cautiously uncorked the bottle. There was a brief hiss of
indrawn air.
He allowed a few drops to splash into the beaker. Nothing happened.
A more generous helping was allowed to fall. The mixture remained
irredeemably inert.
Ridcully sniffed suspiciously at the bottle.
“I wonder if I added enough grated wahooni?” he said, and then upturned
the sauce and let most of it slide into the mixture.
It merely went gloop.
The wizards began to stand up and brush themselves off, giving one
another the rather embarrassed grins of people who know that they’ve just
been part of a synchronized making-a-fool-of-yourself team.
“I know we’ve had that asafoetida rather a long time,” said Ridcully. He
turned the bottle round, peering at it sadly.
Finally he tipped it up for the last time and thumped it hard on the base.
A trickle of sauce arrived on the lip of the bottle and glistened there
for a moment. Then it began to form a bead.
As if drawn by invisible strings, the heads of the wizards turned to look
at it.
Wizards wouldn’t be wizards if they couldn’t see a little way into the
future.
As the bead swelled and started to go pear-shaped they turned and, with a
surprising turn of speed for men so wealthy in years and waistline, began
to dive for the floor.
The drop fell.
It went gloop.
And that was all.
Ridcully, who’d been standing like a statue, sagged in relief.
“I don’t know,” he said, turning away, “I wish you fellows would show
some backbone—”
The fireball lifted him off his feet. Then it rose to the ceiling, where
it spread out widely and vanished with a pop, leaving a perfect
chrysanthemum of scorched plaster.
Pure white light filled the room. And there was a sound.
TINKLE. TINKLE.
FIZZ.
The wizards risked looking around.
The beaker gleamed. It was filled with a liquid glow, which bubbled
gently and sent out sparkles like a spinning diamond.
“My word…” breathed the Lecturer in Recent Runes.
Ridcully picked himself up off the floor. Wizards tended to roll well, or
in any case are well padded enough to bounce.
Slowly, the flickering brilliance casting their long shadows on the walls,
the wizards gravitated toward the beaker.
“Well, what is it?” said the Dean.
“I remember my father tellin’ me some very valuable advice about drinks,”
said Ridcully. “He said, ‘Son, never drink any drink with a paper
umbrella in it, never drink any drink with a humorous name, and never
drink any drink that changes color when the last ingredient goes in. And
never, ever, do this—’”
He dipped his finger into the beaker.
It came out with one glistening drop on the end.
“Careful, Archchancellor,” warned the Dean. “What you have there might
represent pure sobriety.”
Ridcully paused with the finger halfway to his lips.
“Good point,” he said. “I don’t want to start being sober at my time of
life.” He looked around. “How do we usually test stuff?”
“Generally we ask for student volunteers,” said the Dean.
“What happens if we don’t get any?”
“We give it to them anyway.”
“Isn’t that a bit unethical?”
“Not if we don’t tell them, Archchancellor.”
“Ah, good point.”
“I’ll try it,” the oh god mumbled.
“Something these clo—gentlemen have cooked up?” said Susan. “It might
kill you!”
“You’ve never had a hangover, I expect,” said the oh god. “Otherwise you
wouldn’t talk such rot.”
He staggered up to the beaker, managed to grip it on the second go, and
drank the lot.
“There’ll be fireworks now,” said the raven, from Susan’s shoulder.
“Flames coming out of the mouth, screams, clutching at the throat, lying
down under the cold tap, that sort of thing—”
Death found, to his amazement, that dealing with the queue was very
enjoyable. Hardly anyone had ever been pleased to see him before.
NEXT! AND WHAT’S YOUR NAME, LITTLE…He hesitated, but rallied, and
continued…PERSON?
“Nobby Nobbs, Hogfather,” said Nobby. Was it him, or was this knee he was
sitting on a lot bonier than it should be? His buttocks argued with his
brain, and were sat on.
AND HAVE YOU BEEN A GOOD BO…A GOOD DWA…A GOOD GNO…A GOOD INDIVIDUAL?
And suddenly Nobby found he had no control at all of his tongue. Of its
own accord, gripped by a terrible compulsion, it said:
“’s.”
He struggled for self-possession as the great voice went on: SO I EXPECT
YOU’LL WANT A PRESENT FOR A GOOD MON…A GOOD HUM…A GOOD MALE?
Aha, got you bang to rights, you’ll be coming along with me, my old
chummy, I bet you don’t remember the cellar at the back of the shoelace
maker’s in Old Cobblers, eh, all those Hogswatch mornings with a little
hole in my world, eh?
The words rose in Nobby’s throat but were overridden by something ancient
before they reached his voice box, and to his amazement were translated
into:
“’s.”
SOMETHING NICE?
“’s.”
There was hardly anything left of Nobby’s conscious will now. The world
consisted of nothing but his naked soul and the Hogfather, who filled the
universe.
AND YOU WILL OF COURSE BE GOOD FOR ANOTHER YEAR?
The tiny remnant of basic Nobbyness wanted to say, “Er, how exactly do
you define ‘good,’ mister? Like, suppose there was just some stuff that
no one’d miss, say? Or, f’r instance, say a friend of mine was on patrol,
sort of thing, and found a shopkeeper had left his door unlocked at night.
I mean, anyone could walk in, right, but suppose this friend took one or
two things, sort of like, you know, a gratuity, and then called the
shopkeeper out and got him to lock up, that counts as ‘good,’ does it?”
Good and bad were, to Nobby’s way of thinking, entirely relative terms.
Most of his relatives, for example, were criminals. But, again, this
invitation to philosophical debate was ambushed somewhere in his head by
sheer dread of the big beard in the sky.
“’s,” he squeaked.
NOW, I WONDER WHAT YOU WOULD LIKE?
Nobby gave up, and sat mute. Whatever was going to happen next was going
to happen, and there was not a thing he could do about it…Right now, the
light at the end of his mental tunnel showed only more tunnel.
AH, YES…
The Hogfather reached into his sack and pulled out an awkwardly shaped
present wrapped in festive Hogswatch paper which, owing to some slight
confusion on the current Hogfather’s part, had merry ravens on it.
Corporal Nobbs took it in nervous hands.
WHAT DO YOU SAY?
“’nk you.”
OFF YOU GO.
Corporal Nobbs slid down gratefully and barged his way through the crowds,
stopping only when he was fielded by Constable Visit.
“What happened? What happened? I couldn’t see!”
“I dunno,” mumbled Nobby. “He gave me this.”
“What is it.”
“I dunno…”
He clawed at the raven-bedecked paper.
“This is disgusting, this whole business,” said Constable Visit. “It’s
the worship of idols—”
“It’s a genuine Burleigh and Stronginthearm double-action triplecantilever
crossbow with a polished walnut stock and engraved silver
facings!”
“—a crass commercialization of a date which is purely of astronomical
significance,” said Visit, who seldom paid attention when he was in middenounce.
“If it is to be celebrated at all, then—”
“I saw this in Bows and Ammo! It got Editor’s Choice in the ‘What to Buy
When Rich Uncle Sidney Dies’ category! They had to break both the
reviewer’s arms to get him to let go of it!”
“—ought to be commemorated in a small service of—”
“It must cost more’n a year’s salary! They only make ’em to order! You
have to wait ages!”
“—religious significance.” It dawned on Constable Visit that something
behind him was amiss.
“Aren’t we going to arrest this impostor, corporal?” he said.
Corporal Nobbs looked blearily at him through the mists of possessive
pride.
“You’re foreign, Washpot,” he said. “I can’t expect you to know the real
meaning of Hogswatch.”
The oh god blinked.
“Ah,” he said. “That’s better. Oh, yes. That’s a lot better. Thank you.”
The wizards, who shared the raven’s belief in the essential narrative
conventions of life, watched him cautiously.
“Any minute now,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes confidently, “it’ll
probably start with some kind of amusing yell—”
“You know,” said the oh god, “I think I could just possibly eat a softboiled
egg.”
“—or maybe the ears spinning round—”
“And perhaps drink a glass of milk,” said the oh god.
Ridcully looked nonplussed.
“You really feel better?” he said.
“Oh, yes,” said the oh god. “I really think I could risk a smile without
the top of my head falling off.”
“No, no, no,” said the Dean. “This can’t be right. Everyone knows that a
good hangover cure has got to involve a lot of humorous shouting,
ekcetra.”
“I could possibly tell you a joke,” said the oh god carefully.
“You don’t have this pressing urge to run outside and stick your head in
a water butt?” said Ridcully.
“Er…not really,” said the oh god. “But I’d like some toast, if that
helps.”
The Dean took off his hat and pulled a thaumameter out of the point.
“Something happened,” he said. “There was a massive thaumic surge.”
“Didn’t it even taste a bit…well, spicy?” said Ridcully.
“It didn’t taste of anything, really,” said the oh god.
“Oh, look, it’s obvious,” said Susan. “When the God of Wine drinks,
Bilious here gets the aftereffects, so when the God of Hangovers drinks a
hangover cure then the effects must jump back across the same link.”
“That could be right,” said the Dean. “He is, after all, basically a
conduit.”
“I’ve always thought of myself as more of a tube,” said the oh god.
“No, no, she’s right,” said Ridcully. “When he drinks, this lad here gets
the nasty result. So, logically, when our friend here takes a hangover
cure the side effects should head back the same way—”
“Someone mentioned a crystal ball just now,” said the oh god in a voice
suddenly clanging with vengeance. “I want to see this—”
It was a big drink. A very big and a very long drink. It was one of those
special cocktails where each very sticky, very strong ingredient is
poured in very slowly, so that they layer on top of one another. Drinks
like this tend to get called Traffic Lights or Rainbow’s Revenge or, in
places where truth is more highly valued, Hello and Good-bye, Mr. Brain
Cell.
In addition, this drink had some lettuce floating in it. And a slice of
lemon and a piece of pineapple hooked coquettishly on the side of the
glass, which had sugar frosted round the rim. There were two paper
umbrellas, one pink and one blue, and they each had a cherry on the end.
And someone had taken the trouble to freeze ice cubes in the shape of
little elephants. After that, there’s no hope. You might as well be
drinking in a place called the Cococobana.
The God of Wine picked it up lovingly. It was his kind of drink.
There was a rumba going on in the background. There were also a couple of
young ladies snuggling up to him. It was going to be a good night. It was
always a good night.
“Happy Hogswatch, everyone!” he said, and raised the glass.
And then: “Can anyone hear something?”
Someone blew a paper squeaker at him.
“No, seriously…like a sort of descending note…?”
Since no one paid this any attention he shrugged, and nudged one of his
fellow drinkers.
“How about we have a couple more and go to this club I know?” he said.
And then—
The wizards leaned back, and one or two of them grimaced.
Only the oh god stayed glued to the glass, face contorted in a vicious
smile.
“We have eructation!” he shouted, and punched the air. “Yes! Yes! Yes!
The worm is on the other boot now, eh? Hah! How do you like them apples,
huh?”
“Well, mainly apples—” said the Dean.
“Looked like a lot of other things to me,” said Ridcully. “It seems we
have reversed the cause-effect flow…”
“Will it be permanent?” said the oh god hopefully.
“I shouldn’t think so. After all, you are the God of Hangovers. It’ll
probably just reverse itself again when the potion wears off.”
“Then I may not have much time. Bring me…let’s see…twenty pints of lager,
some pepper vodka and a bottle of coffee liqueur! With an umbrella in it!
Let’s see how he enjoys that, Mr. You’ve Got Room For Another One In
There!”
Susan grabbed his hand and pulled him over to a bench.
“I didn’t have you sobered up just so you could go on a binge!” she said.
He blinked at her. “You didn’t?”
“I want you to help me!”
“Help you what?”
“You said you’d never been human before, didn’t you?”
“Er…” The oh god looked down at himself. “That’s right,” he said. “Never.”
“You’ve never incarnated?” said Ridcully.
“Surely that’s a rather personal question, isn’t it?” said the Chair of
Indefinite Studies.
“That’s…right,” said the oh god. “Odd, that. I remember always having
headaches…but never having a head. That can’t be right, can it?”
“You existed in potentia?” said Ridcully.
“Did I?”
“Did he?” said Susan.
Ridcully paused. “Oh dear,” he said. “I think I did it, didn’t I? I said
something to young Stibbons about drinking and hangovers, didn’t I…?”
“And you created him just like that?” said the Dean. “I find that very
hard to believe, Mustrum. Hah! Out of thin air? I suppose we can all do
that, can we? Anyone care to think up some new pixie?”
“Like the Hair Loss Fairy?” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes. The other
wizards laughed.
“I am not losing my hair!” snapped the Dean. “It is just very finely
spaced.”
“Half on your head and half on your hairbrush,” said the Lecturer in
Recent Runes.
“No sense in bein’ bashful about goin’ bald,” said Ridcully evenly.
“Anyway, you know what they say about bald men, Dean.”
“Yes, they say, ‘Look at him, he’s got no hair,’” said the Lecturer in
Recent Runes. The Dean had been annoying him lately.
“For the last time,” shouted the Dean, “I am not—”
He stopped.
There was a glingleglingleglingle noise.
“I wish I knew where that was coming from,” said Ridcully.
“Er…” the Dean began. “Is there…something on my head?”
The other wizards stared.
Something was moving under his hat.
Very carefully, he reached up and removed it.
The very small gnome sitting on his head had a clump of the Dean’s hair
in each hand. It blinked guiltily in the light.
“Is there a problem?” it said.
“Get it off me!” the Dean yelled.
The wizards hesitated. They were all vaguely aware of the theory that
very small creatures could pass on diseases, and while the gnome was
larger than such creatures were generally thought to be, no one wanted to
catch Expanding Scalp Sickness.
Susan grabbed it.
“Are you the Hair Loss Fairy?” she said.
“Apparently,” said the gnome, wriggling in her grip.
The Dean ran his hands desperately through his hair.
“What have you been doing with my hair?” he demanded.
“Well, some of it I think I have to put on hairbrushes,” said the gnome,
“but sometimes I think I weave it into little mats to block up the bath
with.”
“What do you mean, you think?” said Ridcully.
“Just a minute,” said Susan. She turned to the oh god. “Where exactly
were you before I found you in the snow?”
“Er…sort of…everywhere, I think,” said the oh god. “Anywhere where drink
had been consumed in beastly quantities some time previously, you could
say.”
“Ah-ha,” said Ridcully. “You were an immanent vital force, yes?”
“I suppose I could have been,” the oh god conceded.
“And when we joked about the Hair Loss Fairy it suddenly focused on the
Dean’s head,” said Ridcully, “where its operations have been noticeable
to all of us in recent months although of course we have been far too
polite to pass comment on the subject.”
“You’re calling things into being,” said Susan.
“Things like the Give the Dean a Huge Bag of Money Goblin?” said the Dean,
who could think very quickly at times. He looked around hopefully.
“Anyone hear any fairy tinkling?”
“Do you often get given huge bags of money, sir?” said Susan.
“Not on what you’d call a daily basis, no,” said the Dean. “But if—”
“Then there probably isn’t any occult room for a Huge Bags of Money
Goblin,” said Susan.
“I personally have always wondered what happens to my socks,” said the
Bursar cheerfully. “You know how there’s always one missing? When I was a
lad I always thought that something was taking them…”
The wizards gave this some thought. Then they all heard it—the little
crinkly tinkling noise of magic taking place.
The Archchancellor pointed dramatically skyward.
“To the laundry!” he said.
“It’s downstairs, Ridcully,” said the Dean.
“Down to the laundry!”
“And you know Mrs. Whitlow doesn’t like us going in there,” said the
Chair of Indefinite Studies.
“And who is Archchancellor of this University, may I ask?” said Ridcully.
“Is it Mrs. Whitlow? I don’t think so! Is it me? Why, how amazing, I do
believe it is!”
“Yes, but you know what she can be like,” said the Chair.
“Er, yes, that’s true—” Ridcully began.
“I believe she’s gone to her sister’s for the holiday,” said the Bursar.
“We certainly don’t have to take orders from any kind of housekeeper!”
said the Archchancellor. “To the laundry!”
The wizards surged out excitedly, leaving Susan, the oh god, the Verruca
Gnome and the Hair Loss Fairy.
“Tell me again who those people were,” said the oh god.
“Some of the cleverest men in the world,” said Susan.
“And I’m sober, am I?”
“Clever isn’t the same as sensible,” said Susan, “and they do say that if
you wish to walk the path to wisdom then for your first step you must
become as a small child.”
“Do you think they’ve heard about the second step?”
Susan sighed. “Probably not, but sometimes they fall over it while
they’re running around shouting.”
“Ah.” The oh god looked around. “Do you think they have any soft drinks
here?” he said.
The path to wisdom does, in fact, begin with a single step.
Where people go wrong is in ignoring all the thousands of other steps
that come after it. They make the single step of deciding to become one
with the universe, and for some reason forget to take the logical next
step of living for seventy years on a mountain and a daily bowl of rice
and yak-butter tea that would give it any kind of meaning. While evidence
says that the road to hell is paved with good intentions, they’re
probably all on first steps.
The Dean was always at his best at times like this. He led the way
between the huge, ancient copper vats, prodding with his staff into dark
corners and going “Hut! Hut!” under his breath.
“Why would it turn up here?” whispered the Lecturer in Recent Runes.
“Point of reality instability,” said Ridcully, standing on tiptoe to look
into a bleaching cauldron. “Every damn thing turns up here. You should
know that by now.”
“But why now?” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies.
“No talking!” hissed the Dean, and leapt out into the next alleyway,
staff held protectively in front of him.
“Hah!” he screamed, and then looked disappointed.
“Er, how big would this sock-stealing thing be?” said the Senior Wrangler.
“Don’t know,” said Ridcully. He peered behind a stack of washboards.
“Come to think of it, I must’ve lost a ton of socks over the years.”
“Me too,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes.
“So…should we be looking in small places or very large places?” the
Senior Wrangler went on, in the voice of one whose train of thought has
just entered a long dark tunnel.
“Good point,” said Ridcully. “Dean, why do you keep referring to sheds
all the time?”
“It’s ‘hut,’ Mustrum,” said the Dean. “It means…it means…”
“Small wooden building?” Ridcully suggested.
“Well, sometimes, agreed, but other times…well, you just have to say
‘hut.’”
“This sock creature…does it just steal them, or does it eat them?” said
the Senior Wrangler.
“Valuable contribution, that man,” said Ridcully, giving up on the Dean.
“Right, pass the word along: no one is to look like a sock, understand?”
“How can you—” the Dean began, and stopped.
They all heard it.
…grnf, grnf, grnf…
It was a busy sound, the sound of something with a serious appetite to
satisfy.
“The Eater of Socks,” moaned the Senior Wrangler, with his eyes shut.
“How many tentacles would you expect it to have?” said the Lecturer in
Recent Runes. “I mean, roughly speaking?”
“It’s a very large sort of noise, isn’t it?” said the Bursar.
“To the nearest dozen, say,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes, edging
backward.
…grnf, grnf, grnf…
“It’d probably tear our socks off as soon as look at us…” wailed the
Senior Wrangler.
“Ah. So at least five or six tentacles, then, would you say?” said the
Lecturer in Recent Runes.
“Seems to me it’s coming from one of the washing engines,” said the Dean.
The engines were each two stories high, and usually only used when the
University’s population soared during term time. A huge treadmill
connected to a couple of big bleached wooden paddles in each vat, which
were heated via the fireboxes underneath. In full production the washing
engines needed at least half a dozen people to manhandle the loads,
maintain the fires and oil the scrubbing arms. Ridcully had seen them at
work once, when it had looked like a picture of a very clean and hygienic
hell, the kind of place soap might go to when it died.
The Dean stopped by the door to the boiler area.
“Something’s in here,” he whispered. “Listen!”
…grnf…
“It’s stopped! It knows we’re here!” he hissed. “All right? Ready? Hut!”
“No!” squeaked the Lecturer in Recent Runes.
“I’ll open the door and you be ready to stop it! One…two…three! Oh…”
The sleigh soared into the snowy sky.
ON THE WHOLE, I THINK THAT WENT VERY WELL, DON’T YOU?
“Yes, master,” said Albert.
I WAS RATHER PUZZLED BY THE LITTLE BOY IN THE CHAIN MAIL, THOUGH.
“I think that was a Watchman, master.”
REALLY? WELL, HE WENT AWAY HAPPY, AND THAT’S THE MAIN THING.
“Is it, master?” There was worry in Albert’s voice. Death’s osmotic
nature tended to pick up new ideas altogether too quickly. Of course,
Albert understood why they had to do all this, but the master…well,
sometimes the master lacked the necessary mental equipment to work out
what should be true and what shouldn’t…
AND I THINK I’VE GOT THE LAUGH WORKING REALLY WELL NOW. HO. HO. HO.
“Yeah, sir, very jolly,” said Albert. He looked down at the list. “Still,
work goes on, eh? The next one’s pretty close, master, so I should keep
them down low if I was you.”
JOLLY GOOD. HO. HO. HO.
“Sarah the little match girl, doorway of Thimble’s Pipe and Tobacco Shop,
Money Trap Lane, it says here.”
AND WHAT DOES SHE WANT FOR HOGSWATCH? HO. HO. HO.
“Dunno. Never sent a letter. By the way, just a tip, you don’t have to
say ‘Ho, ho, ho’ all the time, master. Let’s see…It says here…” Albert’s
lips moved as he read.
I EXPECT A DOLL IS ALWAYS ACCEPTABLE. OR A SOFT TOY OF SOME DESCRIPTION.
THE SACK SEEMS TO KNOW. WHAT’VE WE GOT FOR HER, ALBERT? HO. HO. HO.
Something small was dropped into his hand.
“This,” said Albert.
OH.
There was a moment of horrible silence as they both stared at the
lifetimer.
“You’re for life, not just for Hogswatch,” prompted Albert. “Life goes on,
master. In a manner of speaking.”
BUT THIS IS HOGSWATCHNIGHT.
“Very traditional time for this sort of thing, I understand,” said Albert.
I THOUGHT IT WAS THE SEASON TO BE JOLLY, said Death.
“Ah, well, yes, you see, one of the things that makes folks even more
jolly is knowing there’re people who ain’t,” said Albert, in a matter-offact
voice. “That’s how it goes, master. Master?”
No. Death stood up. THIS IS HOW IT SHOULDN’T GO.
The University’s Great Hall had been set for the Hogswatchnight Feast.
The tables were already groaning under the weight of the cutlery, and it
would be hours before any real food was put on them. It was hard to see
where there would be space for any among the drifts of ornamental fruit
bowls and forests of wine glasses.
The oh god picked up a menu and turned to the fourth page.
“Course four: mollusks and crustaceans. A medley of lobster, crab, king
crab, prawn, shrimp, oyster, clam, giant mussel, green-lipped mussel,
thin-lipped mussel and Fighting Tiger Limpet. With a herb and butter
dipping sauce. Wine: ‘Three Wizards’ Chardonnay, Year of the Talking Frog.
Beer: Winkles’ Old Peculiar.” He put it down. “That’s one course?” he
said.
“They’re big men in the food department,” said Susan.
He turned the menu over. On the cover was the University’s coat of arms
and, over it, three large letters in ancient script:
? ß ?
“Is this some sort of magic word?”
“No.” Susan sighed. “They put it on all their menus. You might call it
the unofficial motto of the University.”
“What’s it mean?”
“Eta Beta Pi.”
Bilious gave her an expectant look.
“Yes…?”
“Er…like, Eat a Better Pie?” said Susan.
“That’s what you just said, yes,” said the oh god.
“Um. No. You see, the letters are Ephebian characters which just sound a
bit like ‘eat a better pie.’”
“Ah.” Bilious nodded wisely. “I can see that might cause confusion.”
Susan felt a bit helpless in the face of the look of helpful puzzlement.
“No,” she said, “in fact they are supposed to cause a little bit of
confusion, and then you laugh. It’s called a pune or play on words. Eta
Beta Pi.” She eyed him carefully. “You laugh,” she said. “With your mouth.
Only, in fact, you don’t laugh, because you’re not supposed to laugh at
things like this.”
“Perhaps I could find that glass of milk,” said the oh god helplessly,
peering at the huge array of jugs and bottles. He’d clearly given up on
sense of humor.
“I gather the Archchancellor won’t have milk in the University,” said
Susan. “He says he knows where it comes from and it’s unhygienic. And
that’s a man who eats three eggs for breakfast every day, mark you. How
do you know about milk, by the way?”
“I’ve got…memories,” said the oh god. “Not exactly of anything, er,
specific. Just, you know, memories. Like, I know trees usually grow
green-end up…that sort of thing. I suppose gods just know things.”
“Any special god-like powers?”
“I might be able to turn water into an enervescent drink.” He pinched the
bridge of his nose. “Is that any help? And it’s just possible I can give
people a blinding headache.”
“I need to find out why my grandfather is…acting strange.”
“Can’t you ask him?”
“He won’t tell me!”
“Does he throw up a lot?”
“I shouldn’t think so. He doesn’t often eat. The occasional curry, once
or twice a month.”
“He must be pretty thin.”
“You’ve no idea.”
“Well, then…Does he often stare at himself in the mirror and say ‘Arrgh’?
Or stick out his tongue and wonder why it’s gone yellow? You see, it’s
possible I might have some measure of influence over people who are hung
over. If he’s been drinking a lot, I might be able to find him.”
“I can’t see him doing any of those things. I think I’d better tell
you…My grandfather is Death.”
“Oh, I’m sorry to hear that.”
“I said Death.”
“Sorry?”
“Death. You know…Death?”
“You mean the robes, the—”
“—scythe, white horse, bones…yes. Death.”
“I just want to make sure I’ve got this clear,” said the oh god in a
reasonable tone of voice. “You think your grandfather is Death and you
think he’s acting strange?”
The Eater of Socks looked up at the wizards, cautiously. Then its jaws
started to work again.
…grnf, grnf…
“Here, that’s one of mine!” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies, making
a grab. The Eater of Socks backed away hurriedly.
It looked like a very small elephant with a very wide, flared trunk, up
which one of the Chair’s socks was disappearing.
“Funny lookin’ little thing, ain’t it?” said Ridcully, leaning his staff
against the wall.
“Let go, you wretched creature!” said the Chair, making a grab for the
sock. “Shoo!”
The sock eater tried to get away while remaining where it was. This
should be impossible, but it is in fact a move attempted by many small
animals when they are caught eating something forbidden. The legs
scrabble hurriedly but the neck and feverishly working jaws merely
stretch and pivot around the food. Finally the last of the sock
disappeared up the snout with a faint sucking noise and the creature
lumbered off behind one of the boilers. After a while it poked one
suspicious eye around the corner to watch them.
“They’re expensive, you know, with the flax-reinforced heel,” muttered
the Chair of Indefinite Studies.
Ridcully pulled open a drawer in his hat and extracted his pipe and a
pouch of herbal tobacco. He struck a match on the side of the washing
engine. This was turning out to be a far more interesting evening than he
had anticipated.
“We’ve got to get this sorted out,” he said, as the first few puffs
filled the washing hall with the scent of autumn bonfires. “Can’t have
creatures just popping into existence because someone’s thought about
them. It’s unhygienic.”
The sleigh slewed around at the end of Money Trap Lane.
COME ON, ALBERT.
“You know you’re not supposed to do this sort of thing, master. You know
what happened last time.”
THE HOGFATHER CAN DO IT, THOUGH.
“But…little match girls dying in the snow is part of what the Hogswatch
spirit is all about, master,” said Albert desperately. “I mean, people
hear about it and say, ‘We may be poorer than a disabled banana and only
have mud and old boots to eat, but at least we’re better off than the
poor little match girl,’ master. It makes them feel happy and grateful
for what they’ve got, see.”
I KNOW WHAT THE SPIRIT OF HOGSWATCH IS, ALBERT.
“Sorry, master. But, look, it’s all right, anyway, because she wakes up
and it’s all bright and shining and tinkling music and there’s angels,
master.”
Death stopped.
AH. THEY TURN UP AT THE LAST MINUTE WITH WARM CLOTHES AND A HOT DRINK?
Oh dear, thought Albert. The master’s really in one of his funny moods
now.
“Er. No. Not exactly at the last minute, master. Not as such.”
WELL?
“More sort of just after the last minute.” Albert coughed nervously.
YOU MEAN AFTER SHE’S—
“Yes. That’s how the story goes, master, ’s not my fault.”
WHY NOT TURN UP BEFORE? AN ANGEL HAS QUITE A LARGE CARRYING CAPACITY.
“Couldn’t say, master. I suppose people think it’s more…satisfying the
other way…Albert hesitated, and then frowned. “You know, now that I come
to tell someone…”
Death looked down at the shape under the falling snow. Then he set the
lifetimer on the air and touched it with a finger. A spark flashed across.
“You ain’t really allowed to do that,” said Albert, feeling wretched.
THE HOGFATHER CAN. THE HOGFATHER GIVES PRESENTS. THERE’S NO BETTER
PRESENT THAN A FUTURE.
“Yeah, but—”
ALBERT.
“All right, master.”
Death scooped up the girl and strode to the end of the alley.
The snowflakes fell like angel’s feathers. Death stepped out into the
street and accosted two figures who were tramping through the drifts.
TAKE HER SOMEWHERE WARM AND GIVE HER A GOOD DINNER, he commanded, pushing
the bundle into the arms of one of them. AND I MAY WELL BE CHECKING UP
LATER.
Then he turned and disappeared into the swirling snow.
Constable Visit looked down at the little girl in his arms, and then at
Corporal Nobbs.
“What’s all this about, corporal?”
Nobby pulled aside the blanket.
“Search me,” he said. “Looks like we’ve been chosen to do a bit of
charity.”
“I don’t call it very charitable, just dumping someone on people like
this.”
“Come on, there’ll still be some grub left in the Watch-house,” said
Nobby. He’d got a very deep and certain feeling that this was expected of
him. He remembered a big man in a grotto, although he couldn’t quite
remember the face. And he couldn’t quite remember the face of the person
who had handed over the girl, so that meant it must be the same one.
Shortly afterward there was some tinkling music and a very bright light
and two rather affronted angels appeared at the other end of the alley,
but Albert threw snowballs at them until they went away.
Hex worried Ponder Stibbons. He didn’t know how it worked, but everyone
else assumed that he did. Oh, he had a good idea about some parts, and he
was pretty certain that Hex thought about things by turning them all into
numbers and crunching them (a clothes wringer from the laundry, or CWL,
had been plumbed in for this very purpose), but why did it need a lot of
small religious pictures? And there was the mouse. It didn’t seem to do
much, but whenever they forgot to give it its cheese Hex stopped working.
There were all those ram skulls. The ants wandered over to them
occasionally but they didn’t seem to do anything.
What Ponder was worried about was the fear that he was simply engaged in
a cargo cult. He’d read about them. Ignorant* and credulous† people,
whose island might once have been visited by some itinerant merchant
vessel that traded pearls and coconuts for such fruits of civilization as
glass beads, mirrors, axes and sexual diseases, would later make big
model ships out of bamboo in the hope of once again attracting this
magical cargo. Of course, they were far too ignorant and credulous to
know that just because you built the shape you didn’t get the substance…
He’d built the shape of Hex and, it occurred to him, he’d built it in a
magical university where the border between the real and “not real” was
stretched so thin you could almost see through it. He got the horrible
suspicion that, somehow, they were merely making solid a sketch that was
hidden somewhere in the air.
Hex knew what it ought to be.
All that business about the electricity, for example. Hex had raised the
subject one night, not long after it’d asked for the mouse.
Ponder prided himself that he knew pretty much all there was to know
about electricity. But they’d tried rubbing balloons and glass rods until
they’d been able to stick Adrian onto the ceiling, and it hadn’t had any
effect on Hex. Then they’d tried tying a lot of cats to a wheel which,
when revolved against some beads of amber, caused any amount of
electricity all over the place. The wretched stuff hung around for days,
but there didn’t seem any way of ladling it into Hex and anyway no one
could stand the noise.
So far the Archchancellor had vetoed the lightning rod idea.
All this depressed Ponder. He was certain that the world ought to work in
a more efficient way.
And now even the things that he thought were going right were going wrong.
He stared glumly at Hex’s quill pen in its tangle of springs and wire.
The door was thrown open. Only one person could make a door bang on its
hinges like that. Ponder didn’t even turn round.
“Hello again, Archchancellor.”
“That thinking engine of yours working?” said Ridcully. “Only there’s an
interesting little—”
“It’s not working,” said Ponder.
“It ain’t? What’s this, a half-holiday for Hogswatch?”
“Look,” said Ponder.
Hex wrote: +++ Whoops! Here Comes The Cheese! +++ MELON MELON MELON +++
Error At Address: 14, Treacle Mine Road, Ankh-Morpork +++ !!!!! +++
Oneoneoneoneoneone +++ Redo From Start +++
“What’s going on?” said Ridcully, as the others pushed in behind them.
“I know it sounds stupid, Archchancellor, but we think it might have
caught something off the Bursar.”
“Daftness, you mean?”
“That’s ridiculous, boy!” said the Dean. “Idiocy is not a communicable
disease.”
Ridcully puffed his pipe.
“I used to think that, too,” he said. “Now I’m not so sure. Anyway, you
can catch wisdom, can’t you?”
“No, you can’t,” snapped the Dean. “It’s not like the flu, Ridcully.
Wisdom is…well, instilled.”
“We bring students here and hope they catch wisdom off us, don’t we?”
said Ridcully.
“Well, metaphorically,” said the Dean.
“And if you hang around with a bunch of idiots you’re bound to become
pretty daft yourself,” Ridcully went on.
“I suppose in a manner of speaking…”
“And you’ve only got to talk to the poor old Bursar for five minutes and
you think you’re going a bit potty yourself, am I right?”
The wizards nodded glumly. The Bursar’s company, although quite harmless,
had a habit of making one’s brain squeak.
“So Hex here has caught daftness off the Bursar,” said Ridcully. “Simple.
Real stupidity beats artificial intelligence every time.” He banged his
pipe on the side of Hex’s listening tube and shouted: “FEELING ALL RIGHT,
OLD CHAP?”
Hex wrote: +++ Hi Mum Is Testing +++ MELON MELON MELON +++ Out Of Cheese
Error +++ !!!!! +++ Mr. Jelly! Mr. Jelly! +++
“Hex seems perfectly able to work out anything purely to do with numbers,
but when it tries anything else it does this,” said Ponder.
“See? Bursar Disease,” said Ridcully. “The bee’s knees when it comes to
adding up, the pig’s ear at everything else. Try giving him dried frog
pills?”
“Sorry, sir, but that is a very uninformed suggestion,” said Ponder. “You
can’t give medicine to machines.”
“Don’t see why not,” said Ridcully. He banged on the tube again and
bellowed, “SOON HAVE YOU BACK ON YOUR…your…yes, indeed, old chap! Where’s
that board with all the letter and number buttons, Mr. Stibbons? Ah,
good.” He sat down and typed, with one finger, as slowly as a company
chairman:
D-R-Y-D-F-R-O-R-G-1/2 P-I-L-L-S
Hex’s pipes jangled.
“That can’t possibly work, sir,” said Ponder.
“It ought to,” said Ridcully. “If he can get the idea of being ill, he
can get the idea of being cured.”
He typed: L-O-T-S-O-F-D-R-Y-D-F-R-O-R-G-P-1/4-L-L-S
“Seems to me,” he said, “that this thing believes what it’s told, right?”
“Well, it’s true that Hex has, if you want to put it that way, no idea of
an untruth.”
“Right. Well, I’ve just told the thing it’s had a lot of dried frog pills.
It’s not going to call me a liar, is it?”
There was some clickings and whirrings within the structure of Hex.
Then it wrote: +++ Good Evening, Archchancellor. I Am Fully Recovered And
Enthusiastic About My Tasks +++
“Not mad, then?”
+++ I Assure You I Am As Sane As The Next Man +++
“Bursar, just move away from the machine, will you?” said Ridcully. “Oh,
well, I expect it’s the best we’re going to get. Right, let’s get all
this sorted out. We want to find out what’s going on.”
“Anywhere specific or just everywhere?” said Ponder, a shade
sarcastically.
There was a scratching noise from Hex’s pen. Ridcully glanced down at the
paper.
“Says here ‘Implied Creation Of Anthropomorphic Personification,’” he
said. “What’s that mean?”
“Er…I think Hex has tried to work out the answer,” said Ponder.
“Has it, bigods? I hadn’t even worked out what the question was yet…”
“It heard you talking, sir.”
Ridcully raised his eyebrows. Then he leaned down toward the speaking
tube.
“CAN YOU HEAR ME IN THERE?”
The pen scratched.
+++ Yes +++
“LOOKIN’ AFTER YOU ALL RIGHT, ARE THEY?”
“You don’t have to shout, Archchancellor,” said Ponder.
“What’s this Implied Creation, then?” said Ridcully.
“Er, I think I’ve heard of it, Archchancellor,” said Ponder. “It means
the existence of some things automatically brings into existence other
things. If some things exist, certain other things have to exist as well.”
“Like…crime and punishment, say?” said Ridcully. “Drinking and
hangovers…of course…”
“Something like that, sir, yes.”
“So…if there’s a Tooth Fairy there has to be a Verruca Gnome?” Ridcully
stroked his beard. “Makes a sort of sense, I suppose. But why not a
Wisdom Tooth Goblin? You know, bringing them extra ones? Some little
devil with a bag of big teeth?”
There was silence. But in the depths of the silence there was a little
tingly fairy bell sound.
“Er…do you think I might have—” Ridcully began.
“Sounds logical to me,” said the Senior Wrangler. “I remember the agony I
had when my wisdom teeth came through.”
“Last week?” said the Dean, and smirked.
“Ah,” said Ridcully. He didn’t look embarrassed because people like
Ridcully are never, ever embarrassed about anything, although often
people are embarrassed on their behalf. He bent down to the ear trumpet
again.
“YOU STILL IN THERE?”
Ponder Stibbons rolled his eyes.
“MIND TELLING US WHAT THE REALITY IS LIKE ROUND HERE?”
The pen wrote: +++ On A Scale Of One To Ten—Query +++
“FINE,” Ridcully shouted.
+++ Divide By Cucumber Error. Please Reinstall Universe And Reboot +++
“Interestin’,” said Ridcully. “Anyone know what that means?”
“Damn,” said Ponder. “It’s crashed again.”
Ridcully looked mystified. “Has it? I never even saw it take off.”
“I mean it’s…it’s sort of gone a little bit mad,” said Ponder.
“Ah,” said Ridcully. “Well, we’re experts at that around here.”
He thumped on the drum again.
“WANT SOME MORE DRIED FROG PILLS, OLD CHAP?” he shouted.
“Er, I should let us sort it out, Archchancellor,” said Ponder, trying to
steer him away.
“What does ‘divide by cucumber’ mean?” said Ridcully.
“Oh, Hex just says that if it comes up with an answer that it knows can’t
possibly be real,” said Ponder.
“And this ‘rebooting’ business? Give it a good kicking, do you?”
“Oh, no, of course, we…that is…well, yes, in fact,” said Ponder. “Adrian
goes round the back and…er…prods it with his foot. But in a technical
way,” he added.
“Ah. I think I’m getting the hang of this thinkin’ engine business,” said
Ridcully cheerfully. “So it reckons the universe needs a kicking, does
it?”
Hex’s pen was scratching across the paper. Ponder glanced at the figures.
“It must do. These figures can’t be right!”
Ridcully grinned again. “You mean either the whole world has gone wrong
or your machine is wrong?”
“Yes!”
“Then I’d imagine the answer’s pretty easy, wouldn’t you?” said Ridcully.
“Yes. It certainly is. Hex gets thoroughly tested every day,” said Ponder
Stibbons.
“Good point, that, man,” said Ridcully. He banged on Hex’s listening tube
once more.
“YOU DOWN THERE—”
“You really don’t need to shout, Archchancellor,” said Ponder.
“—what’s this Anthropomorphic Personification, then?”
+++ Humans Have Always Ascribed Random, Seasonal, Natural Or Inexplicable
Actions To Human-Shaped Entities. Such Examples Are Jack Frost, The
Hogfather, The Tooth Fairy And Death +++
“Oh, them. Yes, but they exist,” said Ridcully. “Met a couple of ’em
myself.”
+++ Humans Are Not Always Wrong +++
“All right, but I’m damn sure there’s never been an Eater of Socks or God
of Hangovers.”
+++ But There Is No Reason Why There Should Not Be +++
“The thing’s right, you know,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes. “A
little man who carries verrucas around is no more ridiculous than someone
who takes away children’s teeth for money, when you come to think about
it.”
“Yes, but what about the Eater of Socks?” said the Chair of Indefinite
Studies. “Bursar just said he always thought something was eating his
socks and, bingo, there it was.”
“But we all believed him, didn’t we? I know I did. Seems like the best
possible explanation for all the socks I’ve lost over the years. I mean,
if they’d just fallen down the back of the drawer or something there’d be
a mountain of the things by now.”
“I know what you mean,” said Ponder. “It’s like pencils. I must have
bought hundreds of pencils over the years, but how many have I ever
actually worn down to the stub? Even I’ve caught myself thinking that
something’s creeping up and eating them—”
There was a faint glingleglingle noise. He froze.
“What was that?” he said. “Should I look round? Will I see something
horrible?”
“Looks like a very puzzled bird,” said Ridcully.
“With a very odd-shaped beak,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes.
“I wish I knew who’s making that bloody tinkling noise,” said the
Archchancellor.
The oh god listened attentively. Susan was amazed. He didn’t seem to
disbelieve anything. She’d never been able to talk like this before, and
said so.
“I think that’s because I haven’t got any preconceived ideas,” said the
oh god. “It comes of not having been conceived, probably.”
“Well, that’s how it is, anyway,” said Susan. “Obviously I haven’t
inherited…physical characteristics. I suppose I just look at the world in
a certain way.”
“What way?”
“It…doesn’t always present barriers. Like this, for example.”
She closed her eyes. She felt better if she didn’t see what she was doing.
Part of her would keep on insisting it was impossible.
All she felt was a faintly cold, prickling sensation.
“What did I just do?” she said, her eyes still shut.
“Er…you waved your hand through the table,” said the oh god.
“You see?”
“Um…I assume that most humans can’t do that?”
“No!”
“You don’t have to shout. I’m not very experienced about humans, am I?
Apart from around the point the sun shines through the gap in the
curtains. And then they’re mainly wishing that the ground would open up
and swallow them. I mean the humans, not the curtains.”
Susan leaned back in her chair—and knew that a tiny part of her brain was
saying, yes, there is a chair here, it’s a real thing, you can sit on it.
“There’s other things,” she said. “I can remember things. Things that
haven’t happened yet.”
“Isn’t that useful?”
“No! Because I never know what they—look, it’s like looking at the future
through a keyhole. You see bits of things but you never really know what
they mean until you arrive where they are and see where the bit fits in.”
“That could be a problem,” said the oh god politely.
“Believe me. It’s the waiting that’s the worst part. You keep watching
out for one of the bits to go past. I mean I don’t usually remember
anything useful about the future, just twisted little clues that don’t
make sense until it’s too late. Are you sure you don’t know why you
turned up at the Hogfather’s castle?”
“No. I just remember being a…well, can you understand what I mean by a
disembodied mind?”
“Oh, yes.”
“Good. Now can you understand what I mean by a disembodied headache? And
then, next moment, I was lying on a back I didn’t used to have in a lot
of cold white stuff I’d never seen before. But I suppose if you’re going
to pop into existence, you’ve got to do it somewhere.”
“Somewhere where someone else, who should have existed, didn’t,” said
Susan, half to herself.
“Pardon?”
“The Hogfather wasn’t there,” said Susan. “He shouldn’t have been there
anyway, not tonight, but this time he wasn’t there not because he was
somewhere else but because he wasn’t anywhere any more. Even his castle
was vanishing.”
“I expect I shall get the hang of this incarnation business as I go
along,” said the oh god.
“Most people—” Susan began. A shudder ran through her body. “Oh, no.
What’s he doing? WHAT’S HE DOING?”
A JOB WELL DONE, I FANCY.
The sleigh thundered across the night. Frozen fields passed underneath.
“Hmph,” said Albert. He sniffed.
WHAT DO YOU CALL THAT WARM FEELING YOU GET INSIDE?
“Heartburn!” Albert snapped.
DO I DETECT A NOTE OF UNSEASONAL GRUMPINESS? said Death. NO SUGAR
PIGGYWIGGY FOR YOU, ALBERT.
“I don’t want any present, master.” Albert sighed. “Except maybe to wake
up and find it’s all back to normal. Look, you know it always goes wrong
when you start changing things…”
BUT THE HOGFATHER CAN CHANGE THINGS. LITTLE MIRACLES ALL OVER THE PLACE,
WITH MANY A MERRY HO, HO, HO. TEACHING PEOPLE THE REAL MEANING OF
HOGSWATCH, ALBERT.
“What, you mean that the pigs and cattle have all been slaughtered and
with any luck everyone’s got enough food for the winter?”
WELL, WHEN I SAY THE REAL MEANING—
“Some wretched devil’s had his head chopped off in a wood somewhere ’cos
he found a bean in his dinner and now the summer’s going to come back?”
NOT EXACTLY THAT, BUT—
“Oh, you mean that they’ve chased down some poor beast and shot arrows up
into their apple trees and now the shadows are going to go away?”
THAT IS DEFINITELY A MEANING, BUT I—
“Ah, then you’re talking about the one where they light a bloody big
bonfire to give the sun a hint and tell it to stop lurking under the
horizon and do a proper day’s work?”
Death paused, while the hogs hurtled over a range of hills.
YOU’RE NOT HELPING, ALBERT.
“Well, they’re all the real meanings that I know.”
I THINK YOU COULD WORK WITH ME ON THIS.
“It’s all about the sun, master. White snow and red blood and the sun.
Always has been.”
VERY WELL, THEN. THE HOGFATHER CAN TEACH PEOPLE THE UNREAL MEANING OF
HOGSWATCH.
Albert spat over the side of the sleigh. “Hah! ‘Wouldn’t It Be Nice If
Everyone Was Nice,’ eh?”
THERE ARE WORSE BATTLE CRIES.
“Oh dear, oh dear, oh dear…”
EXCUSE ME…
Death reached into his robe and pulled out an hourglass.
TURN THE SLEIGH AROUND, ALBERT. DUTY CALLS.
“Which one?”
A MORE POSITIVE ATTITUDE WOULD ASSIST AT THIS POINT, THANK YOU SO VERY
MUCH.
“Fascinatin’. Anyone got another pencil?” said Ridcully.
“It’s had four already,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes. “Right down
to the stub, Archchancellor. And you know we buy our own these days.”
It was a sore point. Like most people with no grasp whatsoever of real
economics, Mustrum Ridcully equated “proper financial control” with the
counting of paper clips. Even senior wizards had to produce a pencil stub
to him before they were allowed a new one out of the locked cupboard
below his desk. Since of course hardly anyone retained a half-used pencil,
the wizards had been reduced to sneaking out and buying new ones with
their own money.
The reason for the dearth of short pencils was perched in front of them,
whirring away as it chewed an HB down to the eraser on the end, which it
spat at the Bursar.
Ponder Stibbons had been making notes.
“I think it works like this,” he said. “What we’re getting is the
personification of forces, just like Hex said. But it only works if the
thing is…well, logical.” He swallowed. Ponder was a great believer in
logic, in the face of all the local evidence, and he hated having to use
the word in this way. “I don’t mean it’s logical that there’s a creature
that eats socks, but it…a…it makes a sort of sense…I mean it’s a working
hypothesis.”
“Bit like the Hogfather,” said Ridcully. “When you’re a kiddie, he’s as
good an explanation as any, right?”
“What’s not logical about there being a goblin that brings me huge bags
of money?” said the Dean sulkily. Ridcully fed the Stealer of Pencils
another pencil.
“Well, sir…firstly, you’ve never mysteriously received huge bags of money
and needed to find a hypothesis to explain them, and secondly, no one
else would think it at all likely.”
“Huh!”
“Why’s it happening now?” said Ridcully. “Look, it’s hopped onto my
finger! Anyone got another pencil?”
“Well, these…forces have always been here,” said Ponder. “I mean, socks
and pencils have always inexplicably gone missing, haven’t they? But why
they’re suddenly getting personified like this…I’m afraid I don’t know.”
“Well, we’d better find out, hadn’t we?” said Ridcully. “Can’t have this
sort of thing going on. Daft anti-gods and miscellaneous whatnots being
created just because people’ve thought about ’em? We could have anything
turn up, anyway. Supposing some idiot says there must be a god of
indigestion, eh?”
Glingleglingleglingle.
“Er…I think someone just did, sir,” said Ponder.
“What’s the matter? What’s the matter?” said the oh god. He took Susan by
the shoulders.
They felt bony under his hands.
“DAMN,” said Susan. She pushed him away and steadied herself on the table,
taking care that he didn’t see her face.
Finally, with a measure of the self-control she’d taught herself over the
last few years, she managed to get her own voice back.
“He’s slipping out of character,” she muttered, to the hall in general.
“I can feel him doing it. And that drags me in. What’s he doing it all
for?”
“Search me,” said the oh god, who’d backed away hurriedly. “Er…just
then…before you turned your face away…it looked as though you were
wearing very dark eye shadow…only you weren’t…”
“Look, it’s very simple,” said Susan, spinning round. She could feel her
hair restyling itself, which it always did when it was anxious. “You know
how stuff runs in families? Blue eyes, buck teeth, that sort of thing?
Well, Death runs in my family.”
“Er…in everybody’s family, doesn’t it?” said the oh god.
“Just shut up, please, don’t gabble,” said Susan. “I didn’t mean death, I
meant Death with a capital D. I remember things that haven’t happened yet
and I can TALK THAT TALK and stalk that stalk and…if he gets sidetracked,
then I’ll have to do it. And he does get sidetracked. I don’t know what’s
really happened to the real Hogfather or why Grandfather’s doing his job,
but I know a bit about how he thinks and he’s got no…no mental shields
like we have. He doesn’t know how to forget things or ignore things. He
takes everything liter ally and logically and doesn’t understand why that
doesn’t always work—”
She saw his bemused expression.
“Look…how would you make sure everyone in the world was well fed?” she
demanded.
“Me? Oh, well, I…” The oh god spluttered for a moment. “I suppose you’d
have to think about the prevalent political systems, and the proper
division and cultivation of arable land, and—”
“Yes, yes. But he’d just give everyone a good meal,” said Susan.
“Oh, I see. Very impractical. Hah, it’s as silly as saying you could
clothe the naked by, well, giving them some clothes.”
“Yes! I mean, no. Of course not! I mean, obviously you’d give—oh, you
know what I mean!”
“Yes, I suppose so.”
“But he wouldn’t.”
There was a crash beside them.
A burning wheel always rolls out of flaming wreckage. Two men carrying a
large sheet of glass always cross the road in front of any comedy actor
involved in a crazy car chase. Some narrative conventions are so strong
that equivalents happen even on planets where the rocks boil at noon. And
when a fully laden table collapses, one miraculously unbroken plate
always rolls across the floor and spins to a halt.
Susan and the oh god watched it, and then turned their attention to the
huge figure now lying in what remained of an enormous centerpiece made of
fruit.
“He just…came right out of the air,” whispered the oh god.
“Really? Don’t just stand there. Give me a hand to help him up, will you?”
said Susan, pulling at a large melon.
“Er, that’s a bunch of grapes behind his ear—”
“Well?”
“I don’t like even to think about grapes—”
“Oh, come on.”
Together they managed to get the newcomer onto his feet.
“Toga, sandals…he looks a bit like you,” said Susan, as the fruit victim
swayed heavily.
“Was I that green color?”
“Close.”
“Is…is there a privy nearby?” mumbled their burden, through clammy lips.
“I believe it’s through that arch over there,” said Susan. “I’ve heard
it’s not very pleasant, though.”
“That’s not a rumor, that’s a forecast,” said the fat figure, and lurched
off. “And then can I please have a glass of water and one charcoal
biscuit…”
They watched him go.
“Friend of yours?” said Susan.
“God of Indigestion, I think. Look…I…er…I think I do remember something,”
said the oh god. “Just before I, um, incarnated. But it sounds stupid…”
“Well?”
“Teeth,” said the oh god.
Susan hesitated.
“You don’t mean something attacking you, do you?” she said flatly.
“No. Just…a sensation of toothiness. Probably doesn’t mean much. As God
of Hangovers I see a lot worse, I can tell you.”
“Just teeth. Lots of teeth. But not horrible teeth. Just lots and lots of
little teeth. Almost…sad?”
“Yes! How did you know?”
“Oh, I…maybe I remember you telling me before you told me. I don’t know.
How about a big shiny red globe?”
The oh god looked thoughtful for a moment and then said, “No, can’t help
you there, I’m afraid. It’s just teeth. Rows and rows of teeth.”
“I don’t remember rows,” said Susan. “I just felt…teeth were important.”
“Nah, it’s amazing what you can do with a beak,” said the raven, who’d
been investigating the laden table and had succeeded in levering a lid
off a jar.
“What have you got there?” said Susan wearily.
“Eyeballs,” said the raven. “Hah, wizards know how to live all right, eh?
They don’t want for nothing around here, I can tell you.”
“They’re olives,” said Susan.
“Tough luck,” said the raven. “They’re mine now.”
“They’re a kind of fruit! Or a vegetable or something!”
“You sure?” The raven swiveled one doubtful eye on the jar and the other
on her.
“Yes!”
The eyes swiveled again.
“So you’re an eyeball expert all of a sudden?”
“Look, they’re green, you stupid bird!”
“They could be very old eyeballs,” said the raven defiantly. “Sometimes
they go like that—”
SQUEAK, said the Death of Rats, who was halfway through a cheese.
“And not so much of the stupid,” said the raven. “Corvids are
exceptionally bright with reasoning and, in the case of some forest
species, tool-using abilities!”
“Oh, so you are an expert on ravens, are you?” said Susan.
“Madam, I happen to be a—”
SQUEAK, said the Death of Rats again.
They both turned. It was pointing at its gray teeth.
“The Tooth Fairy?” said Susan. “What about her?”
SQUEAK.
“Rows of teeth,” said the oh god again. “Like…rows, you know? What’s the
Tooth Fairy?”
“Oh, you see her around a lot these days,” said Susan. “Or them, rather.
It’s a sort of franchise operation. You get the ladder, the money belt
and the pliers and you’re set up.”
“Pliers?”
“If she can’t make change she has to take an extra tooth on account. But,
look, the tooth fairies are harmless enough. I’ve met one or two of them.
They’re just working girls. They don’t menace anyone.”
SQUEAK.
“I just hope Grandfather doesn’t take it into his head to do their job as
well. Good grief, the thought of it—”
“They collect teeth?”
“Yes. Obviously.”
“Why?”
“Why? It’s their job.”
“I meant why, where do they take the teeth after they collect them?”
“I don’t know! They just…well, they just take the teeth and leave the
money,” said Susan. “What sort of question is that—‘Where do they take
the teeth?’”
“I just wondered, that’s all. Probably all humans know, I’m probably very
silly for asking, it’s probably a well-known fact.”
Susan looked thoughtfully at the Death of Rats.
“Actually…where do they take the teeth?”
SQUEAK?
“He says search him,” said the raven. “Maybe they sell ’em?” It pecked at
another jar. “How about these, these look nice and wrinkl—”
“Pickled walnuts,” said Susan absently. “What do they do with the teeth?
What use is there for a lot of teeth? But…what harm can a tooth fairy do?”
“Have we got time to find one and ask her?” said the oh god.
“Time isn’t the problem,” said Susan.
There are those who believe knowledge is something that is acquired—a
precious ore hacked, as it were, from the gray strata of ignorance.
There are those who believe that knowledge can only be recalled, that
there was some Golden Age in the distant past when everything was known
and the stones fitted together so you could hardly put a knife between
them, you know, and it’s obvious they had flying machines, right, because
of the way the earthworks can only be seen from above, yeah? and there’s
this museum I read about where they found a pocket calculator under the
altar of this ancient temple, you know what I’m saying? but the
government hushed it up…*
Mustrum Ridcully believed that knowledge could be acquired by shouting at
people, and was endeavoring to do so. The wizards were sitting around the
Uncommon Room table, which was piled high with books.
“It is Hogswatch, Archchancellor,” said the Dean reproachfully, thumbing
through an ancient volume.
“Not until midnight,” said Ridcully. “Sortin’ this out will give you
fellows an appetite for your dinner.”
“I think I might have something, Archchancellor,” said the Chair of
Indefinite Studies. “This is Woddeley’s Basic Gods. There’s some stuff
here about lares and penates that seems to fit the bill.”
“Lares and penates? What were they when they were at home?” said Ridcully.
“Hahaha,” said the Chair.
“What?” said Ridcully.
“I thought you were making a rather good joke, Archchancellor,” said the
Chair.
“Was I? I didn’t mean to,” said Ridcully.
“Nothing new there,” said the Dean, under his breath.
“What was that, Dean?”
“Nothing, Archchancellor.”
“I thought you made the reference ‘at home’ because they are, in fact,
household gods. Or were, rather. They seemed to have faded away long ago.
They were…little spirits of the house, like, for example—”
Three of the other wizards, thinking quite fast for wizards, clapped
their hands over his mouth.
“Careful!” said Ridcully. “Careless talk creates lives! That’s why we’ve
got a big fat God of Indigestion being ill in the privy. By the way,
where’s the Bursar?”
“He was in the privy, Archchancellor,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes.
“What, when the—?”
“Yes, Archchancellor.”
“Oh, well, I’m sure he’ll be all right,” said Ridcully, in the matter-offact
voice of someone contemplating something nasty that was happening to
someone else out of earshot. “But we don’t want any more of these…what’re
they, Chair?”
“Lares and penates, Archchancellor, but I wasn’t suggesting—”
“Seems clear to me. Something’s gone wrong and these little devils are
coming back. All we have to do is find out what’s gone wrong and put it
right.”
“Oh, well, I’m glad that’s all sorted out,” said the Dean.
“Household gods,” said Ridcully. “That’s what they are, Chair?” He opened
the drawer in his hat and took out his pipe.
“Yes, Archchancellor. It says here they used to be the…local spirits, I
suppose. They saw to it that the bread rose and the butter churned
properly.”
“Did they eat pencils? What was their attitude in the socks department?”
“This was back in the time of the First Empire,” said the Chair of
Indefinite Studies. “Sandals and togas and so on.”
“Ah. Not noticeably socked?”
“Not excessively so, no. And it was nine hundred years before Osric
Pencillium first discovered, in the graphite-rich sands of the remote
island of Sumtri, the small bush which, by dint of careful cultivation,
he induced to produce the long—”
“Yes, we can all see you’ve got the encyclopedia open under the table,
Chair,” said Ridcully. “But I daresay things have changed a bit. Moved
with the times. Bound to have been a few developments. Once they looked
after the bread rising, now we have things that eat pencils and socks and
see to it that you can never find a clean towel when you want one—”
There was a distant tinkling.
He stopped.
“I just said that, didn’t I?” he said.
The wizards nodded glumly.
“And this is the first time anyone’s mentioned it?”
The wizards nodded again.
“Well, dammit, it’s amazing, you can never find a clean towel when—”
There was a rising wheeee noise. A towel went by at shoulder height.
There was a suggestion of many small wings.
“That was mine,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes reproachfully. The
towel disappeared in the direction of the Great Hall.
“Towel Wasps,” said the Dean. “Well done, Archchancellor.”
“Well, I mean, dammit, it’s human nature, isn’t it?” said Ridcully hotly.
“Things go wrong, things get lost, it’s natural to invent little
creatures that—All right, all right, I’ll be careful. I’m just saying man
is naturally a mythopoeic creature.”
“What’s that mean?” said the Senior Wrangler.
“Means we make things up as we go along,” said the Dean, not looking up.
“Um…excuse me, gentlemen,” said Ponder Stibbons, who had been scribbling
thoughtfully at the end of the table. “Are we suggesting that things are
coming back? Do we think that’s a viable hypothesis?”
The wizards looked at one another around the table.
“Definitely viable.”
“Viable, right enough.”
“Yes, that’s the stuff to give the troops.”
“What is? What’s the stuff to give the troops?”
“Well…tinned rations? Decent weapons, good boots…that sort of thing.”
“What’s that got to do with anything?”
“Don’t ask me. He was the one who started talking about giving stuff to
the troops.”
“Will you lot shut up? No one’s giving anything to the troops!”
“Oh, shouldn’t they have something? It’s Hogswatch, after all.”
“Look, it was just a figure of speech, all right? I just meant I was
fully in agreement. It’s just colorful language. Good grief, you surely
can’t think I’m actually suggesting giving stuff to the troops, at
Hogswatch or any other time!”
“You weren’t?”
“No!”
“That’s a bit mean, isn’t it?”
Ponder just let it happen. It’s because their minds are so often involved
with deep and problematic matters, he told himself, that their mouths are
allowed to wander around making a nuisance of themselves.
“I don’t hold with using that thinking machine,” said the Dean. “I’ve
said this before. It’s meddling with the cult. The occult has always been
good enough for me, thank you very much.”
“On the other hand it’s the only person round here who can think straight
and it does what it’s told,” said Ridcully.
The sleigh roared through the snow, leaving rolling trails in the sky.
“Oh, what fun,” muttered Albert, hanging on tightly.
The runners hit a roof near the University and the pigs trotted to a halt.
Death looked at the hourglass again.
ODD, he said.
“It’s a scythe job, then?” said Albert. “You won’t be wanting the false
beard and the jolly laugh?” He looked around, and puzzlement replaced
sarcasm. “Hey…how could anyone be dead up here?”
Someone was. A corpse lay in the snow.
It was clear that the man had only just died. Albert squinted up at the
sky.
“There’s nowhere to fall from and there’s no footprints in the snow,” he
said, as Death swung his scythe. “So where did he come from? Looks like
someone’s personal guard. Been stabbed to death. Nasty knife wound there,
see?”
“It’s not good,” agreed the spirit of the man, looking down at himself.
Then he stared from himself to Albert to Death and his phantom expression
went from shock to concern.
“They got the teeth! All of them! They just walked in…and…they…no, wait…”
He faded and was gone.
“Well, what was that all about?” said Albert.
I HAVE MY SUSPICIONS.
“See that badge on his shirt? Looks like a drawing of a tooth.”
YES. IT DOES.
“Where’s that come from?”
A PLACE I CANNOT GO.
Albert looked down at the mysterious corpse and then back up at Death’s
impassive skull.
“I keep thinking it was a funny thing, us bumping into your granddaughter
like that,” he said.
YES.
Albert put his head on one side. “Given the large number of chimneys and
kids in the world, ekcetra.”
INDEED.
“Amazing coincidence, really.”
IT JUST GOES TO SHOW.
“Hard to believe, you might say.”
LIFE CERTAINLY SPRINGS A FEW SURPRISES.
“Not just life, I reckon,” said Albert. “And she got real worked up,
didn’t she? Flew right off the ole handle. Wouldn’t be surprised if she
started asking questions.”
THAT’S PEOPLE FOR YOU.
“But Rat is hanging around, ain’t he? He’ll probably keep an eye socket
on her. Guide her path, prob’ly.”
HE IS A LITTLE SCAMP, ISN’T HE?
Albert knew he couldn’t win. Death had the ultimate poker face.
I’M SURE SHE’LL ACT SENSIBLY.
“Oh, yeah,” said Albert, as they walked back to the sleigh. “It runs in
the family, acting sensibly.”
Like many barmen, Igor kept a club under the bar to deal with those
little upsets that occurred around closing time, although in fact Biers
never closed and no one could ever remember not seeing Igor behind the
bar. Nevertheless, things sometimes got out of hand. Or paw. Or talon.
Igor’s weapon of choice was a little different. It was tipped with silver
(for werewolves), hung with garlic (for vampires) and wrapped around with
a strip of blanket (for bogeymen). For everyone else the fact that it was
two feet of solid bog-oak usually sufficed.
He’d been watching the window. The frost was creeping across it. For some
reason the creeping fingers were forming into a pattern of three little
dogs looking out of a boot.
Then someone had tapped him on the shoulder. He spun around, club already
in his hand, and relaxed.
“Oh…it’s you, miss. I didn’t hear the door.”
There hadn’t been the door. Susan was in a hurry.
“Have you seen Violet lately, Igor?”
“The tooth girl?” Igor’s one eyebrow writhed in concentration. “Nah,
haven’t seen her for a week or two.”
The eyebrow furrowed into a V of annoyance as he spotted the raven, which
tried to shuffle behind a half-empty display card of beer nuts.
“You can get that out of here, miss,” he said. “You know the rule ’bout
pets and familiars. If it can’t turn back into human on demand, it’s out.”
“Yeah, well, some of us have more brain cells than fingers,” muttered a
voice from behind the beer nuts.
“Where does she live?”
“Now, miss, you know I never answers questions like that—”
“WHERE DOES SHE LIVE, IGOR?”
“Shamlegger Street, next to the picture framers,” said Igor automatically.
The eyebrow knotted in anger as he realized what he’d said.
“Now, miss, you know the rules! I don’t get bitten, I don’t get me froat
torn out and no one hides behind me door! And you don’t try your
granddad’s voice on me! I could ban you for messin’ me about like that!”
“Sorry, it’s important,” said Susan. Out of the corner of her eye she
could see that the raven had crept onto the shelves and was pecking the
top off a jar.
“Yeah, well, suppose one of the vampires decides it’s important he’s
missed his tea?” grumbled Igor, putting the club away.
There was a plink from the direction of the pickled egg jar. Susan tried
hard not to look.
“Can we go?” said the oh god. “All this alcohol makes me nervous.”
Susan nodded and hurried out.
Igor grunted. Then he went back to watching the frost, because Igor never
demanded much out of life. After a while he heard a muffled voice say:
“I ’ot ’un! I ’ot ’un!”
It was indistinct because the raven had speared a pickled egg with its
beak.
Igor sighed, and picked up his club. And it would have gone very hard for
the raven if the Death of Rats hadn’t chosen that moment to bite Igor on
the ear.
DOWN THERE, said Death.
The reins were hauled so sharply so quickly that the hogs ended up facing
the other way.
Albert fought his way out of a drift of teddy bears, where he’d been
dozing.
“What’s up? What’s up? Did we hit something?” he said.
Death pointed downward. An endless white snow field lay below, only the
occasional glow of a window candle or a half-covered hut indicating the
presence on this world of brief mortality.
Albert squinted, and then saw what Death had spotted.
“’s some old bugger trudging through the snow,” he said. “Been gathering
wood, by the look of it. A bad night to be out,” he said. “And I’m out in
it, too, come to that. Look, master, I’m sure you’ve done enough now to
make sure—”
SOMETHING’S HAPPENING DOWN THERE. HO. HO. HO.
“Look, he’s all right,” said Albert, hanging on as the sleigh tumbled
downward. There was a brief wedge of light below as the wood-gatherer
opened the door of a snow-drifted hovel. “See, over there, there’s a
couple of blokes catching him up, look, they’re weighed down with parcels
and stuff, see? He’s going to have a decent Hogswatch after all, no
problem there. Now can we go—”
Death’s glowing eye sockets took in the scene in minute detail.
IT’S WRONG.
“Oh, no…here we go again.”
The oh god hesitated.
“What do you mean, you can’t walk through the door?” said Susan. “You
walked through the door in the bar.”
“That was different. I have certain god-like powers in the presence of
alcohol. Anyway, we’ve knocked and she hasn’t answered and whatever
happened to Mr. Manners?”
Susan shrugged, and walked through the cheap woodwork. She knew she
probably shouldn’t. Every time she did something like this she used up a
certain amount of, well, normal. And sooner or later she’d forget what
doorknobs were for, just like Grandfather.
Come to think of it, he’d never found out what doorknobs were for.
She opened the door from the inside. The oh god stepped in and looked
around. This did not take long. It was not a large room. It had been
subdivided from a room that itself hadn’t been all that big to start with.
“This is where the Tooth Fairy lives?” Bilious said. “It’s a bit…poky,
isn’t it? Stuff all over the floor…What’re these things hanging from this
line?”
“They’re…women’s clothes,” said Susan, rummaging through the paperwork on
a small rickety table.
“They’re not very big,” said the oh god. “And a bit thin…”
“Tell me,” said Susan, without looking up. “These memories you arrived
here with…They weren’t very complicated, were they…? Ah…”
He looked over her shoulder as she opened a small red notebook.
“I’ve only talked to Violet a few times,” she said. “I think she delivers
the teeth somewhere and gets a percentage of the money. It’s not a highly
paid line of work. You know, they say you can Earn $$$ in Your Spare Time
but she says really she could earn more money waiting on tables—Ah, this
looks right…”
“What’s that?”
“She said she gets given the names every week.”
“What, of the children who’re going to lose teeth?”
“Yes. Names and addresses,” said Susan, flicking through the pages.
“That doesn’t sound very likely.”
“Pardon me, but are you the God of Hangovers? Oh, look, here’s Twyla’s
tooth last month.” She smiled at the neat gray writing. “She practically
hammered it out because she needed the half-dollar.”
“Do you like children?” said the oh god.
She gave him a look. “Not raw,” she said. “Other people’s are okay. Hold
on…”
She flicked some pages back and forth.
“There’s just blank days,” she said. “Look, the last few days, all
unticked. No names. But if you go back a week or two, look, they’re all
properly marked off and the money added up at the bottom of the page, see?
And…this can’t be right, can it?”
There were only five names entered on the first unticked night, for the
previous week. Most children instinctively knew when to push their luck
and only the greedy or dentally improvident called out the Tooth Fairy
around Hogswatch.
“Read the names,” said Susan.
“William Wittles, a.k.a. Willy (home), Tosser (school), 2nd flr bck bdrm,
68 Kicklebury Street;
“Sophie Langtree, a.k.a. Daddy’s Princess, attic bdrm, 5 The Hippo;
“The Hon. Jeffrey Bibbleton, a.k.a. Trouble in Trousers (home), Foureyes
(school), 1st flr bck, Scrote Manor, Park Lane—”
He stopped. “I say, this is a bit intrusive, isn’t it?”
“It’s a whole new world,” said Susan. “You haven’t got there yet. Keep
going.”
“Nuhakme Icta, a.k.a. Little Jewel, basement, The Laughing Falafel,
Klatchistan Take-Away and All-Nite Grocery, cnr. Soake and Dimwell;
“Reginald Lilywhite, a.k.a. Banjo, The Park Lane Bully, Have You Seen
This Man? The Goose Gate Grabber, The Nap Hill Lurker, Rm 17, YMPA.”
“YMPA?”
“It’s what we generally call the Young-Men’s-Reformed-Cultists-of-the-
Ichor-God-Bel-Shamharoth Association,” said Susan. “Does that sound to
you like someone who’d expect a visit from a tooth fairy?”
“No.”
“Me neither. He sounds like someone who’d expect a visit from the Watch.”
Susan looked around. It really was a crummy room, the sort rented by
someone who probably took it never intending to stay long, the sort where
walking across the floor in the middle of the night would be accompanied
by the crack of cockroaches in a death flamenco. It was amazing how many
people spent their whole lives in places where they never intended to
stay.
Cheap, narrow bed, crumbling plaster, tiny window—
She opened the window and fished around below the ledge, and felt
satisfied when her questing fingers closed on a piece of string which was
attached to an oilcloth bag. She hauled it in.
“What’s that?” said the oh god, as she opened it on the table.
“Oh, you see them a lot,” said Susan, taking out some packages wrapped in
secondhand waxed paper. “You live alone, mice and roaches eat everything,
there’s nowhere to store food—but outside the window it’s cold and safe.
More or less safe. It’s an old trick. Now…look at this. Leathery bacon, a
green loaf and a bit of cheese you could shave. She hasn’t been back home
for some time, believe me.”
“Oh dear. What now?”
“Where would she take the teeth?” said Susan, to the world in general but
mainly to herself. “What the hell does the Tooth Fairy do with—”
There was a knock at the door. Susan opened it.
Outside was a small bald man in a long brown coat. He was holding a
clipboard and blinked nervously at the sight of her.
“Er” he began.
“Can I help you?” said Susan.
“Er, I saw the light, see. I thought Violet was in,” said the little man.
He twiddled the pencil that was attached to his clipboard by a piece of
string. “Only she’s a bit behind with the teeth and there’s a bit of
money owing and Ernie’s cart ain’t come back and it’s got to go in my
report and I come round in case…in case she was ill or something, it not
being nice being alone and ill at Hogswatch—”
“She’s not here,” said Susan.
The man gave her a worried look and shook his head sadly.
“There’s nearly thirteen dollars in pillow money, see. I’ll have to
report it.”
“Who to?”
“It has to go higher up, see. I just hope it’s not going to be like that
business in Quirm where the girl started robbing houses. We never heard
the end of that one—”
“Report to who?”
“And there’s the ladder and the pliers,” the man went on, in a litany
against a world that had no understanding of what it meant to have to
fill in an AF17 report in triplicate. “How can I keep track of
stocktaking if people go around taking stock?” He shook his head. “I
dunno, they get the job, they think it’s all nice sunny nights, they get
a bit of sharp weather and suddenly it’s good-bye Charlie I’m off to be a
waitress in the warm. And then there’s Ernie. I know him. It’s a nip to
keep out the cold, and then another one to keep it company, and then a
third in case the other two get lost…It’s all going to have to go down in
my report, you know, and who’s going to get the blame? I’ll tell you—”
“It’s going to be you, isn’t it?” said Susan. She was almost hypnotized.
The man even had a fringe of worried hair and a small, worried mustache.
And the voice suggested exactly that here was a man who, at the end of
the world, would worry that it would be blamed on him.
“That’s right,” he said, but in a slightly grudging voice. He was not
about to allow a bit of understanding to lighten his day. “And the girls
all go on about the job but I tell them they’ve got it easy, it’s just
basic’ly ladder work, they don’t have to spend their evenings knee-deep
in paper and making shortfalls good out of their own money, I might add—”
“You employ the tooth fairies?” said Susan quickly. The oh god was still
vertical but his eyes had glazed over.
The little man preened slightly. “Sort of,” he said. “Basic’ly I run Bulk
Collection and Dispatch—”
“Where to?”
He stared at her. Sharp, direct questions weren’t his forte.
“I just sees to it they gets on the cart,” he mumbled. “When they’re on
the cart and Ernie’s signed the GV19 for ’em, that’s it done and finished,
only like I said he ain’t turned up this week and—”
“A whole cart for a handful of teeth?”
“Well, there’s the food for the guards, and—’ere, who are you, anyway?
What’re you doing here?”
Susan straightened up. “I don’t have to put up with this,” she said
sweetly, to no one in particular. She leaned forward again.
“WHAT CART ARE WE TALKING ABOUT HERE, CHARLIE?” The oh god jolted away.
The man in the brown coat shot backward and splayed against the corridor
wall as Susan advanced.
“Comes Tuesdays,” he panted. “’ere, what—”
“AND WHERE DOES IT GO?”
“Dunno! Like I said, when he’s—”
“Signed the GV19 for them it’s you done and finished,” said Susan, in her
normal voice. “Yes. You said. What’s Violet’s full name? She never
mentioned it.”
The man hesitated.
“I SAID—”
“Violet Bottler!”
“Thank you.”
“An’ Ernie’s gorn, too,” said Charlie, continuing more or less on
autopilot. “I call that suspicious. I mean, he’s got a wife and
everything. Won’t be the first man to get his head turned by thirteen
dollars and a pretty ankle and, o’ course, no one thinks about muggins
who has to carry the can, I mean, supposing we was all to get it in our
heads to run off with young wimmin?”
He gave Susan the stern look of one who, if it was not for the fact that
the world needed him, would even now be tiring of painting naked young
ladies on some tropical island somewhere.
“What happens to the teeth?” said Susan.
He blinked at her. A bully, thought Susan. A very small, weak, very dull
bully, who doesn’t manage any real bullying because there’s hardly anyone
smaller and weaker than him, so he just makes everyone’s lives just that
little bit more difficult…
“What sort of question is that?” he managed, in the face of her stare.
“You never wondered?” said Susan, and added to herself, I didn’t. Did
anyone?
“Well, ’s not my job, I just—”
“Oh, yes. You said,” said Susan. “Thank you. You’ve been very helpful.
Thank you very much.”
The man stared at her, and then turned and ran down the stairs.
“Drat,” said Susan.
“That’s a very unusual swearword,” said the oh god nervously.
“It’s so easy,” said Susan. “If I want to, I can find anybody. It’s a
family trait.”
“Oh. Good.”
“No. Have you any idea how hard it is to be normal? The things you have
to remember? How to go to sleep? How to forget things? What doorknobs are
for?”
Why ask him, she thought, as she looked at his shocked face. All that’s
normal for him is remembering to throw up what someone else drank.
“Oh, come on,” she said, and hurried toward the stairs.
It was so easy to slip into immortality, to ride the horse, to know
everything. And every time you did, it brought closer the day when you
could never get off and never forget.
Death was hereditary.
You got it from your ancestors.
“Where are we going now?” said the oh god.
“Down to the YMPA,” said Susan.
The old man in the hovel looked uncertainly at the feast spread in front
of him. He sat on his stool as curled up on himself as a spider in a
flame.
“I’d got a bit of a mess of beans cooking,” he mumbled, looking at his
visitors through filmy eyes.
“Good heavens, you can’t eat beans at Hogswatch,” said the king, smiling
hugely. “That’s terribly unlucky, eating beans at Hogswatch. My word,
yes!”
“Di’nt know that,” the old man said, looking down desperately at his lap.
“We’ve brought you this magnificent spread. Don’t you think so?”
“I bet you’re incredibly grateful for it, too,” said the page, sharply.
“Yes, well, o’ course, it’s very kind of you gennelmen,” said the old man,
in a voice the size of a mouse. He blinked, uncertain of what to do next.
“The turkey’s hardly been touched, still plenty of meat on it,” said the
king. “And do have some of this cracking good widgeon stuffed with swan’s
liver.”
“—only I’m partial to a bowl of beans and I’ve never been beholden to no
one nor nobody,” the old man said, still staring at his lap.
“Good heavens, man, you don’t need to worry about that,” said the king
heartily. “It’s Hogswatch! I was only just now looking out of the window
and I saw you plodding through the snow and I said to young Jermain here,
I said, ‘Who’s that chappie?’ and he said, ‘Oh, he’s some peasant fellow
who lives up by the forest,’ and I said, ‘Well, I couldn’t eat another
thing and it’s Hogswatch, after all,’ and so we just bundled everything
up and here we are!”
“And I expect you’re pathetically thankful,” said the page. “I expect
we’ve brought a ray of light into your dark tunnel of a life, hmm?”
“—yes, well, o’ course, only I’d been savin’ ’em for weeks, see, and
there’s some bakin’ potatoes under the fire, I found ’em in the cellar ’n’
the mice’d hardly touched ’em.” The old man never raised his eyes from
knee level. “’n’ our dad brought me up never to ask for—”
“Listen,” said the king, raising his voice a little, “I’ve walked miles
tonight and I bet you’ve never seen food like this in your whole life,
eh?”
Tears of humiliated embarrassment were rolling down the old man’s face.
“—well, I’m sure it’s very kind of you fine gennelmen but I ain’t sure I
knows how to eat swans and such like, but if you want a bit o’ my beans
you’ve only got to say—”
“Let me make myself absolutely clear,” said the king sharply. “This is
some genuine Hogswatch charity, d’you understand? And we’re going to sit
here and watch the smile on your grubby but honest face, is that
understood?”
“And what do you say to the good king?” the page prompted.
The peasant hung his head.
“’nk you.”
“Right,” said the king, sitting back. “Now, pick up your fork—”
The door burst open. An indistinct figure strode into the room, snow
swirling around it in a cloud.
WHAT’S GOING ON HERE?
The page started to stand up, drawing his sword. He never worked out how
the other figure could have got behind him, but there it was, pressing
him gently down again.
“Hello, son, my name is Albert,” said a voice by his ear. “Why don’t you
put that sword back very slowly? People might get hurt.”
A finger prodded the king, who had been too shocked to move.
WHAT DO YOU THINK YOU ARE DOING, SIRE?
The king tried to focus on the figure. There was an impression of red and
white, but black, too.
To Albert’s secret amazement, the man managed to get to his feet and draw
himself up as regally as he could.
“What is going on here, whoever you are, is some fine old Hogswatch
charity! And who—”
NO, IT’S NOT.
“What? How dare you—”
WERE YOU HERE LAST MONTH? WILL YOU BE HERE NEXT WEEK? NO. BUT TONIGHT YOU
WANTED TO FEEL ALL WARM INSIDE. TONIGHT YOU WILL WANT THEM TO SAY: WHAT A
GOOD KING HE IS.
“Oh, no, he’s going too far again—” muttered Albert under his breath. He
pushed the page down again. “No, you stay still, sonny. Else you’ll just
be a paragraph.”
“Whatever it is, it’s more than he’s got!” snapped the king. “And all
we’ve had from him is ingratitude—”
YES, THAT DOES SPOIL IT, DOESN’T IT? Death leaned forward. GO AWAY.
To the king’s own surprise his body took over and marched him out of the
door.
Albert patted the page on the shoulder. “And you can run along, too,” he
said.
“—I didn’t mean to go upsetting anyone, it’s just that I never asked no
one for nothing—” mumbled the old man, in a small humble world of his own,
his hands tangling themselves together out of nervousness.
“Best if you leave this one to me, master, if you don’t mind,” said
Albert. “I’ll be back in just a tick.” Loose ends, he thought, that’s my
job. Tying up loose ends. The master never thinks things through.
He caught up with the king outside.
“Ah, there you are, your sire,” he said. “Just before you go, won’t keep
you a minute, just a minor point—” Albert leaned close to the stunned
monarch. “If anyone was thinking about making a mistake, you know, like
maybe sending the guards down here tomorrow, tipping the old man out of
his hovel, chuckin’ him in prison, anything like that…werrlll…that’s the
kind of mistake he ought to treasure on account of it being the last
mistake he’ll ever make. A word to the wise men, right?” He tapped the
side of his nose conspiratorially. “Happy Hogswatch.”
Then he hurried back into the hovel.
The feast had vanished. The old man was looking blearily at the bare
table.
HALF-EATEN LEAVINGS, said Death. WE COULD CERTAINLY DO BETTER THAN THIS.
He reached into the sack.
Albert grabbed his arm before he could withdraw his hand.
“Mind taking a bit of advice, master? I was brung up in a place like
this.”
DOES IT BRING TEARS TO YOUR EYES?
“A box of matches to me hand, more like. Listen…”
The old man was only dimly aware of some whispering. He sat hunched up,
staring at nothing.
WELL, IF YOU ARE SURE…
“Been there, done that, chewed the bones,” said Albert. “Charity ain’t
giving people what you wants to give, it’s giving people what they need
to get.”
VERY WELL.
Death reached into the sack again.
HAPPY HOGSWATCH. HO. HO. HO.
There was a string of sausages. There was a side of bacon. And a small
tub of salt pork. And a mass of chitterlings wrapped up in greased paper.
There was a black pudding. There were several other tubs of disgusting
yet savory pork-adjacent items highly prized in any pig-based economy.
And, laid on the table with a soft thump, there was—
“A pig’s head,” breathed the old man. “A whole one! Ain’t had brawn in
years! And a basin of pig knuckles! And a bowl of pork dripping!”
HO. HO. HO.
“Amazing,” said Albert. “How did you get the head’s expression to look
like the king?”
I THINK THAT’S ACCIDENTAL.
Albert patted the old man on the back.
“Have yourself a ball,” he said. “In fact, have two. Now I think we ought
to be going, master.”
They left the old man staring at the laden board.
WASN’T THAT NICE? said Death, as the hogs accelerated.
“Oh, yes,” said Albert, shaking his head. “Poor old devil. Beans at
Hogswatch? Unlucky, that. Not a night for a man to find a bean in his
bowl.”
I FEEL I WAS CUT OUT FOR THIS SORT OF THING, YOU KNOW.
“Really, master?”
IT’S NICE TO DO A JOB WHERE PEOPLE LOOK FORWARD TO SEEING YOU.
“Ah,” said Albert glumly.
THEY DON’T NORMALLY LOOK FORWARD TO SEEING ME.
“Yes, I expect so.”
EXCEPT IN SPECIAL AND RATHER UNFORTUNATE CIRCUMSTANCES.
“Right, right.”
AND THEY SELDOM LEAVE A GLASS OF SHERRY OUT.
“I expect they don’t, no.”
I COULD GET INTO THE HABIT OF DOING THIS, IN FACT.
“But you won’t need to, will you, master?” said Albert hurriedly, with
the horrible prospect of being a permanent Pixie Albert looming in his
mind again. “Because we’ll get the Hogfather back, right? That’s what you
said we were going to do, right? And young Susan’s probably bustling
around…”
YES. OF COURSE.
“Not that you asked her to, of course.”
Albert’s jittery ears didn’t detect any enthusiasm.
Oh dear, he thought.
I HAVE ALWAYS CHOSEN THE PATH OF DUTY.
“Right, master.”
The sleigh sped on.
I AM THOROUGHLY IN CONTROL AND FIRM OF PURPOSE.
“No problem there, then, master,” said Albert.
NO NEED TO WORRY AT ALL.
“Pleased to hear it, master.”
IF I HAD A FIRST NAME, “DUTY” WOULD BE MY MIDDLE NAME.
“Good.”
NEVERTHELESS…
Albert strained his ears and thought he heard, just on the edge of
hearing, a voice whisper sadly.
HO. HO. HO.
There was a party going on. It seemed to occupy the entire building.
“Certainly very energetic young men,” said the oh god carefully, stepping
over a wet towel. “Are women allowed in here?”
“No,” said Susan. She stepped through a wall into the superintendent’s
office.
A group of young men went past, manhandling a barrel of beer.
“You’ll feel bad about it in the morning,” said Bilious. “Strong drink is
a mocker, you know.”
They set it up on a table and knocked out the bung.
“Someone’s going to have to be sick after all that,” he said, raising his
voice above the hubbub. “I hope you realize that. You think it’s clever,
do you, reducing yourself to the level of the beasts of the field…er…or
the level they’d sink to if they drank, I mean.”
They moved away, leaving one mug of beer by the barrel.
The oh god glanced at it, and picked it up and sniffed at it.
“Ugh.”
Susan stepped out of the wall.
“He hasn’t been back for—What’re you doing?”
“I thought I’d see what beer tastes like,” said the oh god guiltily.
“You don’t know what beer tastes like?”
“Not on the way down, no. It’s…quite different by the time it gets to me,”
he said sourly. He took another sip, and then a longer one. “I can’t see
what all the fuss is about,” he added.
He tipped up the empty pot.
“I suppose it comes out of this tap here,” he said. “You know, for once
in my existence I’d like to get drunk.”
“Aren’t you always?” said Susan, who wasn’t really paying attention.
“No. I’ve always been drunk. I’m sure I explained.”
“He’s been gone a couple of days,” said Susan. “That’s odd. And he didn’t
say where he was going. The last night he was here was the night he was
on Violet’s list. But he paid for his room for the week, and I’ve got the
number.”
“And the key?” said the oh god.
“What a strange idea.”
Mr. Lilywhite’s room was small. That wasn’t surprising. What was
surprising was how neat it was, how carefully the little bed had been
made, how well the floor had been swept. It was hard to imagine anyone
living in it, but there were a few signs. On the simple table by the bed
was a small, rather crude portrait of a bulldog in a wig, although on
closer inspection it might have been a woman. This tentative hypothesis
was borne out by the inscription “To a Good Boy, from his Mother” on the
back.
A book lay next to it. Susan wondered what kind of reading someone with
Mr. Banjo’s background would buy.
It turned out to be a book of six pages, one of those that were supposed
to enthrall children with the magic of the printed word by pointing out
that they could See Spot Run.
There were no more than ten words on each page and yet, carefully placed
between pages four and five, was a bookmark.
She turned back to the cover. The book was called Happy Tales. There was
a blue sky and trees and a couple of impossibly pink children playing
with a jolly-looking dog.
It looked as though it had been read frequently, if slowly.
And that was it.
A dead end.
No. Perhaps not…
On the floor by the bed, as if it had been accidentally dropped, was a
small, silvery half-dollar piece.
Susan picked it up and tossed it idly. She looked the oh god up and down.
He was swilling a mouthful of beer from cheek to cheek and looking
thoughtfully at the ceiling.
She wondered about his likelihood of survival incarnate in Ankh-Morpork
at Hogswatch, especially if the cure wore off. After all, the only
purpose of his existence was to have a headache and throw up. There were
not a great many postgraduate jobs for which these were the main
qualifications.
“Tell me,” she said. “Have you ever ridden a horse?”
“I don’t know. What’s a horse?”
In the depths of the library of Death, a squeaking noise.
It was not loud, but it appeared louder than mere decibels would suggest
in the furtive, scribbling hush of the books.
Everyone, it is said, has a book inside them. In this library, everyone
was inside a book.
The squeaking got louder. It had a rhythmical, circular quality.
Book on book, shelf on shelf…and in every one, at the page of the evermoving
now, a scribble of handwriting following the narrative of every
life…
The squeaking came round the corner.
It was issuing from what looked like a very rickety edifice, several
stories high. It looked rather like a siege tower, open at the sides. At
the base, between the wheels, was a pair of geared treadles which moved
the whole thing.
Susan clung to the railing of the topmost platform.
“Can’t you hurry up?” she said. “We’re only at the Bi’s at the moment.”
“I’ve been pedaling for ages!” panted the oh god.
“Well, A is a very popular letter.”
Susan stared up at the shelves. A was for Anon, among other things. All
those people who, for one reason or another, never officially got a name.
They tended to be short books.
“Ah…Bo…Bod…Bog…turn left…”
The library tower squeaked ponderously around the next corner.
“Ah, Bo…blast, the Bots are at least twenty shelves up.”
“Oh, how nice,” said the oh god grimly.
He heaved on the lever that moved the drive chain from one sprocket to
another, and started to pedal again.
Very ponderously, the creaking tower began to telescope upward.
“Right, we’re there,” Susan shouted down, after a few minutes of slow
rise. “Here’s…let’s see…Aabana Bottler…”
“I expect Violet will be a lot further,” said the oh god, trying out
irony.
“Onward!”
Swaying a little, the tower headed down the Bs until:
“Stop!”
It rocked as the oh god kicked the brake block against a wheel.
“I think this is her,” said a voice from above. “Okay, you can lower
away.”
A big wheel with ponderous lead weights on it spun slowly as the tower
concertina’d back, creaking and grinding. Susan climbed down the last few
feet.
“Everyone’s in here?” said the oh god, as Susan thumbed through the pages.
“Yes.”
“Even gods?”
“Anything that’s alive and self-aware,” said Susan, not looking up. “This
is…odd. It looks as though she’s in some sort of…prison. Who’d want to
lock up a tooth fairy?”
“Someone with very sensitive teeth?”
Susan flicked back a few pages. “It’s all…hoods over her head and people
carrying her and so on. But…” she turned a page, “…it says the last job
she did was on Banjo and…yes, she got the tooth…and then she felt as
though someone was behind her and…there’s a ride on a cart…and the hood’s
come off…and there’s a causeway…and…”
“All that’s in a book?”
“The autobiography. Everyone has one. It writes down your life as you go
along.”
“I’ve got one?”
“I expect so.”
“Oh, dear. ‘Got up, was sick, wanted to die.’ Not a gripping read,
really.”
Susan turned the page.
“A tower,” she said. “She’s in a tower. From what she saw, it was tall
and white inside…but not outside? It didn’t look real. There were apple
trees around it, but the trees, the trees didn’t look right. And a river,
but that wasn’t right either. There were goldfish in it…but they were on
top of the water.”
“Ah. Pollution,” said the oh god.
“I don’t think so. It says here she saw them swimming.”
“Swimming on top of the water?”
“That’s how she thinks she saw it.”
“Really? You don’t think she’d been eating any of that moldy cheese, do
you?”
“And there was blue sky but…she must have got this wrong…it says here
there was only blue sky above…”
“Yep. Best place for the sky,” said the oh god. “Sky underneath you, that
probably means trouble.”
Susan flicked a page back and forth. “She means…sky overhead but not
around the edges, I think. No sky on the horizon.”
“Excuse me,” said the oh god. “I’m not long in this world, I appreciate
that, but I think you have to have sky on the horizon. That’s how you can
tell it’s the horizon.”
A sense of familiarity was creeping up on Susan, but surreptitiously,
dodging behind things whenever she tried to concentrate on it.
“I’ve seen this place,” she said, tapping the page. “If only she’d looked
harder at the trees…She says they’ve got brown trunks and green leaves
and it says here she thought they were odd. And…” She concentrated on the
next paragraph. “Flowers. Growing in the grass. With big round petals.”
She stared unseeing at the oh god again.
“This isn’t a proper landscape,” she said.
“It doesn’t sound too unreal to me,” said the oh god. “Sky. Trees.
Flowers. Dead fish.”
“Brown tree trunks? Really they’re mostly a sort of grayish mossy color.
You only ever see brown tree trunks in one place,” said Susan. “And it’s
the same place where the sky is only ever overhead. The blue never comes
down to the ground.”
She looked up. At the far end of the corridor was one of the very tall,
very thin windows. It looked out onto the black gardens. Black bushes,
black grass, black trees. Skeletal fish cruising in the black waters of a
pool, under black water lilies.
There was color, in a sense, but it was the kind of color you’d get if
you could shine a beam of black through a prism. There were hints of
tints, here and there a black you might persuade yourself was a very deep
purple or a midnight blue. But it was basically black, under a black sky,
because this was the world belonging to Death and that was all there was
to it.
The shape of Death was the shape people had created for him, over the
centuries. Why bony? Because bones were associated with death. He’d got a
scythe because agricultural people could spot a decent metaphor. And he
lived in a somber land because the human imagination would be rather
stretched to let him live somewhere nice with flowers.
People like Death lived in the human imagination, and got their shape
there, too. He wasn’t the only one…
…but he didn’t like the script, did he? He’d started to take an interest
in people. Was that a thought, or just a memory of something that hadn’t
happened yet?
The oh god followed her gaze.
“Can we go after her?” said the oh god. “I say we, I think I’ve just got
drafted in because I was in the wrong place.”
“She’s alive. That means she is mortal,” said Susan. “That means I can
find her, too.” She turned and started to walk out of the library.
“If she says the sky is just blue overhead, what’s between it and the
horizon?” said the oh god, running to keep up.
“You don’t have to come,” said Susan. “It’s not your problem.”
“Yes, but given that my problem is that my whole purpose in life is to
feel rotten, anything’s an improvement.”
“It could be dangerous. I don’t think she’s there of her own free will.
Would you be any good in a fight?”
“Yes. I could be sick on people.”
It was a shack, somewhere out on the outskirts of the Plains town of
Scrote. Scrote had a lot of outskirts, spread so widely—a busted cart
here, a dead dog there—that often people went through it without even
knowing it was there, and really it only appeared on the maps because
cartographers get embarrassed about big empty spaces.
Hogswatch came after the excitement of the cabbage harvest when it was
pretty quiet in Scrote and there was nothing much to look forward to
until the fun of the sprout festival.
This shack had an iron stove, with a pipe that went up through the thick
cabbage-leaf thatch.
Voices echoed faintly within the pipe.
THIS IS REALLY, REALLY STUPID.
“I think the tradition got started when everyone had them big chimneys,
master.” This voice sounded as though it was coming from someone standing
on the roof and shouting down the pipe.
INDEED? IT’S ONLY A MERCY IT’S UNLIT.
There was some muffled scratching and banging, and then a thump from
within the potbelly of the stove.
DAMN.
“What’s up, master?”
THE DOOR HAS NO HANDLE ON THE INSIDE. I CALL THAT INCONSIDERATE.
There were some more bumps, and then a scrape as the stove lid was lifted
up and pushed sideways. An arm came out and felt around the front of the
stove until it found the handle.
It played with it for a while, but it was obvious that the hand did not
belong to a person used to opening things.
In short, Death came out of the stove. Exactly how would be difficult to
describe without folding the page. Time and space were, from Death’s
point of view, merely things that he’d heard described. When it came to
Death, they ticked the box marked Not Applicable. It might help to think
of the universe as a rubber sheet, or perhaps not.
“Let us in, master,” a pitiful voice echoed down from the roof. “It’s
brass monkeys out here.”
Death went over to the door. Snow was blowing underneath it. He peered
nervously at the woodwork. There was a thump outside and Albert’s voice
sounded a lot closer.
“What’s up, master?”
Death stuck his head through the wood of the door.
THERE’S THESE METAL THINGS—
“Bolts, master. You slide them,” said Albert, sticking his hands under
his armpits to keep them warm.
AH.
Death’s head disappeared. Albert stamped his feet and watched his breath
cloud in the air while he listened to the pathetic scrabbling on the
other side of the door.
Death’s head appeared again.
ER…
“It’s the latch, master,” said Albert wearily.
RIGHT. RIGHT.
“You put your thumb on it and push it down.”
RIGHT.
The head disappeared. Albert jumped up and down a bit, and waited.
The head appeared.
ER…I WAS WITH YOU UP TO THE THUMB…
Albert sighed. “And then you press down and pull, master.”
AH. RIGHT. GOT YOU.
The head disappeared.
Oh dear, thought Albert. He just can’t get the hang of them, can he…?
The door jerked open. Death stood behind it, beaming proudly, as Albert
staggered in, snow blowing in with him.
“Blimey, it’s getting really parky,” said Albert. “Any sherry?” he added
hopefully.
IT APPEARS NOT.
Death looked at the sock hooked onto the side of the stove. It had a hole
in it.
A letter, in erratic handwriting, was attached to it. Death picked it up.
THE BOY WANTS A PAIR OF TROUSERS THAT HE DOESN’T HAVE TO SHARE, A HUGE
MEAT PIE, A SUGAR MOUSE, “A LOT OF TOYS” AND A PUPPY CALLED SCRUFF.
“Ah, sweet,” said Albert. “I shall wipe away a tear, ’cos what he’s
gettin’, see, is this little wooden toy and an apple.” He held them out.
BUT THE LETTER CLEARLY—
“Yes, well, it’s socio-economic factors again, right?” said Albert. “The
world’d be in a right mess if everyone got what they asked for, eh?”
I GAVE THEM WHAT THEY WANTED IN THE STORE…
“Yeah, and that’s gonna cause a lot of trouble, master. All them ‘toy
pigs that really work.’ I didn’t say nothing ’cos it was getting the job
done but you can’t go on like that. What good’s a god who gives you
everything you want?”
YOU HAVE ME THERE.
“It’s the hope that’s important. Big part of belief, hope. Give people
jam today and they’ll just sit and eat it. Jam tomorrow, now—that’ll keep
them going forever.”
AND YOU MEAN THAT BECAUSE OF THIS THE POOR GET POOR THINGS AND THE RICH
GET RICH THINGS?
“’s right,” said Albert. “That’s the meaning of Hogswatch.”
Death nearly wailed.
BUT I’M THE HOGFATHER! He looked embarrassed. AT THE MOMENT, I MEAN.
“Makes no difference,” said Albert, shrugging. “I remember when I was a
nipper, one Hogswatch I had my heart set on this huge model horse they
had in the shop…” His face creased for a moment in a grim smile of
recollection. “I remember I spent hours one day, cold as charity the
weather was, I spent hours with my nose pressed up against the
window…until they heard me callin’, and unfroze me. I saw them take it
out of the window, someone was in there buying it, and, y’know, just for
a second I thought it really was going to be for me…Oh, I dreamed of that
toy horse. It were red and white with a real saddle and everything. And
rockers. I’d’ve killed for that horse.” He shrugged again. “Not a chance,
of course, ’cos we didn’t have a pot to piss in and we even ’ad to spit
on the bread to make it soft enough to eat—”
PLEASE ENLIGHTEN ME. WHAT IS SO IMPORTANT ABOUT HAVING A POT TO PISS IN?
“It’s…it’s more like a figure of speech, master. It means you’re as poor
as a church mouse.”
ARE THEY POOR?
“Well…yeah.”
BUT SURELY NOT MORE POOR THAN ANY OTHER MOUSE? AND, AFTER ALL, THERE TEND
TO BE LOTS OF CANDLES AND THINGS THEY COULD EAT.
“Figure of speech again, master. It doesn’t have to make sense.”
OH. I SEE. DO CARRY ON.
“O’ course, I still hung up my stocking on Hogswatch Eve, and in the
morning, you know, you know what? Our dad had put in this little horse
he’d carved his very own self…”
AH, said Death. AND THAT WAS WORTH MORE THAN ALL THE EXPENSIVE TOY HORSES
IN THE WORLD, EH?
Albert gave him a beady look. “No!” he said. “It weren’t. All I could
think of was it wasn’t the big horse in the window.”
Death looked shocked.
BUT HOW MUCH BETTER TO HAVE A TOY CARVED WITH—
“No. Only grown-ups think like that,” said Albert. “You’re a selfish
little bugger when you’re seven. Anyway, Dad got ratted after lunch and
trod on it.”
LUNCH?
“All right, mebbe we had a bit of pork dripping for the bread…”
EVEN SO, THE SPIRIT OF HOGSWATCH—
Albert sighed. “If you like, master. If you like.”
Death looked perturbed.
BUT SUPPOSING THE HOGFATHER HAD BROUGHT YOU THE WONDERFUL HORSE—
“Oh, Dad would’ve flogged it for a couple of bottles,” said Albert.
BUT WE HAVE BEEN INTO HOUSES WHERE THE CHILDREN HAD MANY TOYS AND BROUGHT
THEM EVEN MORE TOYS, AND IN HOUSES LIKE THIS THE CHILDREN GET PRACTICALLY
NOTHING.
“Huh, we’d have given anything to get practically nothing when I were a
lad,” said Albert.
BE HAPPY WITH WHAT YOU’VE GOT, IS THAT THE IDEA?
“That’s about the size of it, master. A good god line, that. Don’t
give ’em too much and tell ’em to be happy with it. Jam tomorrow, see.”
THIS IS WRONG. Death hesitated. I MEAN…IT’S RIGHT TO BE HAPPY WITH WHAT
YOU’VE GOT. BUT YOU’VE GOT TO HAVE SOMETHING TO BE HAPPY ABOUT HAVING.
THERE’S NO POINT IN BEING HAPPY ABOUT HAVING NOTHING.
Albert felt a bit out of his depth in this new tide of social philosophy.
“Dunno,” he said. “I suppose people’d say they’ve got the moon and the
stars and such like.”
I’M SURE THEY WOULDN’T BE ABLE TO PRODUCE THE PAPERWORK.
“All I know is, if Dad’d caught us with a big bag of pricey toys we’d
just have got a ding round the ear hole for nicking ’em.”
IT IS…UNFAIR.
“That’s life, master.”
BUT I’M NOT.
“I meant, this is how it’s supposed to go, master,” said Albert.
NO. YOU MEAN THIS IS HOW IT GOES.
Albert leaned against the stove and rolled himself one of his horrible
thin cigarettes. It was best to let the master work his own way through
these things. He got over them eventually. It was like that business with
the violin. For three days there was nothing but twangs and broken
strings, and then he’d never touched the thing again. That was the
trouble, really. Everything the master did was a bit like that. When
things got into his head you just had to wait until they leaked out again.
He’d thought that Hogswatch was all…plum pudding and brandy and ho ho ho,
and he didn’t have the kind of mind that could ignore all the other stuff.
And so it hurt him.
IT IS HOGSWATCH, said Death, AND PEOPLE DIE ON THE STREETS. PEOPLE FEAST
BEHIND LIGHTED WINDOWS AND OTHER PEOPLE HAVE NO HOMES. IS THIS FAIR?
“Well, of course, that’s the big issue—” Albert began.
THE PEASANT HAD A HANDFUL OF BEANS AND THE KING HAD SO MUCH HE WOULD NOT
EVEN NOTICE THAT WHICH HE GAVE AWAY. IS THIS FAIR?
“Yeah, but if you gave it all to the peasant then in a year or two he’d
be just as snooty as the king—” began Albert, jaundiced observer of human
nature.
NAUGHTY AND NICE? said Death. BUT IT’S EASY TO BE NICE IF YOU’RE RICH. IS
THIS FAIR?
Albert wanted to argue. He wanted to say, Really? In that case, how come
so many of the rich buggers is bastards? And being poor don’t mean being
naughty, neither. We was poor when I were a kid, but we was honest. Well,
more stupid than honest, to tell the truth. But basically honest.
He didn’t argue, though. The master wasn’t in any mood for it. He always
did what needed to be done.
“You did say we just had to do this so’s people’d believe—” he began, and
then stopped and started again. “When it comes to fair, master, you
yourself—”
I AM EVENHANDED TO RICH AND POOR ALIKE, snapped Death. BUT THIS SHOULD
NOT BE A SAD TIME. THIS IS SUPPOSED TO BE THE SEASON TO BE JOLLY. He
wrapped his red robe around him. AND OTHER THINGS ENDING IN OLLY, he
added.
“There’s no blade,” said the oh god. “It’s just a sword hilt.”
Susan stepped out of the light and her wrist moved. A sparkling blue line
flashed in the air, for a moment outlining an edge too thin to be seen.
The oh god backed away.
“What’s that?”
“Oh, it cuts tiny bits of the air in half. It can cut the soul away from
the body, so stand back, please.”
“Oh, I will, I will.”
Susan fished the black scabbard out of the umbrella stand.
Umbrella stand! It never rained here, but Death had an umbrella stand.
Practically no one else Susan knew had an umbrella stand. In any list of
useful furniture, the one found at the bottom would be the umbrella stand.
Death lived in a black world, where nothing was alive and everything was
dark and his great library only had dust and cobwebs because he’d created
them for effect and there was never any sun in the sky and the air never
moved and he had an umbrella stand. And a pair of silver-backed
hairbrushes by his bed. He wanted to be something more than just a bony
apparition. He tried to create these flashes of personality but somehow
they betrayed themselves, they tried too hard, like an adolescent boy
going out wearing an after-shave called “Rampant.”
Grandfather always got things wrong. He saw life from outside and never
quite understood.
“That looks dangerous,” said the oh god.
Susan sheathed the sword.
“I hope so,” she said.
“Er…where are we going? Exactly?”
“Somewhere under an overhead sky,” said Susan. “And…I’ve seen it before.
Recently. I know the place.”
They walked out to the stable yard. Binky was waiting.
“I said you don’t have to come,” said Susan, grasping the saddle. “I mean,
you’re a…an innocent bystander.”
“But I’m a god of hangovers who’s been cured of hangovers,” said the oh
god. “I haven’t really got any function at all.”
He looked so forlorn when he said this that she relented.
“All right. Come on, then.”
She pulled him up behind her.
“Just hang on,” she said. And then she said, “Hang on somewhere
differently, I mean.”
“I’m sorry, was that a problem?” said the oh god, shifting his grip.
“It might take too long to explain and you probably don’t know all the
words. Around the waist, please.”
Susan took out Violet’s hourglass and held it up. There was a lot of sand
left to run, but she couldn’t be certain that was a good sign.
All she could be certain of was that the horse of Death could go anywhere.
The sound of Hex’s quill as it scrabbled across the paper was like a
frantic spider trapped in a matchbox.
Despite his dislike of what was going on, there was a part of Ponder
Stibbons that was very, very impressed.
In the past, when Hex had been recalcitrant about its calculations, when
it had got into a mechanical sulk and had started writing things like
“+++ Out of Cheese Error +++” and “+++ Redo From Start +++” Ponder had
tried to sort things out calmly and logically.
It had never, ever occurred to him to contemplate hitting Hex with a
mallet. But this was, in fact, what Ridcully was threatening to do.
What was impressive, and also more than a little worrying, was that Hex
seemed to understand the concept.
“Right,” said Ridcully, putting the mallet aside. “Let’s have no more of
this ‘Insufficient dates’ business, shall we? There’s boxes of the damn
things back in the Great Hall. You can have the lot as far as I’m
concerned—”
“It’s data, not dates,” said Ponder helpfully.
“What? You mean like…more than dates? Extra sticky?”
“No, no, data is Hex’s word for…well, facts,” said Ponder.
“Ridiculous way to behave,” said Ridcully brusquely. “If he’s stumped for
an answer, why can’t he write ‘You’ve got me there’ or ‘Damned if I know’
or ‘That’s a bit of a puzzler and no mistake’? All this ‘Insufficient
data’ business is just pure contrariness, to my mind. It’s just swank.”
He turned back to Hex. “Right, you. Hazard a guess.”
The quill started to write “+++ Insuff” and then stopped. After quivering
for a moment it went down a line and started again.
+++ This Is Just Calculating Aloud, You Understand +++
“Fair enough,” said Ridcully.
+++ The Amount Of Belief In The World Must Be Subject To An Upper Limit
+++
“What an odd question,” said the Dean.
“Sounds sensible,” said Ridcully. “I suppose people just…believe in stuff.
Obviously there’s a limit to what you can believe in. I’ve always said so.
So what?”
+++ Creatures Have Appeared That Were Once Believed In +++
“Yes. Yes, you could put it like that.”
+++ They Disappeared Because They Were Not Believed In +++
“Seems reasonable,” said Ridcully.
+++ People Were Believing In Something Else—Query? +++
Ridcully looked at the other wizards. They shrugged.
“Could be,” he said guardedly. “People can only believe in so many
things.”
+++ It Follows That If A Major Focus Of Belief Is Removed, There Will Be
Spare Belief +++
Ridcully stared at the words.
“You mean…sloshing around?”
The big wheel with the ram skulls on it began to turn ponderously. The
scurrying ants in the glass tubes took on a new urgency.
“What’s happening?” said Ridcully, in a loud whisper.
“I think Hex is looking up the word ‘sloshing,’” said Ponder. “It may be
in long-term storage.”
A large hourglass came down on the spring.
“What’s that for?” said Ridcully.
“Er…it shows Hex is working things out.”
“Oh. And that buzzing noise? Seems to be coming from the other side of
the wall.”
Ponder coughed.
“That is the long-term storage, Archchancellor.”
“And how does that work?”
“Er…well, if you think of memory as a series of little shelves or, or, or
holes, Archchancellor, in which you can put things, well, we found a way
of making a sort of memory which, er, interfaces neatly with the ants, in
fact, but more importantly can expand its size depending on how much we
give it to remember and, er, is possibly a bit slow but—”
“It’s a very loud buzzing,” said the Dean. “Is it going wrong?”
“No, that shows it’s working,” said Ponder. “It’s, er, beehives.”
He coughed.
“Different types of pollen, different thicknesses of honey, placement of
the eggs…It’s actually amazing how much information you can store on one
honeycomb.”
He looked at their faces. “And it’s very secure because anyone trying to
tamper with it will get stung to death and Adrian believes that when we
shut it down in the summer holidays we should get a nice lot of honey,
too.” He coughed again. “For our…sand…wiches,” he said.
He felt himself getting smaller and hotter under their gazes.
Hex came to his rescue. The hourglass bounced away and the quill pen was
jerked in and out of its inkwell.
+++ Yes. Sloshing Around. Accreting +++
“That means forming around new centers, Archchancellor,” said Ponder
helpfully.
“I know that,” said Ridcully. “Blast. Remember when we had all that life
force all over the place? A man couldn’t call his trousers his own!
So…there’s spare belief sloshing around, thank you, and these little
devils are taking advantage of it? Coming back? Household gods?”
+++ This Is Possible +++
“All right, then, so what are people not believing in all of a sudden?”
+++ Out Of Cheese Error +++ MELON MELON MELON +++ Redo From Start +++
“Thank you. A simple ‘I don’t know’ would have been sufficient,” said
Ridcully, sitting back.
“One of the major gods?” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies.
“Hah, we’d soon know about it if one of those vanished.”
“It’s Hogswatch,” said the Dean. “I suppose the Hogfather is around, is
he?”
“You believe in him?” said Ridcully.
“Well, he’s for kids, isn’t he?” said the Dean. “But I’m sure they all
believe in him. I certainly did. It wouldn’t be Hogswatch when I was a
kid without a pillowcase hanging by the fire—”
“A pillowcase?” said the Senior Wrangler, sharply.
“Well, you can’t get much in a stocking,” said the Dean.
“Yes, but a whole pillowcase?” the Senior Wrangler insisted.
“Yes. What of it?”
“Is it just me, or is that a rather greedy and selfish way to behave? In
my family we just hung up very small socks,” said the Senior Wrangler. “A
sugar pig, a toy soldier, a couple of oranges and that was it. Hah, turns
out people with whole pillowcases were cornering the market, eh?”
“Shut up and stop squabbling, both of you,” said Ridcully. “There must be
a simple way to check up. How can you tell if the Hogfather exists?”
“Someone’s drunk the sherry, there’s sooty footprints on the carpet,
sleigh tracks on the roof and your pillowcase is full of presents,” said
the Dean.
“Hah, pillowcase,” said the Senior Wrangler darkly. “Hah. I expect your
family were the stuck-up sort that didn’t even open their presents until
after Hogswatch dinner, eh? One of them with a big snooty Hogswatch tree
in the hall?”
“What if—” Ridcully began, but he was too late.
“Well?” said the Dean. “Of course we waited until after lunch—”
“You know, it really used to wind me right up, people with big snooty
Hogswatch trees. And I just bet you had one of those swanky fancy
nutcrackers like a big thumbscrew,” said the Senior Wrangler. “Some
people had to make do with the coal hammer out of the outhouse, of course.
And had dinner in the middle of the day instead of lah-di-dah posh dinner
in the evening.”
“I can’t help it if my family had money,” said the Dean, and that might
have defused things a bit had he not added, “and standards.”
“And big pillowcases!” shouted the Senior Wrangler, bouncing up and down
in rage. “And I bet you bought your holly, eh?”
The Dean raised his eyebrows. “Of course! We didn’t go creeping around
the country pinching it out of other people’s hedges, like some people
did,” he snapped.
“That’s traditional! That’s part of the fun!”
“Celebrating Hogswatch with stolen greenery?”
Ridcully put his hand over his eyes.
The word for this, he had heard, was “cabin fever.” When people had been
cooped up for too long in the dark days of the winter, they always tended
to get on one another’s nerves, although there was probably a school of
thought that would hold that spending your time in a university with more
than five thousand known rooms, a huge library, the best kitchens in the
city, its own brewery, dairy, extensive wine cellar, laundry, barber shop,
cloisters and skittle alley was testing the definition of “cooped up” a
little. Mind you, wizards could get on one another’s nerves in opposite
corners of a very large field.
“Just shut up, will you?” he said. “It’s Hogswatch! That’s not the time
for silly arguments, all right?”
“Oh, yes it is,” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies glumly. “It’s
exactly the time for silly arguments. In our family we were lucky to get
through dinner without a reprise of What A Shame Henry Didn’t Go Into
Business With Our Ron. Or Why Hasn’t Anyone Taught Those Kids To Use A
Knife? That was another favorite.”
“And the sulks,” said Ponder Stibbons.
“Oh, the sulks,” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies. “Not a proper
Hogswatch without everyone sitting staring at different walls.”
“The games were worse,” said Ponder.
“Worse than the kids hitting one another with their toys, d’you think?
Not a proper Hogswatch afternoon without wheels and bits of broken dolly
everywhere and everyone whining. Assault and battery included.”
“We had a game called Hunt the Slipper,” said Ponder. “Someone hid a
slipper. And then we had to find it. And then we had a row.”
“It’s not really bad,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes. “I mean, not
proper Hogswatch bad, unless everyone’s wearing a paper hat. There’s
always that bit, isn’t there, when someone’s horrible great-aunt puts on
a paper hat and smirks at everyone because she’s being so bohemian.”
“I’d forgotten about the paper hats,” said the Chair of Indefinite
Studies. “Oh dear.”
“And then later on someone’ll suggest a board game,” said Ponder.
“That’s right. Where no one exactly remembers all the rules.”
“Which doesn’t stop someone suggesting that you play for pennies.”
“And five minutes later there’s two people not speaking to one another
for the rest of their lives because of tuppence.”
“And some horrible little kid—”
“I know, I know! Some little kid who’s been allowed to stay up wins
everyone’s money by being a nasty little cut-throat swot!”
“Right!”
“Er…” said Ponder, who rather suspected that he had been that child.
“And don’t forget the presents,” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies, as
if reading off some internal list of gloom. “How…how full of potential
they seem in all that paper, how pregnant with possibilities…and then you
open them and basically the wrapping paper was more interesting and you
have to say ‘How thoughtful, that will come in handy.’ It’s not better to
give than to receive, in my opinion, it’s just less embarrassing.”
“I’ve worked out,” said the Senior Wrangler, “that over the years I have
been a net exporter of Hogswatch presents—”
“Oh, everyone is,” said the Chair. “You spend a fortune on other people
and what you get when all the paper is cleared away is one slipper that’s
the wrong color and a book about ear wax.”
Ridcully sat in horrified amazement. He’d always enjoyed Hogswatch, every
bit of it. He’d enjoyed seeing ancient relatives, he’d enjoyed the food,
he’d been good at games like Chase My Neighbor up the Passage and Hooray
Jolly Tinker. He was always the first to don a paper hat. He felt that
paper hats lent a special festive air to the occasion. And he always very
carefully read the messages on Hogswatch cards and found time for a few
kind thoughts about the sender.
Listening to his wizards was like watching someone kick apart a doll’s
house.
“At least the Hogswatch cracker mottoes are fun…?” he ventured.
They all turned to look at him, and then turned away again.
“If you have the sense of humor of a wire coat hanger,” said the Senior
Wrangler.
“Oh dear,” said Ridcully. “Then perhaps there isn’t a Hogfather if all
you chaps are sitting around with long faces. He’s not the sort to let
people go around being miserable!”
“Ridcully, he’s just some old winter god,” said the Senior Wrangler
wearily. “He’s not the Cheerful Fairy or anything.”
The Lecturer in Recent Runes raised his chin from his hands. “What
Cheerful Fairy?”
“Oh, it’s just something my granny used to go on about if it was a wet
afternoon and we were getting on her nerves,” said the Senior Wrangler.
“She’d say ‘I’ll call the Cheerful Fairy if you’re…’” He stopped, looking
guilty.
The Archchancellor held a hand to his ear in a theatrical gesture
denoting, “Hush. What was that I heard?”
“Someone tinkled,” he said. “Thank you, Senior Wrangler.”
“Oh, no,” the Senior Wrangler moaned. “No, no, no!”
They listened for a moment.
“We might have got away with it,” said Ponder. “I didn’t hear anything…”
“Yes, but you can just imagine her, can’t you?” said the Dean. “The
moment you said it, I had this picture in my mind. She’s going to have a
whole bag of word games, for one thing. Or she’ll suggest we go outdoors
for our health.”
The wizards shuddered. They weren’t against the outdoors, it was simply
their place in it they objected to.
“Cheerfulness has always got me down,” said the Dean.
“Well, if some wretched little ball of cheerfulness turns up I shan’t
have it for one,” said the Senior Wrangler, folding his arms. “I’ve put
up with monsters and trolls and big green things with teeth, so I’m not
sitting still for any kind of—”
“Hello!! Hello!!”
The voice was the kind of voice that reads suitable stories to children.
Every vowel was beautifully rounded. And they could hear the extra
exclamation marks, born of a sort of desperate despairing jollity, slot
into place. They turned.
The Cheerful Fairy was quite short and plump in a tweed skirt and shoes
so sensible they could do their own tax returns, and was pretty much like
the first teacher you get at school, the one who has special training in
dealing with nervous incontinence and little boys whose contribution to
the wonderful world of sharing consists largely of hitting a small girl
repeatedly over the head with a wooden horse. In fact, this picture was
helped by the whistle on a string around her neck and a general
impression that at any moment she would clap her hands.
The tiny gauzy wings just visible on her back were probably just for show,
but the wizards kept on staring at her shoulder.
“Hello—” she said again, but a lot more uncertainly. She gave them a
suspicious look. “You’re rather big boys,” she said, as if they’d become
so in order to spite her. She blinked. “It’s my job to chase those blues
away,” she added, apparently following a memorized script. Then she
seemed to rally a bit and went on. “So chins up, everyone, and let’s see
a lot of bright shining faces!!”
Her gaze met that of the Senior Wrangler, who had probably never had a
bright shining face in his entire life. He specialized in dull, sullen
ones. The one he was wearing now would have won prizes.
“Excuse me, madam,” said Ridcully. “But is that a chicken on your
shoulder?”
“It’s, er, it’s, er, it’s the Blue Bird of Happiness,” said the Cheerful
Fairy. Her voice now had the slightly shaking tone of someone who doesn’t
quite believe what she has just said but is going to go on saying it
anyway, just in case saying it will eventually make it true.
“I beg your pardon, but it is a chicken. A live chicken,” said Ridcully.
“It just went cluck.”
“It is blue,” she said hopelessly.
“Well, that at least is true,” Ridcully conceded, as kindly as he could
manage. “Left to myself, I expect I’d have imagined a slightly more
streamlined Blue Bird of Happiness, but I can’t actually fault you there.”
The Cheerful Fairy coughed nervously and fiddled with the buttons on her
sensible woolly jumper.
“How about a nice game to get us all in the mood?” she said. “A guessing
game, perhaps? Or a painting competition? There may be a small prize for
the winner.”
“Madam, we’re wizards,” said the Senior Wrangler. “We don’t do cheerful.”
“Charades?” said the Cheerful Fairy. “Or perhaps you’ve been playing them
already? How about a singsong? Who knows ‘Row Row Row Your Boat’?”
Her bright little smile hit the group scowl of the assembled wizards. “We
don’t want to be Mr. Grumpy, do we?” she added hopefully.
“Yes,” said the Senior Wrangler.
The Cheerful Fairy sagged, and then patted frantically at her shapeless
sleeves until she tugged out a balled-up handkerchief. She dabbed at her
eyes.
“It’s all going wrong again, isn’t it?” she said, her chin trembling. “No
one ever wants to be cheerful these days, and I really do try. I’ve made
a Joke Book and I’ve got three boxes of clothes for charades and…and…and
whenever I try to cheer people up they all look embarrassed…and really I
do make an effort…”
She blew her nose loudly.
Even the Senior Wrangler had the grace to look embarrassed.
“Er…” he began.
“Would it hurt anyone just occasionally to try to be a little bit
cheerful?” said the Cheerful Fairy.
“Er…in what way?” said the Senior Wrangler, feeling wretched.
“Well, there’s so many nice things to be cheerful about,” said the
Cheerful Fairy, blowing her nose again.
“Er…raindrops and sunsets and that sort of thing?” said the Senior
Wrangler, managing some sarcasm, but they could tell his heart wasn’t in
it. “Er, would you like to borrow my handkerchief? It’s nearly fresh.”
“Why don’t you get the lady a nice sherry?” said Ridcully. “And some corn
for her chicken…”
“Oh, I never drink alcohol,” said the Cheerful Fairy, horrified.
“Really?” said Ridcully. “We find it’s something to be cheerful about. Mr.
Stibbons…would you be so kind as to step over here for a moment?”
He beckoned him up close.
“There’s got to be a lot of belief sloshing around to let her be created,”
he said. “She’s a good fourteen stone, if I’m any judge. If we wanted to
contact the Hogfather, how would we go about it? Letter up chimney?”
“Yes, but not tonight, sir,” said Ponder. “He’ll be out delivering.”
“No telling where he’ll be, then,” said Ridcully. “Blast.”
“Of course, he might not have come here yet,” said Ponder.
“Why should he come here?” said Ridcully.
The Librarian pulled the blankets over himself and curled up.
As an orangutan he hankered for the warmth of the rain forest. The
problem was that he’d never even seen a rain forest, having been turned
into an orangutan when he was already a fully grown human. Something in
his bones knew about it, though, and didn’t like the cold of winter at
all. But he was also a librarian in those same bones and he flatly
refused to allow fires to be lit in the library. As a result, pillows and
blankets went missing everywhere else in the University and ended up in a
sort of cocoon in the reference section, in which the ape lurked during
the worst of the winter.
He turned over and wrapped himself in the Bursar’s curtains.
There was a creaking outside his nest, and some whispering.
“No, don’t light the lamp.”
“I wondered why I hadn’t seen him all evening.”
“Oh, he goes to bed early on Hogswatch Eve, sir. Here we are…”
There was some rustling.
“We’re in luck. It hasn’t been filled,” said Ponder. “Looks like he’s
used one of the Bursar’s.”
“He puts it up every year?”
“Apparently.”
“But it’s not as though he’s a child. A certain childlike simplicity,
perhaps.”
“It might be different for orangutans, Archchancellor.”
“Do they do it in the jungle, d’you think?”
“I don’t imagine so, sir. No chimneys, for one thing.”
“And quite short legs, of course. Extremely underfunded in the sock area,
orangutans. They’d be quids in if they could hang up gloves, of course.
Hogfather’d be on double shifts if they could hang up their gloves. On
account of the length of their arms.”
“Very good, Archchancellor.”
“I say, what’s this on the…my word, a glass of sherry. Well, waste not,
want not.” There was a damp glugging noise in the darkness.
“I think that was supposed to be for the Hogfather, sir.”
“And the banana?”
“I imagine that’s been left out for the pigs, sir.”
“Pigs?”
“Oh, you know, sir. Tusker and Snouter and Gouger and Rooter. I mean,”
Ponder stopped, conscious that a grown man shouldn’t be able to remember
this sort of thing, “that’s what children believe.”
“Bananas for pigs? That’s not traditional, is it? I’d have thought acorns,
perhaps. Or apples or swedes.”
“Yes, sir, but the Librarian likes bananas, sir.”
“Very nourishin’ fruit, Mr. Stibbons.”
“Yes, sir. Although, funnily enough it’s not actually a fruit, sir.”
“Really?”
“Yes, sir. Botanically, it’s a type of fish, sir. According to my theory
it’s cladistically associated with the Krullian pipefish, sir, which of
course is also yellow and goes around in bunches or shoals.”
“And lives in trees?”
“Well, not usually, sir. The banana is obviously exploiting a new niche.”
“Good heavens, really? It’s a funny thing, but I’ve never much liked
bananas and I’ve always been a bit suspicious of fish, too. That’d
explain it.”
“Yes, sir.”
“Do they attack swimmers?”
“Not that I’ve heard, sir. Of course, they may be clever enough to only
attack swimmers who’re far from land.”
“What, you mean sort of…high up? In the trees, as it were?”
“Possibly, sir.”
“Cunning, eh?”
“Yes, sir.”
“Well, we might as well make ourselves comfortable, Mr. Stibbons.”
“Yes, sir.”
A match flared in the darkness as Ridcully lit his pipe.
The Ankh-Morpork wassailers had practiced for weeks.
The custom was referred to by Anaglypta Huggs, organizer of the best and
most select group of the city’s singers, as an occasion for fellowship
and good cheer.
One should always be wary of people who talk unashamedly of “fellowship
and good cheer” as if it were something that can be applied to life like
a poultice. Turn your back for a moment and they may well organize a
maypole dance and, frankly, there’s no option then but to try and make it
to the tree line.
The singers were halfway down Park Lane now, and halfway through “The Red
Rosy Hen” in marvelous harmony.* Their collecting tins were already full
of donations for the poor of the city, or at least those sections of the
poor who in Mrs. Huggs’s opinion were suitably picturesque and not too
smelly and could be relied upon to say thank you. People had come to
their doors to listen. Orange light spilled onto the snow. Candle
lanterns glowed among the tumbling flakes. If you could have taken the
lid off the scene, there would have been chocolates inside. Or at least
an interesting biscuit assortment.
Mrs. Huggs had heard that wassailing was an ancient ritual, and you
didn’t need anyone to tell you what that meant, but she felt she’d
carefully removed all those elements that would affront the refined ear.
And it was only gradually that the singers became aware of the discord.
Around the corner, slipping and sliding on the ice, came another band of
singers.
Some people march to a different drummer. The drummer in question here
must have been trained elsewhere, possibly by a different species on
another planet.
In front of the group was a legless man on a small wheeled trolley, who
was singing at the top of his voice and banging two saucepans together.
His name was Arnold Sideways. Pushing him along was Coffin Henry, whose
croaking progress through an entirely different song was punctuated by
bouts of off-the-beat coughing. He was accompanied by a perfectly
ordinary-looking man in torn, dirty and yet expensive clothing, whose
pleasant tenor voice was drowned out by the quacking of a duck on his
head. He answered to the name of Duck Man, although he never seemed to
understand why, or why he was always surrounded by people who seemed to
see ducks where no ducks could be. And finally, being towed along by a
small gray dog on a string, was Foul Ole Ron, generally regarded in Ankh-
Morpork as the deranged beggars’ deranged beggar. He was probably
incapable of singing, but at least he was attempting to swear in time to
the beat, or beats.
The wassailers stopped and watched them in horror.
Neither party noticed, as the beggars oozed and ambled up the street,
that little smears of black and gray were spiraling out of drains and
squeezing out from under tiles and buzzing off into the night. People
have always had the urge to sing and clang things at the dark stub of the
year, when all sorts of psychic nastiness has taken advantage of the long
gray days and the deep shadows to lurk and breed. Lately people had taken
to singing harmoniously, which rather lost the effect. Those who really
understood just clanged something and shouted.
The beggars were not in fact this well versed in folkloric practice. They
were just making a din in the well-founded hope that people would give
them money to stop.
It was just possible to make out a consensus song in there somewhere.
“Hogswatch is coming,
The pig is getting fat,
Please put a dollar in the old man’s hat
If you ain’t got a dollar a penny will do—”
“And if you ain’t got a penny,” Foul Ole Ron yodeled, solo, “then—fghfgh
yffg mfmfmf…”
The Duck Man had, with great presence of mind, clamped a hand over Ron’s
mouth.
“So sorry about this,” he said, “but this time I’d like people not to
slam their doors on us. And it doesn’t scan, anyway.”
The nearby doors slammed regardless. The other wassailers fled hastily to
a more salubrious location. Goodwill to all men was a phrase coined by
someone who hadn’t met Foul Ole Ron.
The beggars stopped singing, except for Arnold Sideways, who tended to
live in his own small world.
“—nobody knows how good we can live, on boots three times a day…”
Then the change in the air penetrated even his consciousness.
Snow thumped off the trees as a contrary wind brushed them. There was a
whirl of flakes and it was just possible, since the beggars did not
always have their mental compasses pointing due Real, that they heard a
brief snatch of conversation.
“It just ain’t that simple, master, that’s all I’m saying—”
IT IS BETTER TO GIVE THAN TO RECEIVE, ALBERT.
“No, master, it’s just a lot more expensive. You can’t just go around—”
Things rained down on the snow.
The beggars looked at them. Arnold Sideways carefully picked up a sugar
pig and bit its nose off. Foul Ole Ron peered suspiciously into a cracker
that had bounced off his hat, and then shook it against his ear.
The Duck Man opened a bag of sweets.
“Ah, humbugs?” he said.
Coffin Henry unlooped a string of sausages from around his neck.
“Buggrit?” said Foul Ole Ron.
“It’s a cracker,” said the dog, scratching its ear. “You pull it.”
Ron waved the cracker aimlessly by one end.
“Oh, give it here,” said the dog, and gripped the other end in its teeth.
“My word,” said the Duck Man, fishing in a snow drift. “Here’s a whole
roast pig! And a big dish of roast potatoes, miraculously uncracked!
And…look…isn’t this caviar in the jar? Asparagus! Potted shrimp! My
goodness! What were we going to have for Hogswatch dinner, Arnold?”
“Old boots,” said Arnold. He opened a fallen box of cigars and licked
them.
“Just old boots?”
“Oh, no. Stuffed with mud, and with roast mud. ’s good mud, too. I bin
saving it up.”
“Now we can have a merry feast of goose!”
“All right. Can we stuff it with old boots?”
There was a pop from the direction of the cracker. They heard Foul Ole
Ron’s thinking-brain dog growl.
“No, no, no, you put the hat on your head and you read the hum’rous
mottar.”
“Millennium hand and shrimp?” said Ron, passing the scrap of paper to the
Duck Man. The Duck Man was regarded as the intellectual of the group.
He peered at the motto.
“Ah, yes, let’s see now…It says ‘Help Help Help Ive Fallen in the Crakker
Machine I Cant Keep Runin on this Roller Please Get me Ou—’” He turned
the paper over a few times. “That appears to be it, except for the
stains.”
“Always the same ole mottars,” said the dog. “Someone slap Ron on the
back, will you? If he laughs any more he’ll—oh, he has. Oh, well, nothing
new about that.”
The beggars spent a few more minutes picking up hams, jars and bottles
that had settled on the snow. They packed them around Arnold on his
trolley and set off down the street.
“How come we got all this?”
“’s Hogswatch, right?”
“Yeah, but who hung up their stocking?”
“I don’t think we’ve got any, have we?”
“I hung up an old boot.”
“Does that count?”
“Dunno. Ron ate it.”
I’m waiting for the Hogfather, thought Ponder Stibbons. I’m in the dark
waiting for the Hogfather. Me. A believer in Natural Philosophy. I can
find the square root of 27.4 in my head.* I shouldn’t be doing this.
It’s not as if I’ve hung a stocking up. There’d be some point if…
He sat rigid for a moment, and then pulled off his pointy sandal and
rolled down a sock. It helped if you thought of it as the scientific
testing of an interesting hypothesis.
From out of the darkness Ridcully said, “How long, do you think?”
“It’s generally believed that all deliveries are completed well before
midnight,” said Ponder, and tugged hard.
“Are you all right, Mr. Stibbons?”
“Fine, sir. Fine. Er…do you happen to have a drawing pin about you? Or a
small nail, perhaps?”
“I don’t believe so.”
“Oh, it’s all right. I’ve found a penknife.”
After a while Ridcully heard a faint scratching noise in the dark.
“How do you spell ‘electricity,’ sir?”
Ridcully thought for a while. “You know, I don’t think I ever do.”
There was silence again, and then a clang. The Librarian grunted in his
sleep.
“What are you doing?”
“I just knocked over the coal shovel.”
“Why are you feeling around on the mantelpiece?”
“Oh, just…you know, just…just looking. A little…experiment. After all,
you never know.”
“You never know what?”
“Just…never know, you know.”
“Sometimes you know,” said Ridcully. “I think I know quite a lot that I
didn’t used to know. It’s amazing what you do end up knowing, I sometimes
think. I often wonder what new stuff I’ll know.”
“Well, you never know.”
“That’s a fact.”
High over the city Albert turned to Death, who seemed to be trying to
avoid his gaze.
“You didn’t get that stuff out of the sack! Not cigars and peaches in
brandy and grub with fancy foreign names!”
YES, IT CAME OUT OF THE SACK.
Albert gave him a suspicious look.
“But you put it in the sack in the first place, didn’t you?”
NO.
“You did, didn’t you?” Albert stated.
NO.
“You put all those things in the sack.”
NO.
“You got them from somewhere and put them in the sack.”
NO.
“You did put them in the sack, didn’t you?”
NO.
“You put them in the sack.”
YES.
“I knew you put them in the sack. Where did you get them?”
THEY WERE JUST LYING AROUND.
“Whole roast pig does not, in my experience, just lie around.”
NO ONE SEEMED TO BE USING THEM, ALBERT.
“Couple of chimneys ago we were over that big posh restaurant…”
REALLY? I DON’T REMEMBER.
“And it seemed to me you were down there a bit longer than usual, if you
don’t mind me saying so.”
REALLY.
“How exactly were they just quote lying around unquote comma?”
JUST…LYING AROUND. YOU KNOW. RECUMBENT.
“In a kitchen?”
THERE WAS A CERTAIN CULINARINESS ABOUT THE PLACE, I RECALL.
Albert pointed a trembling finger.
“You nicked someone’s Hogswatch dinner, master!”
IT’S GOING TO BE EATEN, said Death defensively. ANYWAY, YOU THOUGHT IT
WAS A GOOD IDEA WHEN I SHOWED THAT KING THE DOOR.
“Yeah, well, that was a bit different,” said Albert, lowering his voice.
“But, I mean, the Hogfather doesn’t drop down the chimney and pinch
people’s grub!”
THE BEGGARS WILL ENJOY IT, ALBERT.
“Well, yes, but—”
IT WASN’T STEALING. IT WAS JUST…REDISTRIBUTION. IT WILL BE A GOOD DEED IN
A NAUGHTY WORLD.
“No, it won’t!”
THEN IT WILL BE A NAUGHTY DEED IN A NAUGHTY WORLD AND WILL PASS
COMPLETELY UNNOTICED.
“Yeah, but you might at least have thought about the people whose grub
you pinched.”
THEY HAVE BEEN PROVIDED FOR, OF COURSE. I AM NOT COMPLETELY HEARTLESS. IN
A METAPHORICAL SENSE. AND NOW—ONWARD AND UPWARD.
“We’re heading down, master.”
ONWARD AND DOWNWARD, THEN.
There were…swirls. Binky galloped easily through them, except that he did
not seem to move. He might have been hanging in the air.
“Oh, me,” said the oh god weakly.
“What?” said Susan.
“Try shutting your eyes—”
Susan shut her eyes. Then she reached up to touch her face.
“I’m still seeing…”
“I thought it was just me. It’s usually just me.”
The swirls vanished.
There was greenery below.
And that was odd. It was greenery. Susan had flown a few times over
countryside, even swamps and jungles, and there had never been a green as
green as this. If green could be a primary color, this was it.
And that wiggly thing—
“That’s not a river!” she said.
“Isn’t it?”
“It’s blue!”
The oh god risked a look down.
“Water’s blue,” he said.
“Of course it’s not!”
“Grass is green, water’s blue…I can remember that. It’s some of the stuff
I just know.”
“Well, in a way…” Susan hesitated. Everyone knew grass was green and
water was blue. Quite often it wasn’t true, but everyone knew it in the
same way they knew the sky was blue, too.
She made the mistake of looking up as she thought that.
There was the sky. It was, indeed, blue. And down there was the land. It
was green.
And in between was nothing. Not white space. Not black night.
Just…nothing, all round the edges of the world. Where the brain said
there should be, well, sky and land, meeting neatly at the horizon, there
was simply a void that sucked at the eyeball like a loose tooth.
And there was the sun.
It was under the sky, floating above the land.
And it was yellow.
Buttercup yellow.
Binky landed on the grass beside the river. Or at least on the green. It
felt more like sponge, or moss. He nuzzled it.
Susan slid off, trying to keep her gaze low. That meant she was looking
at the vivid blue of the water.
There were orange fish in it. They didn’t look quite right, as if they’d
been created by someone who really did think a fish was two curved lines
and a dot and a triangular tail. They reminded her of the skeletal fish
in Death’s quiet pool. Fish that were…appropriate to their surroundings.
And she could see them, even though the water was just a block of color
which part of her insisted ought to be opaque…
She knelt down and dipped her hand in. It felt like water, but what
poured through her fingers was liquid blue.
And now she knew where she was. The last piece clicked into place and the
knowledge bloomed inside her. She knew if she saw a house just how its
windows would be placed, and just how the smoke would come out of the
chimney.
There would almost certainly be apples on the trees. And they would be
red, because everyone knew that apples were red. And the sun was yellow.
And the sky was blue. And the grass was green.
But there was another world, called the real world by the people who
believed in it, where the sky could be anything from off-white to sunset
red to thunderstorm yellow. And the trees would be anything from bare
branches, mere scribbles against the sky, to red flames before the frost.
And the sun was white or yellow or orange. And water was brown and gray
and green…
The colors here were springtime colors, and not the springtime of the
world. They were the colors of the springtime of the eye.
“This is a child’s painting,” she said.
The oh god slumped onto the green.
“Every time I look at the gap my eyes water,” he mumbled. “I feel awful.”
“I said this is a child’s painting,” said Susan.
“Oh, me…I think the wizards’ potion is wearing off…”
“I’ve seen dozens of pictures of it,” said Susan, ignoring him. “You put
the sky overhead because the sky’s above you and when you are a couple of
feet high there’s not a lot of sideways to the sky in any case. And
everyone tells you grass is green and water is blue. This is the
landscape you paint. Twyla paints like that. I painted like that.
Grandfather saved some of—”
She stopped.
“All children do it, anyway,” she muttered. “Come on, let’s find the
house.”
“What house?” the oh god moaned. “And can you speak quieter, please?”
“There’ll be a house,” said Susan, standing up. “There’s always a house.
With four windows. And the smoke coming out of the chimney all curly like
a spring. Look, this is a place like Gr—Death’s country. It’s not really
geography.”
The oh god walked over to the nearest tree and banged his head on it as
if he hoped it was going to hurt.
“Feels like geo’fy,” he muttered.
“But have you ever seen a tree like that? A big green blob on a brown
stick? It looks like a lollipop!” said Susan, pulling him along.
“Dunno. Firs’ time I ever saw a tree. Arrgh. Somethin’ dropped on m’head.”
He blinked owlishly at the ground. “’s red.”
“It’s an apple,” she said. She sighed. “Everyone knows apples are red.”
There were no bushes. But there were flowers, each with a couple of green
leaves. They grew individually, dotted around the rolling green.
And then they were out of the trees and there, by a bend in the river,
was the house.
It didn’t look very big. There were four windows and a door. Corkscrew
smoke curled out of the chimney.
“You know, it’s a funny thing,” said Susan, staring at it. “Twyla draws
houses like that. And she practically lives in a mansion. I drew houses
like that. And I was born in a palace. Why?”
“P’raps it’s all this house,” muttered the oh god miserably.
“What? You really think so? Kids’ paintings are all of this place? It’s
in our heads?”
“Don’t ask me, I was just making conversation,” said the oh god.
Susan hesitated. The words What Now? loomed. Should she just go and knock?
And she realized that was normal thinking…
In the glittering, clattering, chattering atmosphere a head waiter was
having a difficult time. There were a lot of people in, and the staff
should have been fully stretched, putting bicarbonate of soda in the
white wine to make very expensive bubbles and cutting the vegetables very
small to make them cost more.
Instead they were standing in a dejected group in the kitchen.
“Where did it all go?” screamed the manager. “Someone’s been through the
cellar, too!”
“William said he felt a cold wind,” said the waiter. He’d been backed up
against a hot plate, and now knew why it was called a hot plate in a way
he hadn’t fully comprehended before.
“I’ll give him a cold wind! Haven’t we got anything?”
“There’s odds and ends…”
“You don’t mean odds and ends, you mean des curieux et des bouts,”
corrected the manager.
“Yeah, right, yeah. And, er, and, er…”
“There’s nothing else?”
“Er…old boots. Muddy old boots.”
“Old—?”
“Boots. Lots of ’em,” said the waiter. He felt he was beginning to singe.
“How come we’ve got…vintage footwear?”
“Dunno. They just turned up, sir. The oven’s full of old boots. So’s the
pantry.”
“There’s a hundred people booked in! All the shops’ll be shut! Where’s
Chef?”
“William’s trying to get him to come out of the privy, sir. He’s locked
himself in and is having one of his Moments.”
“Something’s cooking. What’s that I can smell?”
“Me, sir.”
“Old boots…” muttered the manager. “Old boots…old boots…Leather, are they?
Not clogs or rubber or anything?”
“Looks like…just boots. And lots of mud, sir.”
The manager took off his jacket. “All right. Got any cream, have we?
Onions? Garlic? Butter? Some old beef bones? A bit of pastry?”
“Er, yes…”
The manager rubbed his hands together. “Right,” he said, taking an apron
off a hook. “You there, get some water boiling! Lots of water! And find a
really large hammer! And you, chop some onions! The rest of you, start
sorting out the boots. I want the tongues out and the soles off. We’ll do
them…let’s see…Mousse de la Boue dans une Panier de la Pâte de
Chaussures…”
“Where’re we going to get that from, sir?”
“Mud mousse in a basket of shoe pastry. Get the idea? It’s not our fault
if even Quirmians don’t understand restaurant Quirmian. It’s not like
lying, after all.”
“Well, it’s a bit like—” the waiter began. He’d been cursed with honesty
at an early stage.
“Then there’s Brodequin rôti Façon Ombres…” The manager sighed at the
head waiter’s panicky expression. “Soldier’s boot done in the Shades
fashion,” he translated.
“Er…Shades fashion?”
“In mud. But if we cook the tongues separately we can put on Languette
braisée, too.”
“There’s some ladies’ shoes, sir,” said an underchef.
“Right. Add to the menu…Let’s see now…Sole d’une Bonne
Femme…and…yes…Servis dans un Coulis de Terre en l’Eau. That’s mud, to
you.”
“What about the laces, sir?” said another underchef.
“Good thinking. Dig out that recipe for Spaghetti Carbonara.”
“Sir?” said the head waiter.
“I started off as a chef,” said the manager, picking up a knife. “How do
you think I was able to afford this place? I know how it’s done. Get the
look and the sauce right and you’re three-quarters there.”
“But it’s all going to be old boots!” said the waiter.
“Prime aged beef,” the manager corrected him. “It’ll tenderize in no
time.”
“Anyway…anyway…we haven’t got any soup—”
“Mud. And a lot of onions.”
“There’s the puddings—”
“Mud. Let’s see if we can get it to caramelize, you never know.”
“I can’t even find the coffee…Still, they probably won’t last till the
coffee…”
“Mud. Café de Terre,” said the manager firmly. “Genuine ground coffee.”
“Oh, they’ll spot that, sir!”
“They haven’t up till now,” said the manager darkly.
“We’ll never get away with it, sir. Never.”
In the country of the sky on top, Medium Dave Lilywhite hauled another
bag of money down the stairs.
“There must be thousands here,” said Chickenwire.
“Hundreds of thousands,” said Medium Dave.
“And what’s all this stuff?” said Catseye, opening a box. “’s just paper.”
He tossed it aside.
Medium Dave sighed. He was all for class solidarity, but sometimes
Catseye got on his nerves.
“They’re title deeds,” he said. “And they’re better than money.”
“Paper’s better’n money?” said Catseye. “Hah, if you can burn it you
can’t spend it, that’s what I say.”
“Hang on,” said Chickenwire. “I know about them. The Tooth Fairy owns
property?”
“Got to raise money somehow,” said Medium Dave. “All those half-dollars
under the pillow.”
“If we steal them, do they become ours?”
“Is that a trick question?” said Catseye, smirking.
“Yeah, but…ten thousand each doesn’t sound such a lot, when you see all
this.”
“He won’t miss a—”
“Gentlemen…”
They turned. Teatime was in the doorway.
“We were just…we were just piling up the stuff,” said Chickenwire.
“Yes. I know. I told you to.”
“Right. That’s right. You did,” said Chickenwire gratefully.
“And there’s such a lot,” said Teatime. He gave them a smile. Catseye
coughed.
“’s got to be thousands,” said Medium Dave. “And what about all these
deeds and so on? Look, this one’s for that pipe shop in Honey Trap Lane!
In Ankh-Morpork! I buy my tobacco there! Old Thimble is always moaning
about the rent, too!”
“Ah. So you opened the strongboxes,” said Teatime pleasantly.
“Well…yes…”
“Fine. Fine,” said Teatime. “I didn’t ask you to, but…fine, fine. And how
did you think the Tooth Fairy made her money? Little gnomes in some mine
somewhere? Fairy gold? But that turns to trash in the morning!”
He laughed. Chickenwire laughed. Even Medium Dave laughed. And then
Teatime was on him, pushing him irresistibly backward until he hit the
wall.
There was a blur and he tried to blink and his left eyelid was suddenly a
rose of pain.
Teatime’s good eye was close to him, if you could call it good. The pupil
was a dot. Medium Dave could just make out his hand, right by Medium
Dave’s face.
It was holding a knife. The point of the blade could only be the merest
fraction of an inch from Medium Dave’s right eye.
“I know people say I’d kill them as soon as look at them,” whispered
Teatime. “And in fact I’d much rather kill you than look at you, Mr.
Lilywhite. You stand in a castle of gold and plot to steal pennies. Oh,
dear. What am I to do with you?”
He relaxed a little, but his hand still held the knife to Medium Dave’s
unblinking eye.
“You’re thinking that Banjo is going to help you,” he said. “That’s how
it’s always been, isn’t it? But Banjo likes me. He really does. Banjo is
my friend.”
Medium Dave managed to focus beyond Teatime’s ear. His brother was just
standing there, with the blank face he had while he waited for another
order or a new thought to turn up.
“If I thought you were feeling bad thoughts about me I would be so
downcast,” said Teatime. “I do not have many friends left, Mr. Medium
Dave.”
He stood back and smiled happily. “All friends now?” he said, as Medium
Dave slumped down. “Help him, Banjo.”
On cue, Banjo lumbered forward.
“Banjo has the heart of a little child,” said Teatime, the knife
disappearing somewhere about his clothing. “I believe I have, too.”
The others were frozen in place. They hadn’t moved since the attack.
Medium Dave was a heavyset man and Teatime was a matchstick model, but
he’d lifted Medium Dave off his feet like a feather.
“As far as the money goes, in fact, I really have no use for it,” said
Teatime, sitting down on a sack of silver. “It is small change. You may
share it out amongst yourselves, and no doubt you’ll squabble and doublecross
one another more tiresomely. Oh dear. It is so awful when friends
fall out.”
He kicked the sack. It split. Silver and copper fell in an expensive
trickle.
“And you’ll swagger and spend it on drink and women,” he said, as they
watched the coins roll into every corner of the room. “The thought of
investment will never cross your scarred little minds—”
There was a rumble from Banjo. Even Teatime waited patiently until the
huge man had assembled a sentence. The result was:
“I gotta piggy bank.”
“And what would you do with a million dollars, Banjo?” said Teatime.
Another rumble. Banjo’s face twisted up.
“Buy…a…bigger piggy bank?”
“Well done.” The Assassin stood up. “Let’s go and see how our wizard is
getting on, shall we?”
He walked out of the room without looking back. After a moment Banjo
followed.
The others tried not to look at one another’s faces. Then Chickenwire
said, “Was he saying we could take the money and go?”
“Don’t be bloody stupid, we wouldn’t get ten yards,” said Medium Dave,
still clutching his face. “Ugh, this hurts. I think he cut the eyelid…he
cut the damn eyelid…”
“Then let’s just leave the stuff and go! I never joined up to ride on
tigers!”
“And what’ll you do when he comes after you?”
“Why’d he bother with the likes of us?”
“He’s got time for his friends,” said Medium Dave bitterly. “For gods’
sakes, someone get me a clean rag or something…”
“Okay, but…but he can’t look everywhere.”
Medium Dave shook his head. He’d been through Ankh-Morpork’s very own
university of the streets and had graduated with his life and an
intelligence made all the keener by constant friction. You only had to
look into Teatime’s mismatched eyes to know one thing, which was this:
that if Teatime wanted to find you he would not look everywhere. He’d
look in only one place, which would be the place where you were hiding.
“How come your brother likes him so much?”
Medium Dave grimaced. Banjo had always done what he was told, simply
because Medium Dave had told him. Up to now, anyway.
It must have been that punch in the bar. Medium Dave didn’t like to think
about it. He’d always promised their mother that he’d look after Banjo,*
and Banjo had gone back like a falling tree. And when Medium Dave had
risen from his seat to punch Teatime’s unbalanced lights out he’d
suddenly found the Assassin already behind him, holding a knife. In front
of everyone. It was humiliating, that’s what it was—
And then Banjo had sat up, looking puzzled, and spat out a tooth—
“If it wasn’t for Banjo going around with him all the time we could gang
up on him,” said Catseye.
Medium Dave looked up, one hand clamping a handkerchief to his eye.
“Gang up on him?” he said.
“Yeah, it’s all your fault,” Chickenwire went on.
“Oh, yeah? So it wasn’t you who said, wow, ten thousand dollars, count me
in?”
Chickenwire backed away. “I didn’t know there was going to be all this
creepy stuff! I want to go home!”
Medium Dave hesitated, despite his pain and rage. This wasn’t normal talk
for Chickenwire, for all that he whined and grumbled. This was a strange
place, no lie about that, and all that business with the teeth had been
very…odd, but he’d been out with Chickenwire when jobs had gone wrong and
both the Watch and the Thieves’ Guild had been after them and he’d been
as cool as anyone. And if the Guild had been the ones to catch them
they’d have nailed their ears to their ankles and thrown them in the
river. In Medium Dave’s book, which was a simple book and largely written
in mental crayon, things didn’t get creepier than that.
“What’s up with you?” he said. “All of you—you’re acting like little
kids!”
“Would he deliver to apes earlier than humans?”
“Interesting point, sir. Possibly you’re referring to my theory that
humans may have in fact descended from apes, of course,” said Ponder. “A
bold hypothesis which ought to sweep away the ignorance of centuries if
the grants committee could just see their way clear to letting me hire a
boat and sail around to the islands of—”
“I just thought he might deliver alphabetically,” said Ridcully.
There was a patter of soot in the cold fireplace.
“That’s presumably him now, do you think?” Ridcully went on. “Oh, well, I
thought we should check—”
Something landed in the ashes. The two wizards stood quietly in the
darkness while the figure picked itself up. There was a rustle of paper.
LET ME SEE NOW—
There was a click as Ridcully’s pipe fell out of his mouth.
“Who the hell are you?” he said. “Mr. Stibbons, light a candle!”
Death backed away.
I’M THE HOGFATHER, OF COURSE. ER. HO. HO. HO. WHO WOULD YOU EXPECT TO
COME DOWN A CHIMNEY ON A NIGHT LIKE THIS, MAY I ASK?
“No, you’re not!”
I AM. LOOK, I’VE GOT THE BEARD AND THE PILLOW AND EVERYTHING!
“You look extremely thin in the face!”
I’M…I…I’M NOT WELL. IT’S ALL…YES, IT’S ALL THIS SHERRY. AND RUSHING
AROUND. I AM A BIT ILL.
“Terminally, I should say.” Ridcully grabbed the beard. There was a twang
as the string gave way.
“It’s a false beard!”
NO, IT’S NOT, said Death desperately.
“Here’s the hooks for the ears, which must have given you a bit of
trouble, I must say!”
Ridcully flourished the incriminating evidence.
“What were you doing coming down the chimney?” he continued. “Not in
marvelous taste, I think.”
Death waved a small grubby scrap of paper defensively.
OFFICIAL LETTER TO THE HOGFATHER. SAYS HERE…he began, and then looked at
the paper again. WELL, QUITE A LOT, IN FACT. IT’S A LONG LIST. LIBRARY
STAMPS, REFERENCE BOOKS, PENCILS, BANANAS…
“The Librarian asked the Hogfather for those things?” said Ridcully.
“Why?”
I DON’T KNOW, said Death. This was a diplomatic answer. He kept his
finger over a reference to the Archchancellor. The orangutan for “duck’s
bottom” was quite an interesting squiggle.
“I’ve got plenty in my desk drawer,” mused Ridcully. “I’m quite happy to
give them out to any chap provided he can prove he’s used up the old one.”
THEY MUST SHOW YOU AN ABSENCE OF PENCIL?
“Of course. If he needed essential materials he need only have come to me.
No man can tell you I’m an unreasonable chap.”
Death checked the list carefully.
THAT IS PRECISELY CORRECT, he confirmed, with anthropological exactitude.
“Except for the bananas, of course. I wouldn’t keep fish in my desk.”
Death looked down at the list and then back up at Ridcully.
GOOD? he said, in the hope that this was the right response.
Wizards know when they are going to die.* Ridcully had no such
premonitions, and to Ponder’s horror prodded Death in the cushion.
“Why you?” he said. “What’s happened to the other fellow?”
I SUPPOSE I MUST TELL YOU.
In the house of Death, a whisper of shifting sand and the faintest chink
of moving glass, somewhere in the darkness of the floor…
And, in the dry shadows, the sharp smell of snow and a thud of hooves.
Sideney almost swallowed his tongue when Teatime appeared beside him.
“Are we making progress?”
“Gnk—”
“I’m sorry?” said Teatime.
Sideney recovered himself. “Er…some,” he said. “We think we’ve worked
out…er…one lock.”
Light gleamed off Teatime’s eye.
“I believe there are seven of them?” said the Assassin.
“Yes, but…they’re half magic and half real and half not there…I
mean…there’s parts of them that don’t exist all the time—”
Mr. Brown, who had been working at one of the locks, laid down his pick.
“’t’s no good, mister,” he said. “Can’t even get a purchase with a
crowbar. Maybe if I went back to the city and got a couple of dragons we
could do something. You can melt through steel with them if you twist
their necks right and feed ’em carbon.”
“I was told you were the best locksmith in the city,” said Teatime.
Behind him, Banjo shifted position.
Mr. Brown looked annoyed…
“Well, yes,” he said. “But locks don’t generally alter ’emselves while
you’re working on ’em, that’s what I’m saying.”
“And I thought you could open any lock anyone ever made,” said Teatime.
“Made by humans,” said Mr. Brown sharply. “And most dwarfs. I dunno what
made these. You never said anything about magic.”
“That’s a shame,” said Teatime. “Then really I have no more need of your
services. You may as well go back home.”
“I won’t be sorry.” Mr. Brown started putting things back into his tool
bag. “What about my money?”
“Do I owe you any?”
“I came along with you. I don’t see it’s my fault that this is all magic
business. I should get something.”
“Ah, yes, I see your point,” said Teatime. “Of course, you should get
what you deserve. Banjo?”
Banjo lumbered forward, and then stopped.
Mr. Brown’s hand had come out of the bag holding a crowbar.
“You must think I was born yesterday, you slimy little bugger,” he said.
“I know your type. You think it’s all some kind of game. You make little
jokes to yourself and you think no one else notices and you think you’re
so smart. Well, Mr. Teacup, I’m leaving, right? Right now. With what’s
coming to me. And you ain’t stopping me. And Banjo certainly ain’t. I
knew old Ma Lilywhite back in the good old days. You think you’re nasty?
You think you’re mean? Ma Lilywhite’d tear your ears off and spit ’em in
your eye, you cocky little devil. And I worked with her, so you don’t
scare me and nor does little Banjo, poor sod that he is.”
Mr. Brown glared at each of them in turn, flourishing the crowbar.
Sideney cowered in front of the doors.
He saw Teatime nod gracefully, as if the man had made a small speech of
thanks.
“I appreciate your point of view,” said Teatime. “And, I have to repeat,
it’s Teh-ah-tim-eh. Now, please, Banjo.”
Banjo loomed over Mr. Brown, reached down and lifted him up by the
crowbar so sharply that his feet came out of his boots.
“Here, you know me, Banjo!” the locksmith croaked, struggling in midair.
“I remembers you when you was little, I used to sit you on my knee, I
often used to work for your ma—”
“D’you like apples?” Banjo rumbled.
Brown struggled.
“You got to say yes,” Banjo said.
“Yes!”
“D’you like pears? You got to say yes.”
“All right, yes!”
“D’you like falling down the stairs?”
Medium Dave held up his hands for quiet.
He glared at the gang.
“This place is getting to you, right? But we’ve all been in bad places
before, right?”
“Not this bad,” said Chickenwire. “I’ve never been anywhere where it
hurts to look at the sky. It give me the creeps.”
“Chick’s a little baby, nyer nyer nyer,” sang Catseye.
They looked at him. He coughed nervously.
“Sorry…don’t know why I said that…”
“If we stick together we’ll be fine—”
“Eeeny meeny miney mo…” mumbled Catseye.
“What? What are you talking about?”
“Sorry…it just sort of slipped out…”
“What I’m trying to say,” said Medium Dave, “is that if—”
“Peachy keeps making faces at me!”
“I didn’t!”
“Liar, liar, pants on fire!”
Two things happened at this point. Medium Dave lost his temper, and
Peachy screamed.
A small wisp of smoke was rising from his trousers.
He hopped around, beating desperately at himself.
“Who did that? Who did that?” demanded Medium Dave.
“I didn’t see anyone,” said Chickenwire. “I mean, no one was near him.
Catseye said ‘pants on fire’ and next minute—”
“Now he’s sucking his thumb!” Catseye jeered. “Nyer nyer nyer! Crying for
Mummy! You know what happens to kids who suck their thumbs, there’s this
big monster with scissors all—”
“Will you stop talking like that!” shouted Medium Dave. “Blimey, it is
like dealing with a bunch of—”
Someone screamed, high above. It went on for a while and seemed to be
getting nearer, but then it stopped and was replaced by a rush of
thumping and an occasional sound like a coconut being bounced on a stone
floor.
Medium Dave got to the door just in time to see the body of Mr. Brown the
locksmith tumble past, moving quite fast and not at all neatly. A moment
later his bag somersaulted around the curve of the stairs. It split as it
bounced and there was a jangle as tools and lock picks bounced out and
followed their late owner.
He’d been moving quite fast. He’d probably roll all the way to the bottom.
Medium Dave looked up. Two turns above him, on the opposite side of the
huge shaft, Banjo was watching him.
Banjo didn’t know right from wrong. He’d always left that sort of thing
to his brother.
“Er…poor guy must’ve slipped,” Medium Dave mumbled.
“Oh, yeah…slipped,” said Peachy.
He looked up, too.
It was funny. He hadn’t noticed them before. The white tower had seemed
to glow from within. But now there were shadows, moving across the stone.
In the stone.
“What was that?” he said. “That sound…”
“What sound?”
“It sounded…like knives scraping,” said Peachy. “Really close.”
“There’s only us here!” said Medium Dave. “What’re you afraid of? Attack
by daisies? Come on…let’s go and help him…”
She couldn’t walk through the door. It simply resisted any such effort.
She ended up merely bruised. So Susan turned the doorknob instead.
She heard the oh god gasp. But she was used to the idea of buildings that
were bigger on the inside. Her grandfather had never been able to get a
handle on dimensions.
The second thing the eye was drawn to were the staircases. They started
opposite one another in what was now a big round tower, its ceiling lost
in the haze. The spirals circled into infinity.
Susan’s eyes went back to the first thing.
It was a large conical heap in the middle of the floor.
It was white. It glistened in the cool light that shone down from the
mists.
“It’s teeth,” she said.
“I think I’m going to throw up,” said the oh god miserably.
“There’s nothing that scary about teeth,” said Susan. She didn’t mean it.
The heap was very horrible indeed.
“Did I say I was scared? I’m just hung over again…Oh, me…”
Susan advanced on the heap, moving warily.
They were small teeth. Children’s teeth. Whoever had piled them up hadn’t
been very careful about it, either. A few had been scattered across the
floor. She knew because she trod on one, and the slippery little
crunching sound made her desperate not to tread on any more.
Whoever had piled them up had presumably been the one who’d drawn the
chalk marks around the obscene heap.
“There’re so many,” whispered Bilious.
“At least twenty million, given the size of the average milk tooth,” said
Susan. She was shocked to find that it came almost automatically.
“How can you possibly know that?”
“Volume of a cone,” said Susan. “Pi times the square of the radius times
the height divided by three. I bet Miss Butts never thought it’d come in
handy in a place like this.”
“That’s amazing. You did it in your head?”
“This isn’t right,” said Susan quietly. “I don’t think this is what the
Tooth Fairy is all about. All that effort to get the teeth, and then just
to dump them like this? No. Anyway, there’s a cigarette end on the floor.
I don’t see the Tooth Fairy as someone who rolls her own.”
She stared down at the chalk marks.
Voices high above her made her look up. She thought she saw a head look
over the stair rail, and then draw back again. She didn’t see much of the
face, but what she saw didn’t look fairylike.
She glanced back at the circle of chalk around the teeth. Someone had
wanted all the teeth in one place and had drawn a circle to show people
where they had to go.
There were a few symbols scrawled around the circle.
She had a good memory for small details. It was another family trait. And
a small detail stirred in her memory like a sleepy bee.
“Oh, no,” she breathed. “Surely no one would try to—”
Someone shouted, someone up in the whiteness.
A body rolled down the stairs nearest her. It had been a skinny, middleaged
man. Technically it still was, but the long spiral staircase had not
been kind.
It tumbled across the white marble and slid to a boneless halt.
Then, as she hurried toward the body, it faded away, leaving nothing
behind but a smear of blood.
A jingle noise made her look back up the stairs. Spinning over and over,
making salmon leaps in the air, a crowbar bounded over the last dozen
steps and landed point first on a flagstone, staying upright and
vibrating.
Chickenwire reached the top of the stairs, panting.
“There’s people down there, Mister Teatime!” he wheezed. “Dave and the
others’ve gone down to catch them, Mister Teatime!”
“Teh-ah-tim-eh,” said Teatime, without taking his eyes off the wizard.
“That’s right, sir!”
“Well?” said Teatime. “Just…do away with them.”
“Er…one of them’s a girl, sir.”
Teatime still didn’t look round. He waved a hand vaguely.
“Then do away with them politely.”
“Yes, Mister…yes, right…” Chickenwire coughed. “Don’t you want to find
out why they’re here, sir?”
“Good heavens, no. Why should I want to do that? Now go away.”
Chickenwire stood there for a moment, and then hurried off.
As he scurried down the stairs he thought he heard a creak, as of an
ancient wooden door.
He went pale.
It was just a door, said the sensible bit in front of his brain. There
were hundreds of them in this place, although, come to think of it, none
of them had creaked.
The other bit, the bit that hung around in dark places nearly at the top
of his spinal column, said: But it’s not one of them, and you know it,
because you know which door it really is…
He hadn’t heard that creak for thirty years.
He gave a little yelp and started to take the stairs four at a time.
In the hollows and corners, the shadows grew darker.
Susan ran up a flight of stairs, dragging the oh god behind her.
“Do you know what they’ve been doing?” she said. “You know why they’ve
got all those teeth in a circle? The power…oh, my…”
“I’m not going to,” said the head waiter, firmly.
“Look, I’ll buy you a better pair after Hogswatch—”
“There’s two more Shoe Pastry, one for Purée de la Terre and three more
Tourte à la Boue,” said a waiter, hurrying in.
“Mud pies!” moaned the waiter. “I can’t believe we’re selling mud pies.
And now you want my boots!”
“With cream and sugar, mind you. A real taste of Ankh-Morpork. And we can
get at least four helpings off those boots. Fair’s fair. We’re all in our
socks—”
“Table seven says the steaks were lovely but a bit tough,” said a waiter,
rushing past.
“Right. Use a larger hammer next time and boil them for longer.” The
manager turned back to the suffering head waiter. “Look, Bill,” he said,
taking him by the shoulder. “This isn’t food. No one expects it to be
food. If people wanted food they’d stay at home, isn’t that so? They come
here for ambiance. For the experience. This isn’t cookery, Bill. This is
cuisine. See? And they’re coming back for more.”
“Yeah, but old boots…”
“Dwarfs eat rats,” said the manager. “And trolls eat rocks. There’s folks
in Howondaland that eat insects and folks on the Counterweight Continent
eat soup made out of bird spit. At least the boots have been on a cow.”
“And mud?” said the head waiter, gloomily.
“Isn’t there an old proverb that says a man must eat a bushel of dirt
before he dies?”
“Yes, but not all at once.”
“Bill?” said the manager, kindly, picking up a spatula.
“Yes, boss?”
“Get those damn boots off right now, will you?”
When Chickenwire reached the bottom of the tower he was trembling, and
not just from the effort. He headed straight for the door until Medium
Dave grabbed him.
“Let me out! It’s after me!”
“Look at his face,” said Catseye. “Looks like he’s seen a ghost!”
“Yeah, well, it ain’t a ghost,” muttered Chickenwire. “It’s worse’n a
ghost—”
Medium Dave slapped him across the face.
“Pull yourself together! Look around! Nothing’s chasing you! Anyway, it’s
not as though we couldn’t put up a fight, right?”
Terror had had time to drain away a little. Chickenwire looked back up
the stairs. There was nothing there.
“Good,” said Medium Dave, watching his face. “Now…What happened?”
Chickenwire looked at his feet.
“I thought it was the wardrobe,” he muttered. “Go on, laugh…”
They didn’t laugh.
“What wardrobe?” said Catseye.
“Oh, when I was a kid…” Chickenwire waved his arms vaguely. “We had this
big ole wardrobe, if you must know. Oak. It had this…this…on the door
there was this…sort of…face.” He looked at their faces, which were
equally wooden. “I mean, not an actual face, there was…all
this…decoration round the keyhole, sort of flowers and leaves and stuff,
but if you looked at it in the…right way…it was a face and they put it in
my room ’cos it was so big and in the night…in the night…in the night—”
They were grown men or at least had lived for several decades, which in
some societies is considered the same thing. But you had to stare at a
man so creased up with dread.
“Yes?” said Catseye hoarsely.
“…it whispered things,” said Chickenwire, in a quiet little voice, like a
vole in a dungeon.
They looked at one another.
“What things?” said Medium Dave.
“I don’t know! I always had my head under the pillow! Anyway, it’s just
something from when I was a kid, all right? Our dad got rid of it in the
finish. Burned it. And I watched.”
They mentally shook themselves, as people do when their minds emerge back
into the light.
“It’s like me and the dark,” said Catseye.
“Oh, don’t you start,” said Medium Dave. “Anyway, you ain’t afraid of the
dark. You’re famed for it. I been working with you in all kinds of
cellars and stuff. I mean, that’s how you got your name. Catseye. Sees
like a cat.”
“Yeah, well…you try an’ make up for it, don’t you?” said Catseye. “’Cos
when you’re grown you know it’s just shadows and stuff. Besides, it ain’t
like the dark we used to have in the cellar.”
“Oh, they had a special kind of a dark when you was a lad, did they?”
said Medium Dave. “Not like the kind of dark you get these days, eh?”
Sarcasm didn’t work.
“No,” said Catseye, simply. “It wasn’t. In our cellar, it wasn’t.”
“Our mam used to wallop us if we went down to the cellar,” said Medium
Dave. “She had her still down there.”
“Yeah?” said Catseye, from somewhere far off. “Well, our dad used to
wallop us if we tried to get out. Now shut up talking about it.”
They reached the bottom of the stairs.
There was an absence of anybody. And any body.
“He couldn’t have survived that, could he?” said Medium Dave.
“I saw him as he went past,” said Catseye. “Necks aren’t supposed to bend
that way—”
He squinted upward.
“Who’s that moving up there?”
“How are their necks moving?” quavered Chickenwire.
“Split up!” said Medium Dave. “And this time all take a stairway. Then
they can’t come back down!”
“Who’re they? Why’re they here?”
“Why’re we here?” said Peachy. He started, and looked behind him.
“Taking our money? After us putting up with him?”
“Yeah…” said Peachy distantly, trailing after the others.
“Er…did you hear that noise just then?”
“What noise?”
“A sort of clipping, snipping…?”
“No.”
“No.”
“No. You must have imagined it.”
Peachy nodded miserably.
As he walked up the stairs, little shadows raced through the stone and
followed his feet.
Susan darted off the stairs and dragged the oh god along a corridor lined
with white doors.
“I think they saw us,” she said. “And if they’re tooth fairies there’s
been a really stupid equal opportunities policy…”
She pushed open a door.
There were no windows to the room, but it was lit perfectly well by the
walls themselves. Down the middle of the room was something like a
display case, its lid gaping open. Bits of card littered the floor.
She reached down and picked one up and read: “Thomas Ague, aged 4 and
nearly three quarters, 9 Castle View, Sto Lat.” The writing was in a
meticulous rounded script.
She crossed the passage to another room, where there was the same scene
of devastation.
“So now we know where the teeth were,” she said. “They must’ve taken them
out of everywhere and carried them downstairs.”
“What for?”
She sighed. “It’s such old magic it isn’t even magic any more,” she said.
“If you’ve got a piece of someone’s hair, or a nail clipping, or a tooth—
you can control them.”
The oh god tried to focus.
“That heap’s controlling millions of children?”
“Yes. Adults, too, by now.”
“And you…you could make them think things and do things?”
She nodded. “Yes.”
“You could get them to open Dad’s wallet and post the contents to some
address?”
“Well, I hadn’t thought of that, but yes, I suppose you could…”
“Or go downstairs and smash all the bottles in the drinks cabinet and
promise never to take a drink when they grow up?” said the oh god
hopefully.
“What are you talking about?”
“It’s all right for you. You don’t wake up every morning and see your
whole life flush before your eyes.”
Medium Dave and Catseye ran down the passage and stopped where it forked.
“You go that way, I’ll—”
“Why don’t we stick together?” said Catseye.
“What’s got into everyone? I saw you bite the throats out of a coupla
guard dogs when we did that job in Quirm! Want me to hold your hand? You
check the doors down there, I’ll check them along here.”
He walked off.
Catseye peered down the other passage.
There weren’t many doors down there. It wasn’t very long. And, as Teatime
had said, there was nothing dangerous here that they hadn’t brought with
them.
He heard voices coming from a doorway and sagged with relief.
He could deal with humans.
As he approached, a sound made him look round.
Shadows were racing down the passage behind him. They cascaded down the
walls and flowed over the ceiling.
Where shadows met they became darker. And darker.
And rose. And leapt.
“What was that?” said Susan.
“Sounded like the start of a scream,” said Bilious.
Susan threw open the door.
There was no one outside.
There was movement, though. She saw a patch of darkness in the corner of
a wall shrink and fade, and another shadow slid around the bend of the
corridor.
And there was a pair of boots in the center of the corridor.
She hadn’t remembered any boots there before.
She sniffed. The air tasted of rats, and damp, and mold.
“Let’s get out of here,” she said.
“How’re we going to find this Violet in all these rooms?”
“I don’t know. I should be able to…sense her, but I can’t.” Susan peered
around the end of the corridor. She could hear men shouting, some way off.
They slipped out onto the stairs again and managed another flight. There
were more rooms here, and in each one a cabinet that had been broken open.
Shadows moved in the corners. The effect was as though some invisible
light source was gently shifting.
“This reminds me a lot of your…um…of your grandfather’s place,” said the
oh god.
“I know,” said Susan. “There aren’t any rules except the ones he makes up
as he goes along. I can’t see him being very happy if someone got in and
started pulling the library apart—”
She stopped. When she spoke again her voice had a different tone.
“This is a children’s place,” she said. “The rules are what children
believe.”
“Well, that’s a relief.”
“You think so? Things aren’t going to be right. In the Soul Cake Duck’s
country ducks can lay chocolate eggs, in the same way that Death’s
country is black and somber because that’s what people believe. He’s very
conventional about that sort of thing. Skull and bone decorations all
over the place. And this place—”
“Pretty flowers and an odd sky.”
“I think it’s going to be a lot worse than that. And very odd, too.”
“More odd than it is now?”
“I don’t think it’s possible to die here.”
“That man who fell down the stairs looked pretty dead to me.”
“Oh, you die. But not here. You…let’s see…yes…you go somewhere else. Away.
You’re just not seen any more. That’s about all you understand when
you’re three. Grandfather said it wasn’t like that fifty years ago. He
said you often couldn’t see the bed for everyone having a good cry. Now
they just tell the child that Grandma’s gone. For three weeks Twyla
thought her uncle’d been buried in the sad patch behind the garden shed
along with Buster and Meepo and all three Bulgies.”
“Three Bulgies?”
“Gerbils. They tend to die a lot,” said Susan. “The trick is to replace
them when she’s not looking. You really don’t know anything, do you?”
“Er…hello?”
The voice came from the corridor.
They worked their way round to the next room.
There, sitting on the floor and tied to the leg of a white display case,
was Violet. She looked up in apprehension, and then in bewilderment, and
finally in growing recognition.
“Aren’t you—?”
“Yes, yes, we see each other sometimes in Biers, and when you came for
Twyla’s last tooth you were so shocked that I could see you I had to give
you a drink to get your nerves back,” said Susan, fumbling with the ropes.
“I don’t think we’ve got a lot of time.”
“And who’s he?”
The oh god tried to push his lank hair into place.
“Oh, he’s just a god,” said Susan. “His name’s Bilious.”
“Do you drink at all?” said the oh god.
“What sort of quest—”
“He needs to know before he decides whether he hates you or not,” said
Susan. “It’s a god thing.”
“No, I don’t,” said Violet. “What an idea. I’ve got the blue ribbon!”
The oh god raised his eyebrows at Susan.
“That means she’s a member of Offler’s League of Temperance,” said Susan.
“They sign a pledge not to touch alcohol. I can’t think why. Of course,
Offler’s a crocodile. They don’t go in bars much. They’re into water.”
“Not touch alcohol at all?” said the oh god.
“Never!” said Violet. “My dad’s very strict about that sort of thing!”
After a moment Susan felt forced to wave a hand across their locked gaze.
“Can we get on?” she said. “Good. Who brought you here, Violet?”
“I don’t know! I was doing the collection as usual, and then I thought I
heard someone following me, and then it all went dark, and when I came to
we were…Have you seen what it’s like outside?”
“Yes.”
“Well, we were there. The big one was carrying me. The one they call
Banjo. He’s not bad, just a bit…odd. Sort of…slow. He just watches me.
The others are thugs. Watch out for the one with the glass eye. They’re
all afraid of him. Except Banjo.”
“Glass eye?”
“He’s dressed like an Assassin. He’s called Teatime. I think they’re
trying to steal something…They spent ages carting the teeth out. Little
teeth everywhere…It was horrible! Thank you,” she added to the oh god,
who had helped her onto her feet.
“They’ve piled them up in a magic circle downstairs,” said Susan.
Violet’s eyes and mouth formed three Os. It was like looking at a pink
bowling ball.
“What for?”
“I think they’re using them to control the children. By magic.”
Violet’s mouth opened wider.
“That’s horrid.”
Horrible, thought Susan. The word is “horrible.” “Horrid” is a childish
word selected to impress nearby males with one’s fragility, if I’m any
judge. She knew it was unkind and counter-productive of her to think like
that. She also knew it was probably an accurate observation, which only
made it worse.
“Yes,” she said.
“There was a wizard! He’s got a pointy hat!”
“I think we should get her out of here,” said the oh god, in a tone of
voice that Susan considered was altogether too dramatic.
“Good idea,” she conceded. “Let’s go.”
Catseye’s boots had snapped their laces. It was as if he’d been pulled
upward so fast they simply couldn’t keep up.
That worried Medium Dave. So did the smell. There was no smell at all in
the rest of the tower, but just here there was a lingering odor of
mushrooms.
His forehead wrinkled. Medium Dave was a thief and a murderer and
therefore had a highly developed moral sense. He preferred not to steal
from poor people, and not only because they never had anything worth
stealing. If it was necessary to hurt anyone, he tried to leave wounds
that would heal. And when in the course of his activities he had to kill
people, then he made some effort to see that they did not suffer much or
at least made as few noises as possible.
This whole business was getting on his nerves. Usually, he didn’t even
notice that he had any. There was a wrongness to everything that grated
on his bones.
And a pair of boots was all that remained of old Catseye.
He drew his sword.
Above him, the creeping shadows moved and flowed away.
Susan edged up to the entrance to the stairways and peered around into
the point of a crossbow.
“Now, all of you step out where I can see you,” said Peachy
conversationally. “And don’t touch that sword, lady. You’ll probably hurt
yourself.”
Susan tried to make herself unseen, and failed. Usually it was so easy to
do that that it happened automatically, usually with embarrassing results.
She could be idly reading a book while people searched the room for her.
But here, despite every effort, she seemed to remain obstinately visible.
“You don’t own this place,” she said, stepping back.
“No, but you see this crossbow? I own this crossbow. So you just walk
ahead of me, right, and we’ll all go and see Mister Teatime.”
“Excuse me, I just want to check something,” said Bilious. To Susan’s
amazement he leaned over and touched the point of the arrow.
“Here! What did you do that for?” said Peachy, stepping back.
“I felt it, but of course a certain amount of pain sensation would be
part of normal sensory response,” said the oh god. “I warn you, there’s a
very good chance that I might be immortal.”
“Yes, but we probably aren’t,” said Susan.
“Immortal, eh?” said Peachy. “So if I was to shoot you inna head, you
wouldn’t die?”
“I suppose when you put it like that…I do know I feel pain…”
“Right. You just keep moving, then.”
“When something happens,” said Susan, out of the corner of her mouth,
“you two try to get downstairs and out, all right? If the worst comes to
the worst, the horse will take you out of here.”
“If something happens,” whispered the oh god.
“When,” said Susan.
Behind them, Peachy looked around. He knew he’d feel a lot better when
any of the others turned up. It was almost a relief to have prisoners.
Out of the corner of her eye Susan saw something move on the stairs on
the opposite side of the shaft. For a moment she thought she saw several
flashes like metal blades catching the light.
She heard a gasp behind her.
The man with the crossbow was standing very still and staring at the
opposite stairs.
“Oh, noooo,” he said, under his breath.
“What is it?” said Susan.
He stared at her. “You can see it, too?”
“The thing like a lot of blades clicking together?” said Susan.
“Oh, noooo…”
“It was only there for a moment,” said Susan. “It’s gone now,” she said.
“Somewhere else,” she added.
“It’s the Scissor Man…”
“Who’s he?” said the oh god.
“No one!” snapped Peachy, trying to pull himself together. “There’s no
such thing as the Scissor Man, all right?”
“Ah…yes. When you were little, did you suck your thumb?” said Susan.
“Because the only Scissor Man I know is the one people used to frighten
children with. They said he’d turn up and—”
“Shutupshutupshutup!” said Peachy, prodding her with the crossbow. “Kids
believe all kinds of crap! But I’m grown up now, right, and I can open
beer bottles with other people’s teeth an—oh, gods…”
Susan heard the snip, snip. It sounded very close now.
Peachy had his eyes shut.
“Is there anything behind me?” he quavered.
Susan pushed the others aside and waved frantically toward the bottom of
the stairs.
“No,” she said, as they hurried away.
“Is there anything standing on the stairs at all?”
“No.”
“Right! If you see that one-eyed bastard you tell him he can keep the
money!”
He turned and ran.
When Susan turned to go up the stairs the Scissor Man was there.
It wasn’t man-shaped. It was something like an ostrich, and something
like a lizard on its hind legs, but almost entirely like something made
out of blades. Every time it moved a thousand blades went snip, snip.
Its long silver neck curved and a head made of shears stared down at her.
“You’re not looking for me,” she said. “You’re not my nightmare.”
The blades tilted this way and that. The Scissor Man was trying to think.
“I remember you came for Twyla,” said Susan, stepping forward. “That damn
governess had told her what happens to little girls who suck their thumbs,
remember? Remember the poker? I bet you needed a hell of a lot of
sharpening afterward…”
The creature lowered its head, stepped carefully around her in as polite
a way as it could manage, and clanked on down the stairs after Peachy.
Susan ran on toward the top of the tower.
Sideney put a green filter over his lantern and pressed down with a small
silver rod that had an emerald set on its tip. A piece of the lock moved.
There was a whirring from inside the door and something went click.
He sagged with relief. It is said that the prospect of hanging
concentrates the mind wonderfully, but it was Valium compared to being
watched by Mister Teatime.
“I, er, think that’s the third lock,” he said. “Green light is what opens
it. I remember the fabulous lock of the Hall of Murgle, which could only
be opened by the Hubward wind, although that was—”
“I commend your expertise,” said Teatime. “And the other four?”
Sideney looked up nervously at the silent bulk of Banjo, and licked his
lips.
“Well, of course, if I’m right, and the locks depend on certain
conditions, well, we could be here for years…” he ventured. “Supposing
they can only be opened by, say, a small blond child holding a mouse? On
a Tuesday? In the rain?”
“You can find out what the nature of the spell is?” said Teatime.
“Yes, yes, of course, yes.” Sideney waved his hands urgently. “That’s how
I worked out this one. Reverse thaumaturgy, yes, certainly. Er. In time.”
“We have lots of time,” said Teatime.
“Perhaps a little more time than that,” Sideney quavered. “The processes
are very, very, very…difficult.”
“Oh dear. If it’s too much for you, you’ve only got to say,” said Teatime.
“No!” Sideney yipped, and then managed to get some self-control. “No. No.
No, I can…I’m sure I shall work them out soon—”
“Jolly good,” said Teatime.
The student wizard looked down. A wisp of vapor oozed from the crack
between the doors.
“Do you know what’s in here, Mister Teatime?”
“No.”
“Ah. Right.” Sideney stared mournfully at the fourth lock. It was amazing
how much you remembered when someone like Teatime was around.
He gave him a nervous look. “There’s not going to be any more violent
deaths, are there?” he said. “I just can’t stand the sight of violent
deaths!”
Teatime put a comforting arm around his shoulders. “Don’t worry,” he said.
“I’m on your side. A violent death is the last thing that’ll happen to
you.”
“Mister Teatime?”
He turned. Medium Dave stepped onto the landing.
“Someone else is in the tower,” he said. “They’ve got Catseye. I don’t
know how. I’ve got Peachy watching the stairs and I ain’t sure where
Chickenwire is.”
Teatime looked back to Sideney, who started prodding at the fourth lock
again in a feverish attempt not to die.
“Why are you telling me? I thought I was paying you big strong men a lot
of money to deal with this sort of thing.”
Medium Dave’s lips framed some words, but when he spoke he said, “All
right, but what are we up against here? Eh? Old Man Trouble or the
bogeyman or what?”
Teatime sighed.
“Some of the Tooth Fairy’s employees, I assume,” he said.
“Not if they’re like the ones that were here,” said Medium Dave. “They
were just civilians. It looks like the ground opened and swallowed
Catseye up.” He thought about this. “I mean the ceiling,” he corrected
himself. A horrible image had just passed across his under-used
imagination.
Teatime walked across to the stairwell and looked down. Far below, the
pile of teeth looked like a white circle.
“And the girl’s gone,” said Medium Dave.
“Really? I thought I said she should be killed.”
Medium Dave hesitated. The boys had been brought up by Ma Lilywhite to be
respectful to women as delicate and fragile creatures, and were soundly
thrashed if disrespectful tendencies were perceived by Ma’s incredibly
sensitive radar. And it was truly incredibly sensitive. Ma could hear
what you were doing three rooms away, a terrible thing for a growing lad.
That sort of thing leaves a mark. Ma Lilywhite certainly could. As for
the others, they had no objections in practice to the disposal of anyone
who got between them and large sums of money, but there was a general
unspoken resentment at being told by Teatime to kill someone just because
he had no further use for them. It wasn’t that it was unprofessional.
Only Assassins thought like that. It was just that there were things you
did do, and things you didn’t do. And this was one of the things you
didn’t do.
“We thought…well, you never know…”
“She wasn’t necessary,” said Teatime. “Few people are.”
Sideney thumbed hurriedly through his notebooks.
“Anyway, the place is a maze—” Medium Dave said.
“Sadly, this is so,” said Teatime. “But I am sure they will be able to
find us. It’s probably too much to hope that they intend something
heroic.”
Violet and the oh god hurried down the stairs.
“Do you know how to get back?” said Violet.
“Don’t you?”
“I think there’s a…a kind of soft place. If you walk at it knowing it’s
there you go through.”
“You know where it is?”
“No! I’ve never been here before! They had a bag on my head when we came!
All I ever did was take the teeth from under the pillows!” Violet started
to sob. “You just get this list and about five minutes’ training and they
even dock you ten pence a week for the ladder and I know I made that
mistake with little William Rubin but they should of said, you’re
supposed to take any teeth you—”
“Er…mistake?” said Bilious, trying to get her to hurry.
“Just because he slept with his head under the pillow but they give you
the pliers anyway and no one told me that you shouldn’t—”
She certainly did have a pleasant voice, Bilious told himself. It was
just that in a funny way it grated, too. It was like listening to a
talking flute.
“I think we’d just better get outside,” he said. “In case they hear us,”
he hinted.
“What sort of godding do you do?” said Violet.
“Er…oh, I…this and that…I…er…” Bilious tried to think through the
pounding headache. And then he had one of those ideas, the kind that only
sound good after a lot of alcohol. Someone else may have drunk the drinks,
but he managed to snag the idea.
“I’m actually self-employed,” he said, as brightly as he could manage.
“How can you be a self-employed god?”
“Ah, well, you see, if any other god wants, perhaps, you know, a holiday
or something, I cover for them. Yes. That’s what I do.”
Unwisely, in the circumstances, he let his inventiveness impress him.
“Oh, yes. I’m very busy. Rushed off my feet. They’re always employing me.
You’ve no idea. They don’t think twice about pushing off for a month as a
big white bull or a swan or something and it’s always, ‘Oh, Bilious, old
chap, just take care of things while I’m away, will you? Answer the
prayers and so on.’ I hardly get a minute to myself but of course you
can’t turn down work these days.”
Violet was round-eyed with fascination.
“And are you covering for anyone right now?” she asked.
“Um, yes…the God of Hangovers, actually…”
“A God of Hangovers? How awful!”
Bilious looked down at his stained and wretched toga.
“I suppose it is…” he mumbled.
“You’re not very good at it.”
“You don’t have to tell me.”
“You’re more cut out to be one of the important gods,” said Violet,
admiringly. “I can just see you as Io or Fate or one of those.”
Bilious stared at her with his mouth open.
“I could tell at once you weren’t right,” she went on. “Not for some
horrible little god. You could even be Offler with calves like yours.”
“Could I? I mean…oh, yes. Sometimes. Of course, I have to wear fangs—”
And then someone was holding a sword to his throat.
“What’s this?” said Chickenwire. “Lover’s Lane?”
“You leave him alone, you!” shouted Violet. “He’s a god! You’ll be really
sorry!”
Bilious swallowed, but very gently. It was a sharp sword.
“A god, eh?” said Chickenwire. “What of?”
Bilious tried to swallow again.
“Oh, bit o’ this, bit o’ that,” he mumbled.
“Cor,” said Chickenwire. “Well, I’m impressed. I can see I’m going to
have to be dead careful here, eh? Don’t want you smiting me with
thunderbolts, do I? Puts a crimp in the day, that sort of thing—”
Bilious didn’t dare move his head. But out of the corner of his eye he
was sure he could see shadows moving very fast across the walls.
“Dear me, out of thunderbolts, are we?” Chickenwire sneered. “Well,
y’know, I’ve never—”
There was a creak.
Chickenwire’s face was a few inches from Bilious. The oh god saw his
expression change.
The man’s eyes rolled. His lips said “…nur…”
Bilious risked stepping back. Chickenwire’s sword didn’t move. He stood
there, trembling slightly, like a man who wants to turn round to see
what’s behind him but doesn’t dare to in case he does.
As far as Bilious was concerned, it had just been a creak.
He looked up at the thing on the landing above.
“Who put that there?” said Violet.
It was just a wardrobe. Dark oak, a bit of fancy woodwork glued on in an
effort to disguise the undisguisable fact that it was just an upright box.
It was a wardrobe.
“You didn’t, you know, try to cast a thunderbolt and go on a few letters
too many?” she went on.
“Huh?” said Bilious, looking from the stricken man to the wardrobe. It
was so ordinary it was…odd.
“I mean, thunderbolts begin with T and wardrobes…”
Violet’s lips moved silently. Part of Bilious thought: I’m attracted to a
girl who actually has to shut down all other brain functions in order to
think about the order of the letters of the alphabet. On the other hand,
she’s attracted to someone who’s wearing a toga that looks as though a
family of weasels have had a party in it, so maybe I’ll stop this thought
right here.
But the major part of his brain thought: why’s this man making little
bubbling noises? It’s just a wardrobe, for my sake!
“No, no,” mumbled Chickenwire. “I don’t wanna!”
The sword clanged on the floor.
He took a step backward up the stairs, but very slowly, as if he was
doing it despite every effort his muscles could muster.
“Don’t want to what?” said Violet.
Chickenwire spun round. Bilious had never seen that happen before. People
turned round quickly, yes, but Chickenwire just revolved as if some giant
hand had been placed on his head and twisted a hundred and eighty degrees.
“No. No. No,” Chickenwire whined. “No.”
He tottered up the steps.
“You got to help me,” he whispered.
“What’s the matter?” said Bilious. “It’s just a wardrobe, isn’t it? It’s
for putting all your old clothes in so that there’s no room for your new
clothes.”
The doors of the wardrobe swung open.
Chickenwire managed to thrust out his arms and grab the sides and, for a
moment, he stood quite still.
Then he was pulled into the wardrobe in one sudden movement and the doors
slammed shut.
The little brass key turned in the lock with a click.
“We ought to get him out,” said the oh god, running up the steps.
“Why?” Violet demanded. “They are not very nice people! I know that one.
When he brought me food he made…suggestive comments.”
“Yes, but…” Bilious hadn’t ever seen a face like that, outside of a
mirror. Chickenwire had looked very, very sick.
He turned the key and opened the doors.
“Oh dear…”
“I don’t want to see! I don’t want to see!” said Violet, looking over his
shoulder.
Bilious reached down and picked up a pair of boots that stood neatly in
the middle of the wardrobe’s floor.
Then he put them back carefully and walked around the wardrobe. It was
plywood. The words “Dratley and Sons, Phedre Road, Ankh-Morpork” were
stamped in one corner in faded ink.
“Is it magic?” said Violet nervously.
“I don’t know if something magic has the maker’s name on it,” said
Bilious.
“There are magic wardrobes,” said Violet nervously. “If you go into them,
you come out in a magic land.”
Bilious looked at the boots again.
“Um…yes,” he said.
I THINK I MUST TELL YOU SOMETHING, said Death.
“Yes, I think you should,” said Ridcully. “I’ve got little devils running
round the place eating socks and pencils, earlier tonight we sobered up
someone who thinks he’s a God of Hangovers and half my wizards are trying
to cheer up the Cheerful Fairy. We thought something must’ve happened to
the Hogfather. We were right, right?”
“Hex was right, Archchancellor,” Ponder corrected him.
HEX? WHAT IS HEX?
“Er…Hex thinks—that is, calculates—that there’s been a big change in the
nature of belief today,” said Ponder. He felt, he did not know why, that
Death was probably not in favor of unliving things that thought.
MR. HEX WAS REMARKABLY ASTUTE. THE HOGFATHER HAS BEEN…Death paused. THERE
IS NO SENSIBLE HUMAN WORD. DEAD, IN A WAY, BUT NOT EXACTLY…A GOD CANNOT
BE KILLED. NEVER COMPLETELY KILLED. HE HAS BEEN, SHALL WE SAY, SEVERELY
REDUCED.
“Ye gods!” said Ridcully. “Who’d want to kill off the old boy?”
HE HAS ENEMIES.
“What did he do? Miss a chimney?”
EVERY LIVING THING HAS ENEMIES.
“What, everything?”
YES. EVERYTHING. POWERFUL ENEMIES. BUT THEY HAVE GONE TOO FAR THIS TIME.
NOW THEY ARE USING PEOPLE.
“Who are?”
THOSE WHO THINK THE UNIVERSE SHOULD BE A LOT OF ROCKS MOVING IN CURVES.
HAVE YOU EVER HEARD OF THE AUDITORS?
“I suppose the Bursar may have done—”
NOT AUDITORS OF MONEY. AUDITORS OF REALITY. THEY THINK OF LIFE AS A STAIN
ON THE UNIVERSE. A PESTILENCE. MESSY. GETTING IN THE WAY.
“In the way of what?”
THE EFFICIENT RUNNING OF THE UNIVERSE.
“I thought it was run for us…Well, for the Professor of Applied
Anthropics, actually, but we’re allowed to tag along,” said Ridcully. He
scratched his chin. “And I could certainly run a marvelous university
here if only we didn’t have to have these damn students underfoot all the
time.”
QUITE SO.
“They want to get rid of us?”
THEY WANT YOU TO BE…LESS…DAMN, I’VE FORGOTTEN THE WORD. UNTRUTHFUL? THE
HOGFATHER IS A SYMBOL OF THIS…Death snapped his fingers, causing echoes
to bounce off the walls, and added, WISTFUL LYING?
“Untruthful?” said Ridcully. “Me? I’m as honest as the day is long! Yes,
what is it this time?”
Ponder had tugged at his robe and now he whispered something in his ear.
Ridcully cleared his throat.
“I am reminded that this is in fact the shortest day of the year,” he
said. “However, this does not undermine the point that I just made,
although I thank my colleague for his invaluable support and constant
readiness to correct minor if not downright trivial errors. I am a
remarkably truthful man, sir. Things said at University council meetings
don’t count.”
I MEAN HUMANITY IN GENERAL. ER…THE ACT OF TELLING THE UNIVERSE IT IS
OTHER THAN IT IS?
“You’ve got me there,” said Ridcully. “Anyway, why’re you doing the job?”
SOMEONE MUST. IT IS VITALLY IMPORTANT. THEY MUST BE SEEN, AND BELIEVED.
BEFORE DAWN, THERE MUST BE ENOUGH BELIEF IN THE HOGFATHER.
“Why?” said Ridcully.
SO THAT THE SUN WILL COME UP.
The two wizards gawped at him.
I SELDOM JOKE, said Death.
At which point there was a scream of horror.
“That sounded like the Bursar,” said Ridcully. “And he’s been doing so
well up to now.”
The reason for the Bursar’s scream lay on the floor of his bedroom.
It was a man. He was dead. No one alive had that kind of expression.
Some of the other wizards had got there first. Ridcully pushed his way
through the crowd.
“Ye gods,” he said. “What a face! He looks as though he died of fright!
What happened?”
“Well,” said the Dean, “as far as I can tell, the Bursar opened his
wardrobe and found the man inside.”
“Really? I wouldn’t have said the poor old Bursar was all that
frightening.”
“No, Archchancellor. The corpse fell out on him.”
The Bursar was standing in the corner, wearing his old familiar
expression of good-humored concussion.
“You all right, old fellow?” said Ridcully. “What’s eleven percent of
1,276?”
“One hundred and forty point three six,” said the Bursar promptly.
“Ah, right as rain,” said Ridcully cheerfully.
“I don’t see why,” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies. “Just because he
can do things with numbers doesn’t mean everything else is fine.”
“Doesn’t need to be,” said Ridcully. “Numbers is what he has to do. The
poor chap might be slightly yo-yo, but I’ve been reading about it. He’s
one of these idiot servants.”
“Savants,” said the Dean patiently. “The word is savants, Ridcully.”
“Whatever. Those chaps who can tell you what day of the week the first of
Grune was a hundred years ago—”
“—Tuesday—” said the Bursar.
“—but can’t tie their boot laces,” said Ridcully. “What was a corpse
doing in his wardrobe? And no one is to say ‘Not a lot,’ or anythin’
tasteless like that. Haven’t had a corpse in a wardrobe since that
business with Archchancellor Buckleby.”
“We all warned Buckleby that the lock was too stiff,” said the Dean.
“Just out of interest, why was the Bursar fiddling with his wardrobe at
this time of night?” said Ridcully.
The wizards looked sheepish.
“We were…playing Sardines, Archchancellor,” said the Dean.
“What’s that?”
“It’s like Hide and Seek, but when you find someone you have to squeeze
in with them,” said the Dean.
“I just want to be clear about this,” said Ridcully. “My senior wizards
have spent the evening playing Hide and Seek?”
“Oh, not the whole evening,” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies. “We
played Grandmother’s Footsteps and I Spy for quite a while until the
Senior Wrangler made a scene just because we wouldn’t let him spell
chandelier with an S.”
“Party games? You fellows?”
The Dean sidled closer.
“It’s Miss Smith,” he mumbled. “When we don’t join in she bursts into
tears.”
“Who’s Miss Smith?”
“The Cheerful Fairy,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes glumly. “If you
don’t say yes to everything her lip wobbles like a plate of jelly. It’s
unbearable.”
“We just joined in to stop her weeping,” said the Dean. “It’s amazing how
one woman can be so soggy.”
“If we’re not cheerful she bursts into tears,” said the Chair of
Indefinite Studies. “The Senior Wrangler’s doing some juggling for her at
the moment.”
“But he can’t juggle!”
“I think that’s cheering her up a bit.”
“What you’re tellin’ me, then, is that my wizards are prancing around
playin’ children’s games just to cheer up some dejected fairy?”
“Er…yes.”
“I thought you had to clap your hands and say you believed in ’em,” said
Ridcully. “Correct me if I’m wrong.”
“That’s just for the little shiny ones,” said the Lecturer in Recent
Runes. “Not for the ones in saggy cardigans with half a dozen hankies
stuffed up their sleeves.”
Ridcully looked at the corpse again.
“Anyone know who he is? Looks a bit of a ruffian to me. And where’s his
boots, may I ask?”
The Dean took a small glass cube from his pocket and ran it over the
corpse.
“Quite a large thaumic reading, gentlemen,” he said. “I think he got here
by magic.”
He rummaged in the man’s pockets and pulled out a handful of small white
things.
“Ugh,” he said.
“Teeth?” said Ridcully. “Who goes around with a pocket full of teeth?”
“A very bad fighter?” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies. “I’ll go and
get Modo to take the poor fellow away, shall I?”
“If we can get a reading off the thaumameter, perhaps Hex—” Ridcully
began.
“Now, Ridcully,” said the Dean, “I really think there must be some
problems that can be resolved without having to deal with that damn
thinking mill.”
Death looked up at Hex.
A MACHINE FOR THINKING?
“Er…yes, sir,” said Ponder Stibbons. “You see, when you said…Well, you
see, Hex believes everything…But, look, the sun really will come up,
won’t it? That’s its job.”
LEAVE US.
Ponder backed away, and then scurried out of the room.
The ants flowed along their tubes. Cogwheels spun. The big wheel with the
sheep skulls on it creaked around slowly. A mouse squeaked, somewhere in
the works.
WELL? said Death.
After a while, the pen began to write.
+++ Big Red Lever Time +++ Query +++
NO. THEY SAY YOU ARE A THINKER. EXTEND LOGICALLY THE RESULT OF THE HUMAN
RACE CEASING TO BELIEVE IN THE HOGFATHER. WILL THE SUN COME UP? ANSWER.
It took several minutes. The wheels spun. The ants ran. The mouse
squeaked. An egg timer came down on a spring. It bounced aimlessly for a
while, and then jerked back up again.
Hex wrote: +++ The Sun Will Not Come Up +++
CORRECT. HOW MAY THIS BE PREVENTED? ANSWER.
+++ Regular and Consistent Belief +++
GOOD. I HAVE A TASK FOR YOU, THINKING ENGINE.
+++ Yes. I Am Preparing An Area Of Write-Only Memory +++
WHAT IS THAT?
+++ You Would Say: To Know In Your Bones +++
GOOD. HERE IS YOUR INSTRUCTION. BELIEVE IN THE HOGFATHER.
+++ Yes +++
DO YOU BELIEVE? ANSWER.
+++ YES +++
DO…YOU…BELIEVE? ANSWER.
+++ YES +++
There was a change in the ill-assembled heap of pipes and tubes that was
Hex. The big wheel creaked into a new position. From the other side of
the wall came the hum of busy bees.
GOOD.
Death turned to leave the room, but stopped when Hex began to write
furiously. He went back and looked at the emerging paper.
+++ Dear Hogfather, For Hogswatch I Want—
OH, NO. YOU CAN’T WRITE LETT—Death paused, and then said, YOU CAN, CAN’T
YOU.
+++ Yes. I Am Entitled +++
Death waited until the pen had stopped, and picked up the paper.
BUT YOU ARE A MACHINE. THINGS HAVE NO DESIRES. A DOORKNOB WANTS NOTHING,
EVEN THOUGH IT IS A COMPLEX MACHINE.
+++ All Things Strive +++
YOU HAVE A POINT, said Death. He thought of tiny red petals in the black
depths, and read to the end of the list.
I DON’T KNOW WHAT MOST OF THESE THINGS ARE. I DON’T THINK THE SACK WILL,
EITHER.
+++ I Regret This +++
BUT WE WILL DO THE BEST WE CAN, Said Death. FRANKLY, I SHALL BE GLAD WHEN
TONIGHT’S OVER. IT’S MUCH HARDER TO GIVE THAN TO RECEIVE. He rummaged in
his sack. LET ME SEE…HOW OLD ARE YOU?
Susan crept up the stairs, one hand on the hilt of the sword.
Ponder Stibbons had been worried to find himself, as a wizard, awaiting
the arrival of the Hogfather. It’s amazing how people define roles for
themselves and put handcuffs on their experience and are constantly
surprised by the things a roulette universe spins at them. Here am I,
they say, a mere wholesale fish monger, at the controls of a giant
airliner because as it turns out all the crew had the Coronation Chicken.
Who’d have thought it? Here am I, a housewife who merely went out this
morning to bank the proceeds of the Playgroup Association’s Car Boot Sale,
on the run with one million in stolen cash and a rather handsome man from
the Battery Chickens’ Liberation Organization. Amazing! Here am I, a
perfectly ordinary hockey player, suddenly realizing I’m the Son of God
with five hundred devoted followers in a nice little commune in
Empowerment, Southern California. Who’d have thought it?
Here am I, thought Susan, a very practically minded governess who can add
up faster upside down than most people can the right way up, climbing up
a tooth-shaped tower belonging to the Tooth Fairy and armed with a sword
belonging to Death…
Again! I wish one month, just one damn month, could go by without
something like this happening to me.
She could hear voices above her. Someone said something about a lock.
She peered over the edge of the stairwell.
It looked as though people had been camping out up here. There were boxes
and sleeping rolls strewn around. A couple of men were sitting on boxes
watching a third man who was working on a door in one curved wall. One of
the men was the biggest Susan had ever seen, one of those huge fat men
who contrive to indicate that a lot of the fat under their shapeless
clothes is muscle. The other—
“Hello,” said a cheerful voice by her ear. “What’s your name?”
She made herself turn her head slowly.
First she saw the gray, glinting eye. Then the yellow-white one with the
tiny dot of a pupil came into view.
Around them was a friendly pink and white face topped by curly hair. It
was actually quite pretty, in a boyish sort of way, except that those
mismatched eyes staring out of it suggested that it had been stolen from
someone else.
She started to move her hand but the boy was there first, dragging the
sword scabbard out of her belt.
“Ah, ah!” he chided, turning and fending her off as she tried to grab it.
“Well, well, well. My word. White bone handle, rather tasteless skull and
bone decoration…Death himself’s second favorite weapon, am I right? Oh,
my! This must be Hogswatch! And this must mean that you are Susan Sto-
Helit. Nobility. I’d bow,” he added, dancing back, “but I’m afraid you’d
do something dreadful—”
There was a click, and a little gasp of excitement from the wizard
working on the door.
“Yes! Yes! Left-handed using a wooden pick! That’s simple!”
He saw that even Susan was looking at him, and coughed nervously.
“Er, I’ve got the fifth lock open, Mister Teatime! Not a problem! They’re
just based on Woddeley’s Occult Sequence! Any fool could do it if they
knew that!”
“I know it,” said Teatime, without taking his eyes off Susan.
“Ah…”
It was not technically audible, but nevertheless Susan could almost hear
the wizard’s mind back-pedaling. Up ahead was the conclusion that Teatime
had no time for people he didn’t need.
“…with…inter…est…ing subtleties,” he said slowly. “Yes. Very tricky. I’ll,
er, just have a look at number six…”
“How do you know who I am?” said Susan.
“Oh, easy,” said Teatime. “Twurp’s Peerage. Family motto Non temetis
messor. We have to read it, you know, in class. Hah, old Mericet calls it
the Guide to the Turf. No one laughs except him, of course. Oh, yes, I
know about you. Quite a lot. Your father was well known. Went a long way
very fast. As for your grandfather…honestly, that motto. Is that good
taste? Of course, you don’t need to fear him, do you? Or do you?”
Susan tried to fade. It didn’t work. She could feel herself staying
embarrassingly solid.
“I don’t know what you’re talking about,” she said. “Who are you, anyway?”
“I beg your pardon. My name is Teatime, Jonathan Teatime. At your
service.”
Susan lined up the syllables in her head.
“You mean…like around four o’clock in the afternoon?” she said.
“No. I did say Teh-ah-tim-eh,” said Teatime. “I spoke very clearly.
Please don’t try to break my concentration by annoying me. I only get
annoyed at important things. How are you getting on, Mr. Sideney? If it’s
just according to Woddeley’s Sequence, number six should be copper and
blue-green light. Unless, of course, there are any subtleties…”
“Er, doing it right now, Mister Teatime—”
“Do you think your grandfather will try to rescue you? Do you think he
will? But now I have his sword, you see. I wonder—”
There was another click.
“Sixth lock, Mister Teatime!”
“Really.”
“Er…don’t you want me to start on the seventh?”
“Oh, well, if you like. Pure white light will be the key,” said Teatime,
still not looking away from Susan. “But it may not be all important now.
Thank you, anyway. You’ve been most helpful.”
“Er—”
“Yes, you may go.”
Susan noticed that Sideney didn’t even bother to pick up his books and
tools, but hurried down the stairs as if he expected to be called back
and was trying to run faster than the sound.
“Is that all you’re here for?” she said. “A robbery?” He was dressed like
an Assassin, after all, and there was always one way to annoy an Assassin.
“Like a thief?”
Teatime danced excitedly. “A thief? Me? I’m not a thief, madam. But if I
were, I would be the kind that steals fire from the gods.”
“We’ve already got fire.”
“There must be an upgrade by now. No, these gentlemen are thieves. Common
robbers. Decent types, although you wouldn’t necessarily want to watch
them eat, for example. That’s Medium Dave and exhibit B is Banjo. He can
talk.”
Medium Dave nodded at Susan. She saw the look in his eyes. Maybe there
was something she could use…
She’d need something. Even her hair was a mess. She couldn’t step behind
time, she couldn’t fade into the background, and now even her hair had
let her down.
She was normal. Here, she was what she’d always wanted to be.
Bloody, bloody damn.
Sideney prayed as he ran down the stairs. He didn’t believe in any gods,
since most wizards seldom like to encourage them, but he prayed anyway
the fervent prayers of an atheist who hopes to be wrong.
But no one called him back. And no one ran after him.
So, being of a serious turn of mind under his normal state of subcritical
fear, he slowed down in case he lost his footing.
It was then that he noticed that the steps underfoot weren’t the smooth
whiteness they had been everywhere else but were very large, pitted
flagstones. And the light had changed, and then they weren’t stairs any
more and he staggered as he encountered flat ground where steps should
have been.
His outstretched hand brushed against a crumbling brick.
And the ghosts of the past poured in, and he knew where he was. He was in
the yard of Gammer Wimblestone’s dame school. His mother wanted him to
learn his letters and be a wizard, but she also thought that long curls
on a five-year-old boy looked very smart.
This was the hunting ground of Ronnie Jenks.
Adult memory and understanding said that Ronnie was just an unintelligent
bullet-headed seven-year-old bully with muscles where his brain should
have been. The eye of childhood, rather more accurately, dreaded him as a
force like a personalized earthquake with one nostril bunged up with
bogies, both knees scabbed, both fists balled and all five brain cells
concentrated in a kind of cerebral grunt.
Oh, gods. There was the tree Ronnie used to hide behind. It looked as big
and menacing as he remembered it.
But…if somehow he’d ended up back there, gods knew how, well, he might be
a bit on the skinny side but he was a damn sight bigger than Ronnie Jenks
now. Gods, yes, he’d kick those evil little trousers all the—
And then, as a shadow blotted out the sun, he realized he was wearing
curls.
Teatime looked thoughtfully at the door.
“I suppose I should open it,” he said, “after coming all this way…”
“You’re controlling children by their teeth,” said Susan.
“It does sound odd, doesn’t it, when you put it like that,” said Teatime.
“But that’s sympathetic magic for you. Is your grandfather going to try
to rescue you, do you think? But no…I don’t think he can. Not here, I
think. I don’t think that he can come here. So he sent you, did he?”
“Certainly not! He—” Susan stopped. Oh, he had, she told herself, feeling
even more of a fool. He certainly had. He was learning about humans, all
right. For a walking skeleton, he could be quite clever…
But…how clever was Teatime? Just a bit too excited at his cleverness to
realize that if Death—She tried to stamp on the thought, just in case
Teatime could read it in her eyes.
“I don’t think he’ll try,” she said. “He’s not as clever as you, Mister
Teatime.”
“Teh-ah-tim-eh,” said Teatime, automatically. “That’s a shame.”
“Do you think you’re going to get away with this?”
“Oh dear. Do people really say that?” And suddenly Teatime was much
closer. “I’ve got away with it. No more Hogfather. And that’s only the
start. We’ll keep the teeth coming in, of course. The possibilities—”
There was a rumble like an avalanche, a long way off. The dormant Banjo
had awakened, causing tremors on his lower slopes. His enormous hands,
which had been resting on his knees, started to bunch.
“What’s dis?” he said.
Teatime stopped and, for a moment, looked puzzled.
“What’s this what?”
“You said no more Hogfather,” said Banjo. He stood up, like a mountain
range rising gently in the squeeze between colliding continents. His
hands still stayed in the vicinity of his knees.
Teatime stared at him and then glanced at Medium Dave.
“He does know what we’ve been doing, does he?” he said. “You did tell
him?”
Medium Dave shrugged.
“Dere’s got to be a Hogfather,” said Banjo. “Dere’s always a Hogfather.”
Susan looked down. Gray blotches were speeding across the white marble.
She was standing in a pool of gray. So was Banjo. And around Teatime the
dots bounced and recoiled like wasps around a pot of jam.
Looking for something, she thought.
“You don’t believe in the Hogfather, do you?” said Teatime. “A big boy
like you?”
“Yeah,” said Banjo. “So what’s dis ‘no more Hogfather’?”
Teatime pointed at Susan.
“She did it,” he said. “She killed him.”
The sheer playground effrontery of it shocked Susan.
“No I didn’t,” she said. “He—”
“Did!”
“Didn’t!”
“Did!”
Banjo’s big bald head turned toward her.
“What’s dis about the Hogfather?” he said.
“I don’t think he’s dead,” said Susan. “But Teatime has made him very
ill—”
“Who cares?” said Teatime, dancing away. “When this is over, Banjo,
you’ll have as many presents as you want. Trust me!”
“Dere’s got to be a Hogfather,” Banjo rumbled. “Else dere’s no Hogswatch.”
“It’s just another solar festival,” said Teatime. “It—”
Medium Dave stood up. He had his hand on his sword.
“We’re going, Teatime,” he said. “Me and Banjo are going. I don’t like
any of this. I don’t mind robbing, I don’t mind thieving, but this isn’t
honest. Banjo? You come with me right now!”
“What’s dis about no more Hogfather?” said Banjo.
Teatime pointed to Susan.
“You grab her, Banjo. It’s all her fault!”
Banjo lumbered a few steps in Susan’s direction, and then stopped.
“Our mam said no hittin’ girls,” he rumbled. “No pullin’ dere hair…”
Teatime rolled his one good eye. Around his feet the grayness seemed to
be boiling in the stone, following his feet as they moved. And it was
around Banjo, too.
Searching, Susan thought. It’s looking for a way in.
“I think I know you, Teatime,” she said, as sweetly as she could for
Banjo’s sake. “You’re the mad kid they’re all scared of, right?”
“Banjo?” snapped Teatime. “I said grab her—”
“Our mam said—”
“The giggling excitable one even the bullies never touched because if
they did he went insane and kicked and bit,” said Susan. “The kid who
didn’t know the difference between chucking a stone at a cat and setting
it on fire.”
To her delight he glared at her.
“Shut up,” he said.
“I bet no one wanted to play with you,” said Susan. “Not the kid with no
friends. Kids know about a mind like yours even if they don’t know the
right words for it—”
“I said shut up! Get her, Banjo!”
That was it. She could hear it in Teatime’s voice. There was a touch of
vibrato that hadn’t been there before.
“The kind of little boy,” she said, watching his face, “who looks up
dolls’ dresses…”
“I didn’t!”
Banjo looked worried.
“Our mam said—”
“Oh, to blazes with your mam!” snapped Teatime.
There was a whisper of steel as Medium Dave drew his sword.
“What’d you say about our mam?” he whispered.
Now he’s having to concentrate on three people, Susan thought.
“I bet no one ever played with you,” she said. “I bet there were things
people had to hush up, eh?”
“Banjo! You do what I tell you!” Teatime screamed.
The monstrous man was beside her now. She could see his face twisted in
an agony of indecision. His enormous fists clenched and unclenched and
his lips moved as some kind of horrible debate raged in his head.
“Our…our mam…our mam said…”
The gray marks flowed across the floor and formed a pool of shadow which
grew darker and higher with astonishing speed. It towered over the three
men, and grew a shape.
“Have you been a bad boy, you little perisher?”
The huge woman towered over all three men. In one meaty hand it was
holding a bundle of birch twigs as thick as a man’s arm.
The thing growled.
Medium Dave looked up into the enormous face of Ma Lilywhite. Every pore
was a pothole. Every brown tooth was a tombstone.
“You been letting him get into trouble, our Davey? You have, ain’t you?”
He backed away. “No, Mum…no, Mum…”
“You need a good hiding, Banjo? You been playing with girls again?”
Banjo sagged on to his knees, tears of misery rolling down his face.
“Sorry Mum sorry sorry Mum noooohhh Mum sorry Mum sorry sorry—”
Then the figure turned to Medium Dave again.
The sword dropped out of his hand. His face seemed to melt.
Medium Dave started to cry.
“No Mum no Mum no Mum nooooh Mum—”
He gave a gurgle and collapsed, clutching his chest. And vanished.
Teatime started to laugh.
Susan tapped him on the shoulder and, as he looked round, hit him as hard
as she could across the face.
That was the plan, at least. His hand moved faster and caught her wrist.
It was like striking an iron bar.
“Oh, no,” he said. “I don’t think so.”
Out of the corner of her eye Susan saw Banjo crawling across the floor to
where his brother had been. Ma Lilywhite had vanished.
“This place gets into your head, doesn’t it?” Teatime said. “It pokes
around to find out how to deal with you. Well, I’m in touch with my inner
child.”
He reached out with his other hand and grabbed her hair, pulling her head
down.
Susan screamed.
“And it’s much more fun,” he whispered.
Susan felt his grip lessen. There was a wet thump like a piece of steak
hitting a slab and Teatime went past her, on his back.
“No pullin’ girls’ hair,” rumbled Banjo. “That’s bad.”
Teatime bounced up like an acrobat and steadied himself on the railing of
the stairwell.
Then he drew the sword.
The blade was invisible in the bright light of the tower.
“It’s true what the stories say, then,” he said. “So thin you can’t see
it. I’m going to have such fun with it.” He waved it at them. “So light.”
“You wouldn’t dare use it. My grandfather will come after you,” said
Susan, walking toward him.
She saw one eye twitch.
“He comes after everyone. But I’ll be ready for him,” said Teatime.
“He’s very single-minded,” said Susan, closer now.
“Ah, a man after my own heart.”
“Could be, Mister Teatime.”
He brought the sword around. She didn’t even have time to duck.
And she didn’t even try to when he swung the sword back again.
“It doesn’t work here,” she said, as he stared at it in astonishment.
“The blade doesn’t exist here. There’s no Death here!”
She slapped him across the face.
“Hi!” she said brightly. “I’m the inner baby-sitter!”
She didn’t punch. She just thrust out an arm, palm first, catching him
under the chin and lifting him backward over the rail.
He somersaulted. She never knew how. He somehow managed to gain purchase
on clear air.
His free arm grabbed at hers, her feet came off the ground, and she was
over the rail. She caught it with her other hand—although later she
wondered if the rail hadn’t managed to catch her instead.
Teatime swung from her arm, staring upward with a thoughtful expression.
She saw him grip the sword hilt in his teeth and reach down to his belt—
The question “Is this person mad enough to try to kill someone holding
him?” was asked and answered very, very fast…She kicked down and hit him
on the ear.
The cloth of her sleeve began to tear. Teatime tried to get another grip.
She kicked again and the dress ripped. For an instant he held onto
nothing and then, still wearing the expression of someone trying to solve
a complex problem, he fell away, spinning, getting smaller…
He hit the pile of teeth, sending them splashing across the marble. He
jerked for a moment…
And vanished.
A hand like a bunch of bananas pulled Susan back over the rail.
“You can get into trouble, hittin’ girls,” said Banjo. “No playin’ with
girls.”
There was a click behind them.
The doors had swung open. Cold white mist rolled out across the floor.
“Our mam—” said Banjo, trying to work things out. “Our mam was here—”
“Yes,” said Susan.
“But it weren’t our mam, ’cos they buried our mam—”
“Yes.”
“We watched ’em fill in the grave and everything.”
“Yes,” said Susan, and added to herself, I bet you did.
“And where’s our Davey gone?”
“Er…somewhere else, Banjo.”
“Somewhere nice?” said the huge man hesitantly.
Susan grasped with relief the opportunity to tell the truth, or at least
not definitely lie.
“It could be,” she said.
“Better’n here?”
“You never know. Some people would say the odds are in favor.”
Banjo turned his pink piggy eyes on her. For a moment a thirty-five-yearold
man looked out through the pink clouds of a five-year-old face.
“That’s good,” he said. “He’ll be able to see our mam again.”
This much conversation seemed to exhaust him. He sagged.
“I wanna go home,” he said.
She stared at his big, stained face, shrugged hopelessly, pulled a
handkerchief out of her pocket and held it up to his mouth.
“Spit,” she commanded. He obeyed.
She dabbed the handkerchief over the worst parts and then tucked it into
his hand.
“Have a good blow,” she suggested, and then carefully leaned out of range
until the echoes of the blast had died away.
“You can keep the hanky. Please,” she added, meaning it wholeheartedly.
“Now tuck your shirt in.”
“Yes, miss.”
“Now, go downstairs and sweep all the teeth out of the circle. Can you do
that?”
Banjo nodded.
“What can you do?” Susan prompted.
Banjo concentrated. “Sweep all the teeth out of the circle, miss.”
“Good. Off you go.”
Susan watched him plod off, and then looked at the white doorway. She was
sure the wizard had only got as far as the sixth lock.
The room beyond the door was entirely white, and the mist that swirled at
knee level deadened even the sound of her footsteps.
All there was was a bed. It was a large four-poster, old and dusty.
She thought it was unoccupied and then she saw the figure, lying among
the mounds of pillows. It looked very much like a frail old lady in a
mobcap.
The old woman turned her head and smiled at Susan.
“Hello, my dear.”
Susan couldn’t remember a grandmother. Her father’s mother had died when
she was young, and the other side of the family…well, she’d never had a
grandmother. But this was the sort she’d have wanted.
The kind, the nasty realistic side of her mind said, that hardly ever
existed.
Susan thought she heard a child laugh. And another one. Somewhere almost
out of hearing, children were at play. It was always a pleasant, lulling
sound.
Always provided, of course, you couldn’t hear the actual words.
“No,” said Susan.
“Sorry, dear?” said the old lady.
“You’re not the Tooth Fairy.” Oh, no…there was even a damn patchwork
quilt…
“Oh, I am, dear.”
“Oh, Grandma, what big teeth you have…Good grief, you’ve even got a shawl,
oh dear.”
“I don’t understand, lovey—”
“You forgot the rocking chair,” said Susan. “I always thought there’d be
a rocking chair…”
There was a pop behind her, and then a dying creak-creak. She didn’t even
turn round.
“If you’ve included a kitten playing with a ball of wool it’ll go very
hard with you,” she said sternly, and picked up the candlestick by the
bed. It seemed heavy enough.
“I don’t think you’re real,” she said levelly. “There’s not a little old
woman in a shawl running this place. You’re out of my head. That’s how
you defend yourself…You poke around in people’s heads and find the things
that work—”
She swung the candlestick. It passed through the figure in the bed.
“See?” she said. “You’re not even real.”
“Oh, I am real, dear,” said the old woman, as her outline changed. “The
candlestick wasn’t.”
Susan looked down at the new shape.
“Nope,” she said. “It’s horrible, but it doesn’t frighten me. No, nor
does that.” It changed again, and again. “No, nor does my father. Good
grief, you’re scraping the bottom of the barrel, aren’t you? I like
spiders. Snakes don’t worry me. Dogs? No. Rats are fine, I like rats.
Sorry, is anyone frightened of that?”
She grabbed at the thing and this time the shape stayed. It looked like a
small, wizened monkey, but with big deep eyes under a brow overhanging
like a balcony. Its hair was gray and lank. It struggled weakly in her
grasp, and wheezed.
“I don’t frighten easily,” said Susan, “but you’d be amazed at how angry
I can become.”
The creature hung limp.
“I…I…” it muttered.
She let it down again.
“You’re a bogeyman, aren’t you?” she said.
It collapsed in a heap when she took her hand way.
“…Not a…The…” it said.
“What do you mean, the?” said Susan.
“The bogeyman,” said the bogeyman. And she saw how rangy it was, how
white and gray streaked its hair, how the skin was stretched over the
bones…
“The first bogeyman?”
“I…there were…I do remember when the land was different. Ice. Many times
of…ice. And the…what do you call them?” The creature wheezed. “…The lands,
the big lands…all different…”
Susan sat down on the bed.
“You mean continents?”
“…all different.” The black sunken eyes glinted at her and suddenly the
thing reared up, bony arms waving. “I was the dark in the cave! I was the
shadow in the trees! You’ve heard about…the primal scream? That was…at me!
I was…” It folded up and started coughing. “And when…that thing, you know,
that thing…all light and bright…lightning you could carry, hot, little
sunshine, and then there was no more dark, just shadows, and then you
made axes, axes in the forest, and then…and then…”
Susan sat down on the bed. “There’s still plenty of bogeymen,” she said.
“Hiding under beds! Lurking in cupboards! But,” it fought for breath, “if
you had seen me…in the old days…when they came down into the deep caves
to draw their hunting pictures…I could roar in their heads…so that their
stomachs dropped out of their bottoms…”
“All the old skills are dying out,” said Susan gravely.
“…Oh, others came later…They never knew that first fine terror. All they
knew,” even whispering, the bogeyman managed to get a sneer in its voice,
“was dark corners. I had been the dark! I was the…first! And now I was no
better than them…frightening maids, curdling cream…hiding in shadows at
the stub of the year…and then one night, I thought…why?”
Susan nodded. Bogeymen weren’t bright. The moment of existential
uncertainty probably took a lot longer in heads where the brain cells
bounced so very slowly from one side of the skull to the other.
But…Granddad had thought like that. You hung around with humans long
enough and you stopped being what they imagined you to be and wanted to
become something of your own. Umbrellas and silver hairbrushes…
“You thought: what was the point of it all?” she said.
“…frightening children…lurking…and then I started to watch them. Didn’t
really used to be children back in the ice times…just big humans, little
humans, not children…and…and there was a different world in their
heads…In their heads, that’s where the old days were now. The old days.
When it was all young.”
“You came out from under the bed…”
“I watched over them…kept ’em safe…”
Susan tried not to shudder.
“And the teeth?”
“I…oh, you can’t leave teeth around, anyone might get them, do terrible
things. I liked them, I didn’t want anyone to hurt them…” it bubbled. “I
never wanted to hurt them, I just used to watch, I kept the teeth all
safe…and, and, and sometimes I just sit here listening to them…”
It mumbled on. Susan listened in embarrassed amazement, not knowing
whether to take pity on the thing or, and this was a developing option,
to tread on it.
“…and the teeth…they remember…”
It started to shake.
“The money?” Susan prompted. “I don’t see many rich bogeymen around.”
“…money everywhere…buried in holes…old treasure…back of sofas…it adds
up…investments…money for the tooth, very important, part of the magic,
makes it safe, makes it proper, otherwise it’s thieving…and I labeled ’em
all, and kept ’em safe, and…and then I was old, but I found people…” The
Tooth Fairy sniggered, and for a moment Susan felt sorry for the men in
the ancient caves. “They don’t ask questions, do they?” it bubbled. “…You
give ’em money and they all do their jobs and they don’t ask questions…”
“It’s more than their job’s worth,” said Susan.
“…and then they came…stealing…”
Susan gave in. Old gods do new jobs.
“You look terrible.”
“…thank you very much…”
“I mean ill.”
“…very old…all those men, too much effort…”
The bogeyman groaned.
“…you…don’t die here,” it panted. “Just get old, listening to the
laughter…”
Susan nodded. It was in the air. She couldn’t hear words, just a distant
chatter, as if it was at the other end of a long corridor.
“…and this place…it grew up round me…”
“The trees,” said Susan. “And the sky. Out of their heads…”
“…dying…the little children…you’ve got to…”
The figure faded.
Susan sat for a while, listening to the distant chatter.
Worlds of belief, she thought. Just like oysters. A little piece of shit
gets in and then a pearl grows up around it.
She got up and went downstairs.
Banjo had found a broom and mop somewhere. The circle was empty and, with
surprising initiative, the man was carefully washing the chalk away.
“Banjo?”
“Yes, miss.”
“You like it here?”
“There’s trees, miss.”
That probably counts as a “yes,” Susan decided.
“The sky doesn’t worry you?”
He looked at her in puzzlement.
“No, miss?”
“Can you count, Banjo?”
He looked smug.
“Yes, miss. On m’fingers, miss.”
“So you can count up to…?” Susan prompted.
“Thirteen, miss,” said Banjo proudly.
She looked at his big hands.
“Good grief.”
Well, she thought, and why not? He’s big and trustworthy and what other
kind of life has he got?
“I think it would be a good idea if you did the Tooth Fairy’s job, Banjo.”
“Will that be all right, miss? Won’t the Tooth Fairy mind?”
“You…do it until she comes back.”
“All right, miss.”
“I’ll…er…get people to keep an eye on you, until you get settled in. I
think food comes in on the cart. You’re not to let people cheat you.” She
looked at his hands and then up and up the lower slopes until she saw the
peak of Mount Banjo, and added, “Not that I think they’ll try, mind you.”
“Yes, miss. I will keep things tidy, miss. Er…”
The big pink face looked at her.
“Yes, Banjo?”
“Can I have a puppy, miss? I had a kitten once, miss, but our mam drowned
it ’cos it was dirty.”
Susan’s memory threw up a name.
“A puppy called Spot?”
“Yes, miss. Spot, miss.”
“I think it’ll turn up quite soon, Banjo.”
He seemed to take this entirely on trust.
“Thank you, miss.”
“And now I’ve got to go.”
“Right, miss.”
She looked back up the tower. Death’s land might be dark, but when you
were there you never thought anything bad was going to happen to you. You
were beyond the places where it could. But here—
When you were grown up you only feared, well, logical things. Poverty.
Illness. Being found out. At least you weren’t mad with terror because of
something under the stairs. The world wasn’t full of arbitrary light and
shade. The wonderful world of childhood? Well, it wasn’t a cutdown
version of the adult one, that was certain. It was more like the adult
one written in big heavy letters. Everything was…more. More everything.
She left Banjo to his sweeping and stepped out into the perpetually
sunlit world.
Bilious and Violet hurried toward her. Bilious was waving a branch like a
club.
“You don’t need that,” said Susan. She wanted some sleep.
“We talked about it and we thought we ought to come back and help,” said
Bilious.
“Ah. Democratic courage,” said Susan. “Well, they’re all gone. To
wherever they go.”
Bilious lowered the branch thankfully.
“It wasn’t that—” he began.
“Look, you two can make yourselves useful,” said Susan. “There’s a mess
in there. Go and help Banjo.”
“Banjo?”
“He’s…more or less running the place now.”
Violet laughed.
“But he’s—”
“He’s in charge,” said Susan wearily.
“All right,” said Bilious. “Anyway, I’m sure we can tell him what to do—”
“No! Too many people have told him what to do. He knows what to do. Just
help him get started, all right? But…”
“If the Hogfather comes back now, you’ll vanish, won’t you?” She didn’t
know how to phrase the question.
“I’m, er, giving up my old job,” said Bilious. “Er…I’m going to go on
working as a holiday relief for the other gods.” He gave her a pleading
look.
“Really?” Susan looked at Violet. Oh, well, maybe if she believes in him,
at least…It might work. You never know.
“Good,” she said. “Have fun. Now I’m going home. This is a hell of a way
to spend Hogswatch.”
She found Binky waiting by the stream.
The Auditors fluttered anxiously. And, as always happens in their species
when something goes radically wrong and needs fixing instantly, they
settled down to try to work out who to blame.
One said, It was…
And then it stopped. The Auditors lived by consensus, which made picking
scapegoats a little problematical. It brightened up. After all, if
everyone was to blame, then it was no one’s actual fault. That’s what
collective responsibility meant, after all. It was more like bad luck, or
something.
Another said, Unfortunately, people might get the wrong idea. We may be
asked questions.
One said, What about Death? He interfered, after all.
One said, Er…not exactly.
One said, Oh, come on. He got the girl involved.
One said, Er…no. She got herself involved.
One said, Yes, but he told her…
One said, No. He didn’t. In fact he specifically did not tell—
It paused, and then said, Damn!
One said, On the other hand…
The robes turned toward it.
Yes?
One said, There’s no actual evidence. Nothing written down. Some humans
got excited and decided to attack the Tooth Fairy’s country. This is
unfortunate, but nothing to do with us. We are shocked, of course.
One said, There’s still the Hogfather. Things are going to be noticed.
Questions may be asked.
They hovered for a while, unspeaking.
Eventually one said, We may have to take…
It paused, loath even to think the word, but managed to continue…a risk.
Bed, thought Susan, as the mists rolled past her. And in the morning,
decent human things like coffee and porridge. And bed. Real things—
Binky stopped. She stared at his ears for a moment, and then urged him
forward. He whinnied, and didn’t budge.
A skeletal hand had grabbed his bridle. Death materialized.
IT IS NOT OVER. MORE MUST BE DONE. THEY TORMENT HIM STILL.
Susan sagged. “What is? Who are?”
MOVE FORWARD. I WILL STEER. Death climbed into the saddle and reached
around her for the reins.
“Look, I went—” Susan began.
YES. I KNOW. THE CONTROL OF BELIEF, said Death, as the horse moved
forward again. ONLY A VERY SIMPLE MIND COULD THINK OF THAT. MAGIC SO OLD
IT’S HARDLY MAGIC. WHAT A SIMPLE WAY TO MAKE MILLIONS OF CHILDREN CEASE
TO BELIEVE IN THE HOGFATHER.
“And what were you doing?” Susan demanded.
I TOO HAVE DONE WHAT I SET OUT TO DO. I HAVE KEPT A SPACE. A MILLION
CARPETS WITH SOOTY BOOT MARKS, MILLIONS OF FILLED STOCKINGS, ALL THOSE
ROOFS WITH RUNNER MARKS ON THEM…DISBELIEF WILL FIND IT HARD GOING IN THE
FACE OF THAT. ALBERT SAYS HE NEVER WANTS TO DRINK ANOTHER SHERRY FOR DAYS.
THE HOGFATHER WILL HAVE SOMETHING TO COME BACK TO, AT LEAST.
“What have I got to do now?”
YOU MUST BRING THE HOGFATHER BACK.
“Oh, must I? For peace and goodwill and the tinkling of fairy bells? Who
cares. He’s just some fat old clown who makes people feel smug at
Hogswatch! I’ve been through all this for some old man who prowls around
kids’ bedrooms?”
NO. SO THAT THE SUN WILL RISE.
“What has astronomy got to do with the Hogfather?”
OLD GODS DO NEW JOBS.
The Senior Wrangler wasn’t attending the Feast. He got one of the maids
to bring a tray up to his rooms, where he was Entertaining and doing all
those things a man does when he finds himself unexpectedly tête-à-tête
with the opposite sex, like trying to shine his boots on his trousers and
clean his fingernails with his other fingernails.
“A little more wine, Gwendoline? It’s hardly alcoholic,” he said, leaning
over her.
“I don’t mind if I do, Mr. Wrangler.”
“Oh, call me Horace, please. And perhaps a little something for your
chicken?”
“I’m afraid she seems to have wandered off somewhere,” said the Cheerful
Fairy. “I’m afraid I’m, I’m, I’m rather dull company…” She blew her nose
noisily.
“Oh, I certainly wouldn’t say that,” said the Senior Wrangler. He wished
he’d had time to tidy up his rooms a bit, or at least get some of the
more embarrassing bits of laundry off the stuffed rhinoceros.
“Everyone’s been so kind,” said the Cheerful Fairy, dabbing at her
streaming eyes. “Who was the skinny one that kept making the funny faces
for me?”
“That was the Bursar. Why don’t you—”
“He seemed very cheerful, anyway.”
“It’s the dried frog pills, he eats them by the handful,” said the Senior
Wrangler dismissively. “I say, why don’t—”
“Oh dear. I hope they’re not addictive.”
“I’m sure he wouldn’t keep on eating them if they were addictive,” said
the Senior Wrangler. “Now, why don’t you have another glass of wine, and
then…and then…” a happy thought struck him “…and then…and then perhaps I
could show you Archchancellor Bowell’s Remembrance? It’s got a-a-a-a very
interesting ceiling. My word, yes.”
“That would be very nice,” said the Cheerful Fairy. “Would it cheer me up,
do you think?”
“Oh, it would, it would,” said the Senior Wrangler. “Definitely! Good! So
I’ll, er, I’ll just go and…just go and…I’ll…” He pointed vaguely in the
direction of his dressing room, while hopping from one foot to the other.
“I’ll just go and, er…go…just…”
He fled into the dressing room and slammed the door behind him. His wild
eyes scanned the shelves and hangers.
“Clean robe,” he mumbled. “Comb face, wash socks, fresh hair, where’s
that Insteadofshave lotion—”
From the other side of the door came the adorable sound of the Cheerful
Fairy blowing her nose. From this side came the sound of the Senior
Wrangler’s muffled scream as, made careless by haste and a very poor
sense of smell, he mistakenly splashed his face with the turpentine he
used for treating his feet.
Somewhere overhead a very small plump child with a bow and arrow and
ridiculously unaerodynamic wings buzzed ineffectually against a shut
window on which the frost was tracing the outline of a rather handsome
Auriental lady. The other window already had an icy picture of a vase of
sunflowers.
In the Great Hall one of the tables had already collapsed. It was one of
the customs of the Feast that although there were many courses each
wizard went at his own speed, a tradition instituted to prevent the slow
ones holding everyone else up. And they could also have seconds if they
wished, so that if a wizard was particularly attracted to soup he could
go round and round for an hour before starting on the preliminary stages
of the fish courses.
“How’re you feeling now, old chap?” said the Dean, who was sitting next
to the Bursar. “Back on the dried frog pills?”
“I, er, I, er, no, I’m not too bad,” said the Bursar. “It was, of course,
rather a, rather a shock when—”
“That’s a shame, because here’s your Hogswatch present,” said the Dean,
passing over a small box. It rattled. “You can open it now if you like.”
“Oh, well, how nice—”
“It’s from me,” said the Dean.
“What a lovely—”
“I bought it with my own money, you know,” said the Dean, waving a turkey
leg airily.
“The wrapping paper is a very nice—”
“More than a dollar, I might add.”
“My goodness—”
The Bursar pulled off the last of the wrapping paper.
“It’s a box for keeping dried frog pills in. See? It’s got ‘Dried Frog
Pills’ on it, see?”
The Bursar shook it. “Oh, how nice,” he said weakly. “It’s got some pills
in it already. How thoughtful. They will come in handy.”
“Yes,” said the Dean. “I took them off your dressing table. After all, I
was down a dollar as it was.”
The Bursar nodded gratefully and put the little box neatly beside his
plate. They’d actually allowed him knives this evening. They’d actually
allowed him to eat other things than those things that could only be
scraped up with a wooden spoon.
He eyed the nearest roast pig with nervous anticipation, and tucked his
napkin firmly under his chin.
“Er, excuse me, Mr. Stibbons,” he quavered. “Would you be so good as to
pass me the apple sauce tankard—”
There was a sound like coarse fabric ripping, somewhere in the air in
front of the Bursar, and a crash as something landed on top of the roast
pig. Roast potatoes and gravy filled the air. The apple that had been in
the pig’s mouth was violently expelled and hit the Bursar on the forehead.
He blinked, looked down, and found he was about to plunge his fork into a
human head.
“Ahaha,” he murmured, as his eyes started to glaze.
The wizards heaved aside the overturned dishes and smashed crockery.
“He just fell out of the air!”
“Is he an Assassin? Not one of their student pranks, is it?”
“Why’s he holding a sword without a sharp bit?”
“Is he dead?”
“I think so!”
“I didn’t even have any of that salmon mousse! Will you look at it? His
foot’s in it! It’s all over the place! Do you want yours?”
Ponder Stibbons fought his way through the throng. He knew his more
senior fellows when they were feeling helpful. They were like a glass of
water to a drowning man.
“Give him air!” he protested.
“How do we know if he needs any?” said the Dean.
Ponder put his ear to the fallen youth’s chest.
“He’s not breathing!”
“Breathing spell, breathing spell,” muttered the Chair of Indefinite
Studies. “Er…Spolt’s Forthright Respirator, perhaps? I think I’ve got it
written down somewhere—”
Ridcully reached through the wizards and pulled out the black-clad man by
a leg. He held him upside down in his big hand and thumped him heavily on
the back.
He met their astonished gaze. “Used to do this on the farm,” he said.
“Works a treat on baby goats.”
“Oh, now, really,” said the Dean, “I don’t—”
The corpse made a noise somewhere between a choke and a cough.
“Make some space, you fellows!” the Archchancellor bellowed, clearing an
area of table with one sweep of his spare arm.
“Hey, I hadn’t had any of that Prawn Escoffé!” said the Lecturer in
Recent Runes.
“I didn’t even know we had any,” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies.
“Someone, and I name no names, Dean, shoved it behind the soft-shelled
crabs so they could keep it for themselves. I call that cheap.”
Teatime opened his eyes. It said a lot for his constitution that it
survived a very close-up view of Ridcully’s nose, which filled the
immediate universe like a big pink planet.
“Excuse me, excuse me,” said Ponder, leaning over with his notebook open,
“but this is vitally important for the advancement of natural philosophy.
Did you see any bright lights? Was there a shining tunnel? Did any
deceased relatives attempt to speak to you? What word most describes the—”
Ridcully pulled him away.
“What’s all this, Mr. Stibbons?”
“I really should talk to him, sir. He’s had a near-death experience!”
“We all have. It’s called ‘living,’” said the Archchancellor shortly.
“Pour the poor lad a glass of spirits and put that damn pencil away.”
“Uh…This must be Unseen University?” said Teatime. “And you are all
wizards?”
“Now, just you lie still,” said Ridcully. But Teatime had already risen
on his elbows.
“There was a sword,” he muttered.
“Oh, it’s fallen on the floor,” said the Dean, reaching down. “But it
looks as though it’s—Did I do that?”
The wizards looked at the large curved slice of table falling away.
Something had cut through everything—wood, cloth, plates, cutlery, food.
The Dean swore that a candle flame that had been in the path of the
unseen blade was only half a flame for a moment, until the wick realized
that this was no way to behave.
The Dean raised his hand. The other wizards scattered.
“Looks like a thin blue line in the air,” he said, wonderingly.
“Excuse me, sir,” said Teatime, taking it from him. “I really must be
off.”
He ran from the hall.
“He won’t get far,” said the Lecturer in Recent Runes. “The main doors
are locked in accordance with Archchancellor Spode’s Rules.”
“Won’t get far while holding a sword that appears to be able to cut
through anything,” said Ridcully, to the sound of falling wood.
“I wonder what all that was about?” said the Chair of Indefinite Studies,
and then turned his attention to the remains of the Feast. “Anyway, at
least this joint’s been nicely carved…”
“Bu-bu-bu—”
They all turned. The Bursar was holding his hand in front of him. The cut
surface of a fork gleamed at the wizards.
“Nice to know his new present will come in handy,” said the Dean. “It’s
the thought that counts.”
Under the table the Blue Hen of Happiness relieved itself on the Bursar’s
foot.
THERE ARE…ENEMIES, said Death, as Binky galloped through icy mountains.
“They’re all dead—”
OTHER ENEMIES. YOU MAY AS WELL KNOW THIS. DOWN IN THE DEEPEST KINGDOMS OF
THE SEA, WHERE THERE IS NO LIGHT, THERE LIVES A TYPE OF CREATURE WITH NO
BRAIN AND NO EYES AND NO MOUTH. IT DOES NOTHING BUT LIVE AND PUT FORTH
PETALS OF PERFECT CRIMSON WHERE NONE ARE THERE TO SEE. IT IS NOTHING
EXCEPT A TINY YES IN THE NIGHT. AND YET…AND YET…IT HAS ENEMIES THAT BEAR
ON IT A VICIOUS, UNBENDING MALICE, WHO WISH NOT ONLY FOR ITS TINY LIFE TO
BE OVER BUT ALSO THAT IT HAD NEVER EXISTED. ARE YOU WITH ME SO FAR?
“Well, yes, but—”
GOOD. NOW, IMAGINE WHAT THEY THINK OF HUMANITY.
Susan was shocked. She had never heard her grandfather speak in anything
other than calm tones. Now there was a cutting edge in his words.
“What are they?” she said.
WE MUST HURRY. THERE IS NOT MUCH TIME.
“I thought you always had time. I mean…whatever it is you want to stop,
you can go back in time and—”
AND MEDDLE?
“You’ve done it before…”
THIS TIME IT IS OTHERS WHO ARE DOING IT. AND THEY HAVE NO RIGHT.
“What others?”
THEY HAVE NO NAME. CALL THEM THE AUDITORS. THEY RUN THE UNIVERSE. THEY
SEE TO IT THAT GRAVITY WORKS AND THE ATOMS SPIN, OR WHATEVER IT IS ATOMS
DO. AND THEY HATE LIFE.
“Why?”
IT IS…IRREGULAR. IT WAS NEVER SUPPOSED TO HAPPEN. THEY LIKE STONES,
MOVING IN CURVES. AND THEY HATE HUMANS MOST OF ALL. Death sighed. IN MANY
WAYS, THEY LACK A SENSE OF HUMOR.
“Why the Hog—”
IT IS THE THINGS YOU BELIEVE WHICH MAKE YOU HUMAN. GOOD THINGS AND BAD
THINGS, IT’S ALL THE SAME.
The mists parted. Sharp peaks were around them, lit by the glow off the
snow.
“These look like the mountains where the Castle of Bones was,” she said.
THEY ARE, said Death. IN A SENSE. HE HAS GONE BACK TO A PLACE HE KNOWS.
AN EARLY PLACE…
Binky cantered low over the snow.
“And what are we looking for?” said Susan.
YOU WILL KNOW WHEN YOU SEE IT.
“Snow? Trees? I mean, could I have a clue? What are we here for?”
I TOLD YOU. TO ENSURE THAT THE SUN COMES UP.
“Of course the sun will come up!”
NO.
“There’s no magic that’ll stop the sun coming up!”
I WISH I WAS AS CLEVER AS YOU.
Susan stared down out of sheer annoyance, and saw something below.
Small dark shapes moved across the whiteness, running as if they were in
pursuit of something.
“There’s…some sort of chase…” she conceded. “I can see some sort of
animals but I can’t see what they’re after—”
Then she saw movement in the snow, a blurred, dark shape dodging and
skidding and never clear. Binky dropped until his hooves grazed the tops
of the pine trees, which bent in his wake. A rumble followed him across
the forest, dragging broken branches and a smoke of snow behind it.
Now they were lower she could see the hunters clearly. They were large
dogs. Their quarry was indistinct, dodging among snowdrifts, keeping to
the cover of snow-laden bushes—
A drift exploded. Something big and long and blue-black rose through the
flying snow like a sounding whale.
“It’s a pig!”
A BOAR. THEY DRIVE IT TOWARD THE CLIFF. THEY’RE DESPERATE NOW.
She could hear the panting of the creature. The dogs made no sound at all.
Blood streamed onto the snow from the wounds they had already managed to
inflict.
“This…boar,” said Susan. “…It’s…”
YES.
“They want to kill the Hogf—”
NOT KILL. HE KNOWS HOW TO DIE. OH, YES…IN THIS SHAPE, HE KNOWS HOW TO DIE.
HE’S HAD A LOT OF EXPERIENCE. NO, THEY WANT TO TAKE AWAY HIS REAL LIFE,
TAKE AWAY HIS SOUL, TAKE AWAY EVERYTHING. THEY MUST NOT BE ALLOWED TO
BRING HIM DOWN.
“Well, stop them!”
YOU MUST. THIS IS A HUMAN THING.
The dogs moved oddly. They weren’t running but flowing, crossing the snow
faster than the mere movement of their legs would suggest.
“They don’t look like real dogs…”
NO.
“What can I do?”
Death nodded his head toward the boar. Binky was keeping level with it
now, barely a few feet away.
Realization dawned.
“I can’t ride that!” said Susan.
WHY NOT? YOU HAVE HAD AN EDUCATION.
“Enough to know that pigs don’t let people ride them!”
MERE ACCUMULATION OF OBSERVATIONAL EVIDENCE IS NOT PROOF.
Susan glanced ahead. The snow field had a cut-off look.
YOU MUST, said her grandfather’s voice in her head. WHEN HE REACHES THE
EDGE THERE HE WILL STAND AT BAY. HE MUST NOT. UNDERSTAND? THESE ARE NOT
REAL DOGS. IF THEY CATCH HIM HE WON’T JUST DIE, HE WILL…NEVER BE…
Susan leapt. For a moment she floated through the air, dress streaming
behind her, arms outstretched…
Landing on the animal’s back was like hitting a very, very firm chair. It
stumbled for a moment and then righted itself.
Susan’s arms clung to its neck and her face was buried in its sharp
bristles. She could feel the heat under her. It was like riding a furnace.
And it stank of sweat, and blood, and pig. A lot of pig.
There was a lack of landscape in front of her.
The boar plowed into the snow on the edge of the drop, almost flinging
her off, and turned to face the hounds.
There were a lot of them. Susan was familiar with dogs. They’d had them
at home like other houses had rugs. And these weren’t that big floppy
sort.
She rammed her heels in and grabbed a pig’s ear in each hand. It was like
holding a pair of hairy shovels.
“Turn left!” she screamed, and hauled.
She put everything into the command. It promised tears before bedtime if
disobeyed.
To her amazement the boar grunted, pranced on the lip of the precipice
and scrambled away, the hounds floundering as they turned to follow.
This was a plateau. From here it seemed to be all edge, with no way down
except the very simple and terminal one.
The dogs were flying at the boar’s heels again.
Susan looked around in the gray, lightless air. There had to be somewhere,
some way…
There was.
It was a shoulder of rock, a giant knife edge connecting this plain to
the hills beyond. It was sharp and narrow, a thin line of snow with
chilly depths on either side.
It was better than nothing. It was nothing with snow on it.
The boar reached the edge and hesitated. Susan put her head down and dug
her heels in again.
Snout down, legs moving like pistons, the beast plunged out onto the
ridge. Snow sprayed up as its trotters sought for purchase. It made up
for lack of grace by sheer manic effort, legs moving like a tap dancer
climbing a moving staircase that was heading down.
“That’s right, that’s right, that’s—”
A trotter slipped. For a moment the boar seemed to stand on two, the
others scrabbling at icy rock. Susan flung herself the other way,
clinging to the neck, and felt the dragging abyss under her feet.
There was nothing there.
She told herself, He’ll catch me if I fall, he’ll catch me if I fall,
he’ll catch me if I fall…
Powdered ice made her eyes sting. A flailing trotter almost slammed
against her head.
An older voice said, No, he won’t. If I fall now I don’t deserve to be
caught.
The creature’s eye was inches away. And then she knew…
…Out of the depths of eyes of all but the most unusual of animals comes
an echo. Out of the dark eye in front of her, someone looked back…
A foot caught the rock and she concentrated her whole being on it,
kicking herself upward in one last effort. Pig and woman rocked for a
moment and then a trotter caught a footing and the boar plunged forward
along the ridge.
Susan risked a look behind.
The dogs still moved oddly. There was a slight jerkiness about their
movements, as if they flowed from position to position rather than moved
by ordinary muscles.
Not dogs, she thought. Dog shapes.
There was another shock underfoot. Snow flew up. The world tilted. She
felt the shape of the boar change when its muscles bunched and sent it
soaring as a slab of ice and rock came away and began the long slide into
darkness.
Susan was thrown off when the creature landed, and tumbled into deep snow.
She flailed around madly, expecting at any minute to begin sliding.
Instead her hand found a snow-encrusted branch. A few feet away the boar
lay on its side, steaming and panting.
She pulled herself upright. The spur here had widened out into a hill,
with a few frosted trees on it.
The dogs had reached the gap and were milling round, struggling to
prevent themselves slipping.
They could easily clear the distance, she could see. Even the boar had
managed it with her on its back. She put both hands around the branch and
heaved; it came away with a crack, like a broken icicle, and she waved it
like a club.
“Come on,” she said. “Jump! Just you try it! Come on!”
One did. The branch caught it as it landed, and then Susan spun and
brought the branch back on the upswing, lifting the dazed animal off its
feet and out over the edge.
For a moment the shape wavered and then, howling, it dropped out of sight.
She danced a few steps of rage and triumph.
“Yes! Yes! Who wants some? Anyone else?”
The other dogs looked her in the eye, decided that no one did, and that
there wasn’t. Finally, after one or two nervous attempts, they managed to
turn, still sliding, and tried to make it back to the plateau.
A figure barred their way.
It hadn’t been there a moment ago but it looked permanent now. It seemed
to have been made of snow, three balls of snow piled on one another. It
had black dots for eyes. A semicircle of more dots formed the semblance
of a mouth. There was a carrot for the nose.
And, for the arms, two twigs.
At this distance, anyway.
One of them was holding a curved stick.
A raven wearing a damp piece of red paper landed on one arm.
“Bob bob bob?” it suggested. “Merry Solstice? Tweetie tweet? What are you
waiting for? Hogswatch?”
The dogs backed away.
The snow broke off the snowman in chunks, revealing a gaunt figure in a
flapping black robe.
Death spat out the carrot.
HO. HO. HO.
The gray bodies smeared and rippled as the hounds sought desperately to
change their shape.
YOU COULDN’T RESIST IT? IN THE END? A MISTAKE, I FANCY.
He touched the scythe. There was a click as the blade flashed into life.
IT GETS UNDER YOUR SKIN, LIFE, said Death, stepping forward. SPEAKING
METAPHORICALLY, OF COURSE. IT’S A HABIT THAT’S HARD TO GIVE UP. ONE PUFF
OF BREATH IS NEVER ENOUGH. YOU’LL FIND YOU WANT TO TAKE ANOTHER.
A dog started to slip on the snow and scrabbled desperately to save
itself from the long, cold drop.
AND, YOU SEE, THE MORE YOU STRUGGLE FOR EVERY MOMENT, THE MORE ALIVE YOU
STAY…WHICH IS WHERE I COME IN, AS A MATTER OF FACT.
The leading dog managed, for a moment, to become a gray cowled figure
before being dragged back into shape.
FEAR, TOO, IS AN ANCHOR, said Death. ALL THOSE SENSES, WIDE OPEN TO EVERY
FRAGMENT OF THE WORLD. THAT BEATING HEART. THAT RUSH OF BLOOD. CAN YOU
NOT FEEL IT, DRAGGING YOU BACK?
Once again the Auditor managed to retain a shape for a few seconds, and
managed to say: You cannot do this, there are rules!
YES. THERE ARE RULES. BUT YOU BROKE THEM. HOW DARE YOU? HOW DARE YOU?
The scythe blade was a thin blue outline in the gray light.
Death raised a thin finger to where his lips might have been, and
suddenly looked thoughtful.
AND NOW THERE REMAINS ONLY ONE FINAL QUESTION, he said.
He raised his hands, and seemed to grow. Light flared in his eye sockets.
When he spoke next, avalanches fell in the mountains.
HAVE YOU BEEN NAUGHTY…OR NICE?
HO. HO. HO.
Susan heard the wails die away.
The boar lay in white snow that was now red with blood. She knelt down
and tried to lift its head.
It was dead. One eye stared at nothing. The tongue lolled.
Sobs welled up inside her. The tiny part of Susan that watched, the inner
baby-sitter, said it was just exhaustion and excitement and the backwash
of adrenaline. She couldn’t be crying over a dead pig.
The rest of her drummed on its flank with both fists.
“No, you can’t! We saved you! Dying isn’t how it’s supposed to go!”
A breeze blew up.
Something stirred in the landscape, something under the snow. The
branches on the ancient trees shook gently, dislodging little needles of
ice.
The sun rose.
The light streamed over Susan like a silent gale. It was dazzling. She
crouched back, raising her forearm to cover her eyes. The great red ball
turned frost to fire along the winter branches.
Gold light slammed into the mountain peaks, making every one a blinding,
silent volcano. It rolled onward, gushing into the valleys and thundering
up the slopes, unstoppable…
There was a groan.
A man lay in the snow where the boar had been.
He was naked except for an animal skin loincloth. His hair was long and
had been woven into a thick plait down his back, so matted with blood and
grease that it looked like felt. And he was bleeding everywhere the
hounds had caught him.
Susan watched for a moment, and then, thinking with something other than
her head, methodically tore some strips from her petticoat to bandage the
more unpleasant wounds.
Capability, said the small part of her mind. A rational head in
emergencies.
Rational something, anyway.
It’s probably some kind of character flaw.
The man was tattooed. Blue whorls and spirals haunted his skin, under the
blood.
He opened his eyes and stared at the sky.
“Can you get up?”
His gaze flicked to her. He tried moving and then fell back.
Eventually she managed to pull the man up into a sitting position. He
swayed as she put one of his arms across her shoulders and then heaved
him to his feet. She did her best to ignore the stink, which had an
almost physical force.
Downhill seemed the best option. Even if his brain wasn’t working yet,
his feet seemed to get the idea.
They lurched down through the freezing woods, the snow glowing orange in
the risen sun. Cold blue gloom lurked in hollows like little cups of
winter.
Beside her, the tattooed man made a gurgling sound. He slipped out of her
grasp and landed on his knees in the snow, clutching at his throat and
choking. His breath sounded like a saw.
“What now? What’s the matter? What’s the matter?”
He rolled his eyes at her and pawed at his throat again.
“Something stuck?” She slapped him as hard as she could on the back, but
now he was on his hands and knees, fighting for breath.
She put her hands under his shoulders and pulled him upright, and put her
arms around his waist. Oh, gods, how was it supposed to go, she’d gone to
classes about it, now, didn’t you have to bunch up one fist and then put
the other hand around it and then pull up and in like this—
The man coughed and something bounced off a tree and landed in the snow.
She knelt down to have a look.
It was a small black bean.
A bird trilled, high on a branch. She looked up. A wren bobbed at her and
fluttered to another twig.
When she looked back, the man was different. He had clothes now, heavy
furs, with a fur hood and fur boots. He was supporting himself on a
stone-tipped spear, and looked a lot stronger.
Something hurried through the wood, barely visible except by its shadow.
For a moment she glimpsed a white hare before it sprang away on a new
path.
She looked back. Now the furs had gone and the man looked older, although
he had the same eyes. He was wearing thick white robes, and looked very
much like a priest.
When a bird called again she didn’t look away. And she realized that
she’d been mistaken in thinking that the man changed like the turning of
pages. All the images were there at once, and many others, too. What you
saw depended on how you looked.
Yes. It’s a good job I’m cool and totally used to this sort of thing, she
thought. Otherwise I’d be rather worried…
Now they were at the edge of the forest.
A little way off, four huge boars stood and steamed, in front of a sleigh
that looked as if it had been put together out of crudely trimmed trees.
There were faces in the blackened wood, possibly carved by stone,
possibly carved by rain and wind.
The Hogfather climbed aboard and sat down. He’d put on weight in the last
few yards and now it was almost impossible to see anything other than the
huge, red-robed man, ice crystals settling here and there on the cloth.
Only in the occasional sparkle of frost was there a hint of hair or tusk.
He shifted on the seat and then reached down to extricate a false beard,
which he held up questioningly.
SORRY, said a voice behind Susan. THAT WAS MINE.
The Hogfather nodded at Death, as one craftsman to another, and then at
Susan. She wasn’t sure if she was being thanked—it was more a gesture of
recognition, of acknowledgment that something that needed doing had
indeed been done. But it felt like thanks.
Then he shook the reins and clicked his teeth and the sleigh slid away.
They watched it go.
“I remember hearing,” said Susan distantly, “that the idea of the
Hogfather wearing a red and white outfit was invented quite recently.”
NO. IT WAS REMEMBERED.
Now the Hogfather was a red dot on the other side of the valley.
“Well, that about wraps it up for this dress,” said Susan. “I’d just like
to ask, just out of academic interest…you were sure I was going to
survive, were you?”
I WAS QUITE CONFIDENT.
“Oh, good.”
I WILL GIVE YOU A LIFT BACK, said Death, after a while.
“Thank you. Now…tell me…”
WHAT WOULD HAVE HAPPENED IF YOU HADN’T SAVED HIM?
“Yes! The sun would have risen just the same, yes?”
NO.
“Oh, come on. You can’t expect me to believe that. It’s an astronomical
fact.”
THE SUN WOULD NOT HAVE RISEN.
She turned on him.
“It’s been a long night, Grandfather! I’m tired and I need a bath! I
don’t need silliness!”
THE SUN WOULD NOT HAVE RISEN.
“Really? Then what would have happened, pray?”
A MERE BALL OF FLAMING GAS WOULD HAVE ILLUMINATED THE WORLD.
They walked in silence for a moment.
“Ah,” said Susan dully. “Trickery with words. I would have thought you’d
have been more literal-minded than that.”
I AM NOTHING IF NOT LITERAL-MINDED. TRICKERY WITH WORDS IS WHERE HUMANS
LIVE.
“All right,” said Susan. “I’m not stupid. You’re saying humans
need…fantasies to make life bearable.”
REALLY? AS IF IT WAS SOME KIND OF PINK PILL? NO. HUMANS NEED FANTASY TO
BE HUMAN. TO BE THE PLACE WHERE THE FALLING ANGEL MEETS THE RISING APE.
“Tooth fairies? Hogfathers? Little—”
YES. AS PRACTICE. YOU HAVE TO START OUT LEARNING TO BELIEVE THE LITTLE
LIES.
“So we can believe the big ones?”
YES. JUSTICE. MERCY. DUTY. THAT SORT OF THING.
“They’re not the same at all!”
YOU THINK SO? THEN TAKE THE UNIVERSE AND GRIND IT DOWN TO THE FINEST
POWDER AND SIEVE IT THROUGH THE FINEST SIEVE AND THEN SHOW ME ONE ATOM OF
JUSTICE, ONE MOLECULE OF MERCY. AND YET—Death waved a hand. AND YET YOU
ACT AS IF THERE IS SOME IDEAL ORDER IN THE WORLD, AS IF THERE IS
SOME…SOME RIGHTNESS IN THE UNIVERSE BY WHICH IT MAY BE JUDGED.
“Yes, but people have got to believe that, or what’s the point—”
MY POINT EXACTLY.
She tried to assemble her thoughts.
THERE IS A PLACE WHERE TWO GALAXIES HAVE BEEN COLLIDING FOR A MILLION
YEARS, said Death, apropos of nothing. DON’T TRY TO TELL ME THAT’S RIGHT.
“Yes, but people don’t think about that,” said Susan. “Somewhere there
was a bed…”
CORRECT. STARS EXPLODE, WORLDS COLLIDE, THERE’S HARDLY ANYWHERE IN THE
UNIVERSE WHERE HUMANS CAN LIVE WITHOUT BEING FROZEN OR FRIED, AND YET YOU
BELIEVE THAT A…A BED IS A NORMAL THING. IT IS THE MOST AMAZING TALENT.
“Talent?”
OH, YES. A VERY SPECIAL KIND OF STUPIDITY. YOU THINK THE WHOLE UNIVERSE
IS INSIDE YOUR HEADS.
“You make us sound mad,” said Susan. A nice warm bed…
NO. YOU NEED TO BELIEVE IN THINGS THAT AREN’T TRUE. HOW ELSE CAN THEY
BECOME? said Death, helping her up onto Binky.
“These mountains,” said Susan, as the horse rose. “Are they real
mountains, or some sort of shadows?”
YES.
Susan knew that was all she was going to get.
“Er…I lost the sword. It’s somewhere in the Tooth Fairy’s country.”
Death shrugged. I CAN MAKE ANOTHER.
“Can you?”
OH, YES. IT WILL GIVE ME SOMETHING TO DO. DON’T WORRY ABOUT IT.
The Senior Wrangler hummed cheerfully to himself as he ran a comb through
his beard for the second time and liberally sprinkled it with what would
turn out to be a preparation of weasel extract for demon removal rather
than, as he had assumed, a pleasant masculine scent.* Then he stepped out
into his study.
“Sorry for the delay, but—” he began.
There was no one there. Only, very far off, the sound of someone blowing
their nose mingling with the glingleglingleglingle of fading magic.
The light was already gilding the top of the Tower of Art when Binky
trotted to a standstill on the air beside the nursery balcony. Susan
climbed down onto the fresh snow and stood uncertainly for a moment. When
someone has gone out of their way to drop you home it’s only courteous to
ask them in. On the other hand…
WOULD YOU LIKE TO VISIT FOR HOGSWATCH DINNER? said Death. He sounded
hopeful. ALBERT IS FRYING A PUDDING.
“Frying a pudding?”
ALBERT UNDERSTANDS FRYING. AND I BELIEVE HE’S MAKING JAM. HE CERTAINLY
KEPT TALKING ABOUT IT.
“I…er…they’re really expecting me here,” said Susan. “The Gaiters do a
lot of entertaining. His business friends. Probably the whole day will
be…I’ll more or less have to look after the children…”
SOMEONE SHOULD.
“Er…would you like a drink before you go?” said Susan, giving in.
A CUP OF COCOA WOULD BE APPROPRIATE IN THE CIRCUMSTANCES.
“Right. There’s biscuits in the tin on the mantelpiece.”
Susan headed with relief into the tiny kitchen.
Death sat down in the creaking wicker chair, buried his feet in the rug
and looked around with interest. He heard the clatter of cups, and then a
sound like indrawn breath, and then silence.
Death helped himself to a biscuit from the tin. There were two full
stockings hanging from the mantelpiece. He prodded them with professional
satisfaction, and then sat down again and observed the nursery wallpaper.
It seemed to be pictures of rabbits in waistcoats, among other fauna. He
was not surprised. Death occasionally turned up in person even for
rabbits, simply to see that the whole process was working properly. He’d
never seen one wearing a waistcoat. He wouldn’t have expected waistcoats.
At least, he wouldn’t have expected waistcoats if he hadn’t had some
experience of the way humans portrayed the universe. As it was, it was
only a blessing they hadn’t been given gold watches and top hats as well.
Humans liked dancing pigs, too. And lambs in hats. As far as Death was
aware, the sole reason for any human association with pigs and lambs was
as a prelude to chops and sausages. Quite why they should dress up for
children’s wallpaper as well was a mystery. Hello, little folk, this is
what you’re going to eat…He felt that if only he could find the key to it,
he’d know a lot more about human beings.
His gaze traveled to the door. Susan’s governess coat and hat were
hanging on it. The coat was gray, and so was the hat. Gray and round and
dull. Death didn’t know many things about the human psyche, but he did
know protective coloration when he saw it.
Dullness. Only humans could have invented it. What imaginations they had.
The door opened.
To his horror, Death saw a small child of unidentifiable sex come out of
the bedroom, amble sleepily across the floor and unhook the stockings
from the mantelpiece. It was halfway back before it noticed him and then
it simply stopped and regarded him thoughtfully.
He knew that young children could see him because they hadn’t yet
developed that convenient and selective blindness that comes with the
intimation of personal mortality. He felt a little embarrassed.
“Susan’s gotta poker, you know,” it said, as if anxious to be helpful.
WELL, WELL. INDEED. MY GOODNESS ME.
“I fort—thought all of you knew that now. Larst—last week she picked a
bogey up by its nose.”
Death tried to imagine this. He felt sure he’d heard the sentence wrong,
but it didn’t sound a whole lot better however he rearranged the words.
“I’ll give Gawain his stocking and then I’ll come an’ watch,” said the
child. It padded out.
ER…SUSAN? Death said, calling in reinforcements.
Susan backed out of the kitchen, a black kettle in her hand.
There was a figure behind her. In the half-light the sword gleamed blue
along its blade. Its glitter reflected off one glass eye.
“Well, well,” said Teatime, quietly, glancing at Death. “Now this is
unexpected. A family affair?”
The sword hummed back and forth.
“I wonder,” said Teatime, “is it possible to kill Death? This must be a
very special sword and it certainly works here…” He raised a hand to his
mouth for a moment and gave a little chuckle. “And of course it might
well not be regarded as murder. Possibly it is a civic act. It would be,
as they say, The Big One. Stand up, sir. You may have some personal
knowledge about your vulnerability but I’m pretty certain that Susan here
would quite definitely die, so I’d rather you didn’t try any last-minute
stuff.”
I AM LAST-MINUTE STUFF, said Death, standing up.
Teatime circled around carefully, the sword’s tip making little curves in
the air.
From the next room came the sound of someone trying to blow a whistle
quietly.
Susan glanced at her grandfather.
“I don’t remember them asking for anything that made a noise,” she said.
OH, THERE HAS TO BE SOMETHING IN THE STOCKING THAT MAKES A NOISE, said
Death. OTHERWISE WHAT IS 4:30 A.M. FOR?
“There are children?” said Teatime. “Oh, yes, of course. Call them.”
“Certainly not!”
“It will be instructive,” said Teatime. “Educational. And when your
adversary is Death, you cannot help but be the good guy.”
He pointed the sword at Susan.
“I said call them.”
Susan glanced hopefully at her grandfather. He nodded. For a moment she
thought she saw the glow in one eye socket flicker off and on, Death’s
equivalent of a wink. He’s got a plan. He can stop time. He can do
anything. He’s got a plan.
“Gawain? Twyla?”
The muffled noises stopped in the next room. There was a padding of feet
and two solemn faces appeared round the door.
“Ah, come in, come in, curly haired tots,” said Teatime genially.
Gawain gave him a steely stare.
His next mistake, thought Susan. If he’d called them little bastards he’d
have them bang on his side. But they know when you’re sending them up.
“I’ve caught this bogeyman,” said Teatime. “What shall we do with him,
eh?”
The two faces turned to Death. Twyla put her thumb in her mouth.
“It’s only a skeleton,” said Gawain critically.
Susan opened her mouth, and the sword swung toward her. She shut it again.
“Yes, a nasty, creepy, horrible skeleton,” said Teatime. “Scary, eh?”
There was a very faint pop as Twyla took her thumb out of her mouth.
“He’s eating a bittit,” she said.
“Biscuit,” Susan corrected automatically. She started to swing the kettle
in an absentminded way.
“A creepy bony man in a black robe!” said Teatime, aware that things
weren’t going in quite the right direction.
He spun round to face Susan. “You’re fidgeting with that kettle,” he said.
“So I expect you’re thinking of doing something creative. Put it down,
please. Slowly.”
Susan knelt down gently and put the kettle on the hearth.
“Huh, that’s not very creepy, it’s just bones,” said Gawain dismissively.
“And anyway Willie the groom down at the stables has promised me a real
horse skull. And anyway I’m going to make a hat out of it like General
Tacticus had when he wanted to frighten people. And anyway it’s just
standing there. It’s not even making woo-woo noises. And anyway you’re
creepy. Your eye’s weird.”
“Really? Then let’s see how creepy I can be,” said Teatime. Blue fire
crackled along the sword as he raised it.
Susan closed her hand over the poker.
Teatime saw her start to turn. He stepped behind Death, sword raised…
Susan threw the poker overarm. It made a ripping noise as it shot through
the air, and trailed sparks.
It hit Death’s robe and vanished.
He blinked.
Teatime smiled at Susan.
He turned and peered dreamily at the sword in his hand.
It fell out of his fingers.
Death turned and caught it by the handle as it tumbled, and turned its
fall into an upward curve.
Teatime looked down at the poker in his chest as he folded up.
“Oh, no,” he said. “It couldn’t have gone through you. There are so many
ribs and things!”
There was another pop as Twyla extracted her thumb and said, “It only
kills monsters.”
“Stop time now,” commanded Susan.
Death snapped his fingers. The room took on the grayish purple of
stationary time. The clock paused its ticking.
“You winked at me! I thought you had a plan!”
INDEED. OH, YES. I PLANNED TO SEE WHAT YOU WOULD DO.
“Just that?”
YOU ARE VERY RESOURCEFUL. AND OF COURSE YOU HAVE HAD AN EDUCATION.
“What?”
I DID ADD THE SPARKLY STARS AND THE NOISE, THOUGH. I THOUGHT THEY WOULD
BE APPROPRIATE.
“And if I hadn’t done anything?”
I DARESAY I WOULD HAVE THOUGHT OF SOMETHING. AT THE LAST MINUTE.
“That was the last minute!”
THERE IS ALWAYS TIME FOR ANOTHER LAST MINUTE.
“The children had to watch that!”
EDUCATIONAL. THE WORLD WILL TEACH THEM ABOUT MONSTERS SOON ENOUGH. LET
THEM REMEMBER THERE’S ALWAYS THE POKER.
“But they saw he’s human—”
I THINK THEY HAD A VERY GOOD IDEA OF WHAT HE WAS.
Death prodded the fallen Teatime with his foot.
STOP PLAYING DEAD, MISTER TEH-AH-TIM-EH.
The ghost of the Assassin sprang up like a jack-in-the-box, all slightly
crazed smiles.
“You got it right!”
OF COURSE.
Teatime began to fade.
I’LL TAKE THE BODY, said Death. THAT WILL PREVENT INCONVENIENT QUESTIONS.
“What did he do it all for?” said Susan. “I mean, why? Money? Power?”
SOME PEOPLE WILL DO ANYTHING FOR THE SHEER FASCINATION OF DOING IT, said
Death. OR FOR FAME. OR BECAUSE THEY SHOULDN’T.
Death picked up the corpse and slung it over his shoulder. There was a
sound of something bouncing on the hearth. He turned, and hesitated.
ER…YOU DID KNOW THE POKER WOULD GO THROUGH ME?
Susan realized she was shaking.
“Of course. In this room it’s pretty powerful.”
YOU WERE NEVER IN ANY DOUBT?
Susan hesitated, and then smiled.
“I was quite confident,” she said.
AH. Her grandfather stared at her for a moment and she thought she
detected just the tiniest flicker of uncertainty. OF COURSE. OF COURSE.
TELL ME, ARE YOU LIKELY TO TAKE UP TEACHING ON A LARGER SCALE?
“I hadn’t planned to.”
Death turned toward the balcony, and then seemed to remember something
else. He fumbled inside his robe.
I HAVE MADE THIS FOR YOU.
She reached out and took a square of damp cardboard. Water dripped off
the bottom. Somewhere in the middle, a few brown feathers seemed to have
been glued on.
“Thank you. Er…what is it?”
ALBERT SAID THERE OUGHT TO BE SNOW ON IT, BUT IT APPEARS TO HAVE MELTED,
said Death. IT IS, OF COURSE, A HOGSWATCH CARD.
“Oh…”
THERE SHOULD HAVE BEEN A ROBIN ON IT AS WELL, BUT I HAD CONSIDERABLE
DIFFICULTY IN GETTING IT TO STAY ON.
“Ah…”
IT WAS NOT AT ALL CO-OPERATIVE.
“Really…?”
IT DID NOT SEEM TO GET INTO THE HOGSWATCH SPIRIT AT ALL.
“Oh. Er. Good. Granddad?”
YES?
“Why? I mean, why did you do all this?”
He stood quite still for a moment, as if he was trying out sentences in
his mind.
I THINK IT’S SOMETHING TO DO WITH HARVESTS, he said at last. YES. THAT’S
RIGHT. AND BECAUSE HUMANS ARE SO INTERESTING THAT THEY HAVE EVEN INVENTED
DULLNESS. QUITE ASTONISHING.
“Oh.”
WELL THEN…HAPPY HOGSWATCH.
“Yes. Happy Hogswatch.”
Death paused again, at the window.
AND GOOD NIGHT, CHILDREN…EVERYWHERE.
The raven fluttered down onto a log covered in snow. Its prosthetic red
breast had been torn and fluttered uselessly behind it.
“Not so much as a lift home,” it muttered. “Look at this, willya? Snow
and frozen wastes, everywhere. I couldn’t fly another damn inch. I could
starve to death here, you know? Hah! People’re going on about recycling
the whole time, but you just try a bit of practical ecology and they
just…don’t…want…to…know. Hah! I bet a robin’d have a lift home. Oh, yes.”
SQUEAK, said the Death of Rats sympathetically, and sniffed.
The raven watched the small hooded figure scrabble at the snow.
“So I’ll just freeze to death here, shall I?” it said gloomily. “A
pathetic bundle of feathers with my little feet curled up with the cold.
It’s not even as if I’m gonna make anyone a good meal, and let me tell
you it’s a disgrace to die thin in my spec—”
It became aware that under the snow was a rather grubbier whiteness.
Further scraping by the rat exposed something that could very possibly
have been an ear.
The raven stared. “It’s a sheep!” it said.
The Death of Rats nodded.
“A whole sheep!”*
SQUEAK.
“Oh, wow!” said the raven, hopping forward with its eyes spinning. “Hey,
it’s barely cool!”
The Death of Rats patted it happily on a wing.
SQUEAK-EEK. EEK-SQUEAK…
“Why, thanks. And the same to you…”
Far, far away and a long, long time ago, a shop door opened. The little
toy maker bustled in from the workshop in the rear, and then stopped,
with amazing foresight, dead.
YOU HAVE A BIG WOODEN ROCKING HORSE IN THE WINDOW, said the new customer.
“Ah, yes, yes, yes.” The shopkeeper fiddled nervously with his squarerimmed
spectacles. He hadn’t heard the bell, and this was worrying him.
“But I’m afraid that’s just for show, that is a special order for Lord—”
NO. I WILL BUY IT.
“No, because, you see—”
THERE ARE OTHER TOYS?
“Yes, indeed, but—”
THEN I WILL TAKE THE HORSE. HOW MUCH WOULD THIS LORDSHIP HAVE PAID YOU?
“Er, we’d agreed twelve dollars but—”
I WILL GIVE YOU FIFTY, said the customer.
The little shopkeeper stopped in mid-remonstrate and started up in midgreed.
There were other toys, he told himself quickly. And this customer,
he thought with considerable prescience, looked like someone who did not
take no for an answer and seldom even bothered to ask the question. Lord
Selachii would be angry, but Lord Selachii wasn’t here. The stranger, on
the other hand, was here. Incredibly here.
“Er…well, in the circumstances…er…shall I wrap it up for you?”
NO. I WILL TAKE IT AS IT IS. THANK YOU. I WILL LEAVE VIA THE BACK WAY, IF
IT’S ALL THE SAME TO YOU.
“Er…how did you get in?” said the shopkeeper, pulling the horse out of
the window.
THROUGH THE WALL. SO MUCH MORE CONVENIENT THAN CHIMNEYS, DON’T YOU THINK?
The apparition dropped a small clinking bag on the counter and lifted the
horse easily. The shopkeeper wasn’t in a position to hold onto anything.
Even yesterday’s dinner was threatening to leave him.
The figure looked at the other shelves.
YOU MAKE GOOD TOYS.
“Er…thank you.”
INCIDENTALLY, said the customer, as he left, THERE IS A SMALL BOY OUT
THERE WITH HIS NOSE FROZEN TO THE WINDOW. SOME WARM WATER SHOULD DO THE
TRICK.
Death walked out to where Binky was waiting in the snow and tied the toy
horse behind the saddle.
ALBERT WILL BE VERY PLEASED. I CAN’T WAIT TO SEE HIS FACE. HO. HO. HO.
As the light of Hogswatch slid down the towers of Unseen University, the
Librarian slipped into the Great Hall with some sheet music clenched
firmly in his feet.
As the light of Hogswatch lit the towers of Unseen University, the
Archchancellor sat down with a sigh in his study and pulled off his boots.
It had been a damn long night, no doubt about it. Lots of strange things.
First time he’d ever seen the Senior Wrangler burst into tears, for one
thing.
Ridcully glanced at the door to the new bathroom. Well, he’d sorted out
the teething troubles, and a nice warm shower would be very refreshing.
And then he could go along to the organ recital all nice and clean.
He removed his hat, and someone fell out of it with a tinkling sound. A
small gnome rolled across the floor.
“Oh, another one. I thought we’d got rid of you fellows,” said Ridcully.
“And what are you?”
The gnome looked at him nervously.
“Er…you know whenever there was another magical appearance you heard the
sound of, er, bells?” it said. Its expression suggested it was owning up
to something it just knew was going to get it a smack.
“Yes?”
The gnome held up some rather small hand bells and waved them nervously.
They went glingleglingleglingle, in a very sad way.
“Good, eh? That was me. I’m the Glingleglingleglingle Fairy.”
“Get out.”
“I also do sparkly fairy dust effects that go twing too, if you like…”
“Go away!”
“How about ‘The Bells of St. Ungulant’s’?” said the gnome desperately.
“Very seasonal. Very nice. Why not join in? It goes: ‘The bells [clong]
of St. [clang]…’”
Ridcully scored a direct hit with the rubber duck, and the gnome escaped
through the bath overflow. Cursing and spontaneous hand bell ringing
echoed away down the pipes.
In perfect peace at last, the Archchancellor pulled off his robe.
The organ’s storage tanks were wheezing at the rivets by the time the
Librarian had finished pumping. Satisfied, he knuckled his way up to the
seat and paused to survey, with great satisfaction, the keyboards in
front of him.
Bloody Stupid Johnson’s approach to music was similar to his approach in
every field that was caressed by his genius in the same way that a potato
field is touched by a late frost. Make it loud, he said. Make it wide.
Make it all-embracing. And thus the Great Organ of Unseen University was
the only one in the world where you could play an entire symphony scored
for thunderstorm and squashed toad noises.
Warm water cascaded off Mustrum Ridcully’s pointy bathing cap.
Mr. Johnson had, surely not on purpose, designed a perfect bathroom—at
least, perfect for singing in. Echoes and resonating pipeways smoothed
out all those little imperfections and gave even the weediest singer a
rolling, dark brown voice.
And so Ridcully sang.
“—as I walked out one dadadadada for to something or other and to take
the dadada, I did espy a fair pretty may-ay-den I think it was, and I—”
The organ pipes hummed with pent-up energy. The Librarian cracked his
knuckles. This took some time. Then he pulled the pressure release valve.
The hum became an urgent thrumming.
Very carefully, he let in the clutch.
Ridcully stopped singing as the tones of the organ came through the wall.
Bath-time music, eh? he thought. Just the job.
It was a shame it was muffled by all the bathroom fixtures, though.
It was at this point he espied a small lever marked “Musical pipes.”
Ridcully, never being a man to wonder what any kind of switch did when it
was so much easier and quicker to find out by pulling it, did so. But
instead of the music he was expecting he was rewarded simply with several
large panels sliding silently aside, revealing row upon row of brass
nozzles.
The Librarian was lost now, dreaming on the wings of music. His hands and
feet danced over the keyboards, picking their way toward the crescendo
which ended the first movement of Bubbla’s Catastrophe Suite.
One foot kicked the “Afterburner” lever and the other spun the valve of
the nitrous oxide cylinder.
Ridcully tapped the nozzles.
Nothing happened. He looked at the controls again, and realized that he’d
never pulled the little brass lever marked “Organ Interlock.”
He did so. This did not cause a torrent of pleasant bath-time
accompaniment, however. There was merely a thud and a distant gurgling,
which grew in volume.
He gave up, and went back to soaping his chest.
“—running of the deer, the playing of…huh? What—”
Later that day he had the bathroom nailed up again and a notice placed on
the door, on which was written:
“Not to be used in any circumstances. This is IMPORTANT.”
However, when Modo nailed the door up he didn’t hammer the nails in all
the way but left just a bit sticking up so that his pliers would grip
later on, when he was told to remove them. He never presumed and he never
complained, he just had a good working knowledge of the wizardly mind.
They never did find the soap.
Ponder and his fellow students watched Hex carefully.
“It can’t just, you know, stop,” said Adrian “Mad Drongo” Turnipseed.
“The ants are just standing still,” said Ponder. He sighed. “All right,
put the wretched thing back.”
Adrian carefully replaced the small fluffy teddy bear above Hex’s
keyboard. Things immediately began to whir. The ants started to trot
again. The mouse squeaked.
They’d tried this three times.
Ponder looked again at the single sentence Hex had written.
+++ Mine! Waaaah! +++
“I don’t actually think,” he said, gloomily, “that I want to tell the
Archchancellor that this machine stops working if we take its fluffy
teddy bear away. I just don’t think I want to live in that kind of world.”
“Er,” said Mad Drongo, “you could always, you know, sort of say it needs
to work with the FTB enabled…?”
“You think that’s better?” said Ponder, reluctantly. It wasn’t as if it
was even a very realistic interpretation of a bear.
“You mean, better than ‘fluffy teddy bear’?”
Ponder nodded. “It’s better,” he said.
Of all the presents he got from the Hogfather, Gawain told Susan, the
best of all was the marble.
And she’d said, what marble?
And he’d said, the glass marble I found in the fireplace. It wins all the
games. It seems to move in a different way.
The beggars walked their erratic and occasionally backward walk along the
city streets, while fresh morning snow began to fall.
Occasionally one of them belched happily. They all wore paper hats,
except for Foul Ole Ron, who’d eaten his.
A tin can was passed from hand to hand. It contained a mixture of fine
wines and spirits and something in a can that Arnold Sideways had stolen
from behind a paint factory in Phedre Road.
“The goose was good,” said the Duck Man, picking his teeth.
“I’m surprised you et it, what with that duck on your head,” said Coffin
Henry, picking his nose.
“What duck?” said the Duck Man.
“What were that greasy stuff?” said Arnold Sideways.
“That, my dear fellow, was pâté de foie gras. All the way from Genua,
I’ll wager. And very good, too.”
“Dun’arf make you fart, don’t it?”
“Ah, the world of haute cuisine,” said the Duck Man happily.
They reached, by fits and starts, the back door of their favorite
restaurant. The Duck Man looked at it dreamily, eyes filmy with
recollection.
“I used to dine here almost every night,” he said.
“Why’d you stop?” said Coffin Henry.
“I…I don’t really know,” said the Duck Man. “It’s…rather a blur, I’m
afraid. Back in the days when I…think I was someone else. But still,” he
said, patting Arnold’s head, “as they say, ‘Better a meal of old boots
where friendship is, than a stalled ox and hatred therewith.’ Forward,
please, Ron.”
They positioned Foul Ole Ron in front of the back door and then knocked
on it. When a waiter opened it Foul Ole Ron grinned at him, exposing what
remained of his teeth and his famous halitosis, which was still all there.
“Millennium hand and shrimp!” he said, touching his forelock.
“Compliments of the season,” the Duck Man translated.
The man went to shut the door but Arnold Sideways was ready for him and
had wedged his boot in the crack.*
“We thought you might like us to come round at lunchtime and sing a merry
Hogswatch glee for your customers,” said the Duck Man. Beside him, Coffin
Henry began one of his volcanic bouts of coughing, which even sounded
green. “No charge, of course.”
“It being Hogswatch,” said Arnold.
The beggars, despite being too disreputable even to belong to the Beggars’
Guild, lived quite well by their own low standards. This was generally by
careful application of the Certainty Principle. People would give them
all sorts of things if they were certain to go away.
A few minutes later they wandered off again, pushing a happy Arnold who
was surrounded by hastily wrapped packages.
“People can be so kind,” said the Duck Man.
“Millennium hand and shrimp.”
Arnold started to investigate the charitable donations as they maneuvered
his trolley through the slush and drifts.
“Tastes…sort of familiar,” he said.
“Familiar like what?”
“Like mud and old boots.”
“Garn! That’s posh grub, that is.”
“Yeah, yeah…” Arnold chewed for a while. “You don’t think we’ve become
posh all of a sudden?”
“Dunno. You posh, Ron?”
“Buggrit.”
“Yep. Sounds posh to me.”
The snow began to settle gently on the River Ankh.
“Still…Happy New Year, Arnold.”
“Happy New Year, Duck Man. And your duck.”
“What duck?”
“Happy New Year, Henry.”
“Happy New Year, Ron.”
“Buggrem!”
“And god bless us, every one,” said Arnold Sideways.
The curtain of snow hid them from view.
“Which god?”
“Dunno. What’ve you got?”
“Duck Man?”
“Yes, Henry?”
“You know that stalled ox you mentioned?”
“Yes, Henry?”
“How come it’d stalled? Run out of grass, or something?”
“Ah…it was more a figure of speech, Henry.”
“Not an ox?”
“Not exactly. What I meant was—”
And then there was only the snow.
After a while, it began to melt in the sun.
*That is to say, those who deserve to shed blood. Or possibly not. You
never quite know with some kids.
* This exchange contains almost all you need to know about human
civilization. At least, those bits of it that are now under the sea,
fenced off or still smoking.
* It’s a sad and terrible thing that high-born folk really have thought
that the servants would be totally fooled if spirits were put into
decanters that were cunningly labeled backward. And also throughout
history the more politically conscious butler has taken it on trust, and
with rather more justification, that his employers will not notice if the
whiskey is topped up with eniru.
* Peachy was not someone you generally asked questions of, except the
sort that go like: “If-if-if-if I give you all my money could you
possibly not break the other leg, thank you so much?”
* Chickenwire had got his name from his own individual contribution to
the science of this very specialized “concrete overshoe” form of waste
disposal. An unfortunate drawback of the process was the tendency for
bits of the client to eventually detach and float to the surface, causing
much comment in the general population. Enough chicken wire, he’d pointed
out, would solve that, while also allowing the ingress of crabs and fish
going about their vital recycling activities.
† Ankh-Morpork’s underworld, which was so big that the over-world floated
around on top of it like a very small hen trying to mother a nest of
ostrich chicks, already had Big Dave, Fat Dave, Mad Dave, Wee Davey, and
Lanky Dai. Everyone had to find their niche.
* This is very similar to the suggestion put forward by the Quirmian
philosopher Ventre, who said, “Possibly the gods exist, and possibly they
do not. So why not believe in them in any case? If it’s all true you’ll
go to a lovely place when you die, and if it isn’t then you’ve lost
nothing, right?” When he died he woke up in a circle of gods holding
nasty-looking sticks and one of them said, “We’re going to show you what
we think of Mr. Clever Dick in these parts…”
* He’d done his best. But black and purple and vomit yellow weren’t a
good color combination for paper chains, and no Hogswatch fairy doll
should be nailed up by its head.
* Such as the Electric Drill Chuck Key Fairy.
* Who was (according to Sideney’s mother) a bit of a catch since her
father owned a half-share in an eel pie shop in Gleam Street, you must
know her, got all her own teeth and a wooden leg you’d hardly notice, got
a sister called Continence, lovely girl, why didn’t she invite her along
for tea next time he was over, not that she hardly saw her son the big
wizard at all these days, but you never knew and if the magic thing
didn’t work out then a quarter-share in a thriving eel pie business was
not to be sneezed at…
* Not, that is, things that he wanted to do, or wanted done to him. Just
things that he dreamed of, in the armpit of a bad night.
*In fact, when she was eight she’d found a collection of animal skulls in
an attic, relict of some former duke of an inquiring turn of mind. Her
father had been a bit preoccupied with affairs of state and she’d made
twenty-seven dollars before being found out. The hippopotamus molar had,
with hindsight, been a mistake.
Skulls never frightened her, even then.
* The CEH was always ready to fight for the rights of the differently
tall, and was not put off by the fact that most pixies and gnomes weren’t
the least interested in dressing up in little pointy hats with bells on
when there were other far more interesting things to do. All that tinklywee
stuff was for the old folks back home in the forest—when a tiny man
hit Ankh-Morpork he preferred to get drunk, kick some serious ankle and
search for tiny women. In fact the CEH now had to spend so much time
explaining to people that they hadn’t got enough rights that they barely
had any time left to fight for them.
* Often they lived to a time scale to suit themselves. Many of the senior
ones, of course, lived entirely in the past, but several were like the
Professor of Anthropics, who had invented an entire temporal system based
on the belief that all the other ones were a mere illusion. Many people
are aware of the Weak and Strong Anthropic Principles. The Weak One says,
basically, that it was jolly amazing of the universe to be constructed in
such a way that humans could evolve to a point where they make a living
in, for example, universities, while the Strong One says that, on the
contrary, the whole point of the universe was that humans should not only
work in universities but also write for huge sums books with words like
“Cosmic” and “Chaos” in the titles.†The UU Professor of Anthropics had
developed the Special and Inevitable Anthropic Principle, which was that
the entire reason for the existence of the universe was the eventual
evolution of the UU Professor of Anthropics. But this was only a formal
statement of the theory which absolutely everyone, with only some minor
details of a “Fill in name here” nature, secretly believes to be true.
† And they are correct. The universe clearly operates for the benefit of
humanity. This can be readily seen from the convenient way the sun comes
up in the morning, when people are ready to start the day.
*The ceremony still carries on, of course. If you left off traditions
because you didn’t know why they started you’d be no better than a
foreigner.
* Ignorant: a state of not knowing what a pronoun is, or how to find the
square root of 27.4, and merely knowing childish and useless things like
which of the seventy almost identical-looking species of the purple sea
snake are the deadly ones, how to treat the poisonous pith of the Sagosago
tree to make a nourishing gruel, how to foretell the weather by the
movements of the tree-climbing Burglar Crab, how to navigate across a
thousand miles of featureless ocean by means of a piece of string and a
small clay model of your grandfather, how to get essential vitamins from
the liver of the ferocious Ice Bear, and other such trivial matters. It’s
a strange thing that when everyone becomes educated, everyone knows about
the pronoun but no one knows about the Sago-sago.
*† Credulous: having views about the world, the universe and humanity’s
place in it that are shared only by very unsophisticated people and the
most intelligent and advanced mathematicians and physicists.
*It’s amazing how good governments are, given their track record in
almost every other field, at hushing up things like alien encounters.
One reason may be that the aliens themselves are too embarrassed to talk
about it.
It’s not known why most of the space-going races of the universe want to
undertake rummaging in Earthling underwear as a prelude to formal contact.
But representatives of several hundred races have taken to hanging out,
unsuspected by one another, in rural corners of the planet and, as a
result of this, keep on abducting other would-be abductees. Some have
been in fact abducted while waiting to carry out an abduction on a couple
of other aliens trying to abduct the aliens who were, as a result of
misunderstood instructions, trying to form cattle into circles and
mutilate crops.
The planet Earth is now banned to all alien races until they can compare
notes and find out how many, if any, real humans they have actually got.
It is gloomily suspected that there is only one—who is big, hairy and has
very large feet.
The truth may be out there, but lies are inside your head.
*“The red rosy hen greets the dawn of the day.” In fact the hen is not
the bird traditionally associated with heralding a new sunrise, but Mrs.
Huggs, while collecting many old folk songs for posterity, has taken care
to rewrite them where necessary to avoid, as she put it, “offending those
of a refined disposition with unwarranted coarseness.” Much to her
surprise, people often couldn’t spot the unwarranted coarseness until it
had been pointed out to them.
Sometimes a chicken is nothing but a bird.
* He’d have to admit that the answer would be “five and a bit,” but at
least he could come up with it.
*It had been Ma Lilywhite’s dying wish, although she hadn’t known it at
the time. Her last words to her son were “You try and get to the horses,
I’ll try to hold ’em off on the stairs, and if anything happens to me,
take care of the dummy!”
*They generally know in time to have their best robe cleaned, do some
serious damage to the wine cellar and have a really good last meal. It’s
a nicer version of Death Row, with the bonus of no lawyers.
*It was, in fact, a pleasant masculine scent. But only to female weasels.
* Which had died in its sleep. Of natural causes. At a great age. After a
long and happy life, insofar as a sheep can be happy. And would probably
be quite pleased to know that it could help somebody as it passed away.
*Arnold had no legs but, since there were many occasions when a boot was
handy on the streets, Coffin Henry had affixed one to the end of a pole
for him. He was deadly with it, and any muggers hard-pressed enough to
try to rob the beggars often found themselves kicked on the top of the
head by a man three feet high.
